le they can
hiss and scribble as much as they please. In the course of the
summer my "Faust" and "Dante" Symphonies will be published by
Hartel, together with a couple of new Symphonic Poems. The "Faust
Symphony" is dedicated to Berlioz, and the "Dante" to Wagner. I
am sending them to you, dear friend, with the two pianoforte
arrangements, with the risk that nothing will please you in them,
which however will not prevent us from being good friends. You
may rest assured that I shall always be grateful to you for the
friendliness you have shown me in past years, and that I would
never attempt to compromise you with my future. For the latter I
alone can and must care.

Please then make my best excuses to Herr * * *, whose kind letter
has, alas! cost me much useless searching, and continue your
personal well-wishing to your ever faithful friend (though fallen
in musical esteem and under your ban),

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 1st, 1858



196. To Professor L. A. Zellner in Vienna

You may believe me, dear friend, when I tell you that all the
disagreeables and vexations which the preparations for the
performance of my Mass [The Gran Festival Mass.] draw upon you
are the most acutely felt by myself. Do you really think it is
desirable to go against trifles of this sort and openly to fight
them? I should not like to decide this "a distance"; but I
promise you that I will not leave you in the lurch if in the end
the indispensable invitation to me follows. The concert at Prague
is to take place on the 12th of March, and I invite you to it.
Then after that I can travel with you on the 14th to Vienna or
return to Weymar. But I hope the former. I have nothing whatever
to say against the invitation of the Pest singers, because the
four persons have remained in my friendly remembrance. Yet I must
remark that the performance of the solos in my Mass offers no
special difficulties, and that consequently it could be quite
suitably and satisfactorily given by Vienna singers, which seems
both simpler and pleasanter. Herr Dr. Gunz, Herr Panzer, and
Fraulein Huber are quite satisfactory to me as soloists, as also
Fraulein Friedlowsky, of whom I have heard the highest praise as
Elizabeth. The tenor and alto are the chief people concerned, as
they have the principal subject in the Kyrie and Benedictus. If
we have two rehearsals with pianoforte, which I shall have great
pleasure in holding with the ladies and gentlemen myself, we
shall thoroughly get to the bottom of it; and if the singers have
steadfastness enough to make an effect with their part the thing
will go of itself.

With regard to the chorus and orchestra I reserve it to myself to
express my thanks to Hellmesberger and the chorus-directors in
writing, as soon as I have definite tidings. But to you, dear
friend, I can only repeat that he who will understand me loves me
also--and that I remain,

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 8th, 1858



197. To Peter Cornelius in Mainz

[Weimar,] February 19th, 1858

It is very bad, dearest Cornelius, that you have so long forsaken
us! Much as I must approve of your decision to finish writing
your Opera ["Der Barbier von Baghdad"] completely, yet I am
dreadfully sorry to be without you for so many months. I did hope
that you would be with us on the 18th of February for certain;
now you announce yourself for the middle of March, at which time
I shall probably not be here. On the 12th of March I conduct a
concert at Prague, at which the "Ideale" and the "Dante Symphony"
will be given. Thence I proceed to Vienna, and later to
Loewenberg (in Silesia) to my noble and most amiable patron
Prince Hohenzollern-Hechingen, who, in spite of political
changes, has not only retained his Hechingen orchestra, but has
also increased it by fresh members.

I wish I could give you better tidings of my work, best friend,
than I am able to do. The last few months have passed without my
being able to do any steady work at my writing. I have merely
sketched and patched.

By May will appear a new edition of the Kuenstler-Chor (with some
important simplifications and improvements), and shortly after
that the volume of my "Gesammelte Lieder" ["Collected Songs."]
(about thirty), one or two of which will not be displeasing to
you. I shall not be able to set to the working out of my
Elizabeth till my return from Vienna.

The three songs [by Cornelius] (dedicated to Princess Marie)
[Princess Wittgenstein, now Princess Hohenlohe in Vienna.] are
charming and excellent. There is in them such a refined and true
proportion in union with such fervent and ardent mood that other
people besides the author must love them.

In order to make no break in my wonted fault-finding, I observe
that in the fifth bar of the first song the A-flat is more
agreeable than G.

[Figure: Music example showing the passage in question.]  The
carrying out of the motive in the second song:

[Figure: Here Liszt writes 2 bars of music to illustrate.]

(page 2, last line, and page 3) you have done most happily--also
the moonlight conclusion of it,

[Figure: Here Liszt writes 3 bars of music to illustrate.]

and the poetic delineation of the last verse in the third song
(in which the rests in the voice part and the motive in the
accompaniment, enlivened by the rhythm [Here follows in the
original an illegible sign. In the song there come in here, in
place of the quaver movement which has prevailed hitherto, some
long-sustained chords in the accompaniment, which are again
interrupted by the quaver movement.], make an excellent effect):-
-

"Wenn mein Lied zu Ende geht, Sing ich's weiter in Gedanken,
Wie's im Wald verschwiegen weht, Wie die Rosen sich umranken!"

["When my song is ended quite, Yet in thought I still am singing,
As the wood at silent night Echoes from the day is bringing!"]

Well and good, dearest Cornelius, and now some more soon, let me
beg of you! Don't make too long pauses in your hermitage, and
allow us to tell you and prove to you how truly we love you.

F. Liszt

P.S.--About two months ago I at last sent Schott the proofs of
the second year of the "Annees de Pelerinage," together with the
manuscript of Seroff's arrangement for two pianofortes of
Beethoven's C-sharp minor Quartet. Will you be so good as to get
Schott to let me know the fate of the C-sharp minor Quartet?
Although two-piano arrangements are somewhat thankless articles
of sale, yet perhaps Schott may manage to bring out this Quartet,
of which I should be very glad.

Don't forget, dearest friend, to remind him that he has left my
letter about this matter hitherto unanswered--and I should be
glad to let Seroff know something definite.



198. To Dionys Pruckner in Munich

"Lohengrin" be thanked that I hear something from you again, dear
Dionysius, and I give you my best thanks that you wrote to me
directly after the first performance, and thus gave me fresh good
tidings [Namely after the first performance of Lohengrin in
Munich, on February 28th, 1858]. What criticism will emit about
it by way of addition troubles me little--in our present
circumstances its strength consists mainly in the fear which
people have of it; and, as the Augsburg gentlemen renounce all
claim "to wash to teach us," nothing remains for us but to teach
ourselves better than they can do it.

Ad vocem of the severe gentlemen of Augsburg, I will send you in
a few days Bronsart's brochure "Musikalische Pflichten" ["Musical
Duties." Leipzig, Matthes, 1858] (in answer to the "Musikalische
Leiden" ["Musical Sufferings." In Nos. 353-55 of the supplement
to the Augsburg Allgemeine Zeitung, 1857.], etc.). The
A[llgemeine]Z[eitung] only made a couple of extracts from it in
its columns, and from these the point was missing. Bronsart
exquisitely accuses our opponents of ill-will, unfairness, and
calumniation. Since they have not succeeded in silencing us in a
conspicuous manner, they would like to kill us insignificantly,
for which, however, other weapons would be necessary than those
which they have at their command.

Meanwhile Bronsart's form of argument will give you a pleasant
hour, and if, as you tell me, you have found in Munich a few
comrades of the same mind, let the "Musikalische Pflichten" be
recommended in their circle.

Amongst other things the assumption of the reporter of the A. Z.
that Wagner himself had never conducted his Lohengrin better than
Franz Lachner, appeared to me very droll. It is well known that
Wagner has never heard this work, let alone conducted it!--
Ignorance of this kind is, moreover, not the worst on the other
side, where intentional and unintentional ignorance and lies (not
to mince the matter) are continually being directed against us.

But enough of that. Let us continue to go on our own way simply
and honorably, and let the tame or wild beasts on our right and
left behave as they like!--

I have not kept your last letter (during my stay in Dresden).
Address, up to the 25th of this month, to Haslinger in Vienna. I
shall get there by the beginning of next week, and shall conduct
the Gran Mass in the Redouten-Saal [Ball-room] on the 22nd and
23rd. Next Thursday the "Dante Symphony" and the "Ideale" will be
given here--and on Sunday "Tasso" (in a Conservatorium Concert).
Tausig and Pflughaupt [A pupil of Henselt and Liszt (1833-71)]
play my two Concertos.

In the E-flat major (No. 1) I have now hit on the expedient of
striking the triangle (which aroused such anger and gave such
offence) quite lightly with a tuning-fork--and in the Finale
(Marcia) I have pretty nearly struck it out altogether, because
the ordinary triangle-virtuosi as a rule come in wrong and strike
it too hard.

Rubinstein and Dreyschock came to see me in Weymar before I left.
The latter is intending to go to Munich. Go and see him and give
him greetings from me.

Write and tell me, dear Dionysius, if I can be of use to you in
any way, and you may always dispose of Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Prague, March 9th, 1858

P.S.--Give me some tidings about your stay in Munich. With whom
do you have most intercourse? Do you see many of my friends
there--Kaulbach, Frau Pacher, etc.? Do you give lessons? Are you
thinking of settling there, or do you intend to make a concert
tour, and if so, where?--Send me also your exact address.



199. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Hearty thanks for your few lines.

The letter of invitation has not yet arrived. It goes without
saying that I shall accept it; and as soon as I know in what form
and to whom I have to reply, I shall write at once. Meanwhile I
intend to reach Vienna on Monday, or Tuesday at latest. After
tomorrow's concert (with "Dante" and the "Ideale") there is still
a Conservatorium Concert to come off on Sunday at midday, at
which I shall conduct "Tasso," and also my first Concerto will be
played by Herr Pflughaupt. I shall either start for Vienna at
once that same evening, or else on Tuesday early. Will you be so
good as to order me rooms, as before, in the Kaiserin von
Oesterreach [Empress of Austria.] hotel? I am bringing Tausig
with me, whose acquaintance you will like to make.

Yours in spirit, and by the ties of flesh and blood,

F. Liszt

Prague, Wednesday early, March 10th, 1858

I received the five hundred gulden all right--and also the big
bill, which was a pleasant surprise to me, for when I left Weymar
I had made up my mind to give up all claim to it. Now that it has
come, however, it must be something good!--I promise you this,
that we shall not disgrace ourselves, and shall even surpass the
expectations of our very few friends!--



200. To Frau Dr. Steche in Leipzig

Vienna, March 20th, 1858

How many excuses I owe you, my dear lady and kind friend, for all
the trouble and disagreeables that the "Preludes" have occasioned
you! I can really scarcely pardon myself for having written the
piece!--When the Princess informed me of your kind intention I
wrote to her that a performance of my things in Leipzig appeared
to me untimely, and that I was resolved to let them fall into
oblivion rather than to importune my friends with them. Hence the
heterogeneousness of the letters and telegrams to you, dear
madam, which I beg you kindly to excuse. Candidly, I still think
it is better not to have the "Preludes" performed now in
Leipzig;[As there had already been a performance of this on the
26th of February, 1857, this can only refer to a performance in
the "Euterpe" Concerts.] but I thank you none the less warmly for
the kind interest you take in my compositions--in spite of their
bad name--and take this opportunity of repeating to you the
expression of high esteem and friendly devotion with which I
remain

F. Liszt



201. To Professor L. A. Zellner in Vienna

Pest, April 6th, 1858

Dear Friend,

With the

[Here Liszt writes a musical score excerpt of a whole note A
falling to quarter note D, in octave below middle C, with the
word 'Cre - do' under the notes]

Cre-do we will conclude this time in Vienna! We must not give
certain gentlemen any occasion to imagine that I concern myself
about them more than is really the case. Faust and Dante can
quietly wait for the due understanding of them. I must send them
next to Hartel, so that they may be published by the end of this
year. Give my very best thanks to Hellmesberger for the kind way
in which he meets me; he will forgive me if I cannot as yet put
it to use. Under existing circumstances it is wise and suitable
for me "to strive with earnest consistency for my high aim,
regardless of adverse circumstances and small-minded people."

At the end of next week I go to Lowenberg, and thence back to
Weymar. Therefore no concert in Vienna for this season--what may
happen later on remains meanwhile undecided.

The Pest concert has also not been given; but possibly my
Symphonic Poems may obtain a hearing in Pest sooner than in
Vienna, because I may expect much more susceptibility to them
here. When I have got my Opera finished, [This must be
"Sardanapalus."] I must in any case stay here a couple of month--
and on that occasion, perhaps, I may be able to bring in my
Symphonic things in three or four concerts. But there is no hurry
whatever for this; the "Elizabeth" and the Opera must be finished
first...

My intention had been to get to Vienna yesterday, and to be
satisfied with calling only on our four solo-singers and Count
Raday in Pest to express my thanks. But I was pressed on all
sides in so kind a manner to let my Gran Festival Mass be heard
again that I willingly acquiesced. The articles in the Austrian
p[aper], and your brochure, have done the most towards stirring
up the general wish. The public is like this--that they only know
what they ought to think of a work when they see it printed in
black and white!--You have therefore to answer for it if the Mass
is performed here a second time--on Friday afternoon in the
Museum-Saal (for the benefit of the Conservatorium) and on Sunday
in the Parish Church. On Monday evening I shall be in Vienna. I
wrote to Tausig yesterday that we would decide on the evening of
our musical meeting at your house after Countess Banffy has
chosen on the evening for her soiree (at which Tausig will play).
If I hear anything further about it Tausig shall let you know at
once, so that you may be able to make your invitations in
advance. On Thursday or on Saturday at latest I leave Vienna. All
further particulars viva voce.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

There is no truth in the idea of a private concert. I will tell
you in what way I might be able to realize it another time--and
will take counsel and consent about it from you.



202. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

It is not enough that I have already been in all sorts of trouble
here in connection with the two performances of the Gran Mass,
which will take place next Friday and Sunday (for which four to
five rehearsals at the least are indispensable)--but now the post
from Vienna brings me bad tidings, for which indeed I was
prepared, but which, nevertheless, are by no means desired by me.
I had a long letter yesterday from our friend Z., which I am
answering with a decided refusal as regards a nearly impending
performance of my Symphonic Poems in Vienna. For this time we
will stop at the two performances of the Gran Mass--neither a
note more nor less. Later on we will consider how we shall stand
on the next occasion, and I shall take counsel with you about it,
because I have the conviction that you not only intend and act
for the best and kindest as regards me, but also the most
judiciously!--

On Monday evening I shall be back in Vienna--and will expect you
directly I reach home. If possible I shall start from Vienna on
Thursday evening--but at the latest on Saturday early. I have
written to Tausig to take my old rooms for me. Much as I should
like to come to you, yet this time it is simpler for me to stay
at an hotel.

To our speedy meeting, which, alas! will be a good deal clouded
for us by these various obstructions. But in Vienna it can't be
otherwise. On this account you must soon come again to Weymar,
where we can belong to ourselves.

Heartfelt greetings in sincere friendship and loving devotion
from

F. Liszt

Pest, April 7th, 1858



203. To Adolf Reubke, Organ-Builder at Hausneinsdorf in the Harz.

[Written on the death of his son Julius Reubke (died June 3rd,
1858), a favorite pupil of Liszt's.]

Dear Sir,

Allow me to add these few lines of deepest sympathy to the poem
by Cornelius, ["Bein Tode von Julius Reubke" ("On the Death of
Julius Reubke"). Cornelius, Poems. Leipzig, 1890.] which lends
such fitting words to our feelings of sorrow. Truly no one
could feel more deeply the loss which Art has suffered in your
Julius, than the one who has followed with admiring sympathy his
noble, constant, and successful strivings in these latter years,
and who will ever bear his friendship faithfully in mind--the one
who signs himself with great esteem

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, June 10th, 1858



204. To Prince Constantin von Hohenzollern-Hechingen

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Alexander Meyer Cohn in
Berlin.--This very musical Prince was for years Liszt's patron,
and often invited the latter to stay with him at his Silesian
residence at Lowenberg, where he kept up an orchestra.]

Monseigneur,

When Your Highness was kind enough to express your views to me
respecting your noble design of encouraging in an exceptional
manner the progress of musical Art, and to question me as to the
best mode of employing a certain sum of money for this object, I
think I mentioned to you Mr. Brendel, the editor of the Neue
Zeitschrift fur Musik, as the best man to make your liberal
intentions bear fruit. As much on account of the perfect
uprightness of his character, which is free from all reproach, as
for the important and continuous services which his paper and
other of his works have rendered to the good cause for many years
past, I consider Mr. Brendel entirely worthy of your confidence.

It is not lightly that I put forward this opinion--and I venture
to flatter myself that my antecedents will be a sufficient
guarantee to Your Highness that in this matter, as in any others
in which I may have the honor of submitting any proposition to
you, I could follow no other influences, no other counsels, than
those of a scrupulous conscience. Putting aside all
considerations of vanity or personal advantage foreign to the end
in view, my sincere and sole desire is to make Your Highness's
intentions and capital the most productive possible. It is with
this view that I have openly spoken of the matter to Brendel,
whose letter, which I venture to enclose herewith, corresponds,
as it seems to me, with the programme in question.

I venture to beg you, Monseigneur, to look into this attentively,
and to let me know whether you will grant permission to Brendel
to enter into these matters more explicitly by writing to you
direct. In the event of the propositions contained in his letter
meeting with the approval of Your Highness, as I trust they may
do, it would be desirable that you should let him know without
too much delay in what manner you would wish your kind intentions
carried out.

In order to fulfill its task of progress, the Neue Zeitschrift
fur Musik has not spared its editor either in efforts or
sacrifices. By the fact that it represents, in a talented and
conscientious manner, the opinions and sympathies of my friends
and myself, it is in the most advanced, and consequently the most
perilous, position of our musical situation; therefore our
adversaries lose no opportunity of raising difficulties for it.
	Our opinions and sympathies will he sustained, I doubt not,
by their worth and conviction; but if Your Highness condescends
to come to our aid, we shall be both proud and happy--and it is
by spreading our ideas through the Press that we can best
strengthen our position.

In other words, I am convinced that, in granting your confidence
to Mr. Brendel, the sum that Your Highness is pleased to devote
to this matter will be employed in the most honest manner, and
that most useful to the progress of Art--and that all the honor
and gratitude which your munificence deserves will spring from
it--as is the earnest desire of him who has the honor to be,
Monseigneur, Your Highness's most devoted and humble servant,

F. Liszt

Weymar, August 18th, 1858



205. To Frau Rosa von Milde

[Court opera-singer in Weimar, nee Agthe; the first Elsa in
Lohengrin; a refined and poetical artist]

Weymar, August 25th, 1858

My honored and dear Friend,

If the outward circumstances which you mention in your kind
letter are not exactly of the kind that I could wish for you, yet
I am egotist enough to be much pleased at its friendly contents
towards myself. Accept my warmest thanks for them--and let me
tell you how anxious I am that you should like me very much, and
how desirous I am to deserve this--as far as it can be deserved;
for the best part of a harmonious intimacy must ever remain a
free gift.

The "wanton, ragged garments of the Muse," which you abandon with
strict generosity, make a show and  please almost everywhere. Her
sensual charm is not unknown to me; yet I think I may say that it
was given me to lay hold of a higher and a pure ideal, and to vow
to it my whole endeavors for many years past. You, dear friend,
have, through your singing, often led me to this in the best way,
without thinking of it. Moreover it always does me so much good
when we meet in unity in the same path.--

Owing to a heap of visits (among which were several of deep
interest, such as Kaulbach, Varnhagen, Carus, etc.), I have been
much interrupted in the completion of the "Elizabeth." Still, I
hope to be ready with it by February. You will then again do the
best part for it, and must practice works of artistic mercy!--
What is the good of anything that is written on paper, if it is
not comprehended by the soul and imparted in a living manner?--
But among the works of mercy I am not desirous that you should
have to bury a still-born Oratorio!--

My heartfelt, twofold greetings to Milde, as friend and as
artist. I am writing the part of Landgrave Ludwig for him--and,
as the Landgrave is very speedily got out of the way, I will ask
him to undertake, in addition, two other parts (those of a
Hungarian magnate and a bishop).

The day after tomorrow I accompany the Princess to the mountains
and cascades of the Tyrol. On our return journey we shall spend a
couple of days in Munich, and shall be back here by the end of
September. Will you allow me to conduct "Alceste" on the 2nd of
October?--Sobolewski's "Comala" [Opera by Sobolewski.] is fixed
for the 12th. I shall give over to our common friend Lassen (to
whom please remember me warmly) the pianoforte rehearsals during
my absence.

I hope you will get quite strong and enjoy yourself much at the
seaside, dear friend, and return in good spirits to us at Weymar,
where you are quite indispensable to

Yours most truly and devotedly, F. Liszt

P.S.--Possibly Fraulein * * * (whose name at this moment I
forget) will come from Berlin to Weymar during my absence. I
recommend her again to Milde and yourself. Preller will introduce
her to you, and I beg that Milde will help her with good
teaching. If I am not mistaken, she would stand proof well in
mezzo-soprano parts.

I have trustworthy tidings of the brilliant success of the first
performance of "Lohengrin" in Vienna (on the 19th of this month).
Rienzi was also taken up again in these days as before.



206. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear honored Friend,

The memorandum is excellent, and I agree with it in all points. I
have noted this, according to your wish, at the end by the words
vu et approuve [Seen and approved.] (a perfectly correct formula
in French). The Prince's address is as follows:--

To His Highness Prince Constantin Hohenzollern-Hechingen,
Lowenberg, Silesia. I should not be able for the present to find
you a Paris correspondent. But, as I understand, Bülow intends to
go to Paris in the course of this winter, and would then be best
able to tell you of a colleague there. There is no hurry about
the article on theater curtains. As soon as I am somewhat through
the mass of arrears in correspondence I will take an opportunity
of sending it to you, but whether it will be in time to appear in
the first number of the "Anregungen" I cannot say.

I told Pohl yesterday that I wish the Dresden Weber concerto
affair in the meantime not to be mentioned in the paper. The
whole affair has for the moment made an extraordinary stir, and I
will tell you about it later on. For the present there is nothing
to be said about it on our side, even if other papers mix
themselves up in it in an incompetent manner. Very likely the
winter will slip away before the intended concert comes off. [The
Dresden theater directors intended, as M. M. v. Weber tells us in
his biography of his father (vol. ii., p. 721), to arrange a
concert for the benefit of the Weber Memorial which was to be
erected. Liszt was equally desirous of doing something publicly
for the Master whom he so highly esteemed; but "because they
could not agree whether he should take part in the directors'
concert or use the personnel of the Royal Opera at his own
concert, neither of the concerts was given."]

Sobolewski (who has been detained this time by his theater work
in Bremen) will come here for the second performance of "Comala".
I will let you know about it.

The work is worth your hearing and interesting yourself in. Owing
to the acting of the two Schmidts (husband and wife), as guests
here, ["Das Gastspiel"--the playing as guests at a theater--is an
expression used when actors or singers other than those attached
to the theater of the place come to act or sing there for a time]
the second performance has been postponed until towards the
middle of this month.

I will send Riedel the pianoforte edition of my Mass very
shortly.

With heartfelt greetings,

Yours,

F. Liszt

November 2nd, 1858



207. To Johann von Herbeck

Dear Friend,

Your three splendid fellows, my high-minded and honorable
gipsies, ["Die drei Zigeuner" ("The Three Gipsies"), by Lenau,
for voice with pianoforte accompaniment.] are most excellently
lodged on the Altenburg. First of all the song was played on the
violin, then with cello--another time I tried it alone, and
yesterday Caspari sang me the song, so full of pith and beauty
and intrinsic worth, to the delight of us all and of myself in
particular. It will remain as a brilliant repertoire piece
amongst us, and I shall very soon introduce it to Tichatschek,
who will assuredly give it with inspiration and will make it
widely known. Please forgive me, dear friend, for not having
expressed my warm thanks to you sooner.--I only got home a few
weeks ago from my journey to the Tyrol and Munich, and have
scarcely been able to sit down to write, owing to all the
business pressing upon me from every side. If Lessing says "One
must not must," nevertheless the saying of Kladderadatsch, "Bien
muss," ["The bee must"--referring to a joke in the German Punch
(Kladderadatsch).] is, for ordinary mortals, much more
applicable--and over this "bee must" one at last becomes quite
idle from sheer weariness.

I will take the first opportunity of sending you your manuscript
of the score of the Mass for men's voices to Vienna. The Gloria,
which was performed at the University Jubilee Festival of Jena
last August, was made most effective by your excellent
instrumentation. You will observe a slight alteration at the
conclusion (six bars instead of five, and a slightly less risky
modulation), which I beg you to follow at any performance there
may chance to be in Vienna.

As regards the choruses to "Prometheus," I confess to you
candidly that, much as I thank you for thinking about them, I
think it is wiser to wait a little bit. I am not in the slightest
hurry to force myself on to the public, and can quietly let a
little more of the nonsense about my failure in attempts at
composition be spread abroad. Only in so far as I am able to do
something lasting may I place some modest value upon it. This can
and will be decided by time alone. But I should not wish
previously to impose on any of my friends the disagreeables which
the performance of my works, with the widespread presuppositions
and prejudices against them, brings with it. In a few years I
hope things will go better, more rationally, and more justly with
musical matters.

Until then we will go forward composedly and contemplatively on
our way! Once more best thanks and greetings from yours in all
friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, November 22nd (St. Cecilia's Day), 1858



208. To Felix Draseke

My very dear Friend,

Herewith the piano edition of the two first acts of "Sigurd."
[Opera by Draseke.]--Imagining that you may also want the score
of the first act, which had remained here, I send it also, sorry
as I am to part from this monumental work. Under present existing
circumstances, which on my side are passive and negative, as I
intimated to you after the performance of Cornelius's Opera,
there is no prospect of putting Sigurd on the boards at present.
But I promise myself the pleasure and satisfaction of letting all
your "Tamtis" and "Beckis" be heard, when I have again resumed my
active work at the Weymar theater, for which there may probably
be an opportunity next season.

After you left Weymar we had to swallow a kind of second piece or
supplement to the performance of the "Barber of Baghdad," on
occasion of Madame Viardot's performance as "guest" here. But I
will not weary you with tales of our local miseries and crass
improprieties. I will only intimate thus much--that, under the
present Intendant régime, to my sorrow, the inviting of Frau
Schroder-Devrient to play here as guest is met by almost
unconquerable difficulties from within. Tell our excellent friend
Bronsart this, and tell him into the bargain that a concert (in
the room in the Town Hall), at which he and Frau Schroder-
Devrient should appear without any other assistance, would
certainly be very welcome to the public, and I should look upon
this as in any case a practical introduction to the performance
as guest. This matter lies outside my present sway, but it goes
without saying that I will not fail to let my slight influence
towards a favorable solution of the matter be felt.--

The day before yesterday I heard at Gotha your countryman's new
opera (Diana von Solange) for the second time. The work was
received with great approval, and is shortly to be given in
Dresden, where you will be best able to judge of it. Mitterwurzer
and Frau Ney have some very effective moments in it.

The concerts of the joint Weymar and Gotha orchestras (a matter
which I broached long ago) again came under discussion, and
possibly this March an attempt will be made to set them going.
Meanwhile let us look after our cordial [Magen-Starkung] "mentre
che il danno e la vergogna dura," ["Whilst prejudice and shame
last."] as Michael Angelo says.--

Friendly greetings from your faithful and devoted

F. Liszt

January 12th, 1859

Will you give the enclosed letter to Bronsart?



209. To Heinrich Porges In Prague

[Now Royal music-director and conductor of a first-rate Gesang-
verein [vocal union] in Munich, where he has lived since 1867.
Born 1837. Is also a writer on music.]

Dear Sir and Friend,

Owing to your affectionate understanding of what I have striven
after in the "Dante Symphony" and the "Ideale", you have a
special right to both works. Allow me to offer them to you as a
token of my sincere attachment, as also of the grateful
remembrance which I keep of the Prague performance. [At Porges'
initiative the medical students had invited Liszt, in 1858, to a
concert, at which his Dante Symphony and the Icdeale were given.
In 1859 Bulow was also invited at Porges' inducement.] Taking
your kindness for granted, I beg you to give the other two copies
to Herr Professor Mildner and Herr Dr. Ambros with my best
thanks.

It is to be hoped that this year's "Medical" Concert will have
favorable results. My valiant son-in-law, H. von Bulow, cannot
fail to be recognized among you as an eminent musician and noble
character. I thank you and Herr Musil (to whom I beg you to
remember me most kindly) for offering Bülow this opportunity of
doing something in Prague.--There is no doubt that he will
fulfill all your expectations.

For the next "Medical" Concert I willingly place myself at your
disposal. Possibly we might on this occasion venture on the
Symphonic Poem No. I "Ce qu'on entered sur la Montagne"--the
chorus "An die Kunstler," and the "Faust Symphony?"--The
respected medical men would thus take the initiative in the new
musical pathology!--

For the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, etc. [Meeting of Musicians], in
Leipzig at the beginning of June Dr. Brendel is expecting you,
and I rejoice at the thought of meeting you again there. If the
affair is not too much hampered in its natural course by local
miseries and malevolence, it may do much for the bettering of our
suffering musical position. In any case we will not fail in doing
our part towards it.

With highest esteem, yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 10th, 1859



210. To Capellmeister Max Seifriz in Lowenberg

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Alexander Meyer Cohn in
Berlin.]

Dear Friend,

I feel the most heartfelt sympathy with you in your sad days at
Lowenberg, and trust with you that they will not last much
longer. When there is a suitable opportunity, express to our
Prince my heartfelt, grateful devotion. Then tell me quite openly
and candidly whether my visit to Lowenberg, in the course of next
month, will be welcome and will make no trouble. I had planned to
spend the Easter week there, and only await preliminary tidings
from you to announce myself by letter to His Highness. Dr.
Brendel wished at the same time to pay his respects to the
Prince. The press of work upon him just now especially will only
allow him to stay a couple of days with you; but I for my part,
if I am assured that my visit will not come inopportunely, should
like to prolong my stay a little. Perhaps, as you are so kindly
intending to invite Damrosch, it might be arranged for him to
come at the same time. It would be a great pleasure to me to see
the valiant friend and comrade in Art again with you.

I give you once more my best thanks for the kind attention which
you have caused to be bestowed on my works. The many attacks on
me which I have to bear enhance still more the value I place on
the sympathy and concurrence of my friends.

By today's post I send you the scores of the Dante Symphony, the
"Ideale," and the Goethe March, which have just come out--the
former merely to read through (as a memento of the Dresden
performance, which served as a rehearsal to me, after which
several alterations in the score occurred to me)-but the other
two might not be wholly unsuitable for a performance with your
gallant orchestra, to whom I beg you to remember me most kindly.

May the things be welcome to you, dear friend, as a token of the
very high esteem of

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 22nd, 1859



211. To Eduard Liszt

Warmest thanks for all you have done, said, and felt, dearest
Eduard. I hope that I am only going a few steps in front of you,
and that in a couple of years the same distinction will fall to
your lot, in which I shall then have the same pleasure as is
granted to you today. [This would be the bestowing of the title
of nobility on Liszt, who, however, as is well known, never used
it.]

Herewith my letter of thanks to S. E. von Bach. [Austrian
Minister of the Interior.] Perhaps you would think it well to
deliver the letter yourself. Take the opportunity of remembering
me to Wurzbach, who has always been most friendly to me. I will
write to Daniel one of these next days. The Princess goes
tomorrow to Munich, where Kaulbach is painting the portrait of
Princess Marie. On the 30th of this month I again make a visit to
Prince Hohenzollern at Lowenberg (Shlesia), and shall then soon
take up my quarters at Leipzig, where we shall have to live
through some rather warm days on the 1st, 2nd, and 3rd June. For
the rest there are good prospects for us there; and, even if
dishonesty and malevolence make the utmost exertions (as we may
expect they will do), this can do us but very little injury
(where it does not help us).

You have possibly already heard that the Schiller Festival in
Weymar has been frustrated by the imprudence of Dingelstedt. In
spite of that I am composing the Introduction to the Festival by
Halm, which may find its use here or elsewhere. With heartfelt
thanks and greetings, your

F. Liszt

[Weimar,] April 5th, 1859



212. To N. N., Music-Director at Weimer

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Gille, Privy Councillor in
Jena.]

Dear Herr Music-Director,

I learn today by chance of the measures which have been taken a
posteriori against the concert conducted and arranged by Herr
Gotze [Carl Gotze, chorister, afterwards music-director.] and
sincerely regret that a Weimar music-director and Weymar Court
musician could deem such a thing suitable.

I, with my exceptional and only occasional dealings with the
orchestra here, can only draw your attention to the fact of how
deplorably such occurrences run counter to a nice feeling of
decorum, and still more to the nobler artist feeling.

With compliments,

F. Liszt

April 17th, 1859



213. To Peter Cornelius In Vienna Weymar

May 23rd, 1859

Dearest Friend,

I learn with joy from your letter (which has just crossed mine
from Lowenberg), that things are going well and comfortably with
you in Vienna. It is easy to see that your stay there, when once
you have made a firm footing, will become very advantageous--and
whatever I can do towards helping this you may be sure I shall
do. Herewith a few lines for Herr von Villers, Secretary of the
Saxon Embassy (where you will learn his address). He is one of my
older friends who has remained very dear to me. In his refined
poetic and musical feeling many kindred tones will sound for you.
Tell him all about Weymar and play him something from the
"Barbier". [Cornelius' Opera] Although he lives somewhat a part,
he can prove himself agreeable to you in many things,--firstly,
by his own personal intercourse--and then also by his relations
with Baron Stockhausen (the Hanoverian Ambassador), at whose
house there is frequently really good music, etc.--Don't delay,
therefore, looking up Villers.

For today I must beg you also to get the Prologue for the Leipzig
days [The Leipzig Tonkunstler-Versammlung (Meeting of Musicians),
from which the Allgemeine Deutsche Musikverein (Universal German
Musical Society) sprang] ready as quickly as possible. I shall
settle down at the end of this week (Saturday) in Leipzig--Hotel
de Pologne. It would be very good of you if you could send me the
Prologue to Leipzig within eight days. Address to Brendel,
Mittelstrasse, 24. I still do not possess a single copy of my
Mass, because I sent on the two or three that had been previously
sent to me at once to M[usic]-D[irector] Riedel for studying the
work. But my cousin, Dr. Eduard Liszt, will certainly be
delighted to give you your copy at once. You have only to tell
Daniel to bring it to you, if you have not time to call on
Eduard.

Frau von Milde, Bulow, Bronsart, Draseke, Lassen, etc., etc.,
etc., are coming to Leipzig from Monday, 30th May, until Sunday,
4th June. You must not fail us, dearest friend, and we await you
with open arms and loving hearts. Your

F. Liszt

The Princess stays a little longer in Munich, and will not get to
Leipzig till towards the end of this month. Remember me most
respectfully and warmly to Hebbel.

Best greetings to Catinelli.

Once more, please send the "Prologue".



214. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[Autograph in the possession of Herr A.O. Schulz, bookseller in
Leipzig.]

Herewith is an answer to the nine points of your letter of today,
my dear friend [Referring to the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in
Leipzig, in June, 1859].

1. The Mildes have got leave of absence from Monday, 30th April,
till Friday, 3rd June, inclusive. Your programme remains as
already fixed. Duet from the "Flying Dutchman", "Cellini Aria",
Songs by Franz and Schumann (etc. ad libitum).

2. I will bring all the orchestral parts that there are with me,
or, better still, I will send you the whole lot tomorrow. For
"Tasso" the whole set is complete--but for the "Duet" from the
"Dutchman", and the "Cellini Aria" and "Overture" a couple of
copies of the quartet will have to be written out afresh in
Leipzig.

3. I do not possess the "Overture to the Corsair" [By Berlioz]
(and would not recommend it for performance), and the "Prelude to
Tristan" Bülow will see after.

4. I expect more particulars from Bülow in the course of the
week.

5. I am writing today to Cornelius about the Prologue affair.

6. Herewith is the German text of the Mass,[Lizst's "Gran
Festival Mass."] which is to be printed in Leipzig in the same
manner as in Vienna--namely, with the addition of the Latin text-
-and which belongs to the General Programme of the	Festival.
This programme we will settle and revise together next Sunday.

7. Leave of absence for Frau Pohl will be attended to.

8. I reserve to myself the matter of deciding on what pianists
shall accompany the Ballads, and undertake the piano part of the
"Trios" that are to be given. If possible I want Bronsart to take
a part in it.

9. I will send off the definite invitations to the nobility next
Sunday (at latest) from Leipzig to Gotha and Meiningen. I am
coming to you on Saturday afternoon, 21st May [Must be 28th May,
as the letter is dated the 23rd], and shall then stay in Leipzig
till the end of the Festival. For the present a suitable room
(without sitting-room) will satisfy me, and I beg you to bespeak
this for me in the Hotel de Pologne for Saturday. My ministering
spirit should have his room close to mine, because looking for
him and calling is highly disagreeable to me.

Goodbye till Saturday. Your

F. Liszt

Monday, May 23rd, 1859

P.S.--The performance of "Judas Maccabaeus" (for the Handel
Festival) is announced here for next Wednesday, 25th May.
Tomorrow, Tuesday, there will be a similar Handel celebration in
Erfurt with a performance of the "Messiah." Frau von Milde will
sing the soprano part there. Let Pohl know this--perhaps he may
like to hear "Judas."

The rehearsals of Rietz's little Opera are in progress, and
Pasque (who has written the libretto for it) told me yesterday
that the first performance will take place next week. Probably
Rietz will undertake to conduct it, as I proposed.



215. To Felix Draseke

Where, my dear, excellent friend, have you got hold of the
extraordinary idea that I could be angry with you? How to begin
such a thing I really should not know. You are far too good and
dear to me for me not to remain good to you also in all things!--
Herewith are a few lines for Wagner, which however you don't in
the least need. I am glad that you are not putting off this
journey any longer. But before you set out WRITE to Wagner (you
can add my lines to your letter extra), and inquire whether he
will be staying at Lucerne still, so that your Swiss pilgrimage
may not be in vain.--You will be certain to get an answer from
Wagner by return of post, and will thus be sure of your object.

Schuberth tells me that "King Helge" will ride into his shop
almost immediately...to Sigrun, the ever blooming delicious
sorrow!--How scornfully, "without greeting or thanks," will "King
Helge" look down upon all the other wares in Schuberth's shop.
Somewhat as the hippopotamus looks on toads and frogs.--But it is
quite right to let the Ballade come out, and I am impatiently
awaiting my copy.--[Liszt subsequently formed out of Draseke's
song the melodrama of the same name.]

I hope it may be possible for me to come to Lucerne at the end of
August. But send some tidings of yourself before then to

Your sincere and faithful

F. Liszt

[Weimar,] July 19th, 1859



216. To Peter Cornelius in Vienna

Dearest Friend,

You are quite right in setting store upon the choice and putting
together of the three Sonatas. The idea is an excellent one, and
you may rest assured of my readiness to help in the realization
of your intention as well as of my silence until it is quite a
settled thing. If Bronsart could decide on going to Vienna, his
cooperation in that matter would certainly be very desirable.
Write about it to him at Dantzig, where he is now staying with
his father (Commandant-General of Dantzig). Tausig, who is
spending some weeks at Bad Grafenberg (with Her Highness the
Princess von Hatzfeld), would also adapt the thing well, and
would probably be able to meet your views better than you seem to
imagine. As regards Dietrich, I almost fear that he does not
possess sufficient brilliancy for Vienna--but this might, under
certain circumstances, be an advantage. He plays Op. 106 and the
Schumann Sonata capitally--as also the "Invitation to hissing and
stamping," as Gumprecht designates that work of ill odor--my
Sonata. Dietrich is always to be found in the house of Prince
Thurn and Taxis at Ratisbon. He will assuredly enter into your
project with pleasure and enthusiasm, and the small distance from
Ratisbon makes it not too difficult for him. You would only have
to arrange it so that the lectures come quickly one after the
other.

Where Sasch Winterberger is hiding I have not heard. Presupposing
many things, he might equally serve your purpose.

In order to save you time and trouble, I will send you by the
next opportunity your analysis of my Sonata, which you left
behind you at the Altenburg.

Draseke is coming very shortly through Weymar from Lucerne. I
will tell him your wish in confidence. It is very possible that
he would like to go to Vienna for a time. I have not the
slightest doubt as to the success of your lectures, in
conjunction with the musical performance of the works.--I would
merely advise you to put into your programme works which are
universally known--as, for instance, several Bach Fugues (from
"Das wohltemperierte Clavier"), the Ninth Symphony, the grand
Masses of Beethoven and Bach, which you have so closely studied,
etc. [The proposed lectures did not come off.]

Well, all this will come about by degrees. First of all a
beginning must be made, and this will be quite a brilliant one
with the three Sonatas. Later on we will muster Quartets,
Symphonies, Masses, and Operas all in due course!

A propos of operas, how are you getting on with the "Barbier" and
the publication of the pianoforte edition? Schuberth told me for
certain that printing would begin directly they had received the
manuscripts. Don't delay too long, dearest friend--and believe me
when I once more assure you that the work is as eminent as the
intrigue, to which it momentarily succumbed, was mean-spirited.

Schuberth has no doubt told you that I want to make a
transcription of the Salamaleikum. But don't forget that another
Overture is inevitably NECESSARY, in spite of the refined,
masterly counterpoint and ornamentation of the first. The
principal subject

[Figure: Musical example of the principal subject.]

must begin, and the "Salamaleikum" end it. If possible, bring in
the two motives together a little (at the end). In case you
should not be disposed to write the thing I will do it for you
with pleasure--but first send me the complete piano edition for
Schuberth. The new Opera can then afford to wait a while, like a
"good thing"--only may weariness at it remain long absent
[Untranslatable play on the words Weile and Langeweile]!--In
order that you may not have a fit of it in reading this letter, I
will at once name to you the magic name of Rosa [Rosa von Milde,
the artist and friend of Cornelius, who wrote poetry upon her]...

In consequence of an insinuating intimation of our mutual
patroness, I have still to add the excuses of our good friend
Brendel to you. When I have an opportunity I will tell you in
person about the Prologue disturbances at the Leipzig Tonkunstler
Versammlung. Pohl had also supplied one--but the choice was given
over to Frau Ritter, and she chose her good "Stern," whose
prologue was indeed quite successful and made a good effect. But
oblige me by not bearing any grudge against Brendel, and let us
always highly respect the author of "Liszt as a Symphonic
Writer"!--

A thousand heartfelt greetings from your faithful

F. Liszt

Weymar, August 23rd, 1859

Princess Marie will thank you herself for the Sonnet, and at the
same time tell you about the musical performances of the 15th
August. Lassen's song, "Ave Maria," of which you gave him the
poem long ago, was especially successful. The Quartet:

"Elfen, die kleinen,
Wollen dich grussen,
Wollen erscheinen
Zu deinen Fussen"

["Elfin world greeting
To thee is sending,
Fairy forms lowly
At thy feet bending."]

composed by Lassen), and

"Wandelnde Blume, athmender Stern,
Duftende Bluthe am Baum des Lebens"

["Swift-changing flowers, pulsating star,
Sweet-scented blossoms on life's living tree."]

(composed by Damrosch), which we had sung together two years ago,
rejoiced us anew and most truly this time.



217. To Dr Franz Brendel

[In this letter, the programme refers to some theater concerts,
which were to be arranged according to Brendel's design.  The
sketch was as follows:--

"1st Concert: Paradise and the Peri.
2nd Concert:  Eroica, Prometheus.
3rd Concert:  Overture of Wagner. Solo (Bronsart). Overture of
              Beethoven.
              2nd part: L'enfance du Christ of Berlioz.
4th Concert:  Festival Song of Liszt. Solo. Draseke. Chorus for
              men's voices from his Opera.
              2nd part: Walpurgisnacht of Mendelssohn.
5th Concert:  Overture of Berlioz, Wagner, or Beethoven.
		  Solo. Preludes.
		  2nd part: Manfred.
6th Concert:  Overture. Solo. Tasso.
		  2nd part: B-flat major Symphony."

To this Liszt adds, besides some remarks about getting the parts for
No. 5:

"An orchestral work of Hans von Bulow (possibly the Caesar Overture)
would be suitable for this concert. I would also recommend that
Bronsart's "Fruhlings-Phantasie" ["Spring Fancy"] should be included in
one of the programmes.

"Of Berlioz' works I should recommend the following as the most
acceptable for performance:--

"The festival at Capulet's house (Romeo),
The Pilgrims' March (from Harold),
Chorus and Dance of Sylphs (Faust),
Terzet and Chorus (from Cellini), with the artists' oath,
Overture to Lear.

"N.B.--We can bring out the Terzet from Cellini at the next
Tonkunstler-Versammlung. It is a very important and effective piece."]

Dear Friend,

The sketch for your programme is excellent, and if I have some
doubts as to the entire project, yet your proposed programme
seems to me in any case the most suitable, both as regards choice
of works and their order and grouping. With regard to the doubts
which I have so often mentioned I will only make the general
remark that a competition with the Gewandhaus in Leipzig brings a
good deal of risk with it, and for this winter a passive attitude
on our side would not specially injure our cause (at least not
according to my opinion). Whether Wirsing and Riccius will be
able to give the requisite support to the theater concerts, or
are willing to do so, I cannot undertake to say, as the ground of
Leipzig lies in many ways too far removed from me. In this I rely
entirely on your insight and circumspection, dear friend. In case
you end by deciding in the affirmative I will willingly do
something to help--as, for instance, to undertake the conducting
of the "Prometheus." I would rather not let myself in for much
more than that, because conductings in general become more
burdensome to me every year, and I don't in the least desire to
offer further active resistance to the ill-repute with which I am
credited as a conductor. Indeed I owe my friend Dingelstedt many
thanks for having (without perhaps exactly desiring to do so)
given me the chance of freeing myself from the operatic time-
beating here, and I am firmly resolved not to wield the baton
elsewhere except in the most unavoidable cases! Bülow must now
often mount the conductor's desk. He has the mind, liking,
talent, and vocation for this. If the theater concerts should be
arranged, be sure to secure his frequent co-operation. He will
certainly bring new life into the whole affair, and possesses the
necessary amount of experience and aplomb, [Employed in French by
Liszt] to be their solid representative.

I have just written to Klitzsch [Music-conductor at Zwickau] and
promised him to conduct the "Prometheus" in Zwickau. The concert
will take place at the end of October (perhaps on my birthday,
the 22nd). Although you have heard the Prometheus choruses in
Dresden, I wish very much that you could come to Zwickau this
time. I have again worked most carefully at it, have amplified
some things, and have arranged others in a simple and more
singable manner, etc. Now I hope that it will thoroughly hold its
ground and stand the test of proof. So do come to Zwickau.

I have still one more request to make to you today, dear friend.
P. Lohmann [A music colleague of the Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik,
living in Leipzig] was so kind as to send me his drama some weeks
ago. I have read The Victory of Love with much interest, but I
have not yet been able to get so far as the other, and as little
have I been able to express my thanks to him in writing. Kindly
undertake my excuses to him, and tell him that I am exceedingly
obliged by his letter and what he sent me. On the occasion of my
journey to Zwickau I will call on Lohmann in Leipzig, and tell
him personally what an impression his dramas make on me. I
specially take notice of his article in the paper.

I thank you most truly for the kindness which you have shown to
B. He is in many things somewhat awkward, impractical--and almost
looks as though he could not devote himself to any productive and
consistently carried-out form of activity. None the less is there
in him a certain capacity and worth which, in a somewhat more
regular position than he has yet been able to attain, would make
him appear worth more. A more frequent application of a few
utensils such as soak tooth-brush, and nail brush might also be
recommended to him!--I expect much good to result from your
influence on B.'s further work and fortunes, and hope that your
store of patience will not be too sorely tried by him.

With heartfelt greetings, your

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 2nd, 1859

Herewith the programme scheme with two or three little remarks
appended. Weigh again the pros and cons of the matter, and keep
the right balance between the risk and the possible gain. Motto:
"First weigh, then risk it!"--[The nearest English equivalent
seems to be "Look before you leap."

.--. I have had so much of notes [musical] to write lately that
my writing of letters [of the alphabet] has got still worse. But
where you can't read what I have written, you can guess it all
the easier.--



218. To Louis Koehler

Dear Friend,

Your letter was a real joy to me, for which I thank you heartily.
You are far too honorable, brave, and admirable a musician for
our paths to remain long sundered. For the very reason that
people cannot (as you so wittily remark) immediately "label and
catalogue me correctly and place me in an already existing
drawer," I am in hopes that my efforts and working will
eventually prove in accordance with the spirit of the time, and
will fructify. I promise you also that I am not wanting in pains
and labour in honor of my friends. But I certainly cannot
recognize weaklings and cowards as such. It is only with high-
minded, brave, and trusty comrades that we move forwards, no
matter though the number remain small. In matters of intelligence
the majority always follows the minority, when the latter is
sufficiently strong to hold its own.--Welcome, therefore, dear
friend, welcome most truly. If there is still a lot of scandal
which we have to bear quietly and without mortification, we will
by no means let ourselves be confounded by it!

I have written at once to Hartel to send you the arrangements for
two pianofortes of the Symphonic Poems that you wished for. But
there is a better way for the scores than that of a bookseller.
Fraulein Ingeborg Stark is going to St. Petersburg on the 20th of
this month, and will stay a day in Konigsberg. She will bring you
the Dante Symphony, etc., and if there should be an opportunity
she will play the things through with Bronsart (who is also going
to Konigsberg at the same time). I have grown very much attached
to Fraulein Stark, as hers is a very particularly gifted artistic
nature. The same will happen to you if you hear her striking
Sonata. Ingeborg composes all sorts of Fugues, Toccatas, etc.,
into the bargain. I remarked to her lately that she did not look
a bit like that. "Well, I am quite satisfied not to have a fugue
countenance," was her striking answer.

The Pohls are both still in Baden-Baden (whence I hear the
excerpts from Berlioz' manuscript opera Les Troyens [The Trojans]
spoken of with enthusiasm). Madame Viardot sang a grand scena and
a duet from it in the concert conducted by Berlioz--and Fraulein
Emilie Genast is staying a couple of weeks longer with her sister
Frau Raff in Wiesbaden. On her return I will give her your
greetings, and Emilie will certainly be glad to make known the
concert song which you mention to her. In her performance a
beautiful and sympathetic "melody of speech" is reflected. As I
write this word I can't help at the same time wishing that you
may find in my "Gesammelte Lieder" something that appeals to your
feelings, which you have so cleverly represented in the "melody
of speech." You will receive a proof-copy of the six numbers at
the same time as the Dante Symphony. I wanted to dedicate the
last number, "Ich mochte hingehn" (poem by Herwegh), specially to
you, and when next you have occasion to come to Weymar, I will
look for the manuscript for you on which your name is put. But as
I have left out all other dedications in this complete edition, I
propose to dedicate something else to you later--probably some
bigger and longer work.

A Ballade of Draeseke's--"Koenig Helge"--has just appeared, which
pleases me extremely. You must look closely into this wonderful
Opus 1.

In conclusion one more request, dear friend. Do me the kindness
to be perfectly free and open and regardless of consequences in
the discussion of my works. Do not imagine that the slightest
vanity comes over me or impels me. I have long ago done with all
that sort of thing. So long as you allow that I possess the
necessary musical equipments to create freely in Art, as I gather
from your letter that you do, I can but be grateful to you for
all else, even were it severe blame. I have often expressed my
opinion to my friends that, even if all my compositions failed to
succeed (which I neither affirm nor deny), they would not on that
account be quite without their use, owing to the stir and impetus
which they would give to the further development of Art. This
consciousness so completely satisfies me that I can consistently
persevere and go on composing.

With all respect and attachment I remain,

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 3rd, 1859

If the Koenigsberg Academy does not take alarm at my name (as has
indeed been the case in other places, owing to the foolish
prattle of the critics), they might try the "Prometheus" choruses
there by-and-by. They are to be given almost directly (at the end
of October) at Zwickau, and probably later on in Leipzig, where I
shall then also have them published.

In the matters of the prize-subject we will wait and see what
comes. You very justly remark that it hinges now upon enharmony.

It is a pity that you do not bring something. Perhaps you will
still find time to do so.



219. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I beg you to send me by return of post a copy of the intricate
biography ("Liszt's Life and Work"--if I am not mistaken) by
Gustav Schilling. Siegel and Stoll in Leipzig have taken the work
from the Stuttgart publisher, and there will surely be some way
of getting a copy in Leipzig. Ask Kahnt to be so good as to see
after one and to send it me immediately by post, for I require
the work in connection with a special and pressing question which
I can best answer by a quotation from Schilling's book.

With friendliest greetings, your

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 8th, 1859

Why does not Schuberth send me my dedicatory copy of Draeseke's
Ballade "Koenig Helge"?



220. To Johann von Herbeck

Dear Friend,

Warmest thanks for your persevering and well-wishing sympathy. It
is a great pleasure to me that you are bringing about the
performance of the Mass for men's voices on the 23rd October, and
I hope that, as you have once "made your way through it," we
shall also not succeed ill.

The "sneaking brood" (as you well name the people) can henceforth
growl as much as they like. What does that matter to us, so long
as we remain true and faithful to our task? In the performance
last year at Jena (at the secular celebration of the University)
I had the opportunity of convincing myself how capital your
instrumentation of the Mass sounds, and I especially beg that you
will not leave out one iota of it in the oboes or trombones. The
organ alone is not sufficient, especially if there is a large
chorus, and the completion of the accompaniment could not have
been better accomplished than you have done it.

N.B.--At the Jena performance I hit upon the following
alterations at the conclusion of the Gloria:

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a vocal score musical excerpt]

If you are agreed with this, then let this simplification serve
for Vienna. I can only send you the score and parts of the
"Prometheus" choruses towards the middle of November, as Klitzsch
(in Zwickau) has arranged a performance of this work on the 12th
to the 14th November, and I have already placed the parts at his
disposal. If this delay does not hinder your kind intention of
having the "Prometheus" choruses performed in Vienna, I will send
the whole packet of parts to your address in Vienna, free,
immediately after the Zwickau Concert. For the poem belonging to
it, which I will also send with the rest, it is desirable that
you should get an adequate tragic declaimer. In Dresden Davison
undertook this, and in Zwickau Frau Ritter will declaim it. I am
writing today to Herr von Bulow, but rather doubt whether he will
be able to accept your invitation for this winter. According to
what he told me lately, he thinks of going to Warsaw and Paris in
the latter part of the winter. With regard to the eventual choice
of a piece you may, moreover, pacify the strict gentlemen of the
Committee. In case Bulow should make his appearance at the
Philharmonic Concert he will, on my advice, not play my A major
Concerto (nor any other composition of mine), but just simply one
of the Bach or Beethoven Concertos. My intimate friends know
perfectly well that it is not by any means my desire to push
myself into any concert programme whatever...With regard to the
scores and parts that you want, I have noted on a separate sheet
which ones I have at my disposal, and where you can obtain the
rest. In conclusion allow me once more to beg you kindly to let
me have a couple of lines about the performance of the Mass.
Perhaps some things may occur to you which might still be altered
and simplified. Do not deprive me, dear friend, of your good
advice, which I shall be glad to make use of in the score edition
of the Mass which must shortly ensue. Naturally your name will
stand on the title-page, and the responsibility of the
instrumentation will be remitted to you.

With friendly thanks and highest regard, I am

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, October 11th, 1859



221. To Felix Draseke

Dear excellent friend,

Your surmise that I could not go away from Weymar at present was
quite correct. The Altenburg is indeed very deserted, as Princess
Marie went away directly after her marriage on the 15th October,
and the Princess went to Paris yesterday for several days--yet I
will not leave my own hearth so soon, even if my outward activity
be much limited henceforth (as I have already intimated to you)
both here and elsewhere.--I require my whole time for my further
works, which must go on incessantly--consequently I have resolved
to keep at a distance all the delights of conductorship, and to
give the baton a rest equally with the piano.--

On the 9th November the festival play by Halm, "A Hundred Years
Ago," will be given here with the music I have composed to it--
and on the 11th the "Kuenstler-Chor" is to introduce the
Festival-oration by Kuno Fischer at Jena. Damrosch writes to me
also from Berlin that he intends to include the "Kuenstler-Chor"
in the programme of the Schiller Festival there. The Zwickau
Concert is fixed for the 15th November--and I am delighted to
think of meeting the Ritters there. By the way, I am of opinion
that Sasch [Sasch, i.e., Alexander, Ritter's Christian name] will
undertake two numbers of the programme, and will fulfill
Klitzsch's wish with the "Chaconne" as well as mine with the
original Concerto, on the same evening. Zwickau chances to belong
to the few towns where the "Chaconne" (so Klitzsch writes me
word) has never been heard in public. Sasch can take this fact
into consideration, and without doing anything derogatory can
grant the public the enjoyment of the "Chaconne." The assured
success which he will have with it may also act beneficially on
the receptiveness of the audience in connection with his
Concerto. Tell our dear friend this, with the proviso that, if he
only undertakes one number on the programme, I advise him in any
case to choose his Concerto. The piece has much that is
interesting and effective in itself, and it will be useful to
Sasch to test the relation of the orchestra to the solo part by a
public production. If necessary, therefore, force him to do it,
by my order.

With regard to the causes and excuses for your pretended
"obstinacy, dogmatism," and imaginary "arrogance," I beg you,
dearest friend, to rest assured that you will never find any such
suspicion in me. What you think, feel, compose, is noble and
great--therefore I take a sympathetic interest in it.--The next
time we are together I will merely endeavour to make "amputation"
more bearable to you by chloroform!--

With highest esteem I remain,

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

[Weimar,] October 20th, 1859



222. To Heinrich Porges in Prague.

Dear Friend,

Your letter for the 22nd October gave me heartfelt pleasure, and
you need not be in doubt as to the correctness of the
affectionate and deep perception of my endeavour, which "has
proceeded both from man's need of freedom as well as of love,"
and which, by and with the grace of God, has been impelled to
raise itself toward the "Divine."--I cannot say much on this
subject; but may my works only remain no dumb witnesses, and may
your intimate understanding of them give you some satisfaction.

I send you herewith Dingelstedt's Festal Song for the Schiller
Celebration, which I have purposely composed in a very simple,
national manner. Perhaps there might be an opportunity of
bringing the thing to a hearing during the Schiller Festival in
Prague. Will you ask Apt whether he would be disposed to do it?
The studying of it would not give the least trouble. It requires
only a baritone or bass for the solo part, and an ordinary chorus
of men's voices without any accompaniment.--

Leaving it entirely in your hands to act about it as you may
think best, and either to promote the performance or to let it
alone, I remain, with best thanks and high esteem,

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

October 30th, 1859

My composition to Halm's festival play has been sent through H.
von Dingelstedt to Herr Thome, and will probably be performed on
the 9th or 10th November. [The festival play was given in Prague
under the theater conductor Thome. The music to it was never
published. The Weimar archives probably possess the score.] Write
and tell me how the matter is settled.



223. To Ingeborg Stark

[A pupil of Liszt's, who afterwards married Liszt's pupil Hans
von Bronsart, now General Manager of the Weimar Court theater:
she was also known as a composer.]

It is very charming and graceful of you, dear Mademoiselle Inga,
to remember the 22nd October so kindly, and I should have thanked
you sooner for your letter, which gave me sincere pleasure, had I
not been kept to my bed for nearly a week in consequence of much
emotion and fatigue.

Through our friend Bronsart I have had some preliminary good
tidings of you; you have fulfilled your role of charmer in the
best possible manner, and Bronsart is full of raptures about you.
But all this is ancient history for you, something like a chapter
of Rollin on the history of the Medes,--after whom come the
Persians, the Greeks, and the Romans...

For the present it is the turn of Russia, which you are in the
way of conquering, and I see from here the enchantment of your
admirers of St. Petersburg, who are all ears and all eyes around
the piano where you are enthroned.

Will you remember me affectionately to Prince Odoyewski, and give
a friendly shake hand [Written in English by Liszt] from me to
Mr. Martynoff. As for our dear Tartar, [The composer Alexander
Seroff] tell him how much I am attached to him; he will be all
the more agreeably persuaded of this if you tell him. Ask him
also to write to me after your first concert, for I would not
risk offending your modesty so far as to beg you to send me an
exact account of your undoubted successes. But I don't intend on
that account to let you stand still as regards letter-writing,
and you will give me great pleasure if, for example, you will
continue your history of the musical prowess of Rubinstein (that
you have begun so well).

You know that I am truly interested in what he is doing,
considering that he has all that is wanting to compose good and
beautiful things, provided that he does not persist in writing
straight off too hurriedly, and guards a little against excess in
the very exercise of these grand qualities.

The "Ocean" of which Rubinstein has sung might serve as his model
in this; he knows how to restrain his waves in their liberty and
power--and I hope Rubinstein would not be offended by the
comparison!--Let me know then about his artistic actions and
attitudes, of which, I presume, he will have every occasion to be
satisfied and proud. Our little Weymar has remained, as usual,
pretty tame since you left; but in a week's time we shall be
celebrating here the centenary of Schiller's birth with all the
enthusiasm of which we are susceptible (which is not saying
much).

On the 9th November the music that I have composed for Halm's
Festival-play, "A Hundred Years Ago," will be given at the
theater, and Jena has put on its festival programme my chorus "An
die Kuenstler," which will terminate the ceremony of the 11th
(Friday next).

In addition you will find in the Schiller number of the Leipzig
Illustrirte Zeitung, which will appear on the 12th November, a
Festival song "im Volkston" [In the style of a folk-song] of my
composition. Do not be shocked at the extreme simplicity of this
song; it was not the occasion to make a display of musical
knowledge--but simply to write forty bars or so which could be
quite easily sung and remembered by tutti quanti. In order to do
this I had to dress my Muse in a blouse, or, if you prefer a more
German comparison, "ich habe der Dame eine bayrische Joppe
angezogen!" ["I have dressed the lady in a Bavarian jacket."]

How are you getting on with your truly Samsonic Variations--and
with your Fugue "Martha"? Don't make too great a martyr of
yourself over it, and reserve for yourself also the better
part...that of Mary. [She had written a fugue on the musical
letters of the names Martha and Maria [Mary]--the names of her
friends, the sisters Von Sabinin.]

As I have mentioned this name I will tell you that Princess Marie
Hohenlohe will spend her winter in Vienna.

I, for my part, shall not stir from the Altenburg, where I am
reckoning on finishing my Elizabeth, and on living more and more
as a recluse--indeed, even a little like a bear--but not in the
style of those estimable citizens of the woods, whom the
impresarii of small pleasures degrade by making them dance in the
market-places to the sound of their flutes and drums! I shall
rather choose a model ideal of a bear--be sure of that--and the
flutes and drums which might lead me into the slightest future
temptation of cutting capers have still to be invented.

Will you be so good, dear Mademoiselle Inga, as to present my
very affectionate respects to Madame, your mother, as well as my
best remembrances and compliments to la Sagesse Olivia--[Liszt's
name for the sister of Ingeborg Stark] and believe me invariably

Your very devoted

F. Liszt

Weymar, November 2nd, 1859



224. To Johann von Herbeck.

Dear Friend,

I only returned a few hours ago from Zwickau, and find your
friendly letter here, in reply to which I must excuse myself for
not having been able to fulfill your wish so soon as I had
intended, in respect to the Schubert Marches. This delay, which
was very unpleasant to me, was occasioned by an indisposition
which obliged me to keep my bed for a whole week  at the end of
October. The Weymar and Jena Schiller Festivals, following on the
top of that, made it utterly impossible for me to get on with the
instrumentation of the Marches. But I promise you that you shall
have the score by Christmas at latest.

"Prometheus" will present himself to you by the end of this
month. If after looking through the score, dear friend, you think
the work suitable for a performance in Vienna, I shall be glad.
If not, I beg you to tell me so with perfect candor, and without
the slightest scruple of thereby wounding my vanity. Whether the
stomach of the critics and of the public will be able to digest
such a liver cut out of the vulture as this of my "Prometheus,"
or whether at the very first bars all will not be lost, I cannot
determine; but still less would I prepare superfluous
disagreeables for you by the performance of my "Tonschmiererei;"
[Tone-daubing] of such ill-odor from the beginning!

Decide therefore entirely according to your own judicious
opinion--and, whatever that may be, rest assured of the sincere
acknowledgment and esteem with which I remain

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

November 18th, 1859



225. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Of the three prize essays (which I return to you herewith) the
one with the motto "Try all things and maintain the best" is,
according to my opinion, very significant and suitable to the
definite solving of the question. The writer develops his thesis
with so safe, so rightly apprehending, and so far grasping a
logic that it shows convincingly that the now indispensable
practice is in complete union with the results of the theory. It
is to be hoped that our excellent colleague and friend Lobe will
also give his weighty judgment in favor of this prize essay, and
will also scientifically explain his motives for doing so--for I
cannot suppose that Lobe is in agreement with the opponents of
the enharmonic system, whose theory would make us have to do
musical penance.

In the two other essays with the mottoes "Our eyes see, but they
require the light to do so," and "Look, this is what man has
done!" there is much that is true and worthy of consideration
(especially in the former), which might be made prominent after
reading through all the essays sent in.

Come to an understanding next with Lobe about the final business
of the causes for the award of the prize, and let me have a draft
of it. It cannot be otherwise than profitable if the affair is
treated somewhat exhaustively and thoroughly, which you, dear
friend, in conjunction with Lobe and Weitzmann, are much better
able to do than my humble self, since I, as Hauptmann justly
observes, should appear to be too much prejudiced by my own
practice. In matters of harmony, as in other greater matters, I
believe also that Nature is in everlasting union with Genius.

"What one promises, the other surely performs." And Beethoven was
quite right to assert his right to allow that which was forbidden
by Kirnberger, Marpurg, Albrechtsberger, etc.!--Science must only
investigate more and more the nature of things and the freedom of
genius, and become experienced in their further development.-----
-----

Ever faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

[Weimar,] December 1st, 1859

I quite agree with your project of giving two prizes. The first
prize will be awarded to the above-mentioned treatise, unless,
which I doubt, a still more successful one should be sent in.



226. To Anton Rubenstein

Certainly, my very honored friend, I shall not leave off taking a
very sincere and loyal part in the unfolding of the career that
you are pursuing with such rare prowess, and all that you can
tell me of your doings in composition and musical conducting will
always find in me a lively interest. Thank you, therefore, for
your nice letter, which contains also a promise which I shall be
very much pleased to see you fulfill--namely, that of your visit
next spring, in company with your Opera in four acts--and
probably also with your "Song of Songs," which you do not mention
to me, but which I am none the less desirous, on that account, of
knowing.

Have you thought well to give your "Paradise Lost" at St.
Petersburg? I urged you strongly to do so, for it is a capital
work, which does you great honor, and the place of which seems
fixed in your concerts. And on this subject allow me to
compliment you very sincerely upon the idea (all the less
frequent as it is just) which has been uppermost in the
distribution of the programme of these concerts. If it continues
to predominate, and if in effect they take it into their heads at
St. Petersburg to do justice (as you tell me) "to all the masters
of all schools and of all times" (not excepting our own!), the
famous verse

"'Tis from the North that light comes to us today"

will be justified, and even by Music! In France and Germany we
are far from this--and classical Pharisaism swells its voice
there to make a diversion to Mercantilism, that rich disgraceful
one, who succeeds perfectly well in making the principal papers
and their numerous readers dance to the sounds of his harsh
flute, whilst his antagonist (Pharisaism) only ends in
"Improperias" and "Jeremiads"...not composed by Palestrina!

Your choice of the introduction to the second act of the
Fliegender Hollander seems to me an excellent one, and I shall
get the score (of this scene) copied for you, as it is very
difficult to get a complete score of the Opera, and as I only
possess the autograph, with which it would be a matter of
conscience to me to part. In about a fortnight I will send you
what you want for your programme.

Princess Marie Hohenlohe is at the present time at St.
Petersburg, and will be much delighted to see you again. Her
husband does a good deal in the way of music, and plays several
"Lieder ohne Worte" of his own composition very nicely. He and
his wife will assuredly have pleasure in being amongst the first
to applaud at the time of the performances of your Opera in
Vienna.

A revoir then, my dear Rubinstein, in the spring--and ever yours
in sincere esteem and affection,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 3rd, 1859

P.S.--When you see Mademoiselle Ingeborg Stark, please give her
my very affectionate remembrances. If her journey from Paris
should bring her back by Weymar she would be sure to find me
there; for, in spite of what the papers say, which, among other
fancies, have taken it into their heads to make me travel hither
and thither, I shall not stir from here for several months, but
continue to work my best--if only to prove to the "kindly critic"
and the idlers that it is very much to be regretted that I should
have taken it into my head to turn composer!--This recalls the
proverb, "On devient cuisinier, mais on nait rotisseur!"

[There does not seem to be any equivalent to this proverb in
English: the nearest approach to it is, perhaps, "A poet is born,
not made."]



227. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

It is of great consequence to me not to delay any longer the
publication of my "Gesammelte Lieder." Forgive me, therefore, if
today I am somewhat troublesome to your friendship..--.

It seems to me that the best plan would be if, before you confer
with Herr Schulze, you would first have a consultation with
Klemm, and come to a thorough understanding on the matter with
him. [Liszt evidently wished to have the songs engraved first at
his own cost, and to let Klemm undertake the sale on commission.]
Beg him also, in my name, to show a friendly sympathy to the
work. The songs can hold their ground in their present form
(regardless of the criticism of our choking and quarrelling
opponents which will infallibly follow!); and if a few singers
could be found, not of the raw and superficial kind, who would
boldly venture to sing songs by the notorious non-composer, Franz
Liszt, they would probably find a public for them.

I think I told you that a couple of them made a furore in certain
salons which are very much set against me, as posthumous songs of
Schubert, and were encored!--Of course I have begged the singer
to carry the joke on further.

Klemm need not therefore be in the least ashamed of undertaking
the publication of the work in a friendly spirit.

Best thanks beforehand for your kind trouble in this matter--and
ever faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 6th, 1859

P.S.--I have just received your letter. The two K.'s--Kompel and
Kahnt--shall be made most welcome. Pohl had already told me of
Kahnt's coming; it will be a pleasure to me not to verlangweilen
[To make the time hang heavily] his visit here (if that word is
not quite German, still I consider it is comprehensible!). Julius
Schuberth had also the intention of rescuing something [Namely,
Liszt's composition] from Kuehn. [Music publisher] Your idea of
giving Bronsart the conductorship of the Euterpe Concerts is a
most excellent one. I suppose the letter which I wrote about this
to P. Fischer (to your address) came to hand (?). The day before
yesterday I also let Bronsart know that possibly some favorable
openings might occur for him in Leipzig, and recommended him not
to neglect them. Bronsart would be just in his right post in
Leipzig, and I do not doubt that he would in every respect
maintain it in the most honorable manner. In addition to this, it
would be especially agreeable to me to begin constant intercourse
with him as my next neighbor. He is now working at his Opera, and
sent me a little while ago the libretto which he has himself
composed to it, and which seems to me very successful in the most
important scenes, as well as in the dialogue. [It was afterwards
composed by his wife ("King Hiarne").]

Address your letters to "Herr von Bronsart, c/o Herr General von
Bronsart, Commandant of Dantzig, Dantzig."

In consequence of the performance of my Mass in Munich (on the
King's birthday, at the end of November), which, as I am told on
many sides, was well given and--which seems wonderful--was
acknowledged by many musicians there to be a work of importance--
so that even Lachner spoke favorably of it--the "Allgemezne"
Zeftung again breathes forth poison and gall (supplement of 3rd
December), without forgetting therewith the "Neue Zeitschrift fur
Musik." I should like to take the opportunity of making this pack
of critics, such as W., B., G., B., and whatever all the
assistants' assistants are called, understand the following
thoughts as Xenie:--[Epigram]

"Ye break your staff over me, but your staff has indeed long
since become rotten from all the dust and dirt that stick to it,
and it scarcely serves any longer to cut the air!"

Tell this idea to Lohmann--perhaps he may be inspired with a
happy rhyme for it.

I cannot say anything better to you about Pohl than what you tell
me.--

Herewith, for your private delectation, is a copy of some lines
from my letter to Herr Gustav Eggers (in Berlin), brother of the
well-known Art-journal Eggers, now very much concerned in the
Prussian paper. Gustav E. was here at the September Festival
(1857), when he heard the Faust Symphony, and sent me lately a
very pretty book of songs, begging me to recommend them to
Hartel.--Send me the little paper back soon.



228. To Eduard Liszt

By the loving friendship which you have shown me, especially
during the last decade in which so many trials have been laid on
me, our close relationship in heart and character has been for
ever firmly sealed, dearest Eduard. You are, and will ever be to
me, a support and a courage-giving comforter in the battles and
straits of my life. God grant me grace to go through them without
wavering, as a faithful servant of the truth in Christ!

You have decided upon just what is most right and suitable in the
arrangement of the funeral ceremony of my son. [He died in
Vienna, where he was studying law.] The selection of Terziani's
Requiem was a very suitable one under the existing conditions. I
thank you for everything from the depths of my soul!

I shall write a couple of lines to Herbeck tomorrow, and send him
at the same time the score and parts of the "Prometheus," as well
as two Marches of Schubert which I have instrumented for him. The
sending off of this parcel has been delayed by the circumstance
that it was necessary to have the whole score of the "Prometheus"
written out afresh, and to make some alterations in the parts.
The earlier score was indeed sufficient for me--but any strange
conductor would scarcely find his way through it. I hope Herbeck
will be pleased with the instrumentation of the Schubert Marches.
I fancy I have been successful in this little work, and I shall
continue it further, as it offers much attraction to me. The four
other Marches will follow shortly, which should make the half-
dozen complete.

Cornelius arrived here the day before yesterday. His friendly
attachment to you is a very warm and sincerely devoted one. On me
Cornelius's pure mind and thoroughly honorable disposition always
have the most beneficial effect; but it is especially welcome to
me just now to hear more of you from him, and thus to be more
with you.

Be as good to me as you are dear to my heart!

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 28th, 1859



229. To Josef Dessauer

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Von Hannen, painter in
Venice.--The addressee ("Maitre Favilla," as George Sand named
her friend) was known as the composer of refined songs (1798-
1876). Three of these Liszt transcribed (1847, Berlin,
Schlesinger).]

Dear honored Friend,

It is possible that the delicacy of your perception may have
brought you much trouble, but it assures you a soft place in the
better region of the heart of your friends. This I again felt in
reading your dear letter.

Accept, therefore, the heartfelt thanks of your old friend, whose
"manly formed nature" must further prove itself; he has still
many duties to fulfill and more than one battle to fight. May the
Cross remain his support, his strength, and his shield!

Whatever fatality also may hang over me, be assured of the
faithful attachment of your

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 30th, 1859

The crucifix from you (after the Gran Mass) has grown still
dearer to me!--

When I have finished with some works which cannot be postponed
any longer, Daniel shall receive his Requiena.



230. To Wilkoszewshi, Secretary of the Concerts of the
"Hofcapelle" in Munich.

[From a copy in Liszt's own handwriting (amongst the letters to
Brendel)]

Dear Sir,

The performance of new works on the part of so renowned an
orchestra as that of Munich must ever remain a mark of special
attention for the composers. But I must rate it still higher
that, in face of the strong prejudice against my name, one of my
ill-famed Symphonic Poems should have been included in the
programme of the concerts of the Munich Hofcapelle.

It is ill preaching to deaf ears, and it is well known that there
is no worse deafness than that of people who will not hear. Hence
it is that the Festklange, as well as the Mass and everything
that I and others better than my humble self have been able to
compose, is prejudiced. But the more unseemly and malicious
factiousness may show itself against new works, the more am I
laid under a grateful obligation to those who do not accept as
their artistic criterion the injustice inflicted on me.

Time levels all things, and I can quietly wait until people are
more occupied in learning to know and to hear my scores than in
condemning and hissing them. Mean-spirited, blackguard tricks,
even when played in concert-rooms and newspaper reports, are no
arguments worthy of a lasting import.

I beg you, dear sir, to convey to General Music-Director Lachner
my best thanks for his well-meant sentiments towards me, and I
remain, with high esteem, yours very sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 15th, 1860.



231. To Johann von Herbeck.

[Received, according to him, on January 26th, 1860]

Dear Friend,

On getting back from Berlin yesterday evening I find your letter,
which has given me especial pleasure by the assurance that the
"Prometheus" choruses and, the instrumentation of the "Schubert
Marches" fulfill your expectations. You shall very shortly
receive two more "Schubert Marches" (the "Funeral March" in E
flat minor, and the "Hungarian March" in C minor out of the
"Hungarian Divertissement". [Op. 40, No. 5, and "Marcia" from Op.
54] They could be played one immediately after the other.

The "Prometheus" choruses, together with the "Symphonic Poem"
which goes before them (and which has been published by Hartel as
No. 5), were composed in July 1850 for the Herder Festival, and
were performed in the theater here on the eve of that festival.
My pulses were then all beating feverishly, and the thrice-
repeated cry of woe of the Oceanides, the Dryads, and the
Infernals echoed in my ears from all the trees and lakes of our
park.

In my work I strove after an ideal of the antique, which should
be represented, not as an ancient skeleton, but as a living and
moving form. A beautiful stanza of Andre Chenier,

"Sur des pensers nouveaux faisons des vers antiques," ["On modern
thoughts let us fashion verses antique."]

served me for precept, and showed me the way to musical plastic
art and symmetry.

The favorable opinion you have formed of the work in reading it
through is a token to me that I have not altogether failed--I
hope that the performance will not spoil your sympathy for it. I
leave the direction, with the utmost confidence, entirely in your
hands.--You always hit on the right thing, and navigate
satisfactorily with your entire forces the occasional
difficulties of the dissonant entries, and of the pathetic
delivery which is absolutely essential in several places. It
would certainly be a great pleasure to me, dear friend, if I
could be present at the performance in Vienna on the 26th
February, to enjoy your intelligent and inspired performance, but
I am prevented from doing this by various circumstances (an
explanation of which would lead me too far).

I beg you therefore not to induce the directors to invite me,
because I might not be in a position to make my excuses. So
please do you undertake the office of unchaining Prometheus in
Vienna; this labour of Hercules will become you well [Footnote
below]. There are certainly no powerful eagles to hack and rend
in pieces the Titan's liver--but there is a whole host of ravens
and creeping vermin ready to do it.--Once more best thanks and
greetings from your most highly esteeming and very devoted

F. Liszt

[It took place on the 26th February, 1860. Herbeck notes as
follows about it in his diary: "Prometheus, Symphonic Poem,
pleased fairly. Chorus of Tritons pleased extremely. The
Vintagers' and Reapers' choruses and concluding chorus pleased,
but of course there was a formally organized opposition hissing.
They had sworn	the overthrow of this music, without even
knowing a note of it."]



232. To Dr. Franz Brendel.

So then it has happened well that the editor of the Neue
Zeitschrift has also become the editor of my "Gesammelte Lieder."
Best thanks, dear friend, for the means you have taken to promote
this. Kahnt has only to come to an understanding with
Schlesinger; I on my side do not wish to place any limitation on
his rights. Whether a transcription of this or that song may be
made I do not know; if this should be the case I will only beg
Kahnt to let me know of any such chance transcriptions before
allowing them to appear, mainly because it would not be pleasant
to me if any really too stupid arrangements should come out. This
is only a matter of artistic consideration--beyond that I have
neither restriction nor reservation to make to the proposed
edition. As soon as Kahnt is in order with Schlesinger I am
satisfied with everything. This or that song may then appear
singly, or transcribed for guitar or zither; so much the better
if Kahnt can thereby make it pay. N.B.--I should be glad if, in
bringing out the songs singly, the same outside cover could be
employed as in the complete edition, on account of the index.
Probably Kahnt will say nothing against this, as the back of the
cover serves as an advertisement of the entire collection of
songs.

Yesterday evening Fraulein Berghaus (a daughter of the Potsdam
professor) sang two numbers, Freudvoll and leidvoll and Es muss
ein Wunderbares sein (out of the sixth part), at a concert given
by Singer and Cossmann. I had indeed forbidden it, because this
winter I will not have my name put on any concert programme at
all--but her exquisite delivery of these songs, which were also
received with approbation, reconciled me to it.

At the last Court concert in Berlin Fraulein Genast [A highly
gifted singer, afterwards Frau Dr. Merian in Weimar] selected the
"Loreley" as her concluding song, and the Frau Princess Victoria
expressed herself very favorably about it, remarking that a
Schubert spirit breathed in the composition. One of these days
Fraulein Genast is again singing the "Loreley" at the
Philharmonic Concert in Hamburg. Otten has specially begged her
to do so. The same gentleman wrote about eighteen months ago to
Frau von Milde that he must beg to remark "that in regard to the
choice of compositions to be performed Robert Schumann is the
extreme limit to whom his programme could extend!"

I cannot quite remember whether I sent Gotze a copy of my songs.
Please ask him, and if I have not yet done so let me know. Gotze
has a special claim to them, for in earlier years he had the
courage to sing several of my nonentities--and I will see that he
has a copy at once. At the same time ask Fraulein Gotze also
whether she has received the copy of the Ballade Leonore. [Liszt
had composed this melodrama for Auguste Gotze, and frequently
performed it, as well as his later melodramas, with her.] From
several places (and quite lately from Carlsruhe and Brunswick)
orders for this Ballade have come to me, which--between
ourselves--are not convenient to me. My copyist has already had
to make at least nine copies of it, which is a pretty good
expense. Nevertheless a tenth shall willingly be made, if the one
which was intended for Fraulein Gotze did not reach her, of which
I am somewhat in doubt, owing to the many demands which the
Leonore has brought with it, and which have made me somewhat
confused.

It would really be the best for me if Kahnt or Schuberth would
save me the trouble of making further copies by publishing the
"Leonore". But I should not wish in any way to incommode the
publisher, and certainly not to offer anything without knowing
that it would be welcome. Under present circumstances a very
pronounced reserve has become my rule. My business is simply to
continue working unremittingly, and quietly to await the rest.

Accordingly I submit myself without difficulty to your experience
as editor in regard to my Munich letter [To Wilkoszewski]--
although I could maintain good grounds for	publishing it.
Certainly it is always the gentlemanly thing entirely to ignore
certain things and people. You may therefore be quite right in
putting aside all other considerations; and as I am convinced of
your most sincere friendship I willingly leave you to decide
whether my coming forward in such matters is of use or not. In
case you had thought it advisable for my letter to be printed in
the "Neue Zeitschrift" (which I left to your judgment), it would
have had of necessity to be printed without the slightest
alteration, because I have purposely written it thus clearly to
Herr W., and any alteration in it might be taken as cowardice
(which is far from me). But probably it is better to abandon the
matter for a while, and to be somewhat more severe on another
occasion. The pack of ragamuffins has richly deserved to be
treated as ragamuffins!

This evening is Wagner's first concert in Paris. I expect little
good to him from it, and consider such a step on Wagner's part as
a mistake. In consequence of this opinion our correspondence is
for the time suspended. More about this viva voce--as well as
about "Tristan and Isolde." A performance of the Opera was
desired--that is to say, commanded for the 8th April (the
birthday of the Grand Duchess). But Frau von Milde cannot
undertake the chief part--and on that account the parts and score
sent to us from Carlsruhe will be sent back again at once!

Has Wagner given his opinion more decidedly about a "Tristan"
performance in Leipzig? Can you let me know the contents of his
letter?

With heartfelt greetings, your

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 25th, 1860

If you should see Schuberth, tell him that I have something to
communicate to him that would perhaps repay him for the trouble
of coming to see me here for a couple of hours. I have no
intention of coming to Leipzig for the present. Tell him that
delays of this kind make me "nervos" [nervous] (He knows what the
word "nervos" means with me.)



233. To Friedrich Hebbel

[Communicated by Dr. Felix Bamberg, from the original]

The words which you write to me bear the two-fold eloquence of
the praiseworthy man in the fore-rank of Art, and of the friend
dearly loved and highly respected by me. Accept my warmest thanks
for it, and please excuse me for not having told you sooner what
a strengthening and healing effect your letter made on me. Work
of all sorts and a long absence from here occasioned this delay.
In the interim I was often with you in thought; only the day
before yesterday I read to the Princess your two glorious Sonnets
an den Kunstler ["To the Artist"], "Ob Du auch bilden magst, was
unverganglich"--"Und ob mich diese Zweifel brennen
müssen?"["Whether thou canst form what is imperishable": "And
whether these doubts must burn me."]--

From Weymar I have nothing interesting nor especially agreeable
to tell you. This winter will pass away pretty quietly and
insignificantly at the theater, with repertoire works and pieces
that will bring in money, and in society with the customary
pleasures. A new drama by Rost, "Ludwig der Eiserne," made some
sensation, as is peculiar to the very popular productions of this
author, who has achieved a public-house notoriety here. The
nobles ought to have appeared in it yoked to the plough, but on
Dingelstedt's advice Rost toned down that scene!--A translation
by Frau Schuselka (who has performed here sometimes) of the "Pere
prodigue" of Dumas fils was to have come on the boards; but it
appears that there are scruples about making such very ominous
demands on the customary powers of digestion of our un-lavish
fathers of families! Amongst other inconveniences the piece also
contains logarithms, to which the respectable German Philistine
cannot attain.

As regards myself, I am quietly waiting for the spring, when I
shall in all probability move on further--of course not to renew
my occupation of conducting, as it is said I shall do in Munich,
Berlin, or elsewhere--an occupation I have gladly given up;--but
in order to be able to pursue my work further than I am able to
do in Weymar, which to me is a more important matter.

Remember me most kindly to your wife, and be assured that I
remain ever in truest devotion yours most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 5th, 1860.



234. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[February 1860]

Dear Friend,

Although as a general rule I consider that it is not the business
of the Neue Zeitschrift to go in for polemics, yet it seems to me
that the little notice that Hanslick has put in No. 49 of the
Vienna Presse, Saturday, the 18th February, is of such a kind
that one must not ignore it.

The Presse is a paper with a tremendous circulation in the
monarchy, and Hanslick counts among the leaders of our opponents;
it would therefore be worth while to make an exception by coming
forward on this occasion, unless (which I cannot as yet believe)
your Vienna correspondent has been guilty of the mischievous
conduct which Hanslick so severely reports. This point must first
be made clear--whether in the third (or possibly an earlier)
concert of Herr Boskowitz an exchange of a Schumann for a Liszt
piece occurred. [Instead of the Liszt piece "Au bord d'une
source," which stood on the programme, Boskowitz had played the
"Jagdlied" from Schumann's "Waldscenen," which did not prevent a
correspondent (namely, the correspondent of the Deutsche
Musikzeitung, as the Neue Zeitschrift of 24th February, 1860,
gave out) from loudly carping at the supposed Liszt composition.]
Possibly also your correspondent made use of the expression "The
Vienna Press" in general, and did not refer specially to the
paper Die Presse, [This was actually the case] or was referring
to other remarks of Hanslick's...

This is only the second time for many years past, dear friend,
that I have drawn your attention to notices in the paper. On the
first occasion, when the Augsburger Allgemeine gave that infamous
correspondence about the venality of the Neue Zeitschrift, your
striking answer gave the most convincing proof of what part the
opponents were studying to play!--I hope it will be possible to
despatch Hanslick's notice (which I enclose) in a similar
fashion. But it is necessary to get at the exact truth before
inveighing against them--for Hanslick is no easy opponent, and if
one once attacks him it must be with suitable weapons and without
giving quarter. The words "denunciation proceedings," "Gessler
caps of the party of the future," and especially the concluding
sentence, "As long as Herr Brendel," etc., are a challenge, which
deserves more than a faint-hearted reproof! I would also advise
you to send a duplicate of your reply to the Presse in Vienna, at
the same time as it is published in the Zeitschrift. The editors
of the Presse will be certain to reject it, according to the
usual method of the clique impartiality of those gentlemen. But
the scandalous examples of the latter will be thus increased by
one more.

It is easy also to see beforehand that Hanslick will not let the
matter rest at this first notice, and will continue the
discussion.

Hearty greetings.

F.L.P.S.--In case your Vienna correspondent should be quite in
the wrong, it would be better simply to be silent and wait for a
better opportunity.



235. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[March or April 1860]

Dear Friend,

Do not blame me if this time I follow Pohl's example and keep you
waiting for the promised article. I have been working at it
pretty continuously during the past week, and the sketch of it is
quite ready; but I am not quite satisfied with it, and about
Berlioz and Wagner I must say the right thing in the right
manner. [No article of the kind by Liszt is contained in the Neue
Zeitschrift for the year in question; probably it was
unfinished.] This duty requires me to spend more time on it, and
unfortunately I have so much on hand this week that it is hardly
possible for me to busy myself with polemics. Tomorrow is again a
grand Court concert; Bronsart and Fraulein Stark arrived
yesterday; Frau von Bulow comes today, and I expect Hans on
Saturday. Besides this, there is still more important work for
me, which will take up my time entirely till the end of this
month.

Well, I will see to it that, if possible, Berlioz and Wagner do
not remain forgotten!--

Let me first of all answer your questions.

Whether it would be desirable to hold the second Tonkunstler-
Versammlung this year, I already left it to you, at our last
meeting, to decide. In my opinion we might wait till next year
without injury to the affair. [This was done.] As long as I
myself have not made a secure and firm footing in Weymar, I
cannot invite you to convene the meeting here. If you hold to the
dates of the 17th, 18th, and 19th June, we are bound to Leipzig,
where I can then tell you with certainty whether Weymar will suit
for the next meeting.

It goes without saying that you, dear friend, must arrange about
everything that I can undertake and do for the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung. Only my personal help as conductor must be excepted.
At our next consultation we shall easily come to an understanding
as to the desirability of one conductor or several.

I would indicate and emphasize, as absolutely necessary, the
performance of new works by Bulow, Draseke, Bronsart, Singer,
Seifriz, etc. I think I understand and can manage the art of
programme-making in a masterly manner. When once matters have got
so far, I will fix with you the programme of the three
performances.

I agree with the choice of the "Prometheus," and at the religious
performance, if the latter is not filled up with one single great
work, I would suggest perhaps the "Beatitudes," or the 13th Psalm
(the former last about ten minutes, the latter twenty-five).

Will you therefore decide definitely where the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung shall be held this year and the date of it, about
which I have nothing further to say? We will then discuss and
settle the rest together.

You will find my remarks as to the statute scheme on the last
page of it.

With hearty greetings, your

F. Liszt

P.S.--

A. The revising of the "Leonore" shall be attended to
immediately.

B. I shall welcome Fraulein Brauer most cordially.

C. I recommend to you again the manuscripts of Pasque and
Councillor Muller. Have you replied to Muller?

Herewith is a letter from Weitzmann (14th June, 1859), in which
you will find much worthy of consideration and use.

Important! N.B.--When you convene the Tonkunstler-Versammlung,
add to it at once the following: "For the foundation of the
German Universal Musical Society." This is the principal aim,
toward the accomplishment of which we have to work.

[Liszt was, as Princess Wittgenstein distinctly told the editor,
the actual founder of the "German Universal Musical Society." He
conceived the idea and plan of it, and it was only at his wish
that Brendel gave his name to it, and undertook to be president,
etc.]



236. To Louis Kohler.

My dear, excellent friend,

You have given me a rare pleasure. Your articles on my
"Gesammelte Lieder" are a reproduction, replete with spirit and
mind, of what I, alas! must feel and bear much more than I can
venture to write down! Reviews such as these are not matters of
every-day reviewers--nor must one shame you with such a title.

Accept my warmest thanks for them, and allow me to present to you
herewith a couple of little singable things in manuscript. They
were jotted down after reading your articles, and, if I mistake
not, they spring from the melody of speech. In any case, dear
friend, you have a special right to them--as well as to the
sincere esteem and faithful attachment with which I remain your

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 5th, 1860

Towards the end of October the two Symphonic Poems, Nos. 10 and
11, which have still to be published--"Hamlet" and the
"Hunnenschlacht" [The Battle of the Huns]--will appear at
Hartel's; and when these are out all the twelve monsters will
have appeared. Shortly afterwards will follow Faust, the choruses
to Prometheus, a couple of Psalms, and a new number of songs. I
will send you the whole lot. But if possible arrange so that we
may soon meet again--at the latest at the next Tonkunstler-
Versammlung next year, at which we cannot possibly do without
you.



237. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

You remain perpetually in the home of my heart, not at all in
countless company, but all the more in picked company. When I
think I have done anything pretty good I think of you and rejoice
that what I have done will be a pleasure to you--and in the hours
when sadness and sorrow take hold of me you are again my comfort
and strength by your loving insight into my innermost wishes and
yearnings! My thanks, my warmest and truest thanks, to you for
all the sustaining and soothing friendship that you show to me.
It is to me a special token of Heaven's favor to me, and I pray
to God that He may unite us for ever in Himself!--

Cornelius writes me word that you will probably come to Weymar
towards the end of the summer. That will be a great pleasure to
me; I often feel as if I must have a talk with you out of the
depths of my heart--for with writing, as you know, I don't
exactly get on. I expect the Princess towards the middle of
August. Meanwhile I receive good and satisfactory tidings from
Rome. I hope all will turn out for the best.

In these latter weeks I have been completely absorbed in my
composing. If I mistake not, my power of production has
materially increased, while some things in me are made clear and
others are more concentrated. By the end of October the last two
of the Symphonic Poems will be out ("Hamlet" and the
"Hunnenschlacht"). Then come the Psalms, which you do not yet
know, and which I much want you to know-and also a new number of
songs which will please you. I shall then work at the Oratorio
St. Elizabeth, exclusive of all else, and get it completely
finished before the end of the year. May God in His grace accept
my endeavors!--

I must express myself not entirely in accord beforehand with your
plan for your son, although I consider your way of looking at the
present state of things by no means a wrong one. I am also
convinced that, when it comes to settling definitely, the talents
and capabilities, as well as the bent of mind, of your child will
be satisfactory to you. If the young one has a mind for a
uniform--well, let it be so. To cut one's way through life with a
sabre is indeed for the most part pleasanter than any other
mode...The business paper for the Princess I will keep till her
return, unless you write to me to forward it to her in Rome.

May I bother you with a commission for provisions? Forgive me for
the way in which I am always making use of you, but I do so want
to make a little joke for Bulow, and I have no one now in Vienna
who could help me in it except just you. It is about sending a
pretty considerable amount of Hungarian Paprika [Hungarian,
Turkish, or Spanish pepper from Hungary] and a little barrel of
Pfefferoni (little green Hungarian pepper-plants preserved in
vinegar). Please ask Capellmeister Doppler where these things are
to be procured genuine, and send them me as soon as possible to
Weymar. I won't hide from you that I intend to go shares with
Bulow, as I am particularly fond of Paprika and Pfefferoni. So
take care that there is enough sent, and that it arrives in good
condition.--And as this will give you occasion to see Doppler,
give him my warm thanks for the instrumentation of the Pester
Carnaval (in which musical Paprika and Pfefferoni are not
wanting). He has again been most successful in it, and I intend
to push on in the autumn the publication of the six Rhapsodies
for orchestra, for which indeed I shall have to obtain the
permission or consent of three separate publishers (Schott,
Senff, Haslinger)--a circumstance which may of itself occasion
some delay, especially if the gentlemen behave in regard to my
wish as Spina did in so unpleasantly surprising a manner in
regard to the instrumentation of the Schubert Marches. To tell
you this incident briefly: I wrote to Dachs and asked him to
request Spina in my name either to publish the three Marches
himself in score--without any remuneration for me!--or else to
give me permission to bring them out through another publisher.
Spina's answer, as Dachs gave me to understand, was that he could
not consent to either the one or the other of my proposals (which
were certainly reasonable enough)! And thus I must wait until
Spina can hit on a better plan! When I have an opportunity, I
shall venture to apply to him direct.

For the present, in consideration of the fact that Paprika and
Pfefferoni make one very thirsty, a barrel of Gumpoldskirchner
(with a slightly sharp, flowery after-taste) would be very
welcome to me, if by chance you are able to find a good kind and
cheap.--Forgive me for all these Lucullian extravagances!--

I will write soon to Cornelius. Give him my heartfelt greetings.
Also please remember me kindly to Dr. Kulke. I will give him my
thanks by letter on the first opportunity for his Prometheus
articles, as I would have already done through Cornelius, had he
not started so suddenly.--

Now farewell, dearest Eduard. Spare yourself and take care of
your health. Assure your dear wife of my heartfelt attachment,
and kiss your children for your faithful

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 9th, 1860



238. To Ingeborg Stark

[Summer, 1860]

If a sort of idiosyncrasy against letters did not hold me back I
should have told you long ago what pleasure your charming letter
from Paris gave me, and what a sincere part I have taken in your
late successes, dear enchantress. But you must know all that far
better than I could succeed in writing it.

So let us talk of something else--for instance, Baron
Vietinghoff's [He took the noun de plume Boris Scheel, and in
1885 he performed his opera "Der Daemon" in St. Petersburg, which
originated twenty years before that of Rubinstein.] Overture,
which you were so kind as to send me, and which I have run
through with B[ronsart] during his short stay at Weymar--too
short to please me, but doubtless much too long for you!--The
Overture in question is not wanting either in imagination or
spirit. It is the work of a man musically much gifted, but who
has not yet sufficiently handled his subject. When you have an
opportunity, will you give my best compliments to the author, and
give him also the little scale of chords that I add? It is
nothing but a very simple development of the scale, terrifying
for all the long and protruding ears, [Figure demonstrating a
descending whole-tone scale] that Mr. de Vietinghoff employs in
the final presto of his overture (page 66 of the score).

Tausig makes a pretty fair use of it in his Geisterschaff; and in
the classes of the Conservatoire, in which the high art of the
mad dog is duly taught, the existing elementary exercises of the
piano methods, [Figure: Musical example; a five-finger exercise]
which are of a sonorousness as disagreeable as they are
incomplete, ought to be replaced by this one, which will thus
form the unique basis of the method of harmony--all the other
chords, in use or not, being unable to be employed except by the
arbitrary curtailment of such and such an interval.

In fact it will soon be necessary to complete the system by the
admission of quarter and half-quarter tones until something
better turns up!--

Behold the abyss of progress into which the abominable "Musicians
of the Future" precipitate us!

Take care that you do not let yourself be contaminated by this
pest of Art!

For a week past it has done nothing but rain here, and I have
been obliged to have fires and stoves lighted in the house. If by
chance you are favored with such a temperature at Schwalbach, I
invite you to profit by it to make some new Fugues, and to make
up, by plenty of work for the pedals, for the pedestrian exercise
of which you would be necessarily deprived.

B., to whom I beg you to give my cordial and kind remembrances,
led me to hope that you will stay a couple of days at Weymar
after your cure. If this could be so arranged I for my part
should be delighted, and should pick a quarrel with you (even if
it were a German quarrel!) if you were not completely persuaded
of it!

Remember me most affectionately to la Sagesse, and do me the
kindness to count, under all circumstances, on

Your very sincerely devoted

F. Liszt



239. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Your last proposition is the best. Come quite simply to me at
Weymar. As I am now quite alone at home we can hold our
conference and arrange matters most conveniently at the
Altenburg. I am writing at the same time to Bulow at Wiesbaden
(where he is giving a concert tomorrow, Friday), to beg him to
arrange with you about the day on which the meeting shall be held
here. You two have to decide this. Of course you will stay with
me. There shall also be a room in readiness for Kahnt.

With regard to Wagner's pardon [Wagner had been exiled from
Germany for political reasons.] I am expecting reliable
information shortly. It seems strange that the Dresden papers
should not have been the first to give the official announcement,
and that an act of pardon of H.M. the King of Saxony should be
made known through the "Bohemia" (in Prague). Wagner has not yet
written to me.

To our speedy meeting. Heartily your

F. Liszt

August 9th, 1860



240. To Princess Caroline Sayn-Wittgenstein.

[Portions of the above were published in the Neue Zeitschrift fur
Musik of 4th May, 1887.]

Weymar, September 14th, 1860

I am writing this down on the 14th September, the day on which
the Church celebrates the Festival of the Holy Cross. The
denomination of this festival is also that of the glowing and
mysterious feeling which has pierced my entire life as with a
sacred wound.

Yes, "Jesus Christ on the Cross," a yearning longing after the
Cross and the raising of the Cross,--this was ever my true inner
calling; I have felt it in my innermost heart ever since my
seventeenth year, in which I implored with humility and tears
that I might be permitted to enter the Paris Seminary; at that
time I hoped it would be granted to me to live the life of the
saints and perhaps even to die a martyr's death. This, alas! has
not happened--yet, in spite of the transgressions and errors
which I have committed, and for which I feel sincere repentance
and contrition, the holy light of the Cross has never been
entirely withdrawn from me. At times, indeed, the refulgence of
this Divine light has overflowed my entire soul.--I thank God for
this, and shall die with my soul fixed upon the Cross, our
redemption, our highest bliss; and, in acknowledgment of my
belief, I wish before my death to receive the holy sacraments of
the Catholic, Apostolic, and Romish Church, and thereby to attain
the forgiveness and remission of all my sins. Amen.

I thank my mother with reverence and tender love  for her
continual proofs of goodness and love. In my youth people called
me a good son; it was certainly no special merit on my part, for
how would it have been possible not to be a good son with so
faithfully self-sacrificing a mother?--Should I die before her,
her blessing will follow me into the grave.

I owe it to my cousin Eduard Liszt (Dr. and Royal County
Councillor of Justice in Vienna) to repeat here my warm and
grateful affection for him, and to thank him for his faithfulness
and staunch friendship. By his worth, his talents, and his
character he does honor to the name I bear, and I pray God for
His blessings on him, his wife, and his children.

Among our Art-comrades of the day there is one name which has
already become glorious, and which will become so ever more and
more--Richard Wagner. His genius has been to me a light which I
have followed--and my friendship for Wagner has always been of
the character of a noble passion. At a certain period (about ten
years ago) I had visions of a new Art-period for Weymar, similar
to that of Carl August, in which Wagner and I should have been
the leading spirits, as Goethe and Schiller were formerly,--but
unfavorable circumstances have brought this dream to nothing.

To my daughter Cosima I bequeath the sketch of Steinle
representing St. Francois de Paul, my patron saint; he is walking
on the waves, his mantle spread beneath his feet, holding in one
hand a red-hot coal, the other raised, either to allay the
tempest or to bless the menaced boatmen, his look turned to
heaven, where, in a glory, shines the redeeming word "Caritas."--
This sketch has always stood on my writing-table. Near it there
is an ancient hour-glass in carved wood with four glasses, which
is also for my daughter Cosima. Two other things which have
belonged to me are to be given as a remembrance to my cousin
Eduard Liszt and to my much-loved and brave son-in-law Hans von
Bulow.

Some of the members of our Union of the "New German School"--to
whom I remain deeply attached--must also receive some remembrance
of me; Hans von Bronsart, Peter Cornelius (in Vienna), E. Lassen
(in Weymar), Dr. Franz Brendel (in Leipzig), Richard Pohl (in
Weymar), Alex. Ritter (in Dresden), Felix Draseke (in Dresden),
Professor Weitzmann (in Berlin), Carl Tausig (from Warsaw)--
either a ring with my sign-manual, a portrait, or coat-of-arms.--
May they continue the work that we have begun--the honor of Art
and the inner worth of the artist constrains them to do so. Our
cause cannot fail, though it have for the present but few
supporters.--

One of my jewels set as a ring is to be sent to Madame Caroline
d'Artigaux, nee Countess de St. Cricq (at Pau, France). To the
Princess Constantin Hohenlohe (nee Princess Marie Wittgenstein) I
bequeath the ivory crucifix (cinque-cento) which was given to me
by my kind patron the Prince of Hohenzollern-Hechingen--also a
pair of studs with five different stones, which form the five
initials of my name.

And now I kneel down once more to pray "Thy kingdom come; Thy
will be done on earth as it is in heaven; forgive us our
trespasses as we forgive them that trespass against us; and
deliver us from evil. Amen."

F. Liszt

Written the 14th September, 1860, on the Festival of the raising
of the Holy Cross.

SUPPLEMENT:

To Herr Gross, a member of the Weymar Grand Ducal Royal Orchestra
(trombone and double-bass player), who has for a number of years
looked after the copying of my works and the arranging of the
orchestral and voice parts of them in the library of the
Altenburg, I bequeath a present of one hundred thalers for the
faithful, devoted service he has rendered me.

To the names of my friends of the New German School is to be
added one more, or rather I ought to have mentioned it first; it
is that of Mr. Gaetano Belloni (in Paris).--He was my Secretary
during the period of my concert tours in Europe, from 1841 to
1847, and was always my faithful and devoted servant and friend.
He must not be forgotten. Moreover, whether he will or no, he
belongs to the New German School, by his attachment to me, and
also by the part he took later on in the Berlioz and Wagner
concerts. I wish to be buried simply, without pomp, and if
possible at night.--May light everlasting illumine my soul!



241. To Dr. Franz Brendel

September 20th, 1860

Dear Friend,

I send you by my friend Lassen [Born 1830, became Court music-
director 1858, and Court conductor in Weimar after Liszt's
withdrawal (1861); celebrated as a composer of songs] a little
parcel of songs (eight numbers), which I beg you to give to
Kahnt. Of several of them I have kept no copy--and I therefore
beg Kahnt not to lose them. As regards the numbering of them (the
order of succession), they are to be kept as I noted down some
time ago (on a bit of paper which I gave Kahnt when he was here).

I also add a Quartet for men's voices. It is the Verein song
"Frisch auf zu neuem Leben," ["Uprouse to newer life."] written
for the New Weymar Verein by Hoffmann von Fallersleben. The
passage "von Philister Geschrei;" ["Of Philistine cry."] will
probably amuse you, and the whole thing is kept rather popular
and easy to be performed. If it does not make a bother let it be
tried in Leipzig when you have an opportunity.

N.B.--If you think the designation on the title-page "Written and
composed for the New Weymar Verein" will give offence, it can be
left out, and the title can run simply, "Vereins Lied," by
Hoffmann von Fallersleben, composed for male chorus by F. L. In
any case I shall be glad if Kahnt can bring the little thing out
soon, and will give some sort of illustrated title-page,
expressive of the sense of the poem.

The remarks which I have added in pencil are to be engraved with
it. I hope the printer will be able to read my bad writing--if
not will you be so kind as to make it clear to him?

I am writing to Vienna today. The "Prometheus" parts and score
will be sent to you immediately.

I expect Bronsart here at the end of this month..--.

Your statute-sketch is in all essential points as judicious as it
is practical. It offers a sure basis of operations for the next
Tonkunstler-Versammlung, where assuredly the great majority of
the members will agree with your proposals. Then the point will
be to work on vigorously towards the accomplishment, and to put
aside the much that is "rotten in the State of Denmark."

Before the Euterpe concerts begin I shall in any case see you.
Next Sunday I go to Sondershausen, where Berlioz' "Harold," a new
Oboe Concerto by Stein, Schumann's "Genoveva" Overture, the
Introduction to "Tristan and Isolde," and my "Mazeppa" will be
given. The latter piece is popular to wit...in Sondershausen!--

Very sonderhauslich, [A play on the words Sondershausen and
sonderbar = strange] isn't it?

Hearty greetings to your wife from your

F. Liszt

P.S.--The ninth song by Cornelius is still wanting. [The song
"Wieder mocht' ich Dir begegnen" ("Once again I fain would meet
thee")] But in the meantime the printing can be going on. The
nine numbers form the seventh part of the "Gesammelte Lieder." If
Kahnt wishes, each song can be published separately, especially
the Zigeuner; Nonnenwerth, etc.

Draseke has been with me a couple of days, and is coming shortly
to you. His works captivate me in a special degree, and
personally I am very fond of him, which indeed I also was
formerly, but this time still more. Capacity and character are
there in abundance.



242. To Eduard Liszt

Weymar, September 20th, 1860

The true and loving character of your whole being, as well as of
your letter, dearest Eduard, touches me always with joy, and
fortifies me; but with your letter of today is mingled also
somewhat of sadness. It is conceivable that the ebb of the
Milanese and Hungarian Civil Service employes, with its effect on
Vienna, has acted as a check upon your very justifiable and well-
founded prospects of promotion. This is all the more to be
regretted as, years ago, I was assured many times from a
trustworthy official source that your suitability and deserts
were far above the official position that you hold. Without
wanting to preach to you unseasonably, let me assure you of my
sincere sympathy in the disappointments you have so undeservedly
to bear, and remind you also how things	generally go badly in
this world with the better and best sort of men. One must not let
oneself be embittered by bitter experiences, and one must bear
all sorts of mortifications without mortification.

I will also repeat for your amusement a droll saying of General
Wrangel's: "A man should never vex himself;--if there must be
vexation anywhere, let him rather vex somebody else!"--The best
way, in case of extreme necessity to vex others, is to bear
imperturbably many an injury and unpleasantness--without
prejudice to any defense or help that may offer, when opportunity
occurs--for we were not born to sleep our lives away!--

Under the given circumstances one cannot do otherwise than agree
with your resolution to let your son go into the Military Academy
when he is eleven years old. May this young Franz bring you all
the happiness that your older Franziskus wishes you from his
innermost heart.--[He did not become a soldier, but the renowned
Professor of Law now teaching at the University of Halle.]

In the expectation of this we will comfort ourselves by
swallowing Pfefferoni and Paprika together with Gumpoldskirchner.
Have I ever told you how excellent the latter, which you had
chosen just right, tasted?

It is almost impossible to further B.'s affairs. You think it
would be right to let his drama be examined by a "competent
authority." Undoubtedly; but that will not help him, so long as
this competent authority, who here could be none other than
Dingelstedt, is not able to help him any further. As far as I
know our Intendant he will NOT condescend to perform King
Alphonso; but none the less I will speak to Dingelstedt about it,
and will prevail on him first of all to write a few lines to B.,
as the rules of courtesy demand. I scarcely hope to effect more
than this, glad as I should be if it happened so, for you know
that I am glad to show myself obliging. It is doubtful also
whether B. will have much better chances with other Intendants--
for, as it seems, the good man has decidedly bad luck. Please
make my excuses to him if I do not answer his letter other than
by a silent condolence (in German Beleidsbezeugung!).--It has
become horribly difficult nowadays to make a footing on the
boards--"which signify the world"--especially for writers of
classic tragic-plays, whose lot is far more a tragic than a
playing one!--Things certainly are not much better with most of
the Opera composers, although that genre is the most thankful one
of all. Without a strong dose of obstinacy and resignation there
is no doing anything. In spite of the comforting proverb
"Geduldige Schafe gehen viele in den Stall," [The English
equivalent seems to be "Patience and application will carry us
through."] there is for the greater number and most patient of
the sheep no more room in the fold, to say nothing of food!--Thus
the problem of the literary and artistic proletariat becomes from
year to year more clamorous.

Your orchestral concert plan has surprised me very much, and I
thank you from my heart for this fresh proof of your energy and
goodwill. Yet for this year I think it would be more judicious to
pause, for several reasons which it would lead me rather too far
to explain, and which, therefore, I prefer to reserve for a viva
voce talk. They relate to (A) my personal position and something
connected with it socially; (B) the position of musical matters
among artists and in the Press, which not only influence but
intimidate the public, disconcert it, and palm off upon it ears,
with which it cannot hear. This temporary very bad state of
things I think I have, alas! at all times quite rightly
acknowledged, and, if I do not greatly mistake, it must surely
soon perceptibly modify in our favor. Our opponents "triumph far
more than they conquer us," as Tacitus says. They will not be
able to hold their narrow, malicious, negative, and unproductive
thesis much longer against our quiet, assured, positive progress
in Art-works. A consoling and significant symptom of this is that
they are no longer able to support their adherents among living
and working composers, but devour them critically while the
public is so indifferent. The resume of the whole criticism of
the opposition may be summed up in the following words: "All the
heroes of Art in past times find, alas! no worthy successors in
our day." But our time will not give up its rights--and the
rightful successors will prove themselves such!

More of this when we have an opportunity. You have doubtless
heard that a similar plan to yours is in progress in Leipzig. My
friend Bronsart undertakes the direction of the Euterpe concerts
for this winter, and there will be some rows about it. We will
await the result; if it should not be satisfactory, yet the
matter is so arranged that it cannot do us any great harm. As
regards Vienna I think it would be wisest to let this winter pass
by without troubling ourselves about it. Messrs. B., V.B., and
their associates may peacefully have Symphonies and other works
performed there and mutually blow each other's trumpets.

I have still a request to make to you today, dearest Eduard.
Persuade Herbeck to send the score and the chorus and orchestral
part of my "Prometheus" at once to C.F. Kahnt, the music
publisher in Leipzig. The work is fixed for performance at one of
the Euterpe concerts, which will take place before Christmas of
this year; so it is necessary that the choruses should be studied
in time. Kahnt has already written to Herbeck and also to Spina--
but as yet he has received neither an answer nor the parts and
score of Prometheus that he wants.

Take the same opportunity of telling Herbeck that I should like
once to hear the four Schubert Marches which I instrumented for
him, and I beg him to send the score of them to me at Weymar.

Forgive me that I always trouble you with all sorts of
commissions--but my Vienna acquaintances are so lazy and
unreliable that I have no other alternative but to set you on
everywhere..--.

Heartfelt greetings to your wife and children from your faithful
and grateful

F. Liszt

P.S.--I have written something to Cornelius about my latest
compositions, which he will tell you.

I expect the Princess here in October only. I will tell you,
later on, much about her stay in Rome, some of which is
agreeable.



243. To Hoffman von Fallersleben

My dear, honored Friend,

The melancholy tidings were reported to me by Grafe on Monday
evening (in the New Weymar Verein). [Hoffmann, after he had
obtained in May, 1860 the position of librarian to the Duke of
Ratibor at Schloss Corvey, near Hoxter-on-the-Weser, lost his
wife.] It came upon us all with a most mournful shock, and truly
it needs no further words to assure you of my heartfelt sympathy
in your grief!--Thank you for having thought of me. The Princess,
who was always so attached to your dear good wife, has not yet
returned from Rome--and I do not expect her till towards the end
of November. Unfortunately I must remain here entirely until
then--otherwise I should assuredly come at once to you...Forgive
me, therefore, that only from afar can I tell you how sincerely
and truly I remain your faithfully attached friend,

F. Liszt

October 30th, 1860

I have sent your charming birthday gift for October 22nd (text
and music) to the Princess.



244. To Professor Franz Gotze in Leipzig

Dear, honored Friend,

Do not think me indiscreet if I say something to you about which
you yourself must know best. The artistic gifts of your daughter
are as rare as they are pronounced. I have heard her sing and
declaim several times in the last few days, and each time with
increasing interest. Will you not give her carte blanche, and
grant your consent to the artistic career which is hers by nature
and which can hardly be put aside? [Liszt, like others, was
laboring under the mistake (for reasons which cannot be discussed
here) that Gotze did not intend his daughter to pursue the career
of an artiste, though he had had her educated both as a singer
and dramatically.] I know that this may not be a very easy
decision for you,--but, much as I usually refrain from giving
advice of this kind, yet I cannot do otherwise than make an
exception in this case, and intercede with you to let your
daughter come out in public--because I am convinced that you will
not regret having supported her with fatherly compliance in this.

Dr. Gille much wishes to gain your daughter for the next concert
in Jena. I think that a debut there would in any case do her no
harm. Later on I shall ask you whether you will allow Auguste
shortly to appear here at a Court concert.

Excuse my interference in so delicate a matter by reason of the
sincere interest I take in your daughter, and the faithful
friendship with which I remain Your unalterably sincerely
attached

F. Liszt

Weymar, November 4, 1860

Send a telegram to Gille in reply--if possible, "Yes," as the
concert takes place next Sunday.



245. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

.--. I take a sincere interest in the progress of the Euterpe
concerts--a progress which up to now has been favorable on the
whole; you have the chief merit in this, just because it rests
with you to neutralize difficult and opposing elements.

I rejoice much that Bronsart so thoroughly fulfills my
expectations. He is a director-gentleman ["Gentleman" put in
English by Liszt]. I shall hear more about the concerts through
Weissheimer [A composer; was for some time second director of the
Euterpe concerts], who is advertised here for the day after
tomorrow; until now I have only heard something about them from
Fraulein Hundt [A composer, at that time in Weimar; has since
died] yesterday.

With best greetings, yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, November 16th, 1860

Will you be so kind as to send me at once a couple of copies of
Muller's new brochure?

.--. If it is possible to hurry the bringing out of my seventh
book of songs I shall be glad. Also the "Vereins-Lied."

Give my most friendly greetings to Gotze--and at the same time
tell him that his daughter (of whose great artistic powers there
is no doubt) sang and declaimed last Sunday in Jena with the
greatest success. The vocal numbers were "two songs by Schumann,"
one of which was encored--and at the end of the concert she
declaimed the Ballade Leonore (with my melodramatic pianoforte
accompaniment).

Have you heard anything of Wagner? Rienzi is being studied here,
and I have undertaken to conduct the rehearsals. With regard to
the performance I have at once mentioned decidedly that nothing
will induce me to make an exception and conduct it--consequently
Musik-director Stor will conduct it.



246. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Since I have again had a conference with respect to the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Weymar next August, I am happy to be
able to tell you that not only will there be no obstacle to it,
but that we may expect that much will be done to further the
matter here. In your next announcement in the Neue Zeitschrift
about the Tonkunstler-Versammlung you are therefore fully
authorized to intimate the readiness of the artists, both vocal
and instrumental, here and in the neighborhood (Jena, Eisenach,
Sondershausen, etc.), as also the favorable disposition of H.R.H.
the Grand Duke, for the matter. This latter point must be
mentioned with some formality, so that I can submit your article
to my gracious master.

According to my opinion it would be well if, in this connection,
you were to touch upon the musical antecedents of Weymar
(performances of Wagner, Berlioz, Schumann), also the founding of
the Academy of Painting by the Grand Duke which took place
lately, and also the protectorate which H.R.H. has undertaken of
the Allegemeine deutsche Schiller-Stiftung [The Universal German
Schiller Scholarship] (the first place of which is to be Weymar
next year).

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

December 2nd, 1860

P.S.--With the next Tonkunstler-Versammlung I join three
principal things:--

(1) The founding and establishing of the Tonkunstler-Vierein.

(2) That the States should take part (according to your idea) in
the principal musical interests to be supported.

(3) The introduction and proposal of the projected music school.
[Liszt was endeavoring at that time to found a music school in
Weimar.]



247. To C.F. Kahnt, Music Publisher in Leipzig

[Kahnt was the publisher of the Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik for
more than thirty years (ever since 1855); also the publisher of
several of Liszt's compositions, co-founder and for many years
cashier of the Allgemeine deutsche Musikvereins, and, after 1873,
Councillor of Commission in Weimar.]

Dear Sir,

I send you herewith the proof-sheets of the seventh book of my
songs, and of the "Vereins-Lied" for the chorus of men's voices.
I quite concur in the new title-page, which can also be employed
for each single song. It is better than the former one, only I
shall be glad if there are no other advertisements on the back
side, and it is left bare.

On the 17th of this month the Neu-Weymar-Verein intends to give a
little Beethoven-Festival, and the "Vereins-Lied" is included in
the programme. I beg, therefore, that you will send me some
proof-copies by the 12th December--if it is not possible to get
the edition ready so soon.--.

The three Chansons and arrangement of the three Quartets for
men's voices (published in Basle) are all completed in my head;
you shall have them as a new manuscript at the end of the week.
There is no hurry about the publishing of the Chansons and
Quartets (probably I shall entitle them "Aus dem Zelt," or "Aus
dem Lager," three songs, etc.). ["From the Tent," or "From the
Camp." They were eventually entitled "Geharnischte Lieder"
("Songs in Armour").] But as you are kind enough to place some
reliance on my songs, I should like to commit to you next a
little wish of mine--namely, that my Schiller Song (which
appeared in the Illustrated in November last) may soon be
published, and also a somewhat repaying (rather sweet!) Quartet
for men's voices, with a tenor solo--"Huttelein, still and
klein."  It has been already sung with success by the Vienna
Manner-Gesangverein, and by some Liedertafeln. I add the two
manuscripts to the parcel of proofs--perhaps you will take an
opportunity of trying both the little things in a small circle.
If Herr Professor Gotze would have the kindness to undertake the
solo-part in the "Huttelein" I should be very much obliged to
him. Herr Wallenreiter might make a good thing of the baritone
solo-part in the "Schiller Song."

In case you should be disposed to acquiesce in my wish, and to
undertake the publishing of the two or three men's choruses, I
would propose to you to bring them out as the opening numbers of
a short succession of "Compositions for Male Voices," and also,
as with the Songs, to give them a title page (with a statement of
the different numbers--to which the Basle Quartets might also be
added; thus six numbers up to now). Do not fear, dear sir, an
over-productiveness in this genre on my part! But if by chance
one or other number of these Quartets should have some spread, I
should not dislike to write a couple more, either secular or
sacred. Among the latter I hope that the Psalm "The Heavens
declare," which will be performed next summer at a great Festival
of Song, will produce a good effect.

Pray pardon my verbosity--it is not usually my way to indulge in
unnecessary words; and accept, dear Sir, the assurance of the
well-known sentiments with which I remain,

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 2nd, 1860

The first performance of "Rienzi" is announced for the second day
of the Christmas holidays. I have engaged to conduct the
rehearsals, but at the same time have positively refused to
conduct the performances. Herr Musik-director Stor undertakes
that. [After the opposition of a coterie that was inimical to
Liszt, to which, as is well known, Cornelius's "Barber of
Baghdad" fell a sacrifice, Liszt had finally resigned his post as
conductor of the theater.]



248. To the Music Publisher C.F. Kahnt

.--. With regard to the publishing of my Songs for men's voices I
do not wish in the least to hurry you, dear sir--yet I should be
glad if you could advertise the things soon--and possibly on the
back of the title-page of my songs (?), if that does not seem
impracticable to you. The two collections (the songs and the
men's songs) have a certain connection, and that is why I make
this suggestion, about which you must decide. A couple of months
ago Louis Kohler wrote to me in his witty, friendly manner, "You
really owed us some Quartets for men's voices, which Bierbruder
["Beer-drinkers," "brothers of the glass"] metamorphosed into
demi-gods!" and when the songs were published, I was already
intending to let the men's songs follow shortly after. As most of
these latter are tolerably short, I think that the score of the
twelve will not require more than forty, or at the most fifty,
plates (small size). Economy might be employed in publishing the
parts by having them well copied. Of course engraving is always
the best, but I do not want to precipitate you into a too ruinous
outlay--and if the copying is done by an experienced copyist it
looks very well, and is quite easy to read.

I am writing to Schuberth by the next post to tell him (what he
might know without that) how unwillingly and how seldom I meddle
with dedications--especially dedications to people and societies
that I don't at all know, as he would like me to do! In the
somewhat numerous works of mine that have appeared of late years
you will find very few dedications. The twelve Symphonic Poems
have none. The Gran Mass is also without one--and in the Songs I
have left out the earlier dedications. Therefore, before I try in
America a method which I have almost given up in Europe, some
time may yet elapse. Schuberth means thoroughly well by me, for
which I am obliged to him--but he means well in his own way,
which cannot always be mine.

May I beg another little favor of you? At the Court concert on
the 1st January I should like to let the Reiter-Marsch of F.
Schubert (not Julius!), which I instrumented, be performed, and I
have no longer either the score or the parts. You would lay me
under an obligation if you could quickly send them to me. I have
never heard the piece; and as it has already been given with
success in Vienna and Leipzig I may almost venture to expect that
the company here may be bold enough to go half-way in the same
direction!--

Possibly I shall also attempt the Mephisto Waltz the same
evening, as well as a couple of my orchestrated songs. (I may
mention, by the way, that I have orchestrated six songs of
Schubert's--"the Erlkonig, Gretchen, the junge Nonne, the
Doppelganger, Mignon, and Abschied"--and three of my own--
"Loreley, Mignon, and the three Zigeuner." Later on, if a weak
moment should come over you, I should be glad to impose these
three latter upon you in score--but you shall hear them first.)

A thousand apologies for all this random talk about compositions,
and best greetings from yours in all friendliness,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 19th, 1860



249. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Your article "For the New Year" is most capital and worthy of
you. In three places I would merely venture to propose some
slight alterations for your consideration. You will find them
marked + and with the letters A, B, C.

At + A it would suit things better to say as follows: "Concert-
rooms and theaters, the scene of the most palpable speculation,
personal passion, and severing struggles." Or, if you think the
word "most palpable" too strong, let us put another, such as "the
commonest" or "the most mercantile speculation," etc.

+ B, instead of opinion, "the most affected assumption" Here
there is more question of assumption than of opinion. If
angenommen [affected] sounds too much like Anmassung
[assumption], let us put "the widespread assumption."

+ C, instead of "outward forces," I would rather have another
word, such as "powers," "factors," "levers," or any one that is
better. I do not know why the "Machle" [forces] do not seem to me
quite right here.

Finally, + D, I think it would be advisable ruthlessly to strike
out the following short sentence: "Indeed it would not be saying
too much if it were to be asserted that in many circles it takes
the place of religion,"--apart from the consideration of whether
it is accurate or not, because for the most part the men of the
State are sure to take offence at it. "How," they will say, "you
wish us to support a movement that aims at nothing less than the
doing away with religion?"--and, behold, there is a new bugbear
ready, and the most healthy and just endeavors are checked for
many a year!--

I am in perfect agreement with all the rest, with the exception
of the parenthesis marked *--"without thereby, as has often been
the case hitherto, falling into the unpractical mistake of
conceding to the public things which they do not want, and
diminishing the revenues." For, by the way, let me also say
parenthetically that, if I had not done this with most resolute
intention for many years, Wagner could not truly have said in his
letter to Villot (page 40 of the French edition of his
translation of the four Operas): "Tout a coup mes relations avec
le public prirent un autre tour, sur lequel je n'avais pas compte
le moins du monde: mes operas se repandaient." ["All at once my
relations with the public took a fresh turn, on which I had not
calculated the least bit in the world: my operas were becoming
known."

Both on this account and for other reasons I think this
parenthesis dangerous, and can in no wise subscribe to it!

With friendliest greetings, your sincere

F. Liszt

December 19th, 1860

I have written a long letter to Kahnt today. In case he cannot
read my writing, will you be so good as to help him with it?



250. To Felix Draseke

You have again encouraged and rejoiced me, my excellent friend,
by your affectionate comprehension of my meaning and endeavors in
the "Dante" Symphony.

Once more my heartfelt thanks for it. Later on, when "Hamlet" and
the "Hunnenschlacht" are published, please do not refuse me the
special satisfaction of publishing the whole of your articles on
the Symphonic Poems in the form of a pamphlet. We will speak
further of this by word of mouth, and possibly a few musical
examples could be added to the earlier ones.

How far have you got with the "Loreley"?--Only take hold of the
witch with tender force.--Geibel has lately brought out his
opera-text to the "Loreley," and several composers are already
setting to work on it  (or under it). In the present state of
things there is not much to be expected from effusions and feeble
attempts of that kind. On the other hand I am expecting something
great, beautiful, and magical from the Symphonic form into which
you will shape this story--a story which just as easily becomes
dry and tedious as, on the other hand, it can be melting. Take
care that we bring your work to a hearing at the next
Tonkunstler-Versammlung (in July-August) here.

O. Singer's "Entschwandenes Ideal" ["Vanished Ideal"] is full of
music; noble in conception and powerfully worked out. I shall
write to him shortly about it, and send him my seventh book of
songs, as you told me that he rather liked the earlier ones.--

An excellent little work by our friend Weitzmann lies before us
again: "The New Science of Harmony at Variance with the Old." The
"Album Leaves for the Emancipation of Fifths" as a supplement are
stirring; and the "Anthology of Classical Following Fifths," with
quotations from Hiller and Hauptmann,. is especially instructive.
In Harmony, as in other things, it is no longer a question of
reforming what has been laid aside, but rather of the fulfilling
of the law.------

On any day, my dear friend, you will be heartily welcome to

Yours very gratefully,

F. Liszt

December 30th, 1860

Towards the middle of January I am going to Paris or a couple of
weeks to see my mother (who is still constantly ill).



251. To Dr. Franz Brendel.

[Beginning of January, 1861]

Dear Friend,

A thousand thanks for your letter, and still more excuses that I
have delayed so long with my answer. On New Year's Day we had a
grand Court-concert--on the top of which there was a banquet at
the Erbprinz, which lasted till four o'clock in the morning; on
the other days perpetual dinners and suppers, at which I was also
obliged to be present. Besides all this, the final revision of my
second concerto (and a couple of smaller piano pieces) occupied
me much. Schott had undertaken the publication of them, and I did
not wish to annoy him by letting the somewhat numerous
alterations which had to be made in them wait to be corrected
until the proofs were printed, etc., etc.

From all the transitions and connection of the movements (which I
am now most carefully working out in the Concerto), I pass at
once without transition to the answering of your questions.

1. I think Bronsart's engagement for next year at four hundred
thalers is advisable.

2. If Weissheimer has really made himself impossible, Damrosch
should be the next one to be thought of, as a colleague of
Bronsart. There is no hurry about this affair, and we will talk
over it again viva voce.

3. The remaining four hundred thalers for X. I will send you at
the end of this month. If you should require them sooner write me
a couple of lines.

4. The question of leave of absence is not easy to decide, so
long as no definite date is fixed for the concert. Frau Pohl, for
instance, had had leave once already--but then the date of the
concert was altered, and in consequence of her absence it was of
no use. For the rest I don't doubt that Frau Pohl can get leave
of absence once more--I only beg you to let me know definitely
the day, so that I may inform Dingelstedt of it.

5. With regard to the co-operation of Messrs. v. Milde and
Singer, it has its difficulties. They are both not without
scruples in regard to the Euterpe, which, though they do not say
so in so many words, might be summed up as follows: "If we co-
operate in the Euterpe, we shut the golden doors of the
Gewandhaus in our faces, and injure ourselves also in other
towns, in which the rule of the Gewandhaus prevails. Ergo, it is
more desirable, prudent(!), for us to act..." The rest you can
add for yourself. Milde complains of the thanklessness of the
part in the "Sangers Fluch," ["The Singer's Curse," by Schumann]
the awful cold of the winter season, all the disagreeables in
connection with obtaining leave, etc. Singer does not know what
piece to choose, and also the E string of his violin is not quite
safe, and more of that kind.

6. Fraulein Genast is in a still worse position, for she is not
quite independent of the intimidation (on classical grounds) of
her father, and is, moreover, engaged for the next Gewandhaus
concert (for the part of the Rose in Schumann's "Rose's
Pilgrimage"). None the less she said to me from the beginning
that she was perfectly ready to do whatever I thought advisable.
In view of this surmise I must naturally be all the more
cautious. She sings on the 22nd in Zwickau, on the 24th
(probably) at the Gewandhaus, and on the 31st in Aix-la-Chapelle.
I have therefore advised her to come to an understanding with you
herself personally in Leipzig on the 23rd, and to co-operate with
you by preference as a singer of Lieder (with pianoforte
accompaniment) at the soiree of the Euterpe on the 29th.
Yesterday evening I marked the following three songs for her, as
the most suitable for the purpose:--

A. "The Pilgrimage to Kevlaar" (composed for E. Genast lately by
Hiller, and still in manuscript).

B. A song of Rubinstein's: for instance, "Ah! could it remain so
for ever!" (Tender allusion to the Gewandhaus!)

C. The three Zigeuner (by me).

The three songs would make up two numbers of the programme.--

I especially beg of you, dear friend, not to make any protest
against the song of Hiller. The plainly fair and just thing,
which has nothing in common with the "elevated right" which is
bestowed exclusively on Capellmeister Rietz and his associates
(as the Leipzig University expressed it), consists simply in not
shutting the door to publicity in anybody's face, or maliciously
and slyly casting stones and mud at him. Regardless of the fact
that we must not expect that they on their side will deal thus
with us, we must consistently and faithfully carry out and
fulfill this simple justice and fairness, and thus show the
gentlemen how people of a nobler mind and more proper cultivation
behave. You perhaps remember the opinion which I have many times
given and proved by actions--especially at the Versammlung-
Versammlung, when Frau Dr. Reclam sang Hiller's (somewhat
mediocre) Psalm, and...etc. After that I vote especially for the
performance of one of Rubinstein's larger works, such as the
proposed Symphony, and beg you to appoint Bronsart for it.--It
would lead me too far to explain my views in detail; that I have
no concessions or favoritisms in view in this matter goes without
saying.

7. The co-operation of the violinist recommended by Schuberth
must be considered, and even qualified, according to his talent.

8. "Tasso" can quite well be performed without the harp. A
pianino will do quite well, and I beg you most earnestly not to
put yourself to any inconvenience for my things. In my orchestral
works I have taken the larger measure of instrumentation (Paris,
Vienna, Berlin, Dresden--or, if you prefer personal names,
Meyerbeer, Mendelssohn, Wagner, Berlioz); but in spite of this
most of them can be performed in smaller proportions, as has been
most strikingly shown, for instance, in Sondershausen. The chief
thing before all else is the conductor; if he be a good and
reliable musician things may then be well managed in a variety of
ways--and in "Tasso" especially the harp is hardly wanted. So
don't bother yourself any more about it, and soothe Bronsart.

If I am not mistaken, I think I have now answered all the
principal questions in your letter. As to what concerns personal
matters we will talk about that shortly. I shall write one of
these next days to Schuberth (as soon as I have finished my
revisions for Schott). He has made me a proposal to which I am
inclined to agree. [The rest of the letter is missing.]



252. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear friend,

I expressly wish that Weissheimer should accompany the songs
which Fraulein Genast will sing at the Euterpe soiree. I have
especially commissioned him to make the motive of this wish of
mine, if necessary, still clearer to you. With regard to the
choice of songs you will easily come to an understanding with the
amiable singer. But I, for my part, hold to the opinion that
Hiller's "Wallfahrt nach Kevlaar" is well suited to the
programme.

The "Faust" Symphony must be written out quite fresh once more
before I send it to Schuberth. By the 15th February he will
receive the manuscript, together with a couple of lines for
Dorffel, who is almost indispensable to me as the corrector of
this work. I shall be over head and ears in work the next few
weeks, in order to do all that is necessary before I start on my
journey to Paris, which I shall probably do on the 20th February.

Best thanks for all the information in your last letter. Some
things, indeed most things, are still going very badly--upon
which we cannot and must not make ourselves any illusions;--but
if we are proof against these things we shall come out of them.

Before and after Lowenberg (in the middle of February) I shall
come and see you in Leipzig.

Meanwhile hearty greetings and thanks from your

F. L.

January 20th, 1861

You shall have the small sum for X. in the course of the week.



253. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear friend.

By yesterday's post I sent you--

A. The score of the second act of the "Flying Dutchman"--and two
orchestral parts of the duet (these latter in order that the
copyist, in writing it out, may guide himself by these, and may
not add the terzet-ending, as it stands in the score--Weissheimer
will give Thumler the exact speed). Beg Thumler to send me the
score back soon, as it may possibly be wanted at Easter in the
theater.

B. The last part (Mephistopheles and final chorus) of the "Faust"
Symphony in score--and the complete arrangement of this same
Symphony for two pianofortes.

Will you be so good as to give these manuscripts to Schuberth? I
hope he will keep his promise and not delay the publication of
the work. At the end of this week I will send Schuberth the score
and the four-hand piano arrangement of the two Faust-episodes
("Der nachtliche Zug" "The Nocturnal Procession")--and the
"Mephisto-Waltz"). I should be glad if these two things could
come out in the course of this year.

C. For Kahnt, the small score of the chorus "Die Seligkeiten"
["The Beatitudes"], which I also hope may soon be published. It
has been given here a couple of times in the Schloss orchestra
and the parish church, and, as I have been told many times, has
been spoken of in an exceptionally favorable manner. I have
written few things that have so welled up from my innermost soul.

I think I shall be ready with the revision of the "Prometheus"
score by next Saturday. I have already made two arrangements (for
two and four hands, not two pianofortes) of the Reapers' Chorus,
which I give Kahnt gratis. He shall get the whole packet early
next Monday at the latest. Weissheimer tells me that the edition
of the score shall be ready by the middle of July. If Kahnt
prefers to let the Prometheus be copied, I have nothing to say
against it; I only beg that in this case he will employ a very
clever and exact copyist-and, as I have already told him, that he
will preserve the size of the other Symphonic Poems.

N.B.--The division and distribution of the score--so that there
may be as few unnecessary rests as possible, and that, where it
can be done (as, for instance, at the beginning of the Tritons'
Chorus, the Reapers' Chorus, etc), two sets of staves should be
printed on one page--I beg that this may be entrusted to Herr
Dorffel. I also do not wish the work to look like a conductor's
score on the outside!--and, before it is given into the hands of
the engraver or copyist, it is necessary that the parts where two
sets of staves come on to one page should be clearly indicated.
My copyist here has made a very careless scrawl of the
"Prometheus" score, and I have therefore taken other work out of
his hands, and have given him a good scolding. But there is no
time to have a new score written, and therefore Dorffel must
largely help out with the matter.

N.B.--The piano arrangement must be put below the score, as it is
in the manuscript.

Kahnt can publish the arrangement of the Reapers' Chorus sooner
or later, as he likes. The date of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung
can remain fixed for the 15th August. I think it would be
advisable for you to come soon to Weymar (perhaps at Easter), and
to come to a direct understanding with Dingelstedt, M[usic]
D[irector] Montag, and some others among those who are
principally concerned in the matter.

I would propose to you Dr. Gille, in Jena, as a lawyer, and a
zealous co-operator in this affair. He is very ready to help, and
reliable.--

Are you really thinking of still giving the "Prometheus" at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung? It certainly would not be incompatible
with the "Faust" Symphony (which I wish for in any case)--but I
fear that it will bring in its train too much vexation and
annoyance.

We will speak further about this.

Weissheimer will tell you some things with regard to the
programmes.

Riedel ought to conduct Beethoven's Mass.

With heartfelt greetings, your

F.L.

Weymar March 4th, 1861

P.S.--Advise Schuberth once more to bring out the book of songs
by Lassen immediately--as he promised me.



254. To Peter Cornelius in Vienna

Your letters, dearest friend, are ever a joy to my heart, as also
this time on the 2nd April [Liszt's name-day]. Although on that
day I felt the absence of the Princess the most keenly, and the
Altenburg was for me equally perturbed, yet the loving attachment
of a few friends touched and filled me with comfort. Remain ever
to me, as I remain to you, faithful and steadfast, trusting in
God!--

Unfortunately I have been able to do but very little work this
winter. Revisions and proof-correcting took up almost my whole
time. The two last Symphonic Poems, "Hamlet" and the
"Hunnenschlacht," will come out directly. I will send them to
you, together with a dozen Quartets for men's voices which Kahnt
is publishing. By the end of July the choruses to "Prometheus"
and the "Faust" Symphony will also be out. If we should not see
each other sooner, I count on you, for certain, to be here for
the Tonkunstler-Versammlung (5th, 6th, 7th August), to which I
give you, dearest Cornelius, a special invitation. I hope that
Eduard, [Liszt's cousin] Tausig, Porges, Laurencin, [Count
Laurencin, a writer on music in Vienna] Kulke, Doppler, [Franz
Doppler (1821-83), a flute virtuoso; music-conductor at the Royal
Opera in Vienna. He arranged with Liszt some of the latter's
"Hungarian Rhapsodies" for orchestra.] are coming--and I beg you
to give them a preliminary intimation of my invitation. The next
number of Brendel's paper will give the programme--with the
exception of the third day, which cannot be fixed until later.
Perhaps you will give us a fragment of your "Cid." In any case I
wish your name not to be wanting; and, if you should not have
anything else ready, a couple of numbers from the "Barber Abul
Hassan Ali Eber" shall be given. The charming canon at the
beginning of the second act would be the best.

I am delighted to think that you have been entirely absorbed for
a time in "Tristan." In that work and the "Ring des Nibelungen"
Wagner has decidedly attained his zenith! I hope you have
received the pianoforte arrangement of "Rheingold" which Schott
has published. If not I will send it you. You might render a
great service by a discussion of this wonderful work. Allow me to
stir you up to do this. The summer days allow you now more
working hours; realize some of these with "Rheingold." The task
for you is neither a. difficult nor a thankless one; as soon as
you have seized upon the principal subjects representing the
various personages, and their application and restatement, the
greater part of the work is done. Let us then sing with Peter
Cornelius,--

"O Lust am Rheine, Am heimischen Strande! In sonnigem Scheine
Ergluhen die Lande; Es lachen die Haine, Die Felsengesteine Im
Strahlengewande Am heimischen Strande, Am wogenden Rheine!"

[Free translation,--

"O joy of the Rhine And its homelike shore! Where the bright
sunshine Gilds the landscape o'er; Where the woods are greenest,
The skies serenest, In that home of mine By the friendly shore Of
the billowy Rhine!"]

On the 30th of this month I am going to Paris for a couple of
weeks--and towards the end of May I shall meet my daughter Cosima
in Reichenhall, where she has to go through the whey-cure. Thank
God, she is again on the road to recovery! You can imagine what
grief took possession of me when I saw Cosima last winter
suffering from a similar complaint to Daniel!--

I have satisfactory tidings from the Princess from Rome. The
climate is having a very beneficial effect on her nerves, and she
feels herself, in that respect, far more at home than in
Germany...

She writes wonders to me about the last cartoons of Cornelius,
[The celebrated painter was the uncle of the addressee.] and her
personal relations with the great master have proved most
friendly.

What will become of me in the latter part of the summer does not
yet appear. But let us hold fast to our meeting again here at the
beginning of August.

Yours from my heart,

F. Liszt

April l8th, 1861

A thousand hearty greetings to Tausig.



255. To Hoffmann von Fallersleben

Dear, excellent friend,

I have received the enclosed note for you from the Princess. It
comes to you with my most heartfelt greetings. Please forgive me
for not having this time sent you my good wishes on the 2nd
April; [Hoffmann's birthday, and at the same time Liszt's name-
day] but as long as the Princess's absence lasts I recognize only
sorrowful anniversaries and no festivals of rejoicing. Meanwhile
rest assured that I think of you always with faithful friendship,
and remain ever truly devoted to you.

F. Liszt

April 18th, 1861

P.S.--I send you herewith the "Vereins-Lied"--and three other of
your songs.



256. To Peter Cornelius

[Autograph in the possession of Constance Bache.]

Dearest Cornelius,

Will you quickly sign the accompanying announcement to the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung with your good, beautiful name? You must
not fail me on this occasion in Weymar!

And yet another request, dearest friend. Will you go and see F.
Doppler and tell him that I very much wish he could arrive with
you on the 4th August at latest? I hope he will not refuse me
this pleasure--and if it is not inconvenient to him will he also
bring his flute and undertake the part in Faust?

With regard to the travelling expenses I have already written to
my cousin Eduard; he is to put a couple of hundred florins at
your disposal; for it goes without saying that neither you nor
Doppler will be allowed to spend a groschen out of your own purse
for the journey.

You will meet Eduard here--and also Wagner, Hans, Draseke,
Damrosch, Tausig, Lassen, and my daughter (Madame Ollivier).

To our speedy meeting then, my best Cornelius!

Bring your "Cid" with you as far as it is done, and kindly
dedicate some days to your heartily devoted

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 12th, 1861

P.S.--Shortly after the Tonkunstler-Versammlung I shall be
leaving Weymar for a long time.-



256A. To Peter Cornelius

[Autograph in the possession of Constance Bache. This letter was
left out by La Mara, but is inserted by the translator.]

Dearest Cornelius,

I have just been told that the score of the "Barber of Baghdad"
is not in the theater library here, as I thought, but that you
have kept it.

I can therefore no longer keep it a secret from you that I am
intending to give the Terzet [Canon] from the beginning of the
second act at the third concert (7th August) of the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung, and I have not the smallest doubt as to the capital
effect that this exquisite piece of music will produce.

But do send me by return of post the score of your "Barber."

The Terzet is a necessary integral part of our programme, which
will consist of the "performance of manuscript works of the
present day."--

With heartfelt greetings, your

F. Liszt

July 14th, 1861



257. To Alfred Dorffel

My dear Sir,

Whilst giving you my warmest thanks for the great pains you have
taken with the "Faust" score [as corrector of the score] I have,
in conclusion, one more request to make.

I wish to modify the prosody of the passage in the tenor solo,

[Here, Liszt writes a 4-measure music score excerpt of the treble
portion of the piece at the point where the words, "das Ewig
Weibliche" are sung.]

each time, just as I have written it on the accompanying note-
sheet. If I mistake not, it would in this way be more singable
and weiblicher [more womanly]. [Referring to Goethe's words "Das
ewig Weibliche" ("The eternal womanly")]

Accept, my dear sir, the assurance of my highest esteem and most
friendly gratitude.

F. Liszt

Weyar, July 18th, 1861

P.S.--The "Faust" Symphony is to be given here on the 6th August.
Perhaps it would be possible to you to be present at that
concert, and to give me the pleasure of a visit from you.



258. To Hofconcertmeister Edmund Singer in Stuttgart

Dear Friend,

The article in the Allgemeine Zeitung on the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung (12th August) is an event, and I thank you sincerely
for the part you have taken in it. [It was written by Singer.]

Although, as you know, I must on principle keep myself
unconcerned as regards criticism, as I cannot allow it the first
word in matters of Art, yet it has long been my wish to see the
"systematic opposition" to the present incontrovertible tendency
(or, better, "development") of music not exclusively represented
in the Allgemeine Zeitung. Just because this paper is not a
merely local, but an European and intellectually historical one,
did the local aversions and the diatribes of the island "Borneo"
appear to me far more inadmissible than in other papers. The
reporter of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung has taken an important
step towards agreement; may he continue to work with us yet
further!

The Altenburg has been closed and locked up since last Sunday--
and in a few hours I am leaving Weymar for a long time. In the
first place I shall spend some weeks with my patron, Prince
Hohenzollern (who is musically very well disposed!), at
Lowenberg. I intend to take up again there and quietly to carry
on my work which has been too long interrupted. My promised
contributions to Herr Stark's Pianoforte School must also soon be
taken in hand. Meanwhile remember me most kindly to Herr Lebert,
[Professors at the Stuttgart Conservatorium. For the great
Pianoforte School edited by Lebert and Stark, Liszt wrote the
concert-studies "Waldesrauschen" and "Gnomenreigen."] and assure
him that I am most anxious to discharge the task allotted to me
in a satisfactory manner.

Pohl has promised me that he will soon send you the "Prometheus"
and "Faust" notices that you want. For the rest you don't require
any further explanation to enable you satisfactorily to instruct
the public in these things. As I am pressed for time I must only
give you for today once more my best thanks, and remain

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

August 17th, 1861

My best greetings to your wife.



259. To the music publisher, C.F. Kahnt

Don't be alarmed, dear sir! Once more a manuscript of mine is
coming to you. "Ich glaube, die Wellen verschlingen, Am Ende
Schiffer und...Kahnt!" [A quotation from Heine's poem "Die
Loreley," set to music by Liszt:

"I fear me the waters engulfing
Are drawing the boatman beneath,--
'Tis Loreley, with voice enchanting,
Who lures him on to death!

Liszt makes a play on the words Kahn (a boat) and Kahnt (the
publisher).]

The pianoforte transcription of the "Loreley" has cost me more
trouble than I expected. But I hope therefore that it has not
succeeded badly. Let a clean and correct copy be made of it by a
reliable musician (Corno perhaps?) [August Horn in Leipzig, whom
Liszt held up as being "very exact and reliable."] before you
give the little piece into the engraver's hands. N.B.--The words
are to be engraved with it, as in the Vienna edition of my
transcription of the Schubert Songs.

As regards the publishing of the scores of my three songs--
"Loreley," "Mignon," and the "Zigeuner"--I leave them entirely to
your pleasure or the reverse, as also the size of the edition
(whether larger or smaller--but in any case, not quite full
size)..--.

I shall be staying at Lowenberg up to the 8th September.

I beg that you will send the final proof of "Loreley" to Herr von
Bulow--and also the second edition of "Mignon" in time, which is
to be engraved from the score left behind by Brendel--for voice
and pianoforte accompaniment (without instrumentation) in the
first place--as you were kind enough to promise me.

With best greetings, your obliged

F. Liszt

Lowenberg, August 27th, 1861



260. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

A musical scribble that I had promised, and which I wished to
finish here, and various little excursions in the neighborhood,
have prevented me from answering your letter sooner.

The Prince [Of Hohenzollern-Hechingen] continues to show me the
same amiable friendship as ever, so that it is hard to me to
leave Lowenberg. Seifriz will write you word a couple of weeks
beforehand to which concert your coming here would be most
advantageous. The concert season does not begin till November,
and, with the exception of the winter months, when the musical
performances take place, a great proportion of the members of the
orchestra is absent. His Highness adheres always firmly and
faithfully to the endeavors of the "New German School," and is
desirous of supporting it still further. On this account I think
it would be desirable to elect Seifriz as a member of the
Committee of the Allgemeane Deutsche Musikverein. I also vote
especially for Stein (of Sondershausen), Eduard Liszt, Herbeck,
Ambros, David--without a word against the rest of the names which
you have proposed.

As regards the other points of your letter I write as follows:--

1. I believe that N.'s reliability and extensive influence in the
affairs of the Mozart Society are a bit hypothetical. You find
out more exactly what he is likely to accomplish.

2. I will undertake with pleasure the examination of the
manuscripts and the decision as to what works shall be performed
at the general assembly--but please do not give me the title of
President, but simply the name of Reporter or Head of the musical
section.

3. I entirely agree with the intention of distributing Pohl's
["On the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Leipzig in 1859."] pamphlet
gratis to the members of the Society.

Of course the two speeches by yourself and Draseke must be
included in it. Should it be necessary, I will gladly contribute
a few thalers towards the publication.

4. According to my opinion the Society should not be placed under
the protection of the Grand Duke "until everything is ready."
According to what he has said to me there is no doubt about his
acceptance of it, but still it is indispensable that you should
write to H.R.H. about it. Pohl and Gille will be the best to help
you in composing the letter to the Grand Duke, and perhaps they
will sign their names to it also. Later on we shall have to
discuss in what form and fashion other German Princes are to be
invited to give their countenance to the Society-or not.

5. Wagner's photograph has unfortunately been locked up in the
Altenburg against my wish. I cannot therefore be of any help with
it--and can only advise you to write to Wagner himself, in order
to learn which of his likenesses would be the most suitable for
publication in the Modenzeitung.

.-.I shall be in Berlin by the evening of the day after tomorrow,
and shall probably stay there till the 24th-26th of this month.
May I also beg you to remind Pohl of his promise to send me my
arrangement of the Dance of Sylphs (from Berlioz' "Faust")? I am
now wanting this little piece, of which I did not keep any copy.
It is the same with my arrangement of the "Tannhauser" Overture,
which I left behind with Pflughaupt. Get Pohl to send me the
Dance of Sylphs and the "Tannhauser" Overture as soon as possible
to Bulow's address in Berlin. I will then send him my thanks in
writing, and will quietly wait for the catalogue of music in his
possession out of my library (which he wanted to send me some
days after my departure!).

How is it with regard to Damrosch's leadership of the orchestra
at Weymar? Pohl must tell me all about it.

Has Bronsart's marriage taken place yet?

If it is not giving you too much trouble, I should be glad to
receive the pamphlets, marked with red pencil, by Bronsart,
Laurencin, Wagner, and Ambros, while I am in Berlin. The
publication of Zellner's brochure on "Faust" shall meanwhile be
left to the geniality and munificence of Schuberth. A propos of
Lassen's songs (which Schuberth boasted that he should bring out
so quickly that last evening he was with you!), the first book
only--say three songs!--and not the second, has come out,
although Schuberth presented me with two books, relying on my
being absent-minded and preoccupied! But he has such an
extraordinary talent for tricks of that kind that it would be
almost a pity if he did not exercise it here and there!.-.

With friendliest greetings to your wife,

Most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Lowenberg, September 16th, 1861

[Shortly after this Liszt departed from Lowenberg. He took the
road which the Princess Wittgenstein had gone before him, and
went, by way of Paris, to Rome.]



          END OF LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOL. I.





INFO ABOUT THIS E-TEXT EDITION

This volume of "Letters of Franz Liszt" is the first volume of a
2-volume set. The letters were selected by La Mara, and
translated into English by Constance Bache. The edition used was
an original 1893 Charles Scribner edition, printed in America.
Each page was cut out of it and fed into an Automatic Document
Scanner to make this e-text; hence, the original book was
fragmented in order to save it.

Some adaptations from the original text were made while
formatting it for an e-text. Italics in the original book were
ignored in making this e-text, unless they referred to proper
nouns, in which case they are put in quotes in the e-text.
Italics are not easily rendered in ASCII text, and in the
original book they generally do not seem to add much to Liszt's
expression.

Also, special German characters like U with an umlaut, and French
characters like a's and e's with various markings above them were
ignored, replaced with their closet single-letter equivalents. U
with an umlaut is U, A with a caret above it is A, and so on.
Words altered include Gotze, Tonkunstler, Gluck, Handel and
Bulow, among others.

In addition, the English spellings of words like "honour,"
"colour," "humour" and "theatre" were changed into American
equivalents like "honor," "color," "humor" and "theater."

This electronic text was prepared by John Mamoun with help from
numerous other proofreaders, including those associated with
Charles Franks' Distributed Proofreaders website.  Special thanks to S.
Morrison, R. Zimmerman, K. McGuire, A. Montague, M. Fong and N. Harris
for proof-reading, and also thanks to B. Schak, D. Maddock, C. Weyant,
M. Taylor, K. Rieff, J. Roberts, K. Peterson and others.

This e-text is public domain, freely copyable and distributable for any
non-commercial purpose, and may be included without royalty or
permission on a mass media storage product, such as a cd-rom, that
contains at least 50 public domain electronic texts, whether offered
for non-commercial or commercial purposes. Any other commercial usage
requires permission. The biographical sketch was prepared for this e-
text and is also not copyright and is public domain.


Use of the Project Gutenberg Trademark requires separate permission.

[Portions of this header are copyright (C) 2001 by Michael S. Hart
and may be reprinted only when these Etexts are free of all fees.]
[Project Gutenberg is a TradeMark and may not be used in any sales
of Project Gutenberg Etexts or other materials be they hardware or
software or any other related product without express permission.]





This etext was prepared by Hollis Ramsey <holliser@ev1.net>





Oscar Wilde, His Life and Confessions, Volume 1

by Frank Harris




CONTENTS


VOLUME I

Introduction

Chapter I--Oscar's Father and Mother on Trial

Chapter II--Oscar Wilde as a Schoolboy

Chapter III--Trinity, Dublin: Magdalen, Oxford

Chapter IV--Formative Influences: Oscar's Poems

Chapter V--Oscar's Quarrel with Whistler and Marriage

Chapter VI--Oscar Wilde's Faith and Practice

Chapter VII--Oscar's Reputation and Supporters

Chapter VIII--Oscar's Growth to Originality About 1890

Chapter IX--The Summer of Success: Oscar's First Play

Chapter X--The First Meeting with Lord Alfred Douglas

Chapter XI--The Threatening Cloud Draws Nearer

Chapter XII--Danger Signals: the Challenge

Chapter XIII--Oscar Attacks Queensberry and is Worsted

Chapter XIV--How Genius is Persecuted in England

Chapter XV--The Queen vs. Wilde: The First Trial

Chapter XVI--Escape Rejected: The Second Trial and Sentence


VOLUME II

Chapter XVII--Prison and the Effects of Punishment

Chapter XVIII--Mitigation of Punishment; but not Release

Chapter XIX--His St. Martin's Summer: His Best Work

Chapter XX--The Results of His Second Fall: His Genius

Chapter XXI--His Sense of Rivalry; His Love of Life and Laziness

Chapter XXII--"A Great Romantic Passion!"

Chapter XXIII--His Judgments of Writers and of Women

Chapter XXIV--We Argue About His "Pet Vice" and Punishment

Chapter XXV--The Last Hope Lost

Chapter XXVI--The End

Chapter XXVII--A Last Word

Shaw's "Memories"

The Appendix




The crucifixion of the guilty is still more awe-inspiring than the crucifixion
of the innocent; what do we men know of innocence?



INTRODUCTION



I was advised on all hands not to write this book, and some English friends
who have read it urge me not to publish it.

"You will be accused of selecting the subject," they say, "because sexual
viciousness appeals to you, and your method of treatment lays you open
to attack.

"You criticise and condemn the English conception of justice, and English
legal methods: you even question the impartiality of English judges, and throw
an unpleasant light on English juries and the English public--all of which is
not only unpopular but will convince the unthinking that you are a presumptuous,
or at least an outlandish, person with too good a conceit of himself and
altogether too free a tongue."

I should be more than human or less if these arguments did not give me pause.
I would do nothing willingly to alienate the few who are still friendly to me.
But the motives driving me are too strong for such personal considerations.
I might say with the Latin:

"Non me tua fervida terrent,
Dicta, ferox: Di me terrent, et Jupiter hostis."

Even this would be only a part of the truth.  Youth it seems to me should always
be prudent, for youth has much to lose: but I am come to that time of life when
a man can afford to be bold, may even dare to be himself and write the best
in him, heedless of knaves and fools or of anything this world may do.  The
voyage for me is almost over: I am in sight of port: like a good shipman, I have
already sent down the lofty spars and housed the captious canvas in preparation
for the long anchorage: I have little now to fear.

And the immortals are with me in my design.  Greek tragedy treated of far more
horrible and revolting themes, such as the banquet of Thyestes: and Dante did
not shrink from describing the unnatural meal of Ugolino.  The best modern
critics approve my choice.  "All depends on the subject," says Matthew Arnold,
talking of great literature: "choose a fitting action--a great and significant
action--penetrate yourself with the feeling of the situation: this done,
everything else will follow; for expression is subordinate and secondary."

Socrates was found guilty of corrupting the young and was put to death for
the offence.  His accusation and punishment constitute surely a great and
significant action such as Matthew Arnold declared was alone of the highest
and most permanent literary value.

The action involved in the rise and ruin of Oscar Wilde is of the same kind
and of enduring interest to humanity.  Critics may say that Wilde is a smaller
person than Socrates, less significant in many ways: but even if this were true,
it would not alter the artist's position; the great portraits of the world are
not of Napoleon or Dante.  The differences between men are not important in
comparison with their inherent likeness.  To depict the mortal so that he takes
on immortality--that is the task of the artist.

There are special reasons, too, why I should handle this story.  Oscar Wilde
was a friend of mine for many years: I could not help prizing him to the very
end: he was always to me a charming, soul-animating influence.  He was
dreadfully punished by men utterly his inferiors: ruined, outlawed, persecuted
till Death itself came as a deliverance.  His sentence impeaches his judges.
The whole story is charged with tragic pathos and unforgettable lessons.  I have
waited for more than ten years hoping that some one would write about him in
this spirit and leave me free to do other things, but nothing such as I propose
has yet appeared.

Oscar Wilde was greater as a talker, in my opinion, than as a writer, and no
fame is more quickly evanescent.  If I do not tell his story and paint his
portrait, it seems unlikely that anyone else will do it.

English "strachery" may accuse me of attacking morality: the accusation
is worse than absurd.  The very foundations of this old world are moral: the
charred ember itself floats about in space, moves and has its being in obedience
to inexorable law.  The thinker may define morality: the reformer may try to
bring our notions of it into nearer accord with the fact: human love and pity
may seek to soften its occasional injustices and mitigate its intolerable
harshness: but that is all the freedom we mortals enjoy, all the breathing-space
allotted to us.

In this book the reader will find the figure of the Prometheus-artist clamped,
so to speak, with bands of steel to the huge granitic cliff of English
puritanism.  No account was taken of his manifold virtues and graces: no credit
given him for his extraordinary achievements: he was hounded out of life because
his sins were not the sins of the English middle-class.  The culprit was in much
nobler and better than his judges.

Here are all the elements of pity and sorrow and fear that are required in
great tragedy.

The artist who finds in Oscar Wilde a great and provocative subject for his
art needs no argument to justify his choice.  If the picture is a great and
living portrait, the moralist will be satisfied: the dark shadows must all be
there, as well as the high lights, and the effect must be to increase our
tolerance and intensify our pity.

If on the other hand the portrait is ill-drawn or ill-painted, all the reasoning
in the world and the praise of all the sycophants will not save the picture
from contempt and the artist from censure.

There is one measure by which intention as apart from accomplishment can be
judged, and one only: "If you think the book well done," says Pascal,
"and on re-reading find it strong; be assured that the man who wrote it,
wrote it on his knees."  No book could have been written more reverently
than this book of mine.

Nice, 1910.

Frank Harris.




CHAPTER I--OSCAR'S FATHER AND MOTHER ON TRIAL



On the 12th of December, 1864, Dublin society was abuzz with excitement.  A
tidbit of scandal which had long been rolled on the tongue in semi-privacy was
to be discussed in open court, and all women and a good many men were agog with
curiosity and expectation.

The story itself was highly spiced and all the actors in it well known.

A famous doctor and oculist, recently knighted for his achievements, was the
real defendant.  He was married to a woman with a great literary reputation as
a poet and writer who was idolized by the populace for her passionate advocacy
of Ireland's claim to self-government; "Speranza" was regarded by the Irish
people as a sort of Irish Muse.

The young lady bringing the action was the daughter of the professor of medical
jurisprudence at Trinity College, who was also the chief at Marsh's library.

It was said that this Miss Travers, a pretty girl just out of her teens, had
been seduced by Dr. Sir William Wilde while under his care as a patient.
Some went so far as to say that chloroform had been used, and that the girl
had been violated.

The doctor was represented as a sort of Minotaur: lustful stories were invented
and repeated with breathless delight; on all faces, the joy of malicious
curiosity and envious denigration.

The interest taken in the case was extraordinary: the excitement beyond
comparison; the first talents of the Bar were engaged on both sides; Serjeant
Armstrong led for the plaintiff, helped by the famous Mr. Butt, Q.C., and
Mr. Heron, Q.C., who were in turn backed by Mr. Hamill and Mr. Quinn; while
Serjeant Sullivan was for the defendant, supported by Mr. Sidney, Q.C., and
Mr. Morris, Q.C., and aided by Mr. John Curran and Mr. Purcell.

The Court of Common Pleas was the stage; Chief Justice Monahan presiding with
a special jury.  The trial was expected to last a week, and not only the Court
but the approaches to it were crowded.

To judge by the scandalous reports, the case should have been a criminal case,
should have been conducted by the Attorney-General against Sir William Wilde;
but that was not the way it presented itself.  The action was not even brought
directly by Miss Travers or by her father, Dr. Travers, against Sir William
Wilde for rape or criminal assault, or seduction.  It was a civil action brought
by Miss Travers, who claimed L2,000 damages for a libel written by Lady
Wilde to her father, Dr. Travers.  The letter complained of ran as follows:--

Tower, Bray, May 6th.

Sir, you may not be aware of the disreputable conduct of your daughter at Bray
where she consorts with all the low newspaper boys in the place, employing them
to disseminate offensive placards in which my name is given, and also tracts
in which she makes it appear that she has had an intrigue with Sir William
Wilde.  If she chooses to disgrace herself, it is not my affair, but as her
object in insulting me is in the hope of extorting money for which she has
several times applied to Sir William Wilde with threats of more annoyance if
not given, I think it right to inform you, as no threat of additional insult
shall ever extort money from our hands.  The wages of disgrace she has so basely
treated for and demanded shall never be given her.

Jane F. Wilde.

To Dr. Travers.

The summons and plaint charged that this letter written to the father of the
plaintiff by Lady Wilde was a libel reflecting on the character and chastity
of Miss Travers, and as Lady Wilde was a married woman, her husband Sir William
Wilde was joined in the action as a co-defendant for conformity.

The defences set up were:--

First, a plea of "No libel": secondly, that the letter did not bear the
defamatory sense imputed by the plaint: thirdly, a denial of the publication,
and, fourthly, a plea of privilege.  This last was evidently the real defence
and was grounded upon facts which afforded some justification of Lady Wilde's
bitter letter.

It was admitted that for a year or more Miss Travers had done her uttermost
to annoy both Sir William Wilde and his wife in every possible way.  The trouble
began, the defence stated, by Miss Travers fancying that she was slighted by
Lady Wilde.  She thereupon published a scandalous pamphlet under the title of
"Florence Boyle Price, a Warning; by Speranza," with the evident intention
of causing the public to believe that the booklet was the composition of
Lady Wilde under the assumed name of Florence Boyle Price.  In this pamphlet
Miss Travers asserted that a person she called Dr. Quilp had made an attempt
on her virtue.  She put the charge mildly.  "It is sad," she wrote, "to think
that in the nineteenth century a lady must not venture into a physician's
study without being accompanied by a bodyguard to protect her."

Miss Travers admitted that Dr. Quilp was intended for Sir William Wilde; indeed
she identified Dr. Quilp with the newly made knight in a dozen different ways.
She went so far as to describe his appearance.  She declared that he had "an
animal, sinister expression about his mouth which was coarse and vulgar in the
extreme: the large protruding under lip was most unpleasant.  Nor did the upper
part of his face redeem the lower part.  His eyes were small and round, mean
and prying in expression.  There was no candour in the doctor's countenance,
where one looked for candour."  Dr. Quilp's quarrel with his victim, it
appeared, was that she was "unnaturally passionless."

The publication of such a pamphlet was calculated to injure both Sir William
and Lady Wilde in public esteem, and Miss Travers was not content to let the
matter rest there.  She drew attention to the pamphlet by letters to the papers,
and on one occasion, when Sir William Wilde was giving a lecture to the Young
Men's Christian Association at the Metropolitan Hall, she caused large placards
to be exhibited in the neighbourhood having upon them in large letters the words
"Sir William Wilde and Speranza."  She employed one of the persons bearing a
placard to go about ringing a large hand bell which she, herself, had given to
him for the purpose.  She even published doggerel verses in the "Dublin Weekly
Advertiser", and signed them "Speranza," which annoyed Lady Wilde intensely.
One read thus:--

Your progeny is quite a pest
To those who hate such "critters";
Some sport I'll have, or I'm blest
I'll fry the Wilde breed in the West
Then you can call them Fritters.

She wrote letters to "Saunders Newsletter", and even reviewed a book of
Lady Wilde's entitled "The First Temptation," and called it a "blasphemous
production."  Moreover, when Lady Wilde was staying at Bray, Miss Travers sent
boys to offer the pamphlet for sale to the servants in her house.  In fine
Miss Travers showed a keen feminine ingenuity and pertinacity in persecution
worthy of a nobler motive.

But the defence did not rely on such annoyance as sufficient provocation for
Lady Wilde's libellous letter.  The plea went on to state that Miss Travers
had applied to Sir William Wilde for money again and again, and accompanied
these applications with threats of worse pen-pricks if the requests were not
acceded to.  It was under these circumstances, according to Lady Wilde, that
she wrote the letter complained of to Dr. Travers and enclosed it in a sealed
envelope.  She wished to get Dr. Travers to use his parental influence to
stop Miss Travers from further disgracing herself and insulting and annoying
Sir William and Lady Wilde.

The defence carried the war into the enemy's camp by thus suggesting that Miss
Travers was blackmailing Sir William and Lady Wilde.

The attack in the hands of Serjeant Armstrong was still more deadly and
convincing.  He rose early on the Monday afternoon and declared at the beginning
that the case was so painful at the beginning that he would have preferred not
to have been engaged in it--a hypocritical statement which deceived no one, and
was just as conventional-false as his wig.  But with this exception the story he
told was extraordinarily clear and gripping.

Some ten years before, Miss Travers, then a young girl of nineteen, was
suffering from partial deafness, and was recommended by her own doctor to go to
Dr. Wilde, who was the chief oculist and aurist in Dublin.  Miss Travers went
to Dr. Wilde, who treated her successfully.  Dr. Wilde would accept no fees from
her, stating at the outset that as she was the daughter of a brother-physician,
he thought it an honour to be of use to her.  Serjeant Armstrong assured his
hearers that in spite of Miss Travers' beauty he believed that at first Dr.
Wilde took nothing but a benevolent interest in the girl.  Even when his
professional services ceased to be necessary, Dr. Wilde continued his
friendship.  He wrote Miss Travers innumerable letters: he advised her as to
her reading and sent her books and tickets for places of amusement: he even
insisted that she should be better dressed, and pressed money upon her to buy
bonnets and clothes and frequently invited her to his house for dinners and
parties.  The friendship went on in this sentimental kindly way for some five
or six years till 1860.

The wily Serjeant knew enough about human nature to feel that it was necessary
to discover some dramatic incident to change benevolent sympathy into passion,
and he certainly found what he wanted.

Miss Travers, it appeared, had been burnt low down on her neck when a child:
the cicatrice could still be seen, though it was gradually disappearing.  When
her ears were being examined by Dr. Wilde, it was customary for her to kneel
on a hassock before him, and he thus discovered this burn on her neck.  After
her hearing improved he still continued to examine the cicatrice from time to
time, pretending to note the speed with which it was disappearing.  Some time
in '60 or '61 Miss Travers had a corn on the sole of her foot which gave her
some pain.  Dr. Wilde did her the honour of paring the corn with his own hands
and painting it with iodine.  The cunning Serjeant could not help saying with
some confusion, natural or assumed, "that it would have been just as well--at
least there are men of such temperament that it would be dangerous to have such
a manipulation going on."  The spectators in the court smiled, feeling that
in "manipulation" the Serjeant had found the most neatly suggestive word.

Naturally at this point Serjeant Sullivan interfered in order to stem the rising
tide of interest and to blunt the point of the accusation.  Sir William Wilde,
he said, was not the man to shrink from any investigation: but he was only in
the case formally and he could not meet the allegations, which therefore were
"one-sided and unfair" and so forth and so on.

After the necessary pause, Serjeant Armstrong plucked his wig straight and
proceeded to read letters of Dr. Wilde to Miss Travers at this time, in which
he tells her not to put too much iodine on her foot, but to rest it for a few
days in a slipper and keep it in a horizontal position while reading a pleasant
book.  If she would send in, he would try and send her one.

"I have now," concluded the Serjeant, like an actor carefully preparing
his effect, "traced this friendly intimacy down to a point where it begins
to be dangerous: I do not wish to aggravate the gravity of the charge in the
slightest by any rhetoric or by an unconscious overstatement; you shall
therefore, gentlemen of the jury, hear from Miss Travers herself what took
place between her and Dr. Wilde and what she complains of."

Miss Travers then went into the witness-box.  Though thin and past her first
youth, she was still pretty in a conventional way, with regular features and
dark eyes.  She was examined by Mr. Butt, Q.C.  After confirming point by point
what Serjeant Armstrong had said, she went on to tell the jury that in the
summer of '62 she had thought of going to Australia, where her two brothers
lived, who wanted her to come out to them.  Dr. Wilde lent her L40 to go,
but told her she must say it was L20 or her father might think the sum too
large.  She missed the ship in London and came back.  She was anxious to impress
on the jury the fact that she had repaid Dr. Wilde, that she had always repaid
whatever he had lent her.

She went on to relate how one day Dr. Wilde had got her in a kneeling position
at his feet, when he took her in his arms, declaring that he would not let her
go until she called him William.  Miss Travers refused to do this, and took
umbrage at the embracing and ceased to visit at his house: but Dr. Wilde
protested extravagantly that he had meant nothing wrong, and begged her to
forgive him and gradually brought about a reconciliation which was consummated
by pressing invitations to parties and by a loan of two or three pounds for a
dress, which loan, like the others, had been carefully repaid.

The excitement in the court was becoming breathless.  It was felt that the
details were cumulative; the doctor was besieging the fortress in proper form.
The story of embracings, reconciliations and loans all prepared the public for
the great scene.

The girl went on, now answering questions, now telling bits of the story in
her own way, Mr. Butt, the great advocate, taking care that it should all be
consecutive and clear with a due crescendo of interest.  In October, 1862, it
appeared Lady Wilde was not in the house at Merrion Square, but was away at
Bray, as one of the children had not been well, and she thought the sea air
would benefit him.  Dr. Wilde was alone in the house.  Miss Travers called and
was admitted into Dr. Wilde's study.  He put her on her knees before him and
bared her neck, pretending to examine the burn; he fondled her too much and
pressed her to him: she took offence and tried to draw away.  Somehow or other
his hand got entangled in a chain at her neck.  She called out to him, "You are
suffocating me," and tried to rise: but he cried out like a madman: "I will,
I want to," and pressed what seemed to be a handkerchief over her face.
She declared that she lost consciousness.

When she came to herself she found Dr. Wilde frantically imploring her to come
to her senses, while dabbing water on her face, and offering her wine to drink.

"If you don't drink," he cried, "I'll pour it over you."

For some time, she said, she scarcely realized where she was or what had
occurred, though she heard him talking.  But gradually consciousness came back
to her, and though she would not open her eyes she understood what he was
saying.  He talked frantically:

"Do be reasonable, and all will be right. . . I am in your power . . . . spare
me, oh, spare me . . . . strike me if you like.  I wish to God I could hate you,
but I can't.  I swore I would never touch your hand again.  Attend to me and do
what I tell you.  Have faith and confidence in me and you may remedy the past
and go to Australia.  Think of the talk this may give rise to.  Keep up
appearances for your own sake. . . . ."

He then took her up-stairs to a bedroom and made her drink some wine and lie
down for some time.  She afterwards left the house; she hardly knew how; he
accompanied her to the door, she thought; but could not be certain; she was
half dazed.

The judge here interposed with the crucial question:

"Did you know that you had been violated?"

The audience waited breathlessly; after a short pause Miss Travers replied:

"Yes."

Then it was true, the worst was true.  The audience, excited to the highest
pitch, caught breath with malevolent delight.  But the thrills were not
exhausted.  Miss Travers next told how in Dr. Wilde's study one evening she had
been vexed at some slight, and at once took four pennyworth of laudanum which
she had bought.  Dr. Wilde hurried her round to the house of Dr. Walsh, a
physician in the neighbourhood, who gave her an antidote.  Dr. Wilde was
dreadfully frightened lest something should get out. . . .

She admitted at once that she had sometimes asked Dr. Wilde for money: she
thought nothing of it as she had again and again repaid him the monies which
he had lent her.

Miss Travers' examination in chief had been intensely interesting.  The
fashionable ladies had heard all they had hoped to hear, and it was noticed that
they were not so eager to get seats in the court from this time on, though the
room was still crowded.

The cross-examination of Miss Travers was at least as interesting to the student
of human nature as the examination in chief had been, for in her story of what
took place on that 14th of October, weaknesses and discrepancies of memory were
discovered and at length improbabilities and contradictions in the narrative
itself.

First of all it was elicited that she could not be certain of the day; it might
have been the 15th or the 16th: it was Friday the 14th, she thought. . . . It
was a great event to her; the most awful event in her whole life; yet she could
not remember the day for certain.

"Did you tell anyone of what had taken place?"

"No."

"Not even your father?"

"No."

"Why not?"

"I did not wish to give him pain."

"But you went back to Dr. Wilde's study after the awful assault?"

"Yes."

"You went again and again, did you not?"

"Yes."

"Did he ever attempt to repeat the offence?"

"Yes."

The audience was thunderstruck; the plot was deepening.  Miss Travers went on
to say that the Doctor was rude to her again; she did not know his intention;
he took hold of her and tried to fondle her; but she would not have it.

"After the second offence you went back?"

"Yes."

"Did he ever repeat it again?"

"Yes."

Miss Travers said that once again Dr. Wilde had been rude to her.

"Yet you returned again?"

"Yes."

"And you took money from this man who had violated you against your will?"

"Yes."

"You asked him for money?"

"Yes."

"This is the first time you have told about this second and third assault,
is it not?"

"Yes," the witness admitted.

So far all that Miss Travers had said hung together and seemed eminently
credible; but when she was questioned about the chloroform and the handkerchief
she became confused.  At the outset she admitted that the handkerchief might
have been a rag.  She was not certain it was a rag.  It was something she saw
the doctor throw into the fire when she came to her senses.

"Had he kept it in his hands, then, all the time you were unconscious?"

"I don't know."

"Just to show it to you?"

The witness was silent.

When she was examined as to her knowledge of chloroform, she broke down
hopelessly. She did not know the smell of it; could not describe it; did not
know whether it burnt or not; could not in fact swear that it was chloroform
Dr. Wilde had used; would not swear that it was anything; believed that it was
chloroform or something like it because she lost consciousness.  That was her
only reason for saying that chloroform had been given to her.

Again the judge interposed with the probing question:

"Did you say anything about chloroform in your pamphlet?"

"No," the witness murmured.

It was manifest that the strong current of feeling in favour of Miss Travers
had begun to ebb.  The story was a toothsome morsel still: but it was
regretfully admitted that the charge of rape had not been pushed home.  It was
felt to be disappointing, too, that the chief prosecuting witness should have
damaged her own case.

It was now the turn of the defence, and some thought the pendulum might swing
back again.

Lady Wilde gave her evidence emphatically, but was too bitter to be a persuasive
witness.  It was tried to prove from her letter that she believed that Miss
Travers had had an intrigue with Sir William Wilde, but she would not have it.
She did not for a moment believe in her husband's guilt.  Miss Travers wished to
make it appear, she said, that she had an intrigue with Sir William Wilde, but
in her opinion it was utterly untrue.  Sir William Wilde was above suspicion.
There was not a particle of truth in the accusation; "her" husband would never
so demean himself.

Lady Wilde's disdainful speeches seemed to persuade the populace, but had small
effect on the jury, and still less on the judge.

When she was asked if she hated Miss Travers, she replied that she did not
hate anyone, but she had to admit that she disliked Miss Travers' methods of
action.

"Why did you not answer Miss Travers when she wrote telling you of your
husband's attempt on her virtue?"

"I took no interest in the matter," was the astounding reply.

The defence made an even worse mistake than this.  When the time came,
Sir William Wilde was not called.

In his speech for Miss Travers, Mr. Butt made the most of this omission.  He
declared that the refusal of Sir William Wilde to go into the witness box was
an admission of guilt; an admission that Miss Travers' story of her betrayal
was true and could not be contradicted.  But the refusal of Sir William Wilde
to go into the box was not, he insisted, the worst point in the defence.  He
reminded the jury that he had asked Lady Wilde why she had not answered Miss
Travers when she wrote to her.  He recalled Lady Wilde's reply:

"I took no interest in the matter."

Every woman would be interested in such a thing, he declared, even a stranger;
but Lady Wilde hated her husband's victim and took no interest in her seduction
beyond writing a bitter, vindictive and libellous letter to the girl's father.
. . . .

The speech was regarded as a masterpiece and enhanced the already great
reputation of the man who was afterwards to become the Home Rule Leader.

It only remained for the judge to sum up, for everyone was getting impatient
to hear the verdict.  Chief Justice Monahan made a short, impartial speech,
throwing the dry, white light of truth upon the conflicting and passionate
statements.  First of all, he said, it was difficult to believe in the story
of rape whether with or without chloroform.  If the girl had been violated she
would be expected to cry out at the time, or at least to complain to her father
as soon as she reached home.  Had it been a criminal trial, he pointed out,
no one would have believed this part of Miss Travers' story.  When you find
a girl does not cry out at the time and does not complain afterwards, and
returns to the house to meet further rudeness, it must be presumed that she
consented to the seduction.

But was there a seduction?  The girl asserted that there was guilty intimacy,
and Sir William Wilde had not contradicted her.  It was said that he was only
formally a defendant; but he was the real defendant and he could have gone
into the box if he had liked and given his version of what took place and
contradicted Miss Travers in whole or in part.

"It is for you, gentlemen of the jury, to draw your own conclusions from
his omission to do what one would have thought would be an honourable man's
first impulse and duty."

Finally it was for the jury to consider whether the letter was a libel and
if so what the amount of damages should be.

His Lordship recalled the jury at Mr. Butt's request to say that in assessing
damages they might also take into consideration the fact that the defence was
practically a justification of the libel.  The fair-mindedness of the judge was
conspicuous from first to last, and was worthy of the high traditions of the
Irish Bench.

After deliberating for a couple of hours the jury brought in a verdict which
had a certain humour in it.  They awarded to Miss Travers a farthing damages
and intimated that the farthing should carry costs.  In other words they rated
Miss Travers' virtue at the very lowest coin of the realm, while insisting that
Sir William Wilde should pay a couple of thousands of pounds in costs for having
seduced her.

It was generally felt that the verdict did substantial justice; though the
jury, led away by patriotic sympathy with Lady Wilde, the true "Speranza,"
had been a little hard on Miss Travers.  No one doubted that Sir William Wilde
had seduced his patient.  He had, it appeared, an unholy reputation, and the
girl's admission that he had accused her of being "unnaturally passionless"
was accepted as the true key of the enigma.  This was why he had drawn away from
the girl, after seducing her.  And it was not unnatural under the circumstances
that she should become vindictive and revengeful.

Such inferences as these, I drew from the comments of the Irish papers at the
time; but naturally I wished if possible to hear some trustworthy contemporary
on the matter.  Fortunately such testimony was forthcoming.

A Fellow of Trinity, who was then a young man, embodied the best opinion of
the time in an excellent pithy letter.  He wrote to me that the trial simply
established, what every one believed, that "Sir William Wilde was a pithecoid
person of extraordinary sensuality and cowardice (funking the witness-box left
him without a defender!) and that his wife was a highfalutin' pretentious
creature whose pride was as extravagant as her reputation founded on second-rate
verse-making. . . . . Even when a young woman she used to keep her rooms in
Merrion Square in semi-darkness; she laid the paint on too thick for any
ordinary light, and she gave herself besides all manner of airs."

This incisive judgment of an able and fairly impartial contemporary (As he has
died since this was written, there is no longer any reason for concealing his
name: R. Y. Tyrrell, for many years before his death Regius Professor of Greek
in Trinity College, Dublin.) corroborates, I think, the inferences which one
would naturally draw from the newspaper accounts of the trial.  It seems to me
that both combine to give a realistic photograph, so to speak, of Sir William
and Lady Wilde.  An artist, however, would lean to a more kindly picture.
Trying to see the personages as they saw themselves he would balance the
doctor's excessive sensuality and lack of self-control by dwelling on the fact
that his energy and perseverance and intimate adaptation to his surroundings
had brought him in middle age to the chief place in his profession, and if
Lady Wilde was abnormally vain, a verse-maker and not a poet, she was still
a talented woman of considerable reading and manifold artistic sympathies.

Such were the father and mother of Oscar Wilde.




CHAPTER II--OSCAR WILDE AS A SCHOOLBOY



The Wildes had three children, two sons and a daughter.  The first son was born
in 1852, a year after the marriage, and was christened after his father William
Charles Kingsbury Wills.  The second son was born two years later, in 1854 and
the names given to him seem to reveal the Nationalist sympathies and pride of
his mother.  He was christened Oscar Fingal O'Flahertie Wills Wilde; but he
appears to have suffered from the pompous string only in extreme youth.  At
school he concealed the "Fingal," as a young man he found it advisable to omit
the "O'Flahertie."

In childhood and early boyhood Oscar was not considered as quick or engaging
or handsome as his brother, Willie.  Both boys had the benefit of the best
schooling of the time.  They were sent as boarders to the Portora School at
Enniskillen, one of the four Royal schools of Ireland.  Oscar went to Portora in
1864 at the age of nine, a couple of years after his brother.  He remained at
the school for seven years and left it on winning an Exhibition for Trinity
College, Dublin, when he was just seventeen.

The facts hitherto collected and published about Oscar as a schoolboy are sadly
meagre and insignificant.  Fortunately for my readers I have received from Sir
Edward Sullivan, who was a contemporary of Oscar both at school and college,
an exceedingly vivid and interesting pen-picture of the lad, one of those
astounding masterpieces of portraiture only to be produced by the plastic
sympathies of boyhood and the intimate intercourse of years lived in common.
It is love alone which in later life can achieve such a miracle of
representment.  I am very glad to be allowed to publish this realistic
miniature, in the very words of the author.

"I first met Oscar Wilde in the early part of 1868 at Portora Royal School.
He was thirteen or fourteen years of age.  His long straight fair hair was a
striking feature of his appearance.  He was then, as he remained for some years
after, extremely boyish in nature, very mobile, almost restless when out of
the schoolroom.  Yet he took no part in the school games at any time.  Now and
then he would be seen in one of the school boats on Loch Erne: yet he was a
poor hand at an oar.

"Even as a schoolboy he was an excellent talker: his descriptive power
being far above the average, and his humorous exaggerations of school
occurrences always highly amusing.

"A favourite place for the boys to sit and gossip in the late afternoon
in winter time was round a stove which stood in 'The Stone Hall.' Here Oscar
was at his best; although his brother Willie was perhaps in those days even
better than he was at telling a story.

"Oscar would frequently vary the entertainment by giving us extremely quaint
illustrations of holy people in stained-glass attitudes: his power of twisting
his limbs into weird contortions being very great.  (I am told that Sir William
Wilde, his father, possessed the same power.) It must not be thought, however,
that there was any suggestion of irreverence in the exhibition.

"At one of these gatherings, about the year 1870, I remember a discussion
taking place about an ecclesiastical prosecution that made a considerable stir
at the time.  Oscar was present, and full of the mysterious nature of the Court
of Arches; he told us there was nothing he would like better in after life than
to be the hero of such a "cause celebre" and to go down to posterity as the
defendant in such a case as 'Regina versus Wilde!'

"At school he was almost always called 'Oscar'--but he had a nick-name,
'Grey-crow,' which the boys would call him when they wished to annoy him, and
which he resented greatly.  It was derived in some mysterious way from the name
of an island in the Upper Loch Erne, within easy reach of the school by boat.

"It was some little time before he left Portora that the boys got to know of his
full name, Oscar Fingal O'Flahertie Wills Wilde.  Just at the close of his
school career he won the 'Carpenter' Greek Testament Prize,--and on presentation
day was called up to the dais by Dr. Steele, by all his names--much to Oscar's
annoyance; for a great deal of schoolboy chaff followed.

"He was always generous, kindly, good-tempered.  I remember he and myself were
on one occasion mounted as opposing jockeys on the backs of two bigger boys in
what we called a 'tournament,' held in one of the class-rooms.  Oscar and his
horse were thrown, and the result was a broken arm for Wilde.  Knowing that it
was an accident, he did not let it make any difference in our friendship.

"He had, I think, no very special chums while at school.  I was perhaps as
friendly with him all through as anybody, though his junior in class by a
year. . . . .

"Willie Wilde was never very familiar with him, treating him always, in those
days, as a younger brother. . . . .

"When in the head class together, we with two other boys were in the town of
Enniskillen one afternoon, and formed part of an audience who were listening
to a street orator.  One of us, for the fun of the thing, got near the speaker
and with a stick knocked his hat off and then ran for home followed by the other
three.  Several of the listeners, resenting the impertinence, gave chase, and
Oscar in his hurry collided with an aged cripple and threw him down--a fact
which was duly reported to the boys when we got safely back.  Oscar was
afterwards heard telling how he found his way barred by an angry giant with whom
he fought through many rounds and whom he eventually left for dead in the road
after accomplishing prodigies of valour on his redoubtable opponent.  Romantic
imagination was strong in him even in those schoolboy days; but there was always
something in his telling of such a tale to suggest that he felt his hearers were
not really being taken in; it was merely the romancing indulged in so humorously
by the two principal male characters in 'The Importance of Being Earnest.' . . .

"He never took any interest in mathematics either at school or college.
He laughed at science and never had a good word for a mathematical or science
master, but there was nothing spiteful or malignant in anything he said against
them; or indeed against anybody.

"The romances that impressed him most when at school were Disraeli's novels.
He spoke slightingly of Dickens as a novelist. . . . .

"The classics absorbed almost his whole attention in his later school days, and
the flowing beauty of his oral translations in class, whether of Thucydides,
Plato or Virgil, was a thing not easily to be forgotten."

This photograph, so to speak, of Oscar as a schoolboy is astonishingly clear
and lifelike; but I have another portrait of him from another contemporary,
who has since made for himself a high name as a scholar at Trinity, which, while
confirming the general traits sketched by Sir Edward Sullivan, takes somewhat
more notice of certain mental qualities which came later to the fruiting.

This observer who does not wish his name given, writes:

"Oscar had a pungent wit, and nearly all the nicknames in the school were
given by him.  He was very good on the literary side of scholarship, with a
special leaning to poetry. . . . .

"We noticed that he always liked to have editions of the classics that were of
stately size with large print. . . . .  He was more careful in his dress than
any other boy.

"He was a wide reader and read very fast indeed; how much he assimilated I never
could make out.  He was poor at music.

"We thought him a fair scholar but nothing extraordinary.  However, he startled
everyone the last year at school in the classical medal examination, by walking
easily away from us all in the "viva voce" of the Greek play ('The Agamemnon')."

I may now try and accentuate a trait or two of these photographs, so to speak,
and then realise the whole portrait by adding an account given to me by Oscar
himself.  The joy in humorous romancing and the sweetness of temper recorded
by Sir Edward Sullivan were marked traits in Oscar's character all through his
life.  His care in dressing too, and his delight in stately editions; his love
of literature "with a special leaning to poetry" were all qualities which
distinguished him to the end.

"Until the last year of my school life at Portora," he said to me once, "I had
nothing like the reputation of my brother Willie.  I read too many English
novels, too much poetry, dreamed away too much time to master the school tasks.

"Knowledge came to me through pleasure, as it always comes, I imagine. . . . .

"I was nearly sixteen when the wonder and beauty of the old Greek life began
to dawn upon me.  Suddenly I seemed to see the white figures throwing purple
shadows on the sun-baked palaestra; 'bands of nude youths and maidens'--you
remember Gautier's words--'moving across a background of deep blue as on the
frieze of the Parthenon.' I began to read Greek eagerly for love of it all,
and the more I read the more I was enthralled:

Oh what golden hours were for us
As we sat together there,
While the white vests of the chorus
Seemed to wave up a light air;
While the cothurns trod majestic
Down the deep iambic lines
And the rolling anapaestics
Curled like vapour over shrines.

"The head master was always holding my brother Willie up to me as an example;
but even he admitted that in my last year at Portora I had made astounding
progress.  I laid the foundation there of whatever classical scholarship
I possess."

It occurred to me once to ask Oscar in later years whether the boarding school
life of a great, public school was not responsible for a good deal of sensual
viciousness.

"Englishmen all say so," he replied, "but it did not enter into my experience.
I was very childish, Frank; a mere boy till I was over sixteen.  Of course I was
sensual and curious, as boys are, and had the usual boy imaginings; but I did
not indulge in them excessively.

"At Portora nine out of ten boys only thought of football or cricket or rowing.
Nearly every one went in for athletics--running and jumping and so forth; no one
appeared to care for sex.  We were healthy young barbarians and that was all."

"Did you go in for games?" I asked.

"No," Oscar replied smiling, "I never liked to kick or be kicked."

"Surely you went about with some younger boy, did you not, to whom you told your
dreams and hopes, and whom you grew to care for?"

The question led to an intimate personal confession, which may take its place
here.

"It is strange you should have mentioned it," he said.  "There was one boy,
and," he added slowly, "one peculiar incident.  It occurred in my last year at
Portora.  The boy was a couple of years younger than I--we were great friends;
we used to take long walks together and I talked to him interminably.  I told
him what I should have done had I been Alexander, or how I'd have played king in
Athens, had I been Alcibiades.  As early as I can remember I used to identify
myself with every distinguished character I read about, but when I was fifteen
or sixteen I noticed with some wonder that I could think of myself as Alcibiades
or Sophocles more easily than as Alexander or Caesar.  The life of books had
begun to interest me more than real life. . . . .

"My friend had a wonderful gift for listening.  I was so occupied with talking
and telling about myself that I knew very little about him, curiously little
when I come to think of it.  But the last incident of my school life makes me
think he was a sort of mute poet, and had much more in him than I imagined.
It was just before I first heard that I had won an Exhibition and was to go to
Trinity.  Dr. Steele had called me into his study to tell me the great news;
he was very glad, he said, and insisted that it was all due to my last year's
hard work.  The 'hard' work had been very interesting to me, or I would not have
done much of it.  The doctor wound up, I remember, by assuring me that if I went
on studying as I had been studying during the last year I might yet do as well
as my brother Willie, and be as great an honour to the school and everybody
connected with it as he had been.

"This made me smile, for though I liked Willie, and knew he was a fairly good
scholar, I never for a moment regarded him as my equal in any intellectual
field.  He knew all about football and cricket and studied the schoolbooks
assiduously, whereas I read everything that pleased me, and in my own opinion
always went about 'crowned.'" Here he laughed charmingly with amused deprecation
of the conceit.

"It was only about the quality of the crown, Frank, that I was in any doubt.
If I had been offered the Triple Tiara, it would have appeared to me only the
meet reward of my extraordinary merit. . . . .

"When I came out from the doctor's I hurried to my friend to tell him all
the wonderful news.  To my surprise he was cold and said, a little bitterly,
I thought:

"'You seem glad to go?'

"'Glad to go,' I cried; 'I should think I was; fancy going to Trinity College,
Dublin, from this place; why, I shall meet men and not boys.  Of course I am
glad, wild with delight; the first step to Oxford and fame.'

"'I mean,' my chum went on, still in the same cold way, 'you seem glad to
leave me.'

"His tone startled me.

"'You silly fellow,' I exclaimed, 'of course not; I'm always glad to be with
you: but perhaps you will be coming up to Trinity too; won't you?'

"'I'm afraid not,' he said, 'but I shall come to Dublin frequently.'

"'Then we shall meet,' I remarked; 'you must come and see me in my rooms.  My
father will give me a room to myself in our house, and you know Merrion Square
is the best part of Dublin.  You must come and see me.'

"He looked up at me with yearning, sad, regretful eyes.  But the future was
beckoning to me, and I could not help talking about it, for the golden key of
wonderland was in my hand, and I was wild with desires and hopes.

"My friend was very silent, I remember, and only interrupted me to ask:

"'When do you go, Oscar?'

"'Early,' I replied thoughtlessly, or rather full of my own thoughts, 'early
to-morrow morning, I believe; the usual train.'

"In the morning just as I was starting for the station, having said 'goodbye'
to everyone, he came up to me very pale and strangely quiet.

"'I'm coming with you to the station, Oscar,' he said; 'the Doctor gave me
permission, when I told him what friends we had been.'

"'I'm glad,' I cried, my conscience pricking me that I had not thought of
asking for his company.  'I'm very glad.  My last hours at school will always
be associated with you.'

"He just glanced up at me, and the glance surprised me; it was like a dog looks
at one.  But my own hopes soon took possession of me again, and I can only
remember being vaguely surprised by the appeal in his regard.

"When I was settled in my seat in the train, he did not say 'goodbye' and go,
and leave me to my dreams; but brought me papers and things and hung about.

"The guard came and said:

"'Now, sir, if you are going.'

"I liked the 'Sir.' To my surprise my friend jumped into the carriage and said:

"'All right, guard, I'm not going, but I shall slip out as soon as you whistle.'

"The guard touched his cap and went.  I said something, I don't know what; I was
a little embarrassed.

"'You will write to me, Oscar, won't you, and tell me about everything?'

"'Oh, yes,' I replied, 'as soon as I get settled down, you know.  There will
be such a lot to do at first, and I am wild to see everything.  I wonder how
the professors will treat me.  I do hope they will not be fools or prigs;
what a pity it is that all professors are not poets. . . . .' And so I went
on merrily, when suddenly the whistle sounded and a moment afterwards the train
began to move.

"'You must go now,' I said to him.

"'Yes,' he replied, in a queer muffled voice, while standing with his hand on
the door of the carriage.  Suddenly he turned to me and cried:

"'Oh, Oscar,' and before I knew what he was doing he had caught my face in his
hot hands, and kissed me on the lips.  The next moment he had slipped out of the
door and was gone. . . . .

"I sat there all shaken.  Suddenly I became aware of cold, sticky drops
trickling down my face--his tears.  They affected me strangely.  As I wiped them
off I said to myself in amaze:

"'This is love: this is what he meant--love.' . . . .

"I was trembling all over.  For a long while I sat, unable to think, all shaken
with wonder and remorse."




CHAPTER III--TRINITY, DUBLIN: MAGDALEN, OXFORD



Oscar Wilde did well at school, but he did still better at college, where the
competition was more severe.  He entered Trinity on October 19th, 1871, just
three days after his seventeenth birthday.  Sir Edward Sullivan writes me that
when Oscar matriculated at Trinity he was already "a thoroughly good classical
scholar of a brilliant type," and he goes on to give an invaluable snap-shot
of him at this time; a likeness, in fact, the chief features of which grew more
and more characteristic as the years went on.

"He had rooms in College at the north side of one of the older squares, known
as Botany Bay.  These rooms were exceedingly grimy and ill-kept.  He never
entertained there.  On the rare occasions when visitors were admitted, an
unfinished landscape in oils was always on the easel, in a prominent place in
his sitting room.  He would invariably refer to it, telling one in his
humorously unconvincing way that 'he had just put in the butterfly.' Those of us
who had seen his work in the drawing class presided over by 'Bully' Wakeman at
Portora were not likely to be deceived in the matter. . . . .

"His college life was mainly one of study; in addition to working for his
classical examinations, he devoured with voracity all the best English
writers.

"He was an intense admirer of Swinburne and constantly reading his poems;
John Addington Symond's works too, on the Greek authors, were perpetually in
his hands.  He never entertained any pronounced views on social, religious or
political questions while in College; he seemed to be altogether devoted to
literary matters.

"He mixed freely at the same time in Dublin society functions of all kinds, and
was always a very vivacious and welcome guest at any house he cared to visit.
All through his Dublin University days he was one of the purest minded men that
could be met with.

"He was not a card player, but would on occasions join in a game of limited loo
at some man's rooms.  He was also an extremely moderate drinker.  He became a
member of the junior debating society, the Philosophical, but hardly ever took
any part in their discussions.

"He read for the Berkeley medal (which he afterwards gained) with an excellent,
but at the same time broken-down, classical scholar, John Townsend Mills, and,
besides instruction, he contrived to get a good deal of amusement out of his
readings with his quaint teacher.  He told me for instance that on one occasion
he expressed his sympathy for Mills on seeing him come into his rooms wearing
a tall hat completely covered in crape.  Mills, however, replied, with a smile,
that no one was dead--it was only the evil condition of his hat that had made
him assume so mournful a disguise.  I have often thought that the incident was
still fresh in Oscar Wilde's mind when he introduced John Worthing in 'The
Importance of Being Earnest,' in mourning for his fictitious brother. . . . .

"Shortly before he started on his first trip to Italy, he came into my rooms in
a very striking pair of trousers.  I made some chaffing remark on them, but he
begged me in the most serious style of which he was so excellent a master not to
jest about them.

"'They are my Trasimene trousers, and I mean to wear them there.'"

Already his humour was beginning to strike all his acquaintances, and what
Sir Edward Sullivan here calls his "puremindedness," or what I should rather
call his peculiar refinement of nature.  No one ever heard Oscar Wilde tell a
suggestive story; indeed he always shrank from any gross or crude expression;
even his mouth was vowed always to pure beauty.

The Trinity Don whom I have already quoted about Oscar's school-days sends me a
rather severe critical judgment of him as a student.  There is some truth in it,
however, for in part at least it was borne out and corroborated by Oscar's later
achievement.  It must be borne in mind that the Don was one of his competitors
at Trinity, and a successful one; Oscar's mind could not limit itself to college
tasks and prescribed books.

"When Oscar came to college he did excellently during the first year; he was top
of his class in classics; but he did not do so well in the long examinations
for a classical scholarship in his second year.  He was placed fifth, which was
considered very good, but he was plainly not the man for the dolichos (or long
struggle), though first-rate for a short examination."

Oscar himself only completed these spirit-photographs by what he told me of
his life at Trinity.

"It was the fascination of Greek letters, and the delight I took in Greek life
and thought," he said to me once, "which made me a scholar.  I got my love of
the Greek ideal and my intimate knowledge of the language at Trinity from
Mahaffy and Tyrrell; they were Trinity to me; Mahaffy was especially valuable
to me at that time.  Though not so good a scholar as Tyrrell, he had been in
Greece, had lived there and saturated himself with Greek thought and Greek
feeling.  Besides he took deliberately the artistic standpoint towards
everything, which was coming more and more to be my standpoint.  He was a
delightful talker, too, a really great talker in a certain way--an artist in
vivid words and eloquent pauses.  Tyrrell, too, was very kind to me--intensely
sympathetic and crammed with knowledge.  If he had known less he would have
been a poet.  Learning is a sad handicap, Frank, an appalling handicap," and
he laughed irresistibly.

"What were the students like in Dublin?" I asked.  "Did you make friends with
any of them?"

"They were worse even than the boys at Portora," he replied; "they thought of
nothing but cricket and football, running and jumping; and they varied these
intellectual exercises with bouts of fighting and drinking.  If they had any
souls they diverted them with coarse "amours" among barmaids and the women
of the streets; they were simply awful.  Sexual vice is even coarser and more
loathsome in Ireland than it is in England:--

"'Lilies that fester smell far worse than weeds.'

"When I tried to talk they broke into my thought with stupid gibes and jokes.
Their highest idea of humour was an obscene story.  No, no, Tyrrell and Mahaffy
represent to me whatever was good in Trinity."

In 1874 Oscar Wilde won the gold medal for Greek.  The subject of the year was
"The Fragments of the Greek Comic Poets, as edited by Meineke."  In this year,
too, he won a classical scholarship--a demyship of the annual value of L95,
which was tenable for five years, which enabled him to go to Oxford without
throwing an undue strain on his father's means.

He noticed with delight that his success was announced in the "Oxford University
Gazette" of July 11th, 1874.  He entered Magdalen College, Oxford, on October
17th, a day after his twentieth birthday.

Just as he had been more successful at Trinity than at school, so he was
destined to be far more successful and win a far greater reputation at Oxford
than in Dublin.

He had the advantage of going to Oxford a little later than most men, at twenty
instead of eighteen, and thus was enabled to win high honours with comparative
ease, while leading a life of cultured enjoyment.

He was placed in the first class in "Moderations" in 1876 and had even then
managed to make himself talked about in the life of the place.  The Trinity Don
whom I have already quoted, after admitting that there was not a breath against
his character either at school or Trinity, goes on to write that "at Trinity he
did not strike us as a very exceptional person," and yet there must have been
some sharp eyes at Trinity, for our Don adds with surprising divination:

"I fancy his rapid development took place after he went to Oxford, where he
was able to specialize more; in fact where he could study what he most affected.
It is, I feel sure, from his Oxford life more than from his life in Ireland that
one would be able to trace the good and bad features by which he afterwards
attracted the attention of the world."

In 1878 Oscar won a First Class in "Greats."  In this same Trinity term, 1878,
he further distinguished himself by gaining the Newdigate prize for English
verse with his poem "Ravenna," which he recited at the annual Commemoration in
the Sheldonian Theatre on June 26th.  His reciting of the poem was the literary
event of the year in Oxford.

There had been great curiosity about him; he was said to be the best talker
of the day, and one of the ripest scholars.  There were those in the University
who predicted an astonishing future for him, and indeed all possibilities seemed
within his reach.  "His verses were listened to," said "The Oxford and Cambridge
Undergraduates' Journal", "with rapt attention."  It was just the sort of thing,
half poetry, half rhythmic rhetoric, which was sure to reach the hearts and
minds of youth.  His voice, too, was of beautiful tenor quality, and exquisitely
used.  When he sat down people crowded to praise him and even men of great
distinction in life flattered him with extravagant compliments.  Strange to say
he used always to declare that his appearance about the same time as Prince
Rupert, at a fancy dress ball, given by Mrs. George Morrell, at Headington Hill
Hall, afforded him a far more gratifying proof of the exceptional position he
had won.

"Everyone came round me, Frank, and made me talk.  I hardly danced at all.
I went as Prince Rupert, and I talked as he charged but with more success, for
I turned all my foes into friends.  I had the divinest evening; Oxford meant
so much to me. . . . .

"I wish I could tell you all Oxford did for me.

"I was the happiest man in the world when I entered Magdalen for the
first time.  Oxford--the mere word to me is full of an inexpressible, an
incommunicable charm.  Oxford--the home of lost causes and impossible ideals;
Matthew Arnold's Oxford--with its dreaming spires and grey colleges, set in
velvet lawns and hidden away among the trees, and about it the beautiful fields,
all starred with cowslips and fritillaries where the quiet river winds its way
to London and the sea. . . . .  The change, Frank, to me was astounding; Trinity
was as barbarian as school, with coarseness superadded.  If it had not been for
two or three people, I should have been worse off at Trinity than at Portora;
but Oxford--Oxford was paradise to me.  My very soul seemed to expand within me
to peace and joy.  Oxford--the enchanted valley, holding in its flowerlet cup
all the idealism of the middle ages. (Oscar was always fond of loosely quoting
or paraphrasing in conversation the purple passages from contemporary writers.
He said them exquisitely and sometimes his own embroidery was as good as
the original.  This discipleship, however, always suggested to me a lack of
originality.  In especial Matthew Arnold had an extraordinary influence upon
him, almost as great indeed as Pater.)  Oxford is the capital of romance, Frank;
in its own way as memorable as Athens, and to me it was even more entrancing.
In Oxford, as in Athens, the realities of sordid life were kept at a distance.
No one seemed to know anything about money or care anything for it.  Everywhere
the aristocratic feeling; one must have money, but must not bother about it.
And all the appurtenances of life were perfect: the food, the wine, the
cigarettes; the common needs of life became artistic symbols, our clothes even
won meaning and significance.  It was at Oxford I first dressed in knee breeches
and silk stockings.  I almost reformed fashion and made modern dress
aesthetically beautiful; a second and greater reformation, Frank.  What a pity
it is that Luther knew nothing of dress, had no sense of the becoming.  He had
courage but no fineness of perception.  I'm afraid his neckties would always
have been quite shocking!" and he laughed charmingly.

"What about the inside of the platter, Oscar?"

"Ah, Frank, don't ask me, I don't know; there was no grossness, no coarseness;
but all delicate delights!

"'Fair passions and bountiful pities and loves without
pain,'" ("Stain," not "pain," in the original.)

and he laughed mischievously at the misquotation.

"Loves?" I questioned, and he nodded his head smiling; but would not be drawn.

"All romantic and ideal affections.  Every successive wave of youths from the
public schools brought some chosen spirits, perfectly wonderful persons, the
most graceful and fascinating disciples that a poet could desire, and I preached
the old-ever-new gospel of individual revolt and individual perfection.
I showed them that sin with its curiosities widened the horizons of life.
Prejudices and prohibitions are mere walls to imprison the soul.  Indulgence
may hurt the body, Frank, but nothing except suffering hurts the spirit; it is
self-denial and abstinence that maim and deform the soul."

"Then they knew you as a great talker even at Oxford?" I asked in some surprise.

"Frank," he cried reprovingly, laughing at the same time delightfully, "I was a
great talker at school.  I did nothing at Trinity but talk, my reading was done
at odd hours.  I was the best talker ever seen in Oxford."

"And did you find any teacher there like Mahaffy?" I asked, "any professor with
a touch of the poet?"

He came to seriousness at once.

"There were two or three teachers, Frank," he replied, "greater than Mahaffy;
teachers of the world as well as of Oxford.  There was Ruskin for instance, who
appealed to me intensely--a wonderful man and a most wonderful writer.  A sort
of exquisite romantic flower; like a violet filling the whole air with the
ineffable perfume of belief.  Ruskin has always seemed to me the Plato of
England--a Prophet of the Good and True and Beautiful, who saw as Plato saw that
the three are one perfect flower.  But it was his prose I loved, and not his
piety.  His sympathy with the poor bored me: the road he wanted us to build was
tiresome.  I could see nothing in poverty that appealed to me, nothing; I shrank
away from it as from a degradation of the spirit; but his prose was lyrical and
rose on broad wings into the blue.  He was a great poet and teacher, Frank, and
therefore of course a most preposterous professor; he bored you to death when he
taught, but was an inspiration when he sang.

"Then there was Pater, Pater the classic, Pater the scholar, who had already
written the greatest English prose: I think a page or two of the greatest prose
in all literature.  Pater meant everything to me.  He taught me the highest form
of art: the austerity of beauty.  I came to my full growth with Pater.  He was a
sort of silent, sympathetic elder brother.  Fortunately for me he could not talk
at all; but he was an admirable listener, and I talked to him by the hour.  I
learned the instrument of speech with him, for I could see by his face when I
had said anything extraordinary.  He did not praise me but quickened me
astonishingly, forced me always to do better than my best--an intense vivifying
influence, the influence of Greek art at its supremest."

"He was the Gamaliel then?" I questioned, "at whose feet you sat?"

"Oh, no, Frank," he chided, "everyone sat at my feet even then.  But Pater was a
very great man.  Dear Pater! I remember once talking to him when we were seated
together on a bench under some trees in Oxford.  I had been watching the
students bathing in the river: the beautiful white figures all grace and ease
and virile strength.  I had been pointing out how Christianity had flowered into
romance, and how the crude Hebraic materialism and all the later formalities of
an established creed had fallen away from the tree of life and left us the
exquisite ideals of the new paganism. . . .

"The pale Christ had been outlived: his renunciations and his sympathies were
mere weaknesses: we were moving to a synthesis of art where the enchanting
perfume of romance should be wedded to the severe beauty of classic form.
I really talked as if inspired, and when I paused, Pater--the stiff, quiet,
silent Pater--suddenly slipped from his seat and knelt down by me and kissed
my hand.  I cried:

"'You must not, you really must not.  What would people think if they saw you?'

"He got up with a white strained face.

"'I had to,' he muttered, glancing about him fearfully, 'I had to--once. . . .'"

I must warn my readers that this whole incident is ripened and set in a higher
key of thought by the fact that Oscar told it more than ten years after it
happened.




CHAPTER IV--FORMATIVE INFLUENCES: OSCAR'S POEMS



The most important event in Oscar's early life happened while he was still
an undergraduate at Oxford: his father, Sir William Wilde, died in 1876, leaving
to his wife, Lady Wilde, nearly all he possessed, some L7,000, the interest
of which was barely enough to keep her in genteel poverty.  The sum is so small
that one is constrained to believe the report that Sir William Wilde in his
later years kept practically open house--"lashins of whisky and a good larder,"
and was besides notorious for his gallantries.  Oscar's small portion, a little
money and a small house with some land, came to him in the nick of time: he used
the cash partly to pay some debts at Oxford, partly to defray the expenses of a
trip to Greece.  It was natural that Oscar Wilde, with his eager sponge-like
receptivity, should receive the best academic education of his time, and should
better that by travel.  We all get something like the education we desire, and
Oscar Wilde, it always seemed to me, was over-educated, had learned, that is,
too much from books and not enough from life and had thought too little for
himself; but my readers will be able to judge of this for themselves.

In 1877 he accompanied Professor Mahaffy on a long tour through Greece.  The
pleasure and profit Oscar got from the trip were so great that he failed to
return to Oxford on the date fixed.  The Dons fined him forty-five pounds for
the breach of discipline; but they returned the money to him in the following
year when he won First Honours in "Greats" and the Newdigate prize.

This visit to Greece when he was twenty-three confirmed the view of life which
he had already formed and I have indicated sufficiently perhaps in that talk
with Pater already recorded.  But no one will understand Oscar Wilde who for
a moment loses sight of the fact that he was a pagan born: as Gautier says,
"One for whom the visible world alone exists," endowed with all the Greek
sensuousness and love of plastic beauty; a pagan, like Nietzsche and Gautier,
wholly out of sympathy with Christianity, one of "the Confraternity of
the faithless who "cannot" believe," (His own words in "De Profundis.")
to whom a sense of sin and repentance are symptoms of weakness and disease.

Oscar used often to say that the chief pleasure he had in visiting Rome was
to find the Greek gods and the heroes and heroines of Greek story throned in
the Vatican.  He preferred Niobe to the Mater Dolorosa and Helen to both; the
worship of sorrow must give place, he declared, to the worship of the beautiful.

Another dominant characteristic of the young man may here find its place.

While still at Oxford his tastes--the bent of his mind, and his temperament--
were beginning to outline his future.  He spent his vacations in Dublin and
always called upon his old school friend Edward Sullivan in his rooms at
Trinity.  Sullivan relates that when they met Oscar used to be full of his
occasional visits to London and could talk of nothing but the impression made
upon him by plays and players.  From youth on the theatre drew him irresistibly;
he had not only all the vanity of the actor; but what might be called the born
dramatist's love for the varied life of the stage--its paintings, costumings,
rhetoric--and above all the touch of emphasis natural to it which gives such
opportunity for humorous exaggeration.

"I remember him telling me," Sullivan writes, "about Irving's 'Macbeth,' which
made a great impression on him; he was fascinated by it.  He feared, however,
that the public might be similarly affected--a thing which, he declared, would
destroy his enjoyment of an extraordinary performance."  He admired Miss Ellen
Terry, too, extravagantly, as he admired Marion Terry, Mrs. Langtry, and Mary
Anderson later.

The death of Sir William Wilde put an end to the family life in Dublin, and
set the survivors free.  Lady Wilde had lost her husband and her only daughter
in Merrion Square: the house was full of sad memories to her, she was eager to
leave it all and settle in London.

The "Requiescat" in Oscar's first book of poems was written in memory of this
sister who died in her teens, whom he likened to "a ray of sunshine dancing
about the house."  He took his vocation seriously even in youth: he felt that he
should sing his sorrow, give record of whatever happened to him in life.  But he
found no new word for his bereavement.

Willie Wilde came over to London and got employment as a journalist and was
soon given almost a free hand by the editor of the society paper "The World".
With rare unselfishness, or, if you will, with Celtic clannishness, he did a
good deal to make Oscar's name known.  Every clever thing that Oscar said or
that could be attributed to him, Willie reported in "The World".  This puffing
and Oscar's own uncommon power as a talker; but chiefly perhaps a whispered
reputation for strange sins, had thus early begun to form a sort of myth around
him.  He was already on the way to becoming a personage; there was a certain
curiosity about him, a flutter of interest in whatever he did.  He had published
poems in the Trinity College magazine, "Kottabos", and elsewhere.  People were
beginning to take him at his own valuation as a poet and a wit; and the more
readily as that ambition did not clash in any way with their more material
strivings.

The time had now come for Oscar to conquer London as he had conquered Oxford.
He had finished the first class in the great World-School and was eager to try
the next, where his mistakes would be his only tutors and his desires his
taskmasters. His University successes flattered him with the belief that he
would go from triumph to triumph and be the exception proving the rule that
the victor in the academic lists seldom repeats his victories on the battlefield
of life.

It is not sufficiently understood that the learning of Latin and Greek and
the forming of expensive habits at others' cost are a positive disability and
handicap in the rough-and-tumble tussle of the great city, where greed and
unscrupulous resolution rule, and where there are few prizes for feats of memory
or taste in words.  When the graduate wins in life he wins as a rule in spite of
his so-called education and not because of it.

It is true that the majority of English 'Varsity men give themselves an
infinitely better education than that provided by the authorities.  They devote
themselves to athletic sports with whole-hearted enthusiasm.  Fortunately for
them it is impossible to develop the body without at the same time steeling the
will.  The would-be athlete has to live laborious days; he may not eat to his
liking, nor drink to his thirst.  He learns deep lessons almost unconsciously;
to conquer his desires and make light of pain and discomfort.  He needs no
Aristotle to teach him the value of habits; he is soon forced to use them as
defences against his pet weaknesses; above all he finds that self-denial has its
reward in perfect health; that the thistle pain, too, has its flower.  It is a
truism that 'Varsity athletes generally succeed in life, Spartan discipline
proving itself incomparably superior to Greek accidence.

Oscar Wilde knew nothing of this discipline.  He had never trained his body
to endure or his will to steadfastness.  He was the perfect flower of academic
study and leisure.  At Magdalen he had been taught luxurious living, the delight
of gratifying expensive tastes; he had been brought up and enervated so to speak
in Capua.  His vanity had been full-fed with cloistered triumphs; he was at
once pleasure-loving, vainly self-confident and weak; he had been encouraged
for years to give way to his emotions and to pamper his sensations, and as the
Cap-and-Bells of Folly to cherish a fantastic code of honour even in mortal
combat, while despising the religion which might have given him some hold on
the respect of his compatriots.  What chance had this cultured honour-loving
Sybarite in the deadly grapple of modern life where the first quality is will
power, the only knowledge needed a knowledge of the value of money.  I must not
be understood here as in any degree disparaging Oscar.  I can surely state that
a flower is weaker than a weed without exalting the weed or depreciating the
flower.

The first part of life's voyage was over for Oscar Wilde; let us try to see him
as he saw himself at this time and let us also determine his true relations to
the world.  Fortunately he has given us his own view of himself with some care.

In Foster's "Alumni Oxonienses", Oscar Wilde described himself on leaving Oxford
as a "Professor of aesthetics, and a Critic of Art"--an announcement to me at
once infinitely ludicrous and pathetic.  "Ludicrous" because it betrays such
complete ignorance of life all given over to men industrious with muck-rakes:
"Gadarene swine," as Carlyle called them, "busily grubbing and grunting in
search of pignuts."  "Pathetic" for it is boldly ingenuous as youth itself with
a touch of youthful conceit and exaggeration.  Another eager human soul on the
threshold longing to find some suitable high work in the world, all unwitting
of the fact that ideal strivings are everywhere despised and discouraged--
jerry-built cottages for the million being the day's demand and not oratories
or palaces of art or temples for the spirit.

Not the time for a "professor of aesthetics," one would say, and assuredly
not the place.  One wonders whether Zululand would not be more favourable for
such a man than England.  Germany, France, and Italy have many positions in
universities, picture-galleries, museums, opera houses for lovers of the
beautiful, and above all an educated respect for artists and writers just
as they have places too for servants of Truth in chemical laboratories and
polytechnics endowed by the State with excellent results even from the
utilitarian point of view.  But rich England has only a few dozen such places
in all at command and these are usually allotted with a cynical contempt for
merit; miserable anarchic England, soul-starved amid its creature comforts,
proving now by way of example to helots that man cannot live by bread alone:--
England and Oscar Wilde! the "Black Country" and "the professor of aesthetics"--
a mad world, my masters!

It is necessary for us now to face this mournful truth that in the quarrel
between these two the faults were not all on one side, mayhap England was even
further removed from the ideal than the would-be professor of aesthetics,
which fact may well give us pause and food for thought.  Organic progress we
have been told; indeed, might have seen if we had eyes, evolution so-called
is from the simple to the complex; our rulers therefore should have provided
for the ever-growing complexity of modern life and modern men.  The good
gardener will even make it his ambition to produce new species; our politicians,
however, will not take the trouble to give even the new species that appear a
chance of living; they are too busy, it appears, in keeping their jobs.

No new profession has been organized in England since the Middle Ages.  In the
meantime we have invented new arts, new sciences and new letters; when will
these be organized and regimented in new and living professions, so that young
ingenuous souls may find suitable fields for their powers and may not be forced
willy-nilly to grub for pignuts when it would be more profitable for them and
for us to use their nobler faculties?  Not only are the poor poorer and more
numerous in England than elsewhere; but there is less provision made for the
"intellectuals" too, consequently the organism is suffering at both extremities.
It is high time that both maladies were taken in hand, for by universal consent
England is now about the worst organized of all modern States, the furthest
from the ideal.

Something too should be done with the existing professions to make them worthy
of honourable ambition.  One of them, the Church, is a noble body without a
soul; the soul, our nostrils tell us, died some time ago, while the medical
profession has got a noble spirit with a wretched half-organized body.  It says
much for the inherent integrity and piety of human nature that our doctors
persist in trying to cure diseases when it is clearly to their self-interest to
keep their patients ailing--an anarchic world, this English one, and stupefied
with self-praise.  What will this professor of aesthetics make of it?

Here he is, the flower of English University training, a winner of some of the
chief academic prizes without any worthy means of earning a livelihood, save
perchance by journalism.  And journalism in England suffers from the prevailing
anarchy.  In France, Italy, and Germany journalism is a career in which an
eloquent and cultured youth may honourably win his spurs.  In many countries
this way of earning one's bread can still be turned into an art by the gifted
and high-minded; but in England thanks in the main to the anonymity of the press
cunningly contrived by the capitalist, the journalist or modern preacher is
turned into a venal voice, a soulless Cheapjack paid to puff his master's wares.
Clearly our "Professor of aesthetics and Critic of Art" is likely to have a
doleful time of it in nineteenth century London.

Oscar had already dipped into his little patrimony, as we have seen, and he
could not conceal from himself that he would soon have to live on what he could
earn--a few pounds a week.  But then he was a poet and had boundless confidence
in his own ability.  To the artist nature the present is everything; just for
to-day he resolved that he would live as he had always lived; so he travelled
first class to London and bought all the books and papers that could distract
him on the way: "Give me the luxuries," he used to say, "and anyone can have
the necessaries."

In the background of his mind there were serious misgivings.  Long afterwards
he told me that his father's death and the smallness of his patrimony had been
a heavy blow to him.  He encouraged himself, however, at the moment by dwelling
on his brother's comparative success and waved aside fears and doubts as
unworthy.

It is to his credit that at first he tried to cut down expenses and live
laborious days.  He took a couple of furnished rooms in Salisbury Street off the
Strand, a very Grub Street for a man of fashion, and began to work at journalism
while getting together a book of poems for publication.  His journalism at first
was anything but successful.  It was his misfortune to appeal only to the best
heads and good heads are not numerous anywhere.  His appeal, too, was still
academic and laboured.  His brother Willie with his commoner sympathies appeared
to be better equipped for this work.  But Oscar had from the first a certain
social success.

As soon as he reached London he stepped boldly into the limelight, going to
all "first nights" and taking the floor on all occasions.  He was not only an
admirable talker but he was invariably smiling, eager, full of life and the joy
of living, and above all given to unmeasured praise of whatever and whoever
pleased him.  This gift of enthusiastic admiration was not only his most
engaging characteristic, but also, perhaps, the chief proof of his extraordinary
ability.  It was certainly, too, the quality which served him best all through
his life.  He went about declaring that Mrs. Langtry was more beautiful than
the 'Venus of Milo,' and Lady Archie Campbell more charming than Rosalind and
Mr. Whistler an incomparable artist.  Such enthusiasm in a young and brilliant
man was unexpected and delightful and doors were thrown open to him in all sets.
Those who praise passionately are generally welcome guests and if Oscar could
not praise he shrugged his shoulders and kept silent; scarcely a bitter word
ever fell from those smiling lips.  No tactics could have been more successful
in England than his native gift of radiant good-humour and enthusiasm.  He got
to know not only all the actors and actresses, but the chief patrons and
frequenters of the theatre: Lord Lytton, Lady Shrewsbury, Lady Dorothy Nevill,
Lady de Grey and Mrs. Jeune; and, on the other hand, Hardy, Meredith, Browning,
Swinburne, and Matthew Arnold--all Bohemia, in fact, and all that part of
Mayfair which cares for the things of the intellect.

But though he went out a great deal and met a great many distinguished people,
and won a certain popularity, his social success put no money in his purse.
It even forced him to spend money; for the constant applause of his hearers
gave him self-confidence.  He began to talk more and write less, and cabs and
gloves and flowers cost money.  He was soon compelled to mortgage his little
property in Ireland.

At the same time it must be admitted he was still indefatigably intent on
bettering his mind, and in London he found more original teachers than in
Oxford, notably Morris and Whistler.  Morris, though greatly overpraised during
his life, had hardly any message for the men of his time.  He went for his
ideals to an imaginary past and what he taught and praised was often totally
unsuited to modern conditions.  Whistler on the other hand was a modern of the
moderns, and a great artist to boot: he had not only assimilated all the newest
thought of the day, but with the alchemy of genius had transmuted it and made it
his own.  Before even the de Goncourts he had admired Chinese porcelain and
Japanese prints and his own exquisite intuition strengthened by Japanese example
had shown him that his impression of life was more valuable than any mere
transcript of it.  Modern art he felt should be an interpretation and not a
representment of reality, and he taught the golden rule of the artist that the
half is usually more expressive than the whole.  He went about London preaching
new schemes of decoration and another Renaissance of art.  Had he only been a
painter he would never have exercised an extraordinary influence; but he was a
singularly interesting appearance as well and an admirable talker gifted with
picturesque phrases and a most caustic wit.

Oscar sat at his feet and imbibed as much as he could of the new aesthetic
gospel.  He even ventured to annex some of the master's most telling stories
and thus came into conflict with his teacher.

One incident may find a place here.

The art critic of "The Times", Mr. Humphry Ward, had come to see an exhibition
of Whistler's pictures.  Filled with an undue sense of his own importance, he
buttonholed the master and pointing to one picture said:

"That's good, first-rate, a lovely bit of colour; but that, you know," he went
on, jerking his finger over his shoulder at another picture, "that's bad,
drawing all wrong . . . bad!"

"My dear fellow," cried Whistler, "you must never say that this painting's good
or that bad, never! Good and bad are not terms to be used by you; but say, I
like this, and I dislike that, and you'll be within your right.  And now come
and have a whiskey for you're sure to like that."

Carried away by the witty fling, Oscar cried:

"I wish I had said that."

"You will, Oscar, you will," came Whistler's lightning thrust.

Of all the personal influences which went to the moulding of Oscar Wilde's
talent, that of Whistler, in my opinion, was the most important; Whistler taught
him that men of genius stand apart and are laws unto themselves; showed him,
too, that all qualities--singularity of appearance, wit, rudeness even, count
doubly in a democracy.  But neither his own talent nor the bold self-assertion
learned from Whistler helped him to earn money; the conquest of London seemed
further off and more improbable than ever.  Where Whistler had missed the laurel
how could he or indeed anyone be sure of winning?

A weaker professor of aesthetics would have been discouraged by the monetary
and other difficulties of his position and would have lost heart at the outset
in front of the impenetrable blank wall of English philistinism and contempt.
But Oscar Wilde was conscious of great ability and was driven by an inordinate
vanity.  Instead of diminishing his pretensions in the face of opposition he
increased them.  He began to go abroad in the evening in knee breeches and silk
stockings wearing strange flowers in his coat--green cornflowers and gilded
lilies--while talking about Baudelaire, whose name even was unfamiliar, as a
world poet, and proclaiming the strange creed that "nothing succeeds like
excess."  Very soon his name came into everyone's mouth; London talked of
him and discussed him at a thousand tea-tables.  For one invitation he had
received before, a dozen now poured in; he became a celebrity.

Of course he was still sneered at by many as a mere "poseur"; it still seemed
to be all Lombard Street to a china orange that he would be beaten down
under the myriad trampling feet of middle-class indifference and disdain.

Some circumstances were in his favour.  Though the artistic movement inaugurated
years before by the Pre-Raphaelites was still laughed at and scorned by the
many as a craze, a few had stood firm, and slowly the steadfast minority had
begun to sway the majority as is often the case in democracies.  Oscar Wilde
profited by the victory of these art-loving forerunners.  Here and there among
the indifferent public, men were attracted by the artistic view of life and
women by the emotional intensity of the new creed.  Oscar Wilde became the
prophet of an esoteric cult.  But notoriety even did not solve the monetary
question, which grew more and more insistent.  A dozen times he waved it aside
and went into debt rather than restrain himself.  Somehow or other he would fall
on his feet, he thought.  Men who console themselves in this way usually fall
on someone else's feet and so did Oscar Wilde.  At twenty-six years of age and
curiously enough at the very moment of his insolent-bold challenge of the world
with fantastic dress, he stooped to ask his mother for money, money which she
could ill spare, though to do her justice she never wasted a second thought on
money where her affections were concerned, and she not only loved Oscar but was
proud of him.  Still she could not give him much; the difficulty was only
postponed; what was to be done?

His vanity had grown with his growth; the dread of defeat was only a spur
to the society favourite; he cast about for some means of conquering the
Philistines, and could think of nothing but his book of poems.  He had been
trying off and on for nearly a year to get it published.  The publishers told
him roundly that there was no money in poetry and refused the risk.  But the
notoriety of his knee-breeches and silken hose, and above all the continual
attacks in the society papers, came to his aid and his book appeared in the
early summer of 1881 with all the importance that imposing form, good paper,
broad margins, and high price (10/6) could give it.  The truth was, he paid for
the printing and production of the book himself, and David Bogue, the publisher,
put his name on for a commission.

Oscar had built high fantastic hopes on this book.  To the very end of his
life he believed himself a poet and in the creative sense of the word he was
assuredly justified, but he meant it in the singing sense as well, and there his
claim can only be admitted with serious qualifications.  But whether he was a
singer or not the hopes founded on this book were extravagant; he expected to
make not only reputation by it, but a large amount of money, and money is not
often made in England by poetry.

The book had an extraordinary success, greater, it may safely be said, than any
first book of real poetry has ever had in England or indeed is ever likely to
have: four editions were sold in a few weeks.  Two of the Sonnets in the book
were addressed to Ellen Terry, one as "Portia," the other as "Henrietta Maria";
and these partly account for the book's popularity, for Miss Terry was delighted
with them and praised the book and its author to the skies.  (In her
"Recollections" Miss Terry says that she was more impressed by the genius of
Oscar Wilde and of Whistler than by that of any other men.)  I reproduce the
"Henrietta Maria" sonnet here as a fair specimen of the work:

QUEEN HENRIETTA MARIA

In the lone tent, waiting for victory,
  She stands with eyes marred by the mists of pain,
  Like some wan lily overdrenched with rain:
The clamorous clang of arms, the ensanguined sky,
War's ruin, and the wreck of chivalry,
  To her proud soul no common fear can bring:
  Bravely she tarrieth for her Lord the King,
Her soul aflame with passionate ecstasy.
O Hair of Gold! O Crimson Lips! O Face!
  Made for the luring and the love of man!
  With thee I do forget the toil and stress,
The loveless road that knows no resting-place,
  Time's straitened pulse, the soul's dread weariness,
My freedom and my life republican.

Lyric poetry is by its excellence the chief art of England, as music is the
art of Germany.  A book of poetry is almost sure of fair appreciation in the
English press which does not trouble to notice a "Sartor Resartus" or the first
essays of an Emerson.  The excessive consideration given to Oscar's book by the
critics showed that already his personality and social success had affected the
reporters.

"The Athenaeum" gave the book the place of honour in its number for the 23rd of
July.  The review was severe; but not unjust.  "Mr. Wilde's volume of poems," it
says, "may be regarded as the evangel of a new creed.  From other gospels it
differs in coming after, instead of before, the cult it seeks to establish.
. . . . We fail to see, however, that the apostle of the new worship has any
distinct message."

The critic then took pains to prove that "nearly all the book is imitative"
. . . . and concluded: "Work of this nature has no element of endurance."

"The Saturday Review "dismissed the book at the end of an article on "Recent
Poetry" as "neither good nor bad."  The reviewer objected in the English fashion
to the sensual tone of the poems; but summed up fairly enough: "This book is not
without traces of cleverness, but it is marred everywhere by imitation,
insincerity, and bad taste."

At the same time the notices in "Punch" were extravagantly bitter, while of
course the notices in "The World", mainly written by Oscar's brother, were
extravagantly eulogistic.  "Punch" declared that "Mr. Wilde may be aesthetic,
but he is not original . . . . a volume of echoes. . . . . Swinburne and water."

Now what did "The Athenaeum" mean by taking a new book of imitative verse so
seriously and talking of it as the "evangel of a new creed," besides suggesting
that "it comes after the cult," and so forth?

It seems probable that "The Athenaeum" mistook Oscar Wilde for a continuator
of the Pre-Raphaelite movement with the sub-conscious and peculiarly English
suggestion that whatever is "aesthetic" or "artistic" is necessarily weak and
worthless, if not worse.

Soon after Oscar left Oxford "Punch" began to caricature him and ridicule the
cult of what it christened "The Too Utterly Utter."  Nine Englishmen out of ten
took delight in the savage contempt poured upon what was known euphemistically
as "the aesthetic craze" by the pet organ of the English middle class.

This was the sort of thing "Punch" published under the title of "A Poet's Day":

"Oscar at Breakfast! Oscar at Luncheon!!
Oscar at Dinner!!! Oscar at Supper!!!!"

"'You see I am, after all, mortal,' remarked the poet, with an ineffable affable
smile, as he looked up from an elegant but substantial dish of ham and eggs.
Passing a long willowy hand through his waving hair, he swept away a stray
curl-paper, with the nonchalance of a D'Orsay.

"After this effort Mr. Wilde expressed himself as feeling somewhat faint; and
with a half apologetic smile ordered another portion of Ham and Eggs."

"Punch"'s verses on the subject were of the same sort, showing spite rather
than humour.  Under the heading of "Sage Green" (by a fading-out aesthete) it
published such stuff as this:

My love is as fair as a lily flower.
  ("The Peacock blue has a sacred sheen!")
Oh, bright are the blooms in her maiden bower.
  ("Sing Hey! Sing Ho! for the sweet Sage Green!")
. . . . . . . . . . . . .
And woe is me that I never may win;
  ("The Peacock blue has a sacred sheen!")
For the Bard's hard up, and she's got no tin.
  ("Sing Hey! Sing Ho! for the sweet Sage Green!")

Taking the criticism as a whole it would be useless to deny that there is an
underlying assumption of vicious sensuality in the poet which is believed to
be reflected in the poetry.  This is the only way to explain the condemnation
which is much more bitter than the verse deserves.

The poems gave Oscar pocket money for a season; increased too his notoriety;
but did him little or no good with the judicious: there was not a memorable
word or a new cadence, or a sincere cry in the book.  Still, first volumes of
poetry are as a rule imitative and the attempt, if inferior to "Venus and
Adonis," was not without interest.

Oscar was naturally disappointed with the criticism, but the sales encouraged
him and the stir the book made and he was as determined as ever to succeed.
What was to be done next?




CHAPTER V--OSCAR'S QUARREL WITH WHISTLER AND MARRIAGE



The first round in the battle with Fate was inconclusive.  Oscar Wilde had
managed to get known and talked about and had kept his head above water for
a couple of years while learning something about life and more about himself.
On the other hand he had spent almost all his patrimony, had run into some debt
besides; yet seemed as far as ever from earning a decent living.  The outlook
was disquieting.

Even as a young man Oscar had a very considerable understanding of life.  He
could not make his way as a journalist, the English did not care for his poetry;
but there was still the lecture-platform.  In his heart he knew that he could
talk better than he wrote.

He got his brother to announce boldly in "The World" that owing to the
"astonishing success of his 'Poems' Mr. Oscar Wilde had been invited to
lecture in America."

The invitation was imaginary; but Oscar had resolved to break into this new
field; there was money in it, he felt sure.

Besides he had another string to his bow.  When the first rumblings of the
social storm in Russia reached England, our aristocratic republican seized
occasion by the forelock and wrote a play on the Nihilist Conspiracy called
"Vera".  This drama was impregnated with popular English liberal sentiment.
With the interest of actuality about it "Vera" was published in September, 1880;
but fell flat.

The assassination of the Tsar Alexander, however, in March, 1881; the way
Oscar's poems published in June of that year were taken up by Miss Terry and
puffed in the press, induced Mrs. Bernard Beere, an actress of some merit, to
accept "Vera" for the stage.  It was suddenly announced that "Vera" would be put
on by Mrs. Bernard Beere at The Adelphi in December, '81; but the author had to
be content with this advertisement.  December came and went and "Vera" was not
staged.  It seemed probable to Oscar that it might be accepted in America; at
any rate, there could be no harm in trying: he sailed for New York.

It was on the cards that he might succeed in his new adventure.  The taste of
America in letters and art is still strongly influenced, if not formed, by
English taste, and, if Oscar Wilde had been properly accredited, it is probable
that his extraordinary gift of speech would have won him success in America as
a lecturer.

His phrase to the Revenue officers on landing: "I have nothing to declare
except my genius," turned the limelight full upon him and excited comment and
discussion all over the country.  But the fuglemen of his caste whose praise had
brought him to the front in England were almost unrepresented in the States, and
never bold enough to be partisans.  Oscar faced the American Philistine public
without his accustomed "claque", and under these circumstances a half-success
was evidence of considerable power.  His subjects were "The English Renaissance"
and "House Decoration."

His first lecture at Chickering Hall on January 9, 1882, was so much talked
about that the famous impresario, Major Pond, engaged him for a tour which,
however, had to be cut short in the middle as a monetary failure.  "The Nation"
gave a very fair account of his first lecture: "Mr. Wilde is essentially a
foreign product and can hardly succeed in this country.  What he has to say is
not new, and his extravagance is not extravagant enough to amuse the average
American audience.  His knee-breeches and long hair are good as far as they go;
but Bunthorne has really spoiled the public for Wilde."

"The Nation" underrated American curiosity.  Oscar lectured some ninety times
from January till July, when he returned to New York.  The gross receipts
amounted to some L4,000: he received about L1,200, which left him with a few
hundreds above his expenses.  His optimism regarded this as a triumph.

One is fain to confess today that these lectures make very poor reading.  There
is not a new thought in them; not even a memorable expression; they are nothing
but student work, the best passages in them being mere paraphrases of Pater and
Arnold, though the titles were borrowed from Whistler.  Dr. Ernest Bendz in his
monograph on "The Influence of Pater and Matthew Arnold in the Prose-Writings of
Oscar Wilde" has established this fact with curious erudition and completeness.

Still, the lecturer was a fine figure of a man: his knee-breeches and silk
stockings set all the women talking, and he spoke with suave authority.  Even
the dullest had to admit that his elocution was excellent, and the manner of
speech is keenly appreciated in America.  In some of the Eastern towns, in
New York especially, he had a certain success, the success of sensation and of
novelty, such success as every large capital gives to the strange and eccentric.

In Boston he scored a triumph of character.  Fifty or sixty Harvard students
came to his lecture dressed to caricature him in "swallow tail coats, knee
breeches, flowing wigs and green ties.  They all wore large lilies in their
buttonholes and each man carried a huge sunflower as he limped along."  That
evening Oscar appeared in ordinary dress and went on with his lecture as if he
had not noticed the rudeness.  The chief Boston paper gave him due credit:

"Everyone who witnessed the scene on Tuesday evening must feel about it very
much as we do, and those who came to scoff, if they did not exactly remain to
pray, at least left the Music Hall with feelings of cordial liking, and, perhaps
to their own surprise, of respect for Oscar Wilde." (By way of heaping coals of
fire on the students' heads Oscar presented a cast of the Hermes (then recently
unearthed) to the University of Harvard.)

As he travelled west to Louisville and Omaha his popularity dwined and dwindled.
Still he persevered and after leaving the States visited Canada, reaching
Halifax in the autumn.

One incident must find a place here.  On September 6 he sent L80 to Lady Wilde.
I have been told that this was merely a return of money she had advanced; but
there can be no doubt that Oscar, unlike his brother Willie, helped his mother
again and again most generously, though Willie was always her favourite.

Oscar returned to England in April, 1883, and lectured to the Art Students at
their club in Golden Square.  This at once brought about a break with Whistler
who accused him of plagiarism:--"Picking from our platters the plums for the
puddings he peddles in the provinces."

If one compares this lecture with Oscar's on "The English Renaissance of Art,"
delivered in New York only a year before, and with Whistler's well-known
opinions, it is impossible not to admit that the charge was justified.  Such
phrases as "artists are not to copy beauty but to create it . . . . a picture
is a purely decorative thing," proclaim their author.

The long newspaper wrangle between the two was brought to a head in 1885, when
Whistler gave his famous "Ten o'clock" discourse on Art.  This lecture was
infinitely better than any of Oscar Wilde's.  Twenty odd years older than Wilde,
Whistler was a master of all his resources: he was not only witty, but he had
new views on art and original ideas.  As a great artist he knew that "there
never was an artistic period.  There never was an Art-loving nation."  Again
and again he reached pure beauty of expression.  The masterly persiflage, too,
filled me with admiration and I declared that the lecture ranked with the best
ever heard in London with Coleridge's on Shakespeare and Carlyle's on Heroes.
To my astonishment Oscar would not admit the superlative quality of Whistler's
talk; he thought the message paradoxical and the ridicule of the professors
too bitter.  "Whistler's like a wasp," he cried, "and carries about with him a
poisoned sting."  Oscar's kindly sweet nature revolted against the disdainful
aggressiveness of Whistler's attitude.  Besides, in essence, Whistler's lecture
was an attack on the academic theory taught in the universities, and defended
naturally by a young scholar like Oscar Wilde.  Whistler's view that the artist
was sporadic, a happy chance, a "sport," in fact, was a new view, and Oscar had
not yet reached this level; he reviewed the master in the "Pall Mall Gazette",
a review remarkable for one of the earliest gleams of that genial humour which
later became his most characteristic gift: "Whistler," he said, "is indeed one
of the very greatest masters of painting in my opinion.  And I may add that in
this opinion Mr. Whistler himself entirely concurs."

Whistler retorted in "The World" and Oscar replied, but Whistler had the best of
the argument. . . . . "Oscar--the amiable, irresponsible, esurient Oscar--with
no more sense of a picture than of the fit of a coat, has the courage of the
opinions . . . . of others!"

It should be noted here that one of the bitterest of tongues could not help
doing homage to Oscar Wilde's "amiability": Whistler even preferred to call him
"amiable and irresponsible" rather than give his plagiarism a harsher attribute.

Oscar Wilde learned almost all he knew of art (confer Appendix: "Criticisms by
Robert Ross.") and of controversy from Whistler, but he was never more than a
pupil in either field; for controversy in especial he was poorly equipped: he
had neither the courage, nor the contempt, nor the joy in conflict of his great
exemplar.

Unperturbed by Whistler's attacks, Oscar went on lecturing about the country on
"Personal Impressions of America," and in August crossed again to New York to
see his play "Vera" produced by Marie Prescott at the Union Square Theatre.  It
was a complete failure, as might have been expected; the serious part of it was
such as any talented young man might have written.  Nevertheless I find in this
play for the first time, a characteristic gleam of humour, an unexpected flirt
of wing, so to speak, which, in view of the future, is full of promise.  At the
time it passed unappreciated.

September, 1883, saw Oscar again in England.  The platform gave him better
results than the theatre, but not enough for freedom or ease.  It is the more to
his credit that as soon as he got a couple of hundred pounds ahead, he resolved
to spend it in bettering his mind.

His longing for wider culture, and perhaps in part, the example of Whistler,
drove him to Paris.  He put up at the little provincial Hotel Voltaire on the
Quai Voltaire and quickly made acquaintance with everyone of note in the world
of letters, from Victor Hugo to Paul Bourget.  He admired Verlaine's genius to
the full but the grotesque physical ugliness of the man himself (Verlaine was
like a masque of Socrates) and his sordid and unclean way of living prevented
Oscar from really getting to know him.  During this stay in Paris Oscar read
enormously and his French, which had been schoolboyish, became quite good.  He
always said that Balzac, and especially his poet, Lucien de Rubempre, had been
his teachers.

While in Paris he completed his blank-verse play, "The Duchess of Padua," and
sent it to Miss Mary Anderson in America, who refused it, although she had
commissioned him, he always said, to write it.  It seems to me inferior even
to "Vera" in interest, more academic and further from life, and when produced
in New York in 1891 it was a complete frost.

In a few months Oscar Wilde had spent his money and had skimmed the cream from
Paris, as he thought; accordingly he returned to London and took rooms again,
this time in Charles Street, Mayfair.  He had learned some rude lessons in the
years since leaving Oxford, and the first and most impressive lesson was the
fear of poverty.  Yet his taking rooms in the fashionable part of town showed
that he was more determined than ever to rise and not to sink.

It was Lady Wilde who urged him to take rooms near her; she never doubted
his ultimate triumph.  She knew all his poems by heart, took the strass for
diamonds and welcomed the chance of introducing her brilliant son to the Irish
Nationalist Members and other pinchbeck celebrities who flocked about her.

It was about this time that I first saw Lady Wilde.  I was introduced to her
by Willie, Oscar's elder brother, whom I had met in Fleet Street.  Willie was
then a tall, well-made fellow of thirty or thereabouts with an expressive
taking face, lit up with a pair of deep blue laughing eyes.  He had any amount
of physical vivacity, and told a good story with immense verve, without for a
moment getting above the commonplace: to him the Corinthian journalism of "The
Daily Telegraph" was literature.  Still he had the surface good nature and good
humour of healthy youth and was generally liked.  He took me to his mother's
house one afternoon; but first he had a drink here and a chat there so that we
did not reach the West End till after six o'clock.

The room and its occupants made an indelible grotesque impression on me.  It
seemed smaller than it was because overcrowded with a score of women and half
a dozen men.  It was very dark and there were empty tea-cups and cigarette ends
everywhere.  Lady Wilde sat enthroned behind the tea-table looking like a sort
of female Buddha swathed in wraps--a large woman with a heavy face and prominent
nose; very like Oscar indeed, with the same sallow skin which always looked
dirty; her eyes too were her redeeming feature--vivacious and quick-glancing
as a girl's.  She "made up" like an actress and naturally preferred shadowed
gloom to sunlight.  Her idealism came to show as soon as she spoke.  It was a
necessity of her nature to be enthusiastic; unfriendly critics said hysterical,
but I should prefer to say high-falutin' about everything she enjoyed or
admired.  She was at her best in misfortune; her great vanity gave her a certain
proud stoicism which was admirable.

The Land League was under discussion as we entered, and Parnell's attitude
to it.  Lady Wilde regarded him as the predestined saviour of her country.
"Parnell," she said with a strong accent on the first syllable, "is the man
of destiny; he will strike off the fetters and free Ireland, and throne her
as Queen among the nations."

A murmur of applause came from a thin birdlike woman standing opposite, who
floated towards us clad in a sage-green gown, which sheathed her like an
umbrella case; had she had any figure the dress would have been indecent.

"How like 'Speranza'!" she cooed, "dear Lady Wilde!" I noticed that her glance
went towards Willie, who was standing on the other side of his mother, talking
to a tall, handsome girl.  Willie's friend seemed amused at the lyrical outburst
of the green spinster, for smiling a little she questioned him:

"'Speranza' is Lady Wilde?" she asked with a slight American accent.

Lady Wilde informed the company with all the impressiveness she had at command
that she did not expect Oscar that afternoon; "he is so busy with his new poems,
 you know; they say there has been no such sensation since Byron," she added;
"already everyone is talking of them."

"Indeed, yes," sighed the green lily, "do you remember, dear Speranza, what he
said about 'The Sphinx,' that he read to us.  He told us the written verse was
quite different from what the printed poem would be just as the sculptor's clay
model differs from the marble.  Subtle, wasn't it?"

"Perfectly true, too!" cried a man, with a falsetto voice, moving into the
circle; "Leonardo himself might have said that."

The whole scene seemed to me affected and middle-class, untidy, too, with an un-
English note about it of shiftlessness; the aesthetic dresses were extravagant,
the enthusiasms pumped up and exaggerated.  I was glad to leave quietly.

It was on this visit to Lady Wilde, or a later one, that I first heard of that
other poem of Oscar, "The Harlot's House," which was also said to have been
written in Paris.  Though published in an obscure sheet and in itself
commonplace enough it made an astonishing stir.  Time and advertisement had been
working for him.  Academic lectures and imitative poetry alike had made him
widely known; and, thanks to the small body of enthusiastic admirers whom I have
already spoken of, his reputation instead of waning out had grown like the Jinn
when released from the bottle.

The fuglemen were determined to find something wonderful in everything he did,
and the title of "The Harlot's House," shocking Philistinism, gave them a
certain opportunity which they used to the uttermost.  On all sides one
was asked: "Have you seen Oscar's latest?" And then the last verse would be
quoted:--"Divine, don't ye think?"

"And down the long and silent street,
  The dawn, with silver-sandalled feet,
Crept like a frightened girl."

In spite of all this extravagant eulogy Oscar Wilde's early plays and poems,
like his lectures, were unimportant.  The small remnant of people in England who
really love the things of the spirit were disappointed in them, failed to find
in them the genius so loudly and so arrogantly vaunted.

But, if Oscar Wilde's early writings were failures, his talk was more successful
than ever.  He still tried to show off on all occasions and sometimes fell flat
in consequence; but his failures in this field were few and merely comparative;
constant practice was ripening his extraordinary natural gift.  About this time,
too, he began to develop that humorous vein in conversation, which later lent a
singular distinction to his casual utterances.

His talk brought him numerous invitations to dinner and lunch and introduced him
to some of the best houses in London, but it produced no money.  He was earning
very little and he needed money, comparatively large sums of money, from week
to week.

Oscar Wilde was extravagant in almost every possible way.  He wished to be well-
fed, well-dressed, well-wined, and prodigal of "tips."  He wanted first editions
of the poets; had a liking for old furniture and old silver, for fine pictures,
Eastern carpets and Renascence bronzes; in fine, he had all the artist's desires
as well as those of the poet and "viveur".  He was constantly in dire need of
cash and did not hesitate to borrow fifty pounds from anyone who would lend it
to him.  He was beginning to experience the truth of the old verse:

'Tis a very good world to live in,
  To lend or to spend or to give in,
But to beg or to borrow or get a man's own,
  'Tis the very worst world that ever was known.

The difficulties of life were constantly increasing upon him.  He despised bread
and butter and talked only of champagne and caviare; but without bread, hunger
is imminent.  Victory no longer seemed indubitable.  It was possible, it began
even to be probable that the fair ship of his fame might come to wreck on the
shoals of poverty.

It was painfully clear that he must do something without further delay, must
either conquer want or overleap it.  Would he bridle his desires, live savingly,
and write assiduously till such repute came as would enable him to launch out
and indulge his tastes?  He was wise enough to see the advantages of such a
course.  Every day his reputation as a talker was growing.  Had he had a little
more self-control, had he waited a little longer till his position in society
was secured, he could easily have married someone with money and position who
would have placed him above sordid care and fear for ever.  But he could not
wait; he was colossally vain; he would wear the peacock's feathers at all times
and all costs: he was intensely pleasure-loving, too; his mouth watered for
every fruit.  Besides, he couldn't write with creditors at the door.  Like
Bossuet he was unable to work when bothered about small economies:--"s'il etait
a l'etroit dans son domestique".

What was to be done?  Suddenly he cut the knot and married the daughter of a
Q.C., a Miss Constance Lloyd, a young lady without any particular qualities
or beauty, whom he had met in Dublin on a lecture tour.  Miss Lloyd had a few
hundreds a year of her own, just enough to keep the wolf from the door.  The
couple went to live in Tite Street, Chelsea, in a modest little house.  The
drawing-room, however, was decorated by Godwin and quickly gained a certain
notoriety.  It was indeed a charming room with an artistic distinction and
appeal of its own.

As soon as the dreadful load of poverty was removed, Oscar began to go about a
great deal, and his wife would certainly have been invited with him if he had
refused invitations addressed to himself alone; but from the beginning he
accepted them and consequently after the first few months of marriage his wife
went out but little, and later children came and kept her at home.  Having
earned a respite from care by his marriage, Oscar did little for the next three
years but talk.  Critical observers began to make up their minds that he was a
talker and not a writer.  "He was a power in the art," as de Quincey said of
Coleridge; "and he carried a new art into the power."  Every year this gift grew
with him: every year he talked more and more brilliantly, and he was allowed
now, and indeed expected, to hold the table.

In London there is no such thing as conversation.  Now and then one hears a
caustic or witty phrase, but nothing more.  The tone of good society everywhere
is to be pleasant without being prominent.  In every other European country,
however, able men are encouraged to talk; in England alone they are discouraged.
People in society use a debased jargon or slang, snobbish shibboleths for the
most part, and the majority resent any one man monopolising attention.  But
Oscar Wilde was allowed this privileged position, was encouraged to hold forth
to amuse people, as singers are brought in to sing after dinner.

Though his fame as a witty and delightful talker grew from week to week, even
his marriage did not stifle the undertone of dislike and disgust.  Now
indignantly, now with contempt, men spoke of him as abandoned, a creature of
unnatural viciousness.  There were certain houses in the best set of London
society the doors of which were closed to him.




CHAPTER VI--OSCAR WILDE'S FAITH AND PRACTICE



From 1884 on I met Oscar Wilde continually, now at the theatre, now in some
society drawing room; most often, I think, at Mrs. Jeune's (afterwards Lady St.
Helier).  His appearance was not in his favour; there was something oily and fat
about him that repelled me.  Naturally being British-born and young I tried to
give my repugnance a moral foundation; fleshly indulgence and laziness, I said
to myself, were written all over him.  The snatches of his monologues which I
caught from time to time seemed to me to consist chiefly of epigrams almost
mechanically constructed of proverbs and familiar sayings turned upside down.
Two of Balzac's characters, it will be remembered, practised this form of
humour.  The desire to astonish and dazzle, the love of the uncommon for its own
sake, was so evident that I shrugged my shoulders and avoided him.  One evening,
however, at Mrs. Jeune's, I got to know him better.  At the very door Mrs. Jeune
came up to me:

"Have you ever met Mr. Oscar Wilde?  You ought to know him: he is so
delightfully clever, so brilliant!"

I went with her and was formally introduced to him.  He shook hands in a limp
way I disliked; his hands were flabby, greasy; his skin looked bilious and
dirty.  He wore a great green scarab ring on one finger.  He was over-dressed
rather than well-dressed; his clothes fitted him too tightly; he was too stout.
He had a trick which I noticed even then, which grew on him later, of pulling
his jowl with his right hand as he spoke, and his jowl was already fat and
pouchy.  His appearance filled me with distaste.  I lay stress on this physical
repulsion, because I think most people felt it, and in itself, it is a tribute
to the fascination of the man that he should have overcome the first impression
so completely and so quickly.  I don't remember what we talked about, but I
noticed almost immediately that his grey eyes were finely expressive; in turn
vivacious, laughing, sympathetic; always beautiful.  The carven mouth, too, with
its heavy, chiselled, purple-tinged lips, had a certain attraction and
significance in spite of a black front tooth which shocked one when he laughed.
He was over six feet in height and both broad and thick-set; he looked like a
Roman Emperor of the decadence.

We had a certain interest in each other, an interest of curiosity, for I
remember that he led the way almost at once into the inner drawing room in order
to be free to talk in some seclusion.  After half an hour or so I asked him to
lunch next day at "The Cafe Royal", then the best restaurant in London.

At this time he was a superb talker, more brilliant than any I have ever heard
in England, but nothing like what he became later.  His talk soon made me forget
his repellant physical peculiarities; indeed I soon lost sight of them so
completely that I have wondered since how I could have been so disagreeably
affected by them at first sight.  There was an extraordinary physical vivacity
and geniality in the man, an extraordinary charm in his gaiety, and lightning-
quick intelligence.  His enthusiasms, too, were infectious.  Every mental
question interested him, especially if it had anything to do with art or
literature.  His whole face lit up as he spoke and one saw nothing but his
soulful eyes, heard nothing but his musical tenor voice; he was indeed what the
French call a "charmeur".

In ten minutes I confessed to myself that I liked him, and his talk was
intensely quickening.  He had something unexpected to say on almost every
subject.  His mind was agile and powerful and he took a delight in using it.
He was well-read too, in several languages, especially in French, and his
excellent memory stood him in good stead.  Even when he merely reproduced
what the great writers had said perfectly, he added a new colouring.  And
already his characteristic humour was beginning to illumine every topic with
lambent flashes.

It was at our first lunch, I think, that he told me he had been asked by
Harper's to write a book of one hundred thousand words and offered a large sum
for it--I think some five thousand dollars--in advance.  He wrote to them
gravely that there were not one hundred thousand words in English, so he could
not undertake the work, and laughed merrily like a child at the cheeky reproof.

"I have sent their letters and my reply to the press," he added, and laughed
again, while probing me with inquisitive eyes: how far did I understand the need
of self-advertisement?

About this time an impromptu of his moved the town to laughter.  At some
dinner party it appeared the ladies sat a little too long; Oscar wanted to
smoke.  Suddenly the hostess drew his attention to a lamp the shade of which
was smouldering.

"Please put it out, Mr. Wilde," she said, "it's smoking."

Oscar turned to do as he was told with the remark:

"Happy lamp!"

The delightful impertinence had an extraordinary success.

Early in our friendship I was fain to see that the love of the uncommon, his
paradoxes and epigrams were natural to him, sprang immediately from his taste
and temperament.  Perhaps it would be well to define once for all his attitude
towards life with more scope and particularity than I have hitherto done.

It is often assumed that he had no clear and coherent view of life, no belief,
no faith to guide his vagrant footsteps; but such an opinion does him injustice.
He had his own philosophy, and held to it for long years with astonishing
tenacity.  His attitude towards life can best be seen if he is held up against
Goethe.  He took the artist's view of life which Goethe was the first to state
and indeed in youth had overstated with an astonishing persuasiveness: "the
beautiful is more than the good," said Goethe; "for it includes the good."

It seemed to Oscar, as it had seemed to young Goethe, that "the extraordinary
alone survives"; the extraordinary whether good or bad; he therefore sought
after the extraordinary, and naturally enough often fell into the extravagant.
But how stimulating it was in London, where sordid platitudes drip and drizzle
all day long, to hear someone talking brilliant paradoxes.

Goethe did not linger long in the halfway house of unbelief; the murderer may
win notoriety as easily as the martyr, but his memory will not remain.  "The
fashion of this world passeth away," said Goethe, "I would fain occupy myself
with that which endures."  Midway in life Goethe accepted Kant's moral
imperative and restated his creed: "A man must resolve to live," he said,
"for the Good, and Beautiful, and for the Common Weal."

Oscar did not push his thought so far: the transcendental was not his field.

It was a pity, I sometimes felt, that he had not studied German as thoroughly
as French; Goethe might have done more for him than Baudelaire or Balzac, for
in spite of all his stodgy German faults, Goethe is the best guide through the
mysteries of life whom the modern world has yet produced.  Oscar Wilde stopped
where the religion of Goethe began; he was far more of a pagan and individualist
than the great German; he lived for the beautiful and extraordinary, but not for
the Good and still less for the Whole; he acknowledged no moral obligation; "in
commune bonis" was an ideal which never said anything to him; he cared nothing
for the common weal; he held himself above the mass of the people with an
Englishman's extravagant insularity and aggressive pride.  Politics, social
problems, religion--everything interested him simply as a subject of art; life
itself was merely material for art.  He held the position Goethe had abandoned
in youth.

The view was astounding in England and new everywhere in its onesidedness.
Its passionate exaggeration, however, was quickening, and there is, of course,
something to be said for it.  The artistic view of life is often higher than
the ordinary religious view; at least it does not deal in condemnations and
exclusions; it is more reasonable, more catholic, more finely perceptive.

"The artist's view of life is the only possible one," Oscar used to say,
"and should be applied to everything, most of all to religion and morality.
Cavaliers and Puritans are interesting for their costumes and not for their
convictions. . . .

"There is no general rule of health; it is all personal, individual. . . . .
I only demand that freedom which I willingly concede to others.  No one
condemns another for preferring green to gold.  Why should any taste be
ostracized?  Liking and disliking are not under our control.  I want to
choose the nourishment which suits "my" body and "my" soul."

I can almost hear him say the words with his charming humorous smile and
exquisite flash of deprecation, as if he were half inclined to make fun of
his own statement.

It was not his views on art, however, which recommended him to the aristocratic
set in London; but his contempt for social reform, or rather his utter
indifference to it, and his English love of inequality.  The republicanism he
flaunted in his early verses was not even skin deep; his political beliefs and
prejudices were the prejudices of the English governing class and were all in
favour of individual freedom, or anarchy under the protection of the policeman.

"The poor are poor creatures," was his real belief, "and must always be hewers
of wood and drawers of water.  They are merely the virgin soil out of which men
of genius and artists grow like flowers.  Their function is to give birth to
genius and nourish it.  They have no other "raison d'etre".  Were men as
intelligent as bees, all gifted individuals would be supported by the community,
as the bees support their queen.  We should be the first charge on the state
just as Socrates declared that he should be kept in the Prytaneum at the
public expense.

"Don't talk to me, Frank, about the hardships of the poor.  The hardships of
the poor are necessities, but talk to me of the hardships of men of genius, and
I could weep tears of blood.  I was never so affected by any book in my life as
I was by the misery of Balzac's poet, Lucien de Rubempre."

Naturally this creed of an exaggerated individualism appealed peculiarly to the
best set in London.  It was eminently aristocratic and might almost be defended
as scientific, for to a certain extent it found corroboration in Darwinism.  All
progress according to Darwin comes from peculiar individuals; "sports" as men of
science call them, or the "heaven-sent" as rhetoricians prefer to style them.
The many are only there to produce more "sports" and ultimately to benefit
by them.  All this is valid enough; but it leaves the crux of the question
untouched.  The poor in aristocratic England are too degraded to produce
"sports" of genius, or indeed any "sports" of much value to humanity.  Such
an extravagant inequality of condition obtains there that the noble soul is
miserable, the strongest insecure.  But Wilde's creed was intensely popular
with the "Smart Set" because of its very one-sidedness, and he was hailed as
a prophet partly because he defended the cherished prejudices of the "landed"
oligarchy.

It will be seen from this that Oscar Wilde was in some danger of suffering from
excessive popularity and unmerited renown.  Indeed if he had loved athletic
sports, hunting and shooting instead of art and letters, he might have been the
selected representative of aristocratic England.

In addition to his own popular qualities a strong current was sweeping him to
success.  He was detested by the whole of the middle or shop-keeping class which
in England, according to Matthew Arnold, has "the sense of conduct--and has but
little else."  This class hated and feared him; feared him for his intellectual
freedom and his contempt of conventionality, and hated him because of his light-
hearted self-indulgence, and also because it saw in him none of its own sordid
virtues.  "Punch" is peculiarly the representative of this class and of all
English prejudices, and "Punch" jeered at him now in prose, now in verse,
week after week.  Under the heading, "More Impressions" (by Oscuro Wildgoose)
I find this:

"My little fancy's clogged with gush,
  My little lyre is false in tone,
  And when I lyrically moan,
I hear the impatient critic's 'Tush!'

"But I've 'Impressions.' These are grand!
  Mere dabs of words, mere blobs of tint,
  Displayed on canvas or in print,
Men laud, and think they understand.

"A smudge of brown, a smear of yellow,
  No tale, no subject,--there you are!
  Impressions!--and the strangest far
Is--that the bard's a clever fellow."

A little later these lines appeared:

"My languid lily, my lank limp lily,
  My long, lithe lily-love, men may grin--
Say that I'm soft and supremely silly--
What care I, while you whisper still;
  What care I, while you smile?  Not a pin!
  While you smile, while you whisper--
    'Tis sweet to decay!
  I have watered with chlorodine, tears of chagrin,
  The churchyard mould I have planted thee in,
    Upside down, in an intense way,
  In a rough red flower-pot, "sweeter than sin",
    That I bought for a halfpenny, yesterday!"

The italics are mine; but the suggestion was always implicit; yet this
constant wind of puritanic hatred blowing against him helped instead of
hindering his progress: strong men are made by opposition; like kites they
go up against the wind.




CHAPTER VII--OSCAR'S REPUTATION AND SUPPORTERS



"Believe me, child, all the gentleman's misfortunes arose from his being
educated at a public school. . . . ."--Fielding.

In England success is a plant of slow growth.  The tone of good society, though
responsive to political talent, and openly, eagerly sensitive to money-making
talent, is contemptuous of genius and rates the utmost brilliancy of the talker
hardly higher than the feats of an acrobat.  Men are obstinate, slow, trusting
a bank-balance rather than brains; and giving way reluctantly to sharp-witted
superiority.  The road up to power or influence in England is full of pitfalls
and far too arduous for those who have neither high birth nor wealth to help
them.  The natural inequality of men instead of being mitigated by law or
custom is everywhere strengthened and increased by a thousand effete social
distinctions. Even in the best class where a certain easy familiarity reigns
there is circle above circle, and the summits are isolated by heredity.

The conditions of English society being what they are, it is all but impossible
at first to account for the rapidity of Oscar Wilde's social success; yet if
we tell over his advantages and bring one or two into the account which have
not yet been reckoned, we shall find almost every element that conduces to
popularity. By talent and conviction he was the natural pet of the aristocracy
whose selfish prejudices he defended and whose leisure he amused.  The middle
class, as has been noted, disliked and despised him: but its social influence is
small and its papers, and especially "Punch", made him notorious by attacking
him in and out of season.  The comic weekly, indeed, helped to build up his
reputation by the almost inexplicable bitterness of its invective.

Another potent force was in his favour.  From the beginning he set himself to
play the game of the popular actor, and neglected no opportunity of turning the
limelight on his own doings.  As he said, his admiration of himself was "a
lifelong devotion," and he proclaimed his passion on the housetops.

Our names happened to be mentioned together once in some paper, I think it was
"The Pall Mall Gazette".  He asked me what I was going to reply.

"Nothing," I answered, "why should I bother?  I've done nothing yet that
deserves trumpeting."

"You're making a mistake," he said seriously.  "If you wish for reputation and
fame in this world, and success during your lifetime, you ought to seize every
opportunity of advertising yourself.  You remember the Latin word, 'Fame springs
from one's own house.' Like other wise sayings, it's not quite true; fame comes
from oneself," and he laughed delightedly; "you must go about repeating how
great you are till the dull crowd comes to believe it."

"The prophet must proclaim himself, eh?  and declare his own mission?"

"That's it," he replied with a smile; "that's it.

"Every time my name is mentioned in a paper, I write at once to admit that I am
the Messiah.  Why is Pears' soap successful?  Not because it is better or
cheaper than any other soap, but because it is more strenuously puffed.  The
journalist is my 'John the Baptist.' What would you give, when a book of yours
comes out, to be able to write a long article drawing attention to it in "The
Pall Mall Gazette"?  Here you have the opportunity of making your name known
just as widely; why not avail yourself of it?  I miss no chance," and to do him
justice he used occasion to the utmost.

Curiously enough Bacon had the same insight, and I have often wondered since
whether Oscar's worldly wisdom was original or was borrowed from the great
Elizabethan climber.  Bacon says:

"'Boldly sound your own praises and some of them will stick.' . . . . It will
stick with the more ignorant and the populace, though men of wisdom may smile at
it; and the reputation won with many will amply countervail the disdain of a
few. . . . .  And surely no small number of those who are of solid nature, and
who, from the want of this ventosity, cannot spread all sail in pursuit of their
own honour, suffer some prejudice and lose dignity by their moderation."

Many of Oscar's letters to the papers in these years were amusing, some of them
full of humour.  For example, when he was asked to give a list of the hundred
best books, as Lord Avebury and other mediocrities had done, he wrote saying
that "he could not give a list of the hundred best books, as he had only written
five."

Winged words of his were always passing from mouth to mouth in town.
Some theatre was opened which was found horribly ugly: one spoke of it as
"Early Victorian."

"No, no," replied Oscar, "nothing so distinctive.  'Early Maple,' rather."

Even his impertinences made echoes.  At a great reception, a friend asked him
in passing, how the hostess, Lady S----, could be recognized.  Lady S---- being
short and stout, Oscar replied, smiling:

"Go through this room, my dear fellow, and the next and so on till you come to
someone looking like a public monument, say the effigy of Britannia or Victoria
--that's Lady S----."

Though he used to pretend that all this self-advertisement was premeditated
and planned, I could hardly believe him.  He was eager to write about himself
because of his exaggerated vanity and reflection afterwards found grounds to
justify his inclination.  But whatever the motive may have been the effect
was palpable: his name was continually in men's mouths, and his fame grew by
repetition. As Tiberius said of Mucianus:

""Omnium quae dixerat feceratque, arte quadam ostentator"" (He had a knack of
showing off and advertising whatever he said or did).

But no personal qualities, however eminent, no gifts, no graces of heart or
head or soul could have brought a young man to Oscar Wilde's social position
and popularity in a few years.

Another cause was at work lifting him steadily.  From the time he left Oxford he
was acclaimed and backed by a small minority of passionate admirers whom I have
called his fuglemen.  These admirers formed the constant factor in his progress
from social height to height.  For the most part they were persons usually
called "sexual inverts," who looked to the brilliancy of his intellect to gild
their esoteric indulgence.  This class in England is almost wholly recruited
from the aristocracy and the upper middle-class that apes the "smart set."  It
is an inevitable product of the English boarding school and University system;
indeed one of the most characteristic products.  I shall probably bring upon
myself a host of enemies by this assertion, but it has been weighed and must
stand.  Fielding has already put the same view on record: he says:

"A public school, Joseph, was the cause of all the calamities which he
afterwards suffered.  Public schools are the nurseries of all vice and
immorality. All the wicked fellows whom I remember at the University were
bred at them....."

If boarding-school life with its close intimacies between boys from twelve to
eighteen years of age were understood by English mothers, it is safe to say that
every boarding-house in every school would disappear in a single night, and
Eton, Harrow, Winchester and the rest would be turned into day-schools.

Those who have learned bad habits at school or in the 'Varsity are inclined to
continue the practices in later life.  Naturally enough these men are usually
distinguished by a certain artistic sympathy, and often by most attractive,
intellectual qualities.  As a rule the epicene have soft voices and ingratiating
manners, and are bold enough to make a direct appeal to the heart and emotions;
they are considered the very cream of London society.

These admirers and supporters praised and defended Oscar Wilde from the
beginning with the persistence and courage of men who if they don't hang
together are likely to hang separately.  After his trial and condemnation
"The Daily Telegraph" spoke with contempt of these "decadents" and "aesthetes"
who, it asserted, "could be numbered in London society on the fingers of one
hand"; but even "The Daily Telegraph" must have known that in the "smart set"
alone there are hundreds of these acolytes whose intellectual and artistic
culture gives them an importance out of all proportion to their number.  It was
the passionate support of these men in the first place which made Oscar Wilde
notorious and successful.

This fact may well give pause to the thoughtful reader.  In the middle ages,
when birth and position had a disproportionate power in life, the Catholic
Church supplied a certain democratic corrective to the inequality of social
conditions. It was a sort of "Jacob's Ladder" leading from the lowest strata of
society to the very heavens and offering to ingenuous, youthful talent a career
of infinite hope and unlimited ambition.  This great power of the Roman Church
in the middle-ages may well be compared to the influence exerted by those whom I
have designated as Oscar Wilde's fuglemen in the England of today.  The easiest
way to success in London society is to be notorious in this sense.  Whatever
career one may have chosen, however humble one's birth, one is then certain of
finding distinguished friends and impassioned advocates.  If you happen to be in
the army and unmarried, you are declared to be a strategist like Caesar, or an
organizer like Moltke; if you are an artist, instead of having your faults
proclaimed and your failings scourged, your qualifications are eulogised and
you find yourself compared to Michel Angelo or Titian! I would not willingly
exaggerate here; but I could easily give dozens of instances to prove that
sexual perversion is a "Jacob's Ladder" to most forms of success in our time
in London.

It seems a curious effect of the great compensatory balance of things that a
masculine rude people like the English, who love nothing so much as adventures
and warlike achievements, should allow themselves to be steered in ordinary
times by epicene aesthetes.  But no one who knows the facts will deny that these
men are prodigiously influential in London in all artistic and literary matters,
and it was their constant passionate support which lifted Oscar Wilde so quickly
to eminence.

From the beginning they fought for him.  He was regarded as a leader among
them when still at Oxford.  Yet his early writings show no trace of such a
prepossession; they are wholly void of offence, without even a suggestion of
coarseness, as pure indeed as his talk.  Nevertheless, as soon as his name came
up among men in town, the accusation of abnormal viciousness was either made or
hinted.  Everyone spoke as if there were no doubt about his tastes, and this in
spite of the habitual reticence of Englishmen.  I could not understand how the
imputation came to be so bold and universal; how so shameful a calumny, as I
regarded it, was so firmly established in men's minds.  Again and again I
protested against the injustice, demanded proofs; but was met only by shrugs
and pitying glances as if my prejudice must indeed be invincible if I needed
evidence of the obvious.

I have since been assured, on what should be excellent authority, that the evil
reputation which attached to Oscar Wilde in those early years in London was
completely undeserved.  I, too, must say that in the first period of our
friendship, I never noticed anything that could give colour even to suspicion
of him; but the belief in his abnormal tastes was widespread and dated from his
life in Oxford.

From about 1886-7 on, however, there was a notable change in Oscar Wilde's
manners and mode of life.  He had been married a couple of years, two children
had been born to him; yet instead of settling down he appeared suddenly to have
become wilder.  In 1887 he accepted the editorship of a lady's paper, "The
Woman's World", and was always mocking at the selection of himself as the
"fittest" for such a post: he had grown noticeably bolder.  I told myself that
an assured income and position give confidence; but at bottom a doubt began to
form in me.  It can't be denied that from 1887-8 on, incidents occurred from
time to time which kept the suspicion of him alive, and indeed pointed and
strengthened it.  I shall have to deal now with some of the more important of
these occurrences.




CHAPTER VIII--OSCAR'S GROWTH TO ORIGINALITY ABOUT 1890



The period of growth of any organism is the most interesting and most
instructive.  And there is no moment of growth in the individual life which
can be compared in importance with the moment when a man begins to outtop his
age, and to suggest the future evolution of humanity by his own genius.  Usually
this final stage is passed in solitude:

"Es bildet ein Talent sich in der Stille,
  Sich ein Charakter in dem Strome der Welt."

After writing a life of Schiller which almost anyone might have written, Carlyle
retired for some years to Craigenputtoch, and then brought forth "Sartor
Resartus", which was personal and soul-revealing to the verge of eccentricity.
In the same way Wagner was a mere continuator of Weber in "Lohengrin" and
"Tannhaeuser", and first came to his own in the "Meistersinger" and "Tristan",
after years of meditation in Switzerland.

This period for Oscar Wilde began with his marriage; the freedom from sordid
anxieties allowed him to lift up his head and be himself.  Kepler, I think, it
is who praises poverty as the foster-mother of genius; but Bernard Palissy was
nearer the truth when he said:--"Pauvrete empeche bons esprits de parvenir"
(poverty hinders fine minds from succeeding).  There is no such mortal enemy of
genius as poverty except riches: a touch of the spur from time to time does
good; but a constant rowelling disables.  As editor of "The Woman's World "Oscar
had some money of his own to spend.  Though his salary was only some six pounds
a week, it made him independent, and his editorial work gave him an excuse for
not exhausting himself by writing.  For some years after marriage; in fact, till
he lost his editorship, he wrote little and talked a great deal.

During this period we were often together.  He lunched with me once or twice a
week and I began to know his method of work.  Everything came to him in the
excitement of talk, epigrams, paradoxes and stories; and when people of great
position or title were about him he generally managed to surpass himself: all
social distinctions appealed to him intensely.  I chaffed him about this one day
and he admitted the snobbishness gaily.

"I love even historic names, Frank, as Shakespeare did.  Surely everyone prefers
Norfolk, Hamilton and Buckingham to Jones or Smith or Robinson."

As soon as he lost his editorship he took to writing for the reviews; his
articles were merely the "resume" of his monologues.  After talking for months
at this and that lunch and dinner he had amassed a store of epigrams and
humorous paradoxes which he could embody in a paper for "The Fortnightly Review"
or "The Nineteenth Century".

These papers made it manifest that Wilde had at length, as Heine phrased it,
reached the topmost height of the culture of his time and was now able to say
new and interesting things.  His "Lehrjahre" or student-time may be said to have
ended with his editorship.  The articles which he wrote on "The Decay of Lying,"
"The Critic as Artist," and "Pen, Pencil and Poison"; in fact, all the papers
which in 1891 were gathered together and published in book form under the title
of "Intentions," had about them the stamp of originality.  They achieved a
noteworthy success with the best minds, and laid the foundation of his fame.
Every paper contained, here and there, a happy phrase, or epigram, or flirt of
humour, which made it memorable to the lover of letters.

They were all, however, conceived and written from the standpoint of the artist,
and the artist alone, who never takes account of ethics, but uses right and
wrong indifferently as colours of his palette.  "The Decay of Lying" seemed to
the ordinary, matter-of-fact Englishman a cynical plea in defence of mendacity.
To the majority of readers, "Pen, Pencil and Poison" was hardly more than a
shameful attempt to condone cold-blooded murder.  The very articles which
grounded his fame as a writer, helped to injure his standing and repute.

In 1889 he published a paper which did him even more damage by appearing to
justify the peculiar rumours about his private life.  He held the opinion,
which was universal at that time, that Shakespeare had been abnormally vicious.
He believed with the majority of critics that Lord William Herbert was addressed
in the first series of Sonnets; but his fine sensibility or, if you will, his
peculiar temperament, led him to question whether Thorpe's dedication to
"Mr. W. H." could have been addressed to Lord William Herbert.  He preferred
the old hypothesis that the dedication was addressed to a young actor named
Mr. William Hughes, a supposition which is supported by a well-known sonnet.
He set forth this idea with much circumstance and considerable ingenuity in an
article which he sent to me for publication in "The Fortnightly Review".  The
theme was scabrous; but his treatment of it was scrupulously reserved and adroit
and I saw no offence in the paper, and to tell the truth, no great ability in
his handling of the subject. (confer Appendix: "Criticisms by Robert Ross.")

He had talked over the article with me while he was writing it, and I told him
that I thought the whole theory completely mistaken.  Shakespeare was as sensual
as one could well be; but there was no evidence of abnormal vice; indeed, all
the evidence seemed to me to be against this universal belief.  The assumption
that the dedication was addressed to Lord William Herbert I had found it
difficult to accept, at first; the wording of it is not only ambiguous but
familiar.  If I assumed that "Mr. W. H." was meant for Lord William Herbert,
it was only because that seemed the easiest way out of the maze.  In fine, I
pointed out to Oscar that his theory had very little that was new in it, and
more that was untrue, and advised him not to publish the paper.  My conviction
that Shakespeare was not abnormally vicious, and that the first series of
Sonnets proved snobbishness and toadying and not corrupt passion, seemed to
Oscar the very madness of partisanship.

He smiled away my arguments, and sent his paper to the "Fortnightly" office when
I happened to be abroad.  Much to my chagrin, my assistant rejected it rudely,
whereupon Oscar sent it to Blackwoods, who published it in their magazine.  It
set everyone talking and arguing.  To judge by the discussion it created, the
wind of hatred and of praise it caused, one would have thought that the paper
was a masterpiece, though in truth it was nothing out of the common.  Had it
been written by anybody else it would have passed unnoticed.  But already Oscar
Wilde had a prodigious notoriety, and all his sayings and doings were eagerly
canvassed from one end of society to the other.

"The Portrait of Mr. W. H." did Oscar incalculable injury.  It gave his enemies
for the first time the very weapon they wanted, and they used it unscrupulously
and untiringly with the fierce delight of hatred.  Oscar seemed to revel in
the storm of conflicting opinions which the paper called forth.  He understood
better than most men that notoriety is often the forerunner of fame and is
always commercially more valuable.  He rubbed his hands with delight as the
discussion grew bitter, and enjoyed even the sneering of the envious.  A wind
that blows out a little fire, he knew, plays bellows to a big one.  So long as
people talked about him, he didn't much care what they said, and they certainly
talked interminably about everything he wrote.

The inordinate popular success increased his self-confidence, and with time his
assurance took on a touch of defiance.  The first startling sign of this
gradual change was the publication in "Lippincott's Magazine" of "The Picture
of Dorian Gray."  It was attacked immediately in "The Daily Chronicle", a
liberal paper usually distinguished for a certain leaning in favour of artists
and men of letters, as a "tale spawned from the leprous literature of the French
"decadents"--a poisonous book, the atmosphere of which is heavy with the
mephitic odours of moral and spiritual putrefaction."

Oscar as a matter of course replied and the tone of his reply is characteristic
of his growth in self-assurance: he no longer dreads the imputation of
viciousness; he challenges it: "It is poisonous, if you like; but you cannot
deny that it is also perfect, and perfection is what we artists aim at."

When Oscar republished "The Picture of Dorian Gray" in book form in April, 1891,
he sent me a large paper copy and with the copy he wrote a little note, asking
me to tell him what I thought of the book.  I got the volume and note early one
morning and read the book until noon.  I then sent him a note by hand: "Other
men," I wrote, "have given us wine; some claret, some burgundy, some Moselle;
you are the first to give us pure champagne.  Much of this book is wittier even
than Congreve and on an equal intellectual level: at length, it seems to me, you
have justified yourself."

Half an hour later I was told that Oscar Wilde had called.  I went down
immediately to see him.  He was bubbling over with content.

"How charming of you, Frank," he cried, "to have written me such a divine
letter."

"I have only read a hundred pages of the book," I said; "but they are
delightful: no one now can deny you a place among the wittiest and most
humorous writers in English."

"How wonderful of you, Frank; what do you like so much?"

Like all artists, he loved praise and I was enthusiastic, happy to have the
opportunity of making up for some earlier doubting that now seemed unworthy:

"Whatever the envious may say, you're with Burke and Sheridan, among the very
ablest Irishmen . . . .

"Of course I have heard most of the epigrams from you before, but you have put
them even better in this book."

"Do you think so, really?" he asked, smiling with pleasure.

It is worth notice that some of the epigrams in "Dorian Gray" were bettered
again before they appeared in his first play.  For example, in "Dorian Gray"
Lord Henry Wotton, who is peculiarly Oscar's mouthpiece, while telling how he
had to bargain for a piece of old brocade in Wardour Street, adds, "nowadays
people know the price of everything and the value of nothing."  In "Lady
Windermere's Fan" the same epigram is perfected, "The cynic is one who knows
the price of everything and the value of nothing."

Nearly all the literary productions of our time suffer from haste: one must
produce a good deal, especially while one's reputation is in the making, in
order to live by one's pen.  Yet great works take time to form, and fine
creations are often disfigured by the stains of hurried parturition.  Oscar
Wilde contrived to minimise this disability by talking his works before writing
them.

The conversation of Lord Henry Wotton with his uncle, and again at lunch when
he wishes to fascinate Dorian Gray, is an excellent reproduction of Oscar's
ordinary talk.  The uncle wonders why Lord Dartmoor wants to marry an American
and grumbles about her people: "Has she got any?"

Lord Henry shook his head.  "American girls are as clever at concealing their
parents as English women are at concealing their past," he said, rising to go.

"They are pork-packers, I suppose?"

"I hope so, Uncle George, for Dartmoor's sake.  I am told that pork-packing is
the most lucrative profession in America, after politics."

All this seems to me delightful humour.

The latter part of the book, however, tails off into insignificance.  The first
hundred pages held the result of months and months of Oscar's talk, the latter
half was written offhand to complete the story.  "Dorian Gray" was the first
piece of work which proved that Oscar Wilde had at length found his true vein.

A little study of it discovers both his strength and his weakness as a writer.
The initial idea of the book is excellent, finer because deeper than the
commonplace idea that is the foundation of Balzac's "Peau de Chagrin," though
it would probably never have been written if Balzac had not written his
book first; but Balzac's sincerity and earnestness grapple with the theme and
wring a blessing out of it, whereas the subtler idea in Oscar's hands dwindles
gradually away till one wonders if the book would not have been more effective
as a short story.  Oscar did not know life well enough or care enough for
character to write a profound psychological study: he was at his best in a
short story or play.

One day about this time Oscar first showed me the aphorisms he had written as an
introduction to "Dorian Gray."  Several of them I thought excellent; but I found
that Oscar had often repeated himself.  I cut these repetitions out and tried to
show him how much better the dozen best were than eighteen of which six were
inferior.  I added that I should like to publish the best in "The Fortnightly."
He thanked me and said it was very kind of me.

Next morning I got a letter from him telling me that he had read over my
corrections and thought that the aphorisms I had rejected were the best, but
he hoped I'd publish them as he had written them.

Naturally I replied that the final judgment must rest with him and I published
them at once.

The delight I felt in his undoubted genius and success was not shared by others.
Friends took occasion to tell me that I should not go about with Oscar Wilde.

"Why not?" I asked.

"He has a bad name," was the reply.  "Strange things are said about him.  He
came down from Oxford with a vile reputation.  You have only got to look at
the man."

"Whatever the disease may be," I replied, "it's not catching--unfortunately."

The pleasure men take in denigration of the gifted is one of the puzzles of life
to those who are not envious.

Men of letters, even people who ought to have known better, were slow to admit
his extraordinary talent; he had risen so quickly, had been puffed into such
prominence that they felt inclined to deny him even the gifts which he
undoubtedly possessed.  I was surprised once to find a friend of mine taking
this attitude: Francis Adams, the poet and writer, chaffed me one day about my
liking for Oscar.

"What on earth can you see in him to admire?" he asked.  "He is not a great
writer, he is not even a good writer; his books have no genius in them; his
poetry is tenth rate, and his prose is not much better.  His talk even is
fictitious and extravagant."

I could only laugh at him and advise him to read "The Picture of Dorian Gray."

This book, however, gave Oscar's puritanic enemies a better weapon against him
than even "The Portrait of Mr. W. H."  The subject, they declared, was the same
as that of "Mr. W. H.," and the treatment was simply loathsome.  More than one
middle-class paper, such as "To-Day" in the hands of Mr. Jerome K. Jerome,
condemned the book as "corrupt," and advised its suppression.  Freedom of speech
in England is more feared than licence of action: a speck on the outside of the
platter disgusts your puritan, and the inside is never peeped at, much less
discussed.

Walter Pater praised "Dorian Gray" in the "Bookman"; but thereby only did
himself damage without helping his friend.  Oscar meanwhile went about boldly,
meeting criticism now with smiling contempt.

One incident from this time will show how unfairly he was being judged and how
imprudent he was to front defamation with defiance.

One day I met a handsome youth in his company named John Gray, and I could not
wonder that Oscar found him interesting, for Gray had not only great personal
distinction, but charming manners and a marked poetic gift, a much greater gift
than Oscar possessed.  He had besides an eager, curious mind, and of course
found extraordinary stimulus in Oscar's talk.  It seemed to me that intellectual
sympathy and the natural admiration which a younger man feels for a brilliant
senior formed the obvious bond between them.  But no sooner did Oscar republish
"Dorian Gray" than ill-informed and worse-minded persons went about saying that
the eponymous hero of the book was John Gray, though "Dorian Gray" was written
before Oscar had met or heard of John Gray.  One cannot help admitting that this
was partly Oscar's own fault.  In talk he often alluded laughingly to John Gray
as his hero, "Dorian."  It is just an instance of the challenging contempt which
he began to use about this time in answer to the inventions of hatred.

Late in this year, 1891, he published four stories completely void of offence,
calling the collection "A House of Pomegranates."  He dedicated each of the
tales to a lady of distinction and the book made many friends; but it was
handled contemptuously in the press and had no sale.

By this time people expected a certain sort of book from Oscar Wilde and wanted
nothing else.  They hadn't to wait long.  Early in 1892 we heard that Oscar had
written a drama in French called "Salome", and at once it was put about that
Sarah Bernhardt was going to produce it in London.  Then came dramatic surprise
on surprise: while it was being rehearsed, the Lord Chamberlain refused to
license it on the ground that it introduced Biblical characters.  Oscar
protested in a brilliant interview against the action of the Censor as "odious
and ridiculous."  He pointed out that all the greatest artists--painters and
sculptors, musicians and writers--had taken many of their best subjects from the
Bible, and wanted to know why the dramatist should be prevented from treating
the great soul-tragedies most proper to his art.  When informed that the
interdict was to stand, he declared in a pet that he would settle in France and
take out letters of naturalisation:

"I am not English.  I am Irish--which is quite another thing."  Of course the
press made all the fun it could of his show of temper.

Mr. Robert Ross considers "Salome" "the most powerful and perfect of all Oscar's
dramas."  I find it almost impossible to explain, much less justify, its
astonishing popularity.  When it appeared, the press, both in France and in
England, was critical and contemptuous; but by this time Oscar had so captured
the public that he could afford to disdain critics and calumny.  The play was
praised by his admirers as if it had been a masterpiece, and London discussed it
the more because it was in French and not clapper-clawed by the vulgar.

The indescribable cold lewdness and cruelty of "Salome" quickened the prejudice
and strengthened the dislike of the ordinary English reader for its author.  And
when the drama was translated into English and published with the drawings of
Aubrey Beardsley, it was disparaged and condemned by all the leaders of literary
opinion.  The colossal popularity of the play, which Mr. Robert Ross proves so
triumphantly, came from Germany and Russia and is to be attributed in part to
the contempt educated Germans and Russians feel for the hypocritical vagaries of
English prudery.  The illustrations of Aubrey Beardsley, too, it must be
admitted, were an additional offence to the ordinary English reader, for they
intensified the peculiar atmosphere of the drama.

Oscar used to say that he invented Aubrey Beardsley; but the truth is, it was
Mr. Robert Ross who first introduced Aubrey to Oscar and persuaded him to
commission the "Salome" drawings which gave the English edition its singular
value.  Strange to say, Oscar always hated the illustrations and would not have
the book in his house.  His dislike even extended to the artist, and as Aubrey
Beardsley was of easy and agreeable intercourse, the mutual repulsion deserves a
word of explanation.

Aubrey Beardsley's genius had taken London by storm.  At seventeen or eighteen
this auburn-haired, blue-eyed, fragile looking youth had reached maturity with
his astounding talent, a talent which would have given him position and wealth
in any other country.  In perfection of line his drawings were superior to
anything we possess.  But the curious thing about the boy was that he expressed
the passions of pride and lust and cruelty more intensely even than Rops, [sic]
more spontaneously than anyone who ever held pencil.  Beardsley's precocity was
simply marvellous.  He seemed to have an intuitive understanding not only of his
own art but of every art and craft, and it was some time before one realised
that he attained this miraculous virtuosity by an absolute disdain for every
other  form of human endeavour.  He knew nothing of the great general or
millionaire or man of science, and he cared as little for them as for fishermen
or 'bus-drivers.  The current of his talent ran narrow between stone banks, so
to speak; it was the bold assertion of it that interested Oscar.

One phase of Beardsley's extraordinary development may be recorded here.  When I
first met him his letters, and even his talk sometimes, were curiously youthful
and immature, lacking altogether the personal note of his drawings.  As soon as
this was noticed he took the bull by the horns and pretended that his style in
writing was out of date; he wished us to believe that he hesitated to shock
us with his "archaic sympathies."  Of course we laughed and challenged him to
reveal himself.  Shortly afterwards I got an article from him written with
curious felicity of phrase, in modish polite eighteenth-century English.  He had
reached personal expression in a new medium in a month or so, and apparently
without effort.  It was Beardsley's writing that first won Oscar to recognition
of his talent, and for a while he seemed vaguely interested in what he called
his "orchid-like personality."

They were both at lunch one day when Oscar declared that he could drink nothing
but absinthe when Beardsley was present.

"Absinthe," he said, "is to all other drinks what Aubrey's drawings are to
other pictures: it stands alone: it is like nothing else: it shimmers like
southern twilight in opalescent colouring: it has about it the seduction of
strange sins.  It is stronger than any other spirit, and brings out the sub-
conscious self in man.  It is just like your drawings, Aubrey; it gets on one's
nerves and is cruel.

"Baudelaire called his poems "Fleurs du Mal," I shall call your drawings "Fleurs
du Peche"--flowers of sin.

"When I have before me one of your drawings I want to drink absinthe, which
changes colour like jade in sunlight and takes the senses thrall, and then I can
live myself back in imperial Rome, in the Rome of the later Caesars."

"Don't forget the simple pleasures of that life, Oscar," said Aubrey; "Nero set
Christians on fire, like large tallow candles; the only light Christians have
ever been known to give," he added in a languid, gentle voice.

This talk gave me the key.  In personal intercourse Oscar Wilde was more English
than the English: he seldom expressed his opinion of person or prejudice boldly;
he preferred to hint dislike and disapproval.  His insistence on the naked
expression of lust and cruelty in Beardsley's drawings showed me that direct
frankness displeased him; for he could hardly object to the qualities which were
making his own "Salome" world-famous.

The complete history of the relations between Oscar Wilde and Beardsley, and
their mutual dislike, merely proves how difficult it is for original artists to
appreciate one another: like mountain peaks they stand alone.  Oscar showed a
touch of patronage, the superiority of the senior, in his intercourse with
Beardsley, and often praised him ineptly, whereas Beardsley to the last spoke
of Oscar as a showman, and hoped drily that he knew more about literature than
he did about art.  For a moment, they worked in concert, and it is important
to remember that it was Beardsley who influenced Oscar, and not Oscar who
influenced Beardsley.  Beardsley's contempt of critics and the public, his
artistic boldness and self-assertion, had a certain hardening influence on
Oscar: as things turned out a most unfortunate influence.

In spite of Mr. Robert Ross's opinion I regard "Salome," as a student work, an
outcome of Oscar's admiration for Flaubert and his "Herodias," on the one hand,
and "Les Sept Princesses," of Maeterlinck on the other.  He has borrowed the
colour and Oriental cruelty with the banquet-scene from the Frenchman, and from
the Fleming the simplicity of language and the haunting effect produced by
the repetition of significant phrases.  Yet "Salome" is original through the
mingling of lust and hatred in the heroine, and by making this extraordinary
virgin the chief and centre of the drama Oscar has heightened the interest of
the story and bettered Flaubert's design.  I feel sure he copied Maeterlinck's
simplicity of style because it served to disguise his imperfect knowledge of
French and yet this very artlessness adds to the weird effect of the drama.

The lust that inspires the tragedy was characteristic, but the cruelty was
foreign to Oscar; both qualities would have injured him in England, had it
not been for two things.  First of all only a few of the best class of English
people know French at all well, and for the most part they disdain the sex-
morality of their race; while the vast mass of the English public regard French
as in itself an immoral medium and is inclined to treat anything in that tongue
with contemptuous indifference.  One can only say that "Salome" confirmed
Oscar's growing reputation for abnormal viciousness.

It was in 1892 that some of Oscar's friends struck me for the first time as
questionable, to say the best of them.  I remember giving a little dinner to
some men in rooms I had in Jermyn Street.  I invited Oscar, and he brought a
young friend with him.  After dinner I noticed that the youth was angry with
Oscar and would scarcely speak to him, and that Oscar was making up to him.
I heard snatches of pleading from Oscar--"I beg of you . . . . It is not true
. . . . You have no cause" . . . . All the while Oscar was standing apart from
the rest of us with an arm on the young man's shoulder; but his coaxing was in
vain, the youth turned away with petulant, sullen ill-temper.  This is a mere
snap-shot which remained in my memory, and made me ask myself afterwards how I
could have been so slow of understanding.

Looking back and taking everything into consideration--his social success, the
glare of publicity in which he lived, the buzz of talk and discussion that arose
about everything he did and said, the increasing interest and value of his work
and, above all, the ever-growing boldness of his writing and the challenge of
his conduct--it is not surprising that the black cloud of hate and slander which
attended him persistently became more and more threatening.




CHAPTER IX--THE SUMMER OF SUCCESS: OSCAR'S FIRST PLAY



No season, it is said, is so beautiful as the brief northern summer.  Three-
fourths of the year is cold and dark, and the ice-bound landscape is swept by
snowstorm and blizzard.  Summer comes like a goddess; in a twinkling the snow
vanishes and Nature puts on her robes of tenderest green; the birds arrive in
flocks; flowers spring to life on all sides, and the sun shines by night as by
day.  Such a summertide, so beautiful and so brief, was accorded to Oscar Wilde
before the final desolation.

I want to give a picture of him at the topmost height of happy hours, which will
afford some proof of his magical talent of speech besides my own appreciation of
it, and, fortunately, the incident has been given to me.  Mr. Ernest Beckett,
now Lord Grimthorpe, a lover of all superiorities, who has known the ablest
men of the time, takes pleasure in telling a story which shows Oscar Wilde's
influence over men who were anything but literary in their tastes.  Mr. Beckett
had a party of Yorkshire squires, chiefly fox-hunters and lovers of an outdoor
life, at Kirkstall Grange when he heard that Oscar Wilde was in the neighbouring
town of Leeds.  Immediately he asked him to lunch at the Grange, chuckling to
himself beforehand at the sensational novelty of the experiment.  Next day
"Mr. Oscar Wilde" was announced and as he came into the room the sportsmen
forthwith began hiding themselves behind newspapers or moving together in groups
in order to avoid seeing or being introduced to the notorious writer.  Oscar
shook hands with his host as if he had noticed nothing, and began to talk.

"In five minutes," Grimthorpe declares, "all the papers were put down and
everyone had gathered round him to listen and laugh."

At the end of the meal one Yorkshireman after the other begged the host to
follow the lunch with a dinner and invite them to meet the wonder again.  When
the party broke up in the small hours they all went away delighted with Oscar,
vowing that no man ever talked more brilliantly.  Grimthorpe cannot remember a
single word Oscar said: "It was all delightful," he declares, "a play of genial
humour over every topic that came up, like sunshine dancing on waves."

The extraordinary thing about Oscar's talent was that he did not monopolise the
conversation: he took the ball of talk wherever it happened to be at the moment
and played with it so humorously that everyone was soon smiling delightedly.
The famous talkers of the past, Coleridge, Macaulay, Carlyle and the others,
were all lecturers: talk to them was a discourse on a favourite theme, and in
ordinary life they were generally regarded as bores.  But at his best Oscar
Wilde never dropped the tone of good society: he could afford to give place to
others; he was equipped at all points: no subject came amiss to him: he saw
everything from a humorous angle, and dazzled one now with word-wit, now with
the very stuff of merriment.

Though he was the life and soul of every social gathering, and in constant
demand, he still read omnivorously, and his mind naturally occupied itself
with high themes.

For some years, the story of Jesus fascinated him and tinged all his thought.
We were talking about Renan's "Life" one day: a wonderful book he called it, one
of the three great biographies of the world, Plato's dialogues with Socrates as
hero and Boswell's "Life of Johnson" being the other two.  It was strange, he
thought, that the greatest man had written the worst biography; Plato made of
Socrates a mere phonograph, into which he talked his own theories: Renan did
better work, and Boswell, the humble loving friend, the least talented of the
three, did better still, though being English, he had to keep to the surface of
things and leave the depths to be divined.  Oscar evidently expected Plato and
Renan to have surpassed comparison.

It seemed to me, however, that the illiterate Galilean fishermen had proved
themselves still more consummate painters than Boswell, though they, too, left a
great deal too much to the imagination.  Love is the best of artists; the puddle
of rain in the road can reflect a piece of sky marvellously.

The Gospel story had a personal interest for Oscar; he was always weaving little
fables about himself as the Master.

In spite of my ignorance of Hebrew the story of Jesus had always had the
strongest attraction for me, and so we often talked about Him, though from
opposite poles.

Renan I felt had missed Jesus at his highest.  He was far below the sincerity,
the tenderness and sweet-thoughted wisdom of that divine spirit.  Frenchman-
like, he stumbled over the miracles and came to grief.  Claus Sluter's head of
Jesus in the museum of Dijon is a finer portrait, and so is the imaginative
picture of Fra Angelico.  It seemed to me possible to do a sketch from the
Gospels themselves which should show the growth of the soul of Jesus and so
impose itself as a true portrait.

Oscar's interest in the theme was different; he put himself frankly in the
place of his model, and appeared to enjoy the jarring antinomy which resulted.
One or two of his stories were surprising in ironical suggestion; surprising
too because they showed his convinced paganism.  Here is one which reveals his
exact position:

"When Joseph of Arimathea came down in the evening from Mount Calvary where
Jesus had died he saw on a white stone a young man seated weeping.  And Joseph
went near him and said, 'I understand how great thy grief must be, for certainly
that Man was a just Man.' But the young man made answer, 'Oh, it is not for that
I am weeping.  I am weeping because I too have wrought miracles.  I also have
given sight to the blind, I have healed the palsied and I have raised the dead;
I too have caused the barren fig tree to wither away and I have turned water
into wine . . . and yet they have not crucified me.'"

At the time this apologue amused me; in the light of later events it assumed a
tragic significance.  Oscar Wilde ought to have known that in this world every
real superiority is pursued with hatred, and every worker of miracles is sure
to be persecuted.  But he had no inkling that the Gospel story is symbolic--the
life-story of genius for all time, eternally true.  He never looked outside
himself, and as the fruits of success were now sweet in his mouth, a pursuing
Fate seemed to him the most mythical of myths.  His child-like self-confidence
was pathetic.  The laws that govern human affairs had little interest for the
man who was always a law unto himself.  Yet by some extraordinary prescience,
some inexplicable presentiment, the approaching catastrophe cast its shadow
over his mind and he felt vaguely that the life-journey of genius would be
incomplete and farcical without the final tragedy: whoever lives for the highest
must be crucified.

It seems memorable to me that in this brief summer of his life, Oscar Wilde
should have concerned himself especially with the life-story of the Man of
Sorrows who had sounded all the depths of suffering.  Just when he himself was
about to enter the Dark Valley, Jesus was often in his thoughts and he always
spoke of Him with admiration.  But after all how could he help it?  Even Dekker
saw as far as that:

  "The best of men
That e'er wore earth about Him."

This was the deeper strain in Oscar Wilde's nature though he was always
disinclined to show it.  Habitually he lived in humorous talk, in the epithets
and epigrams he struck out in the desire to please and astonish his hearers.

One evening I learned almost by chance that he was about to try a new experiment
and break into a new field.

He took up the word "lose" at the table, I remember.

"We lose our chances," he said, laughing, "we lose our figures, we even lose
our characters; but we must never lose our temper.  That is our duty to our
neighbour, Frank; but sometimes we mislay it, don't we?"

"Is that going in a book, Oscar?" I asked, smiling, "or in an article?  You have
written nothing lately."

"I have a play in my mind," he replied gravely.  "To-morrow I am going to
shut myself up in my room, and stay there until it is written.  George Alexander
has been bothering me to write a play for some time and I've got an idea
I rather like.  I wonder can I do it in a week, or will it take three?  It
ought not to take long to beat the Pineros and the Joneses."  It always annoyed
Oscar when any other name but his came into men's mouths: his vanity was
extraordinarily alert.

Naturally enough he minimised Mr. Alexander's initiative.  The well-known actor
had "bothered" Oscar by advancing him L100 before the scenario was even
outlined.  A couple of months later he told me that Alexander had accepted
his comedy, and was going to produce "Lady Windermere's Fan."  I thought the
title excellent.

"Territorial names," Oscar explained, gravely, "have always a "cachet" of
distinction: they fall on the ear full toned with secular dignity.  That's how
I get all the names of my personages, Frank.  I take up a map of the English
counties, and there they are.  Our English villages have often exquisitely
beautiful names.  Windermere, for instance, or Hunstanton," and he rolled the
syllables over his tongue with a soft sensual pleasure.

I had a box the first night and, thinking it might do Oscar some good, I took
with me Arthur Walter of "The Times".  The first scene of the first act was as
old as the hills, but the treatment gave charm to it if not freshness.  The
delightful, unexpected humour set off the commonplace incident; but it was only
the convention that Arthur Walter would see.  The play was poor, he thought,
which brought me to wonder.

After the first act I went downstairs to the "foyer" and found the critics in
much the same mind.  There was an enormous gentleman called Joseph Knight, who
cried out:

"The humour is mechanical, unreal."  Seeing that I did not respond he challenged
me:

"What do you think of it?"

"That is for you critics to answer," I replied.

"I might say," he laughed, "in Oscar's own peculiar way, 'Little promise and
less performance.' Ha! ha! ha!"

"That's the exact opposite to Oscar's way," I retorted.  "It is the listeners
who laugh at his humour."

"Come now, really," cried Knight, "you cannot think much of the play?"

For the first time in my life I began to realise that nine critics out of ten
are incapable of judging original work.  They seem to live in a sort of fog,
waiting for someone to give them the lead, and accordingly they love to discuss
every new play right and left.

"I have not seen the whole play," I answered.  "I was not at any of the
rehearsals; but so far it is surely the best comedy in English, the most
brilliant: isn't it?"

The big man started back and stared at me; then burst out laughing.

"That's good," he cried with a loud unmirthful guffaw.  "'Lady Windermere's Fan'
better than any comedy of Shakespeare! Ha! ha! ha! 'more brilliant!' ho! ho!"

"Yes," I persisted, angered by his disdain, "wittier, and more humorous than 'As
You Like It,' or 'Much Ado.' Strange to say, too, it is on a higher intellectual
level.  I can only compare it to the best of Congreve, and I think it's better."
With a grunt of disapproval or rage the great man of the daily press turned away
to exchange bleatings with one of his "confreres".

The audience was a picked audience of the best heads in London, far superior in
brains therefore to the average journalist, and their judgment was that it was a
most brilliant and interesting play.  Though the humour was often prepared, the
construction showed a rare mastery of stage-effect.  Oscar Wilde had at length
come into his kingdom.

At the end the author was called for, and Oscar appeared before the curtain.
The house rose at him and cheered and cheered again.  He was smiling, with a
cigarette between his fingers, wholly master of himself and his audience.

"I am so glad, ladies and gentlemen, that you like my play. (confer Appendix:
"Criticisms by Robert Ross.")  I feel sure you estimate the merits of it almost
as highly as I do myself."

The house rocked with laughter.  The play and its humour were a seven days'
wonder in London.  People talked of nothing but "Lady Windermere's Fan."
The witty words in it ran from lip to lip like a tidbit of scandal.  Some
clever Jewesses and, strange to say, one Scotchman were the loudest in applause.
Mr. Archer, the well-known critic of "The World", was the first and only
journalist to perceive that the play was a classic by virtue of "genuine
dramatic qualities."  Mrs. Leverson turned the humorous sayings into current
social coin in "Punch", of all places in the world, and from a favourite Oscar
Wilde rapidly became the idol of smart London.

The play was an intellectual triumph.  This time Oscar had not only won success
but had won also the suffrages of the best.  Nearly all the journalist-critics
were against him and made themselves ridiculous by their brainless strictures;
"Truth" and "The Times", for example, were poisonously puritanic, but thinking
people came over to his side in a body.  The halo of fame was about him, and the
incense of it in his nostrils made him more charming, more irresponsibly gay,
more genial-witty than ever.  He was as one set upon a pinnacle with the
sunshine playing about him, lighting up his radiant eyes.  All the while,
however, the foul mists from the underworld were wreathing about him, climbing
higher and higher.




CHAPTER X--THE FIRST MEETING WITH LORD ALFRED DOUGLAS



Thou hast led me like an heathen sacrifice, With music and with fatal pomp of
flowers, To my eternal ruin.--Webster's "The White Devil".

"Lady Windermere's Fan" was a success in every sense of the word, and during
its run London was at Oscar's feet.  There were always a few doors closed to
him; but he could afford now to treat his critics with laughter, call them
fogies and old-fashioned and explain that they had not a decalogue but a
millelogue of sins forbidden and persons tabooed because it was easier to
condemn than to understand.

I remember a lunch once when he talked most brilliantly and finished up by
telling the story now published in his works as "A Florentine Tragedy."  He
told it superbly, making it appear far more effective than in its written form.
A well-known actor, piqued at being compelled to play listener, made himself
ridiculous by half turning his back on the narrator.  But after lunch Willie
Grenfell (now Lord Desborough), a model English athlete gifted with peculiar
intellectual fairness, came round to me:

"Oscar Wilde is most surprising, most charming, a wonderful talker."

At the same moment Mr. K. H---- came over to us.  He was a man who went
everywhere and knew everyone.  He had quiet, ingratiating manners, always spoke
in a gentle smiling way and had a good word to say for everyone, especially for
women; he was a bachelor, too, and wholly unattached.  He surprised me by taking
up Grenfell's praise and breaking into a lyric:

"The best talker who ever lived," he said; "most extraordinary.  I am so
infinitely obliged to you for asking me to meet him--a new delight.  He brings a
supernal air into life.  I am in truth indebted to you"--all this in an affected
purring tone.  I noticed for the first time that there was a touch of rouge on
his face; Grenfell turned away from us rather abruptly I thought.

At this first roseate dawn of complete success and universal applause, new
qualities came to view in Oscar.  Praise gave him the fillip needed in order
to make him surpass himself.  His talk took on a sort of autumnal richness
of colour, and assumed a new width of range; he now used pathos as well as
humour and generally brought in a story or apologue to lend variety to the
entertainment.  His little weaknesses, too, began to show themselves and they
grew rankly in the sunshine.  He always wanted to do himself well, as the phrase
goes, but now he began to eat and drink more freely than before.  His vanity
became defiant.  I noticed one day that he had signed himself, Oscar O'Flahertie
Wilde, I think under some verses which he had contributed years before to his
College magazine.  I asked him jokingly what the O'Flahertie stood for.  To my
astonishment he answered me gravely:

"The O'Flaherties were kings in Ireland, and I have a right to the name; I am
descended from them."

I could not help it; I burst out laughing.

"What are you laughing at, Frank?" he asked with a touch of annoyance.

"It seems humorous to me," I explained, "that Oscar Wilde should want to be
an O'Flahertie," and as I spoke a picture of the greatest of the O'Flaherties,
with bushy head and dirty rags, warming enormous hairy legs before a smoking
peat-fire, flashed before me.  I think something of the sort must have
occurred to Oscar, too, for, in spite of his attempt to be grave, he could not
help laughing.

"It's unkind of you, Frank," he said.  "The Irish were civilised and Christians
when the English kept themselves warm with tattooings."

He could not help telling one in familiar talk of Clumber or some other great
house where he had been visiting; he was intoxicated with his own popularity,
a little surprised, perhaps, to find that he had won fame so easily and on the
primrose path, but one could forgive him everything, for he talked more
delightfully than ever.

It is almost inexplicable, but nevertheless true that life tries all of us,
tests every weak point to breaking, and sets off and exaggerates our powers.
Burns saw this when he wrote:

"Wha does the utmost that he can Will whyles do mair."

And the obverse is true: whoever yields to a weakness habitually, some day
goes further than he ever intended, and comes to worse grief than he deserved.
The old prayer: "Lead us not into temptation", is perhaps a half-conscious
recognition of this fact.  But we moderns are inclined to walk heedlessly, no
longer believing in pitfalls or in the danger of gratified desires.  And Oscar
Wilde was not only an unbeliever; but he had all the heedless confidence of the
artist who has won world-wide popularity and has the halo of fame on his brow.
With high heart and smiling eyes he went to his fate unsuspecting.

It was in the autumn of 1891 that he first met Lord Alfred Douglas.  He was
thirty-six and Lord Alfred Douglas a handsome, slim youth of twenty-one, with
large blue eyes and golden-fair hair.  His mother, the Dowager Lady Queensberry,
preserves a photograph of him taken a few years before, when he was still at
Winchester, a boy of sixteen with an expression which might well be called
angelic.

When I met him, he was still girlishly pretty, with the beauty of youth,
coloring and fair skin; though his features were merely ordinary.  It was
Lionel Johnson, the writer, a friend and intimate of Douglas at Winchester, who
brought him to tea at Oscar's house in Tite Street.  Their mutual attraction had
countless hooks.  Oscar was drawn by the lad's personal beauty, and enormously
affected besides by Lord Alfred Douglas' name and position: he was a snob as
only an English artist can be a snob; he loved titular distinctions, and Douglas
is one of the few great names in British history with the gilding of romance
about it.  No doubt Oscar talked better than his best because he was talking to
Lord Alfred Douglas.  To the last the mere name rolled on his tongue gave him
extraordinary pleasure.  Besides, the boy admired him, hung upon his lips with
his soul in his eyes; showed, too, rare intelligence in his appreciation,
confessed that he himself wrote verses and loved letters passionately.  Could
more be desired than perfection perfected?

And Alfred Douglas on his side was almost as powerfully attracted; he had
inherited from his mother all her literary tastes--and more: he was already a
master-poet with a singing faculty worthy to be compared with the greatest.
What wonder if he took this magical talker, with the luminous eyes and charming
voice, and a range and play of thought beyond his imagining, for a world's
miracle, one of the Immortals.  Before he had listened long, I have been told,
the youth declared his admiration passionately.  They were an extraordinary pair
and were complementary in a hundred ways, not only in mind, but in character.
Oscar had reached originality of thought and possessed the culture of
scholarship, while Alfred Douglas had youth and rank and beauty, besides
being as articulate as a woman with an unsurpassable gift of expression.
Curiously enough, Oscar was as yielding and amiable in character as the boy
was self-willed, reckless, obstinate and imperious.

Years later Oscar told me that from the first he dreaded Alfred Douglas'
aristocratic, insolent boldness:

"He frightened me, Frank, as much as he attracted me, and I held away from him.
But he wouldn't have it; he sought me out again and again and I couldn't resist
him.  That is my only fault.  That's what ruined me.  He increased my expenses
so that I could not meet them; over and over again I tried to free myself from
him; but he came back and I yielded--alas!"

Though this is Oscar's later gloss on what actually happened, it is fairly
accurate.  He was never able to realise how his meeting with Lord Alfred Douglas
had changed the world to him and him to the world.  The effect on the harder
fibre of the boy was chiefly mental: to Alfred Douglas, Oscar was merely a
quickening, inspiring, intellectual influence; but the boy's effect on Oscar was
of character and induced imitation.  Lord Alfred Douglas' boldness gave Oscar
"outre-cuidance", an insolent arrogance: artist-like he tried to outdo his
model in aristocratic disdain.  Without knowing the cause the change in Oscar
astonished me again and again, and in the course of this narrative I shall have
to notice many instances of it.

One other effect the friendship had of far-reaching influence.  Oscar always
enjoyed good living; but for years he had had to earn his bread: he knew the
value of money; he didn't like to throw it away; he was accustomed to lunch or
dine at a cheap Italian restaurant for a few shillings.  But to Lord Alfred
Douglas money was only a counter and the most luxurious living a necessity.  As
soon as Oscar Wilde began to entertain him, he was led to the dearest hotels and
restaurants; his expenses became formidable and soon outran his large earnings.
For the first time since I had known him he borrowed heedlessly right and left,
and had, therefore, to bring forth play after play with scant time for thought.

Lord Alfred Douglas has declared recently:

"I spent much more in entertaining Oscar Wilde than he did in entertaining me";
but this is preposterous self-deception.  An earlier confession of his was much
nearer the truth: "It was a sweet humiliation to me to let Oscar Wilde pay for
everything and to ask him for money."

There can be no doubt that Lord Alfred Douglas' habitual extravagance kept Oscar
Wilde hard up, and drove him to write without intermission.

There were other and worse results of the intimacy which need not be exposed
here in so many words, though they must be indicated; for they derived of
necessity from that increased self-assurance which has already been recorded.
As Oscar devoted himself to Lord Alfred Douglas and went about with him
continually, he came to know his friends and his familiars, and went less into
society so-called.  Again and again Lord Alfred Douglas flaunted acquaintance
with youths of the lowest class; but no one knew him or paid much attention to
him; Oscar Wilde, on the other hand, was already a famous personage whose every
movement provoked comment.  From this time on the rumours about Oscar took
definite form and shaped themselves in specific accusations: his enemies began
triumphantly to predict his ruin and disgrace.

Everything is known in London society; like water on sand the truth spreads
wider and wider as it gradually filters lower.  The "smart set" in London has
almost as keen a love of scandal as a cathedral town.  About this time one heard
of a dinner which Oscar Wilde had given at a restaurant in Soho, which was said
to have degenerated into a sort of Roman orgy.  I was told of a man who tried to
get money by blackmailing him in his own house.  I shrugged my shoulders at all
these scandals, and asked the talebearers what had been said about Shakespeare
to make him rave as he raved again and again against "back-wounding calumny";
and when they persisted in their malicious stories I could do nothing but show
disbelief.  Though I saw but little of Oscar during the first year or so of his
intimacy with Lord Alfred Douglas, one scene from this time filled me with
suspicion and an undefined dread.

I was in a corner of the Cafe Royal one night downstairs, playing chess, and,
while waiting for my opponent to move, I went out just to stretch my legs.  When
I returned I found Oscar throned in the very corner, between two youths.  Even
to my short-sighted eyes they appeared quite common: in fact they looked like
grooms.  In spite of their vulgar appearance, however, one was nice looking in a
fresh boyish way; the other seemed merely depraved.  Oscar greeted me as usual,
though he seemed slightly embarrassed.  I resumed my seat, which was almost
opposite him, and pretended to be absorbed in the game.  To my astonishment he
was talking as well as if he had had a picked audience; talking, if you please,
about the Olympic games, telling how the youths wrestled and were scraped with
strigulae and threw the discus and ran races and won the myrtle-wreath.  His
impassioned eloquence brought the sun-bathed palaestra before one with a magic
of representment.  Suddenly the younger of the boys asked:

"Did you sy they was niked?"

"Of course," Oscar replied, "nude, clothed only in sunshine and beauty."

"Oh, my," giggled the lad in his unspeakable Cockney way.  I could not stand it.

"I am in an impossible position," I said to my opponent, who was the amateur
chess player, Montagu Gattie.  "Come along and let us have some dinner."  With a
nod to Oscar I left the place.  On the way out Gattie said to me:

"So that's the famous Oscar Wilde."

"Yes," I replied, "that's Oscar, but I never saw him in such company before."

"Didn't you?" remarked Gattie quietly; "he was well known at Oxford.  I was at
the 'Varsity with him.  His reputation was always rather--"'high,'" shall we
call it?"

I wanted to forget the scene and blot it out of my memory, and remember my
friend as I knew him at his best.  But that Cockney boy would not be banned;
he leered there with rosy cheeks, hair plastered down in a love-lock on his
forehead, and low cunning eyes.  I felt uncomfortable.  I would not think of
it.  I recalled the fact that in all our talks I had never heard Oscar use a
gross word.  His mind, I said to myself, is like Spenser's, vowed away from
coarseness and vulgarity: he's the most perfect intellectual companion in the
world.  He may have wanted to talk to the boys just to see what effect his talk
would have on them.  His vanity is greedy enough to desire even such applause as
theirs. . . . .  Of course, that was the explanation--vanity.  My affection for
him, tormented by doubt, had found at length a satisfactory solution.  It was
the artist in him, I said to myself, that wanted a model.

But why not boys of his own class?  The answer suggested itself; boys of his own
class could teach him nothing; his own boyhood would supply him with all the
necessary information about well-bred youth.  But if he wanted a gutter-snipe in
one of his plays, he would have to find a gutter-lad and paint him from life.
That was probably the truth, I concluded.  So satisfied was I with my discovery
that I developed it to Gattie; but he would not hear of it.

"Gattie has nothing of the artist in him," I decided, "and therefore cannot
understand."  And I went on arguing, if Gattie were right, why "two" boys?
It seemed evident to me that my reading of the riddle was the only plausible
one.  Besides it left my affection unaffected and free.  Still, the giggle, the
plastered oily hair and the venal leering eyes came back to me again and again
in spite of myself.




CHAPTER XI--THE THREATENING CLOUD DRAWS NEARER



There is a secret apprehension in man counselling sobriety and moderation,
a fear born of expediency distinct from conscience, which is ethical; though
it seems to be closely connected with conscience acting, as it does, by
warnings and prohibitions.  The story of Polycrates and his ring is a symbol
of the instinctive feeling that extraordinary good fortune is perilous and
can not endure.

A year or so after the first meeting between Oscar Wilde and Lord Alfred Douglas
I heard that they were being pestered on account of some amorous letters which
had been stolen from them.  There was talk of blackmail and hints of an
interesting exposure.

Towards the end of the year it was announced that Lord Alfred Douglas had gone
to Egypt; but this "flight into Egypt," as it was wittily called, was gilded
by the fact that a little later he was appointed an honorary attache to Lord
Cromer.  I regarded his absence as a piece of good fortune, for when he was in
London, Oscar had no time to himself, and was seen in public with associates
he would have done better to avoid.  Time and again he had praised Lord Alfred
Douglas to me as a charming person, a poet, and had grown lyrical about his
violet eyes and honey-coloured hair.  I knew nothing of Lord Alfred Douglas,
and had no inkling of his poetic talent.  I did not like several of Oscar's
particular friends, and I had a special dislike for the father of Lord Alfred
Douglas.  I knew Queensberry rather well.  I was a member of the old Pelican
Club, and I used to go there frequently for a talk with Tom, Dick or Harry,
about athletics, or for a game of chess with George Edwards.  Queensberry was
there almost every night, and someone introduced me to him.  I was eager to
know him because he had surprised me.  At some play ("The Promise of May" was
produced in November, 1882.), I think it was "The Promise of May," by Tennyson,
produced at the Globe, in which atheists were condemned, he had got up in his
box and denounced the play, proclaiming himself an atheist.  I wanted to know
the Englishman who could be so contemptuous of convention.  Had he acted out of
aristocratic insolence, or was he by any possibility high-minded?  To one who
knew the man the mere question must seem ridiculous.

Queensberry was perhaps five feet nine or ten in height, with a plain, heavy,
rather sullen face, and quick, hot eyes.  He was a mass of self-conceit, all
bristling with suspicion, and in regard to money, prudent to meanness.  He
cared nothing for books, but liked outdoor sports and under a rather abrupt,
but not discourteous, manner hid an irritable, violent temper.  He was combative
and courageous as very nervous people sometimes are, when they happen to be
strong-willed--the sort of man who, just because he was afraid of a bull and
had pictured the dreadful wound it could give, would therefore seize it by the
horns.

The insane temper of the man got him into rows at the Pelican more than once.
I remember one evening he insulted a man whom I liked immensely.  Haseltine was
a stockbroker, I think, a big, fair, handsome fellow who took Queensberry's
insults for some time with cheerful contempt.  Again and again he turned
Queensberry's wrath aside with a fair word, but Queensberry went on working
himself into a passion, and at last made a rush at him.  Haseltine watched him
coming and hit out in the nick of time; he caught Queensberry full in the face
and literally knocked him heels over head.  Queensberry got up in a sad mess: he
had a swollen nose and black eye and his shirt was all stained with blood spread
about by hasty wiping.  Any other man would have continued the fight or else
have left the club on the spot; Queensberry took a seat at a table, and there
sat for hours silent.  I could only explain it to myself by saying that his
impulse to fly at once from the scene of his disgrace was very acute, and
therefore he resisted it, made up his mind not to budge, and so he sat there the
butt of the derisive glances and whispered talk of everyone who came into the
club in the next two or three hours.  He was just the sort of person a wise man
would avoid and a clever one would use--a dangerous, sharp, ill-handled tool.

Disliking his father, I did not care to meet Lord Alfred Douglas, Oscar's newest
friend.

I saw Oscar less frequently after the success of his first play; he no longer
needed my editorial services, and was, besides, busily engaged; but I have one
good trait to record of him.  Some time before I had lent him L50; so long as he
was hard up I said nothing about it; but after the success of his second play,
I wrote to him saying that the L50 would be useful to me if he could spare it.
He sent me a cheque at once with a charming letter.

He was now continually about again with Lord Alfred Douglas who, it appeared,
had had a disagreement with Lord Cromer and returned to London.  Almost
immediately scandalous stories came into circulation concerning them:

"Have you heard the latest about Lord Alfred and Oscar?  I'm told they're being
watched by the police," and so forth and so on interminably.  One day a story
came to me with such wealth of weird detail that it was manifestly at least
founded on fact.  Oscar was said to have written extraordinary letters to
Lord Alfred Douglas: a youth called Alfred Wood had stolen the letters from
Lord Alfred Douglas' rooms in Oxford and had tried to blackmail Oscar with them.
The facts were so peculiar and so precise that I asked Oscar about it.  He met
the accusation at once and very fairly, I thought, and told me the whole story.
It puts the triumphant power and address of the man in a strong light, and so I
will tell it as he told it to me.

"When I was rehearsing 'A Woman of No Importance' at the Haymarket," he began,
"Beerbohm Tree showed me a letter I had written a year or so before to Alfred
Douglas.  He seemed to think it dangerous, but I laughed at him and read the
letter with him, and of course he came to understand it properly.  A little
later a man called Wood told me he had found some letters which I had written
to Lord Alfred Douglas in a suit of clothes which Lord Alfred had given to him.
He gave me back some of the letters and I gave him a little money.  But the
letter, a copy of which had been sent to Beerbohm Tree, was not amongst them.

"Some time afterwards a man named Allen called upon me one night in Tite Street,
and said he had got a letter of mine which I ought to have.

"The man's manner told me that he was the real enemy.  'I suppose you mean that
beautiful letter of mine to Lord Alfred Douglas,' I said.  'If you had not been
so foolish as to send a copy of it to Mr. Beerbohm Tree, I should have been glad
to have paid you a large sum for it, as I think it is one of the best I ever
wrote.'  Allen looked at me with sulky, cunning eyes and said:

"'A curious construction could be put upon that letter.'

"'No doubt, no doubt,' I replied lightly; 'art is not intelligible to the
criminal classes.'  He looked me in the face defiantly and said:

"'A man has offered me L60 for it.'

"'You should take the offer,' I said gravely; 'L60 is a great price.  I myself
have never received such a large sum for any prose work of that length.  But I
am glad to find that there is someone in England who will pay such a large sum
for a letter of mine.  I don't know why you come to me,' I added, rising, 'you
should sell the letter at once.'

"Of course, Frank, as I spoke my body seemed empty with fear.  The letter could
be misunderstood, and I have so many envious enemies; but I felt that there was
nothing else for it but bluff.  As I went to the door Allen rose too, and said
that the man who had offered him the money was out of town.  I turned to him
and said:

"'He will no doubt return, and I don't care for the letter at all.'

"At this Allen changed his manner, said he was very poor, he hadn't a penny in
the world, and had spent a lot trying to find me and tell me about the letter.
I told him I did not mind relieving his distress, and gave him half a sovereign,
assuring him at the same time that the letter would shortly be published as a
sonnet in a delightful magazine.  I went to the door with him, and he walked
away.  I closed the door; but didn't shut it at once, for suddenly I heard a
policeman's step coming softly towards my house--pad, pad! A dreadful moment,
then he passed by.  I went into the room again all shaken, wondering whether
I had done right, whether Allen would hawk the letter about--a thousand vague
apprehensions.

"Suddenly a knock at the street door.  My heart was in my mouth, still I went
and opened it: a man named Cliburn was there.

"'I have come to you with a letter of Allen's.'

"'I cannot be bothered any more,' I cried, 'about that letter; I don't care
twopence about it.  Let him do what he likes with it.'

"To my astonishment Cliburn said:

"'Allen has asked me to give it back to you,' and he produced it.

"'Why does he give it back to me?' I asked carelessly.

"'He says you were kind to him and that it is no use trying to "rent" you;
you only laugh at us.'

"I looked at the letter; it was very dirty, and I said:

"'I think it is unpardonable that better care should not have been taken of
a manuscript of mine.'

"He said he was sorry; but it had been in many hands.  I took the letter up
casually:

"'Well, I will accept the letter back.  You can thank Mr. Allen for me.'

"I gave Cliburn half a sovereign for his trouble, and said to him:

"'I am afraid you are leading a desperately wicked life.'

"'There's good and bad in every one of us,' he replied.  I said something about
his being a philosopher, and he went away.  That's the whole story, Frank."

"But the letter?" I questioned.

"The letter is nothing," Oscar replied; "a prose poem.  I will give you a copy
of it."

Here is the letter:

"My own boy,--Your sonnet is quite lovely, and it is a marvel that those red
rose-leaf lips of yours should be made no less for the madness of music and song
than for the madness of kissing.  Your slim-gilt soul walks between passion and
poetry.  No Hyacinthus followed Love so madly as you in Greek days.  Why are you
alone in London, and when do you go to Salisbury?  Do go there and cool your
hands in the grey twilight of Gothic things.  Come here whenever you like.  It
is a lovely place and only lacks you.  Do go to Salisbury first.  Always with
undying love,

Yours,

Oscar."

This letter startled me; "slim-gilt" and the "madness of kissing" were
calculated to give one pause; but after all, I thought, it may be merely
an artist's letter, half pose, half passionate admiration.  Another thought
struck me.

"But how did such a letter," I cried, "ever get into the hands of a
blackmailer?"

"I don't know," he replied, shrugging his shoulders.  "Lord Alfred Douglas
is very careless and inconceivably bold.  You should know him, Frank; he's
a delightful poet."

"But how did he come to know a creature like Wood?" I persisted.

"How can I tell, Frank," he answered a little shortly; and I let the matter
drop, though it left in me a certain doubt, an uncomfortable suspicion.

The scandal grew from hour to hour, and the tide of hatred rose in surges.

One day I was lunching at the Savoy, and while talking to the head waiter,
Cesari, who afterwards managed the Elysee Palace Hotel in Paris, I thought I saw
Oscar and Douglas go out together.  Being a little short-sighted, I asked:

"Isn't that Mr. Oscar Wilde?"

"Yes," said Cesari, "and Lord Alfred Douglas.  We wish they would not come here;
it does us a lot of harm."

"How do you mean?" I asked sharply.

"Some people don't like them," the quick Italian answered immediately.

"Oscar Wilde," I remarked casually, "is a great friend of mine," but the super-
subtle Italian was already warned.

"A clever writer, I believe," he said, smiling in bland acquiescence.

This incident gave me warning, strengthened again in me the exact apprehension
and suspicion which the Douglas letter had bred.  Oscar I knew was too self-
centred, went about too continually with admirers to have any understanding of
popular feeling.  He would be the last man to realize how fiercely hate, malice
and envy were raging against him.  I wanted to warn him; but hardly knew how to
do it effectively and without offence: I made up my mind to keep my eyes open
and watch an opportunity.

A little later I gave a dinner at the Savoy and asked him to come.  He was
delightful, his vivacious gaiety as exhilarating as wine.  But he was more like
a Roman Emperor than ever: he had grown fat: he ate and drank too much; not that
he was intoxicated, but he became flushed, and in spite of his gay and genial
talk he affected me a little unpleasantly; he was gross and puffed up.  But he
gave one or two splendid snapshots of actors and their egregious vanity.  It
seemed to him a great pity that actors should be taught to read and write: they
should learn their pieces from the lips of the poet.

"Just as work is the curse of the drinking classes of this country," he said
laughing, "so education is the curse of the acting classes."

Yet even when making fun of the mummers there was a new tone in him of arrogance
and disdain.  He used always to be genial and kindly even to those he laughed
at; now he was openly contemptuous.  The truth is that his extraordinarily
receptive mind went with an even more abnormal receptivity of character: unlike
most men of marked ability, he took colour from his associates.  In this as in
love of courtesies and dislike of coarse words he was curiously feminine.
Intercourse with Beardsley, for example, had backed his humorous gentleness with
a sort of challenging courage; his new intimacy with Lord Alfred Douglas, coming
on the top of his triumph as a playwright, was lending him aggressive self-
confidence.  There was in him that "hubris" (insolent self-assurance) which the
Greek feared, the pride which goeth before destruction.  I regretted the change
in him and was nervously apprehensive.

After dinner we all went out by the door which gives on the Embankment, for it
was after 12.30.  One of the party proposed that we should walk for a minute or
two--at least as far as the Strand, before driving home.  Oscar objected.  He
hated walking; it was a form of penal servitude to the animal in man, he
declared; but he consented, nevertheless, under protest, laughing.  When we
were going up the steps to the Strand he again objected, and quoted Dante's
famous lines:

  "Tu proverai si come sa di sale
Lo pane altrui; e com' e duro calle
Lo scendere e 'l salir per l'altrui scale."

The impression made by Oscar that evening was not only of self-indulgence but
of over-confidence.  I could not imagine what had given him this insolent self-
complacence.  I wanted to get by myself and think.  Prosperity was certainly
doing him no good.

All the while the opposition to him, I felt, was growing in force.  How could I
verify this impression, I asked myself, so as to warn him effectually?

I decided to give a lunch to him, and on purpose I put on the invitations: "To
meet Mr. Oscar Wilde and hear a new story."  Out of a dozen invitations sent out
to men, seven or eight were refused, three or four telling me in all kindness
that they would rather not meet Oscar Wilde.  This confirmed my worst fears:
when Englishmen speak out in this way the dislike must be near revolt.

I gave the lunch and saw plainly enough that my forebodings were justified.
Oscar was more self-confident than ever, but his talk did not suffer; indeed,
it seemed to improve.  At this lunch he told the charming fable of "Narcissus,"
which is certainly one of his most characteristic short stories.

"When Narcissus died the Flowers of the Field were plunged in grief, and asked
the River for drops of water that they might mourn for him.

"'Oh,' replied the River, 'if only my drops of water were tears, I should not
have enough to weep for Narcissus myself--I loved him.'

"'How could you help loving Narcissus?' said the flowers, 'so beautiful was he.'

"'Was he beautiful?' asked the River.

"'Who should know that better than you?' said the flowers, 'for every day, lying
on your bank, he would mirror his beauty in your waters.'"

Oscar paused here, and then went on:

"'If I loved him,' replied the River, 'it is because, when he hung over me,
I saw the reflection of my own loveliness in his eyes.'"

After lunch I took him aside and tried to warn him, told him that unpleasant
stories were being put about against him; but he paid no heed to me.

"All envy, Frank, and malice.  What do I care?  I go to Clumber this summer;
besides I am doing another play which I rather like.  I always knew that play-
writing was my province.  As a youth I tried to write plays in verse; that was
my mistake.  Now I know better; I'm sure of myself and of success."

Somehow or other in spite of his apparent assurance I felt he was in danger
and I doubted his quality as a fighter.  But after all it was not my business:
wilful man must have his way.

It seems to me now that my mistrust dated from the second paper war with
Whistler, wherein to the astonishment of everyone Oscar did not come off
victorious.  As soon as he met with opposition his power of repartee seemed to
desert him and Whistler, using mere rudeness and man-of-the-world sharpness,
held the field.  Oscar was evidently not a born fighter.

I asked him once how it was he let Whistler off so lightly.  He shrugged his
shoulders and showed some irritation.

"What could I say, Frank?  Why should I belabour the beaten?  The man is a wasp
and delights in using his sting.  I have done more perhaps than anyone to make
him famous.  I had no wish to hurt him."

Was it magnanimity or weakness or, as I think, a constitutional, a feminine
shrinking from struggle and strife.  Whatever the cause, it was clear that
Oscar was what Shakespeare called himself, "an unhurtful opposite."

It is quite possible that if he had been attacked face to face, Oscar would have
given a better account of himself.  At Mrs. Grenfell's (now Lady Desborough)
he crossed swords once with the Prime Minister and came off victorious.  Mr.
Asquith began by bantering him, in appearance lightly, in reality, seriously,
for putting many of his sentences in italics.

"The man who uses italics," said the politician, "is like the man who raises his
voice in conversation and talks loudly in order to make himself heard."

It was the well-known objection which Emerson had taken to Carlyle's overwrought
style, pointed probably by dislike of the way Oscar monopolised conversation.

Oscar met the stereotyped attack with smiling good-humour.

"How delightful of you, Mr. Asquith, to have noticed that! The brilliant phrase,
like good wine, needs no bush.  But just as the orator marks his good things by
a dramatic pause, or by raising or lowering his voice, or by gesture, so the
writer marks his epigrams with italics, setting the little gem, so to speak,
like a jeweller--an excusable love of one's art, not all mere vanity, I like to
think"--all this with the most pleasant smile and manner.

In measure as I distrusted Oscar's fighting power and admired his sweetness of
nature I took sides with him and wanted to help him.  One day I heard some talk
at the Pelican Club which filled me with fear for him and quickened my resolve
to put him on his guard.  I was going in just as Queensberry was coming out with
two or three of his special cronies.

"I'll do it," I heard him cry, "I'll teach the fellow to leave my son alone.
I'll not have their names coupled together."

I caught a glimpse of the thrust-out combative face and the hot grey eyes.

"What's it all about?" I asked.

"Only Queensberry," said someone, "swearing he'll stop Oscar Wilde going about
with that son of his, Alfred Douglas."

Suddenly my fears took form: as in a flash I saw Oscar, heedless and smiling,
walking along with his head in the air, and that violent combative insane
creature pouncing on him.  I sat down at once and wrote begging Oscar to lunch
with me the next day alone, as I had something important to say to him.  He
turned up in Park Lane, manifestly anxious, a little frightened, I think.

"What is it, Frank?"

I told him very seriously what I had heard and gave besides my impression of
Queensberry's character, and his insane pugnacity.

"What can I do, Frank?" said Oscar, showing distress and apprehension.  "It's
all Bosie."

"Who is Bosie?" I asked.

"That is Lord Alfred Douglas' pet name.  It's all Bosie's fault.  He has
quarrelled with his father, or rather his father has quarrelled with him.
He quarrels with everyone; with Lady Queensberry, with Percy Douglas, with
Bosie, everyone.  He's impossible.  What can I do?"

"Avoid him," I said.  "Don't go about with Lord Alfred Douglas.  Give
Queensberry his triumph.  You could make a friend of him as easily as possible,
if you wished.  Write him a conciliatory letter."

"But he'll want me to drop Bosie, and stop seeing Lady Queensberry, and I like
them all; they are charming to me.  Why should I cringe to this madman?"

"Because he is a madman."

"Oh, Frank, I can't," he cried.  "Bosie wouldn't let me."

"'Wouldn't let you'?  I repeated angrily.  "How absurd! That Queensberry man
will go to violence, to any extremity.  Don't you fight other people's quarrels:
you may have enough of your own some day."

"You're not sympathetic, Frank," he chided weakly.  "I know you mean it kindly,
but it's impossible for me to do as you advise.  I cannot give up my friend.  I
really cannot let Lord Queensberry choose my friends for me.  It's too absurd."

"But it's wise," I replied.  "There's a very bad verse in one of Hugo's plays.
It always amused me--he likens poverty to a low door and declares that when we
have to pass through it the man who stoops lowest is the wisest.  So when you
meet a madman, the wisest thing to do is to avoid him and not quarrel with him."

"It's very hard, Frank; of course I'll think over what you say.  But really
Queensberry ought to be in a madhouse.  He's too absurd," and in that spirit he
left me, outwardly self-confident.  He might have remembered Chaucer's words:

Beware also to spurne again a nall;
Strive not as doeth a crocke with a wall;
Deme thy selfe that demest others dede,
And trouth thee shall deliver, it is no drede.




CHAPTER XII--DANGER SIGNALS: THE CHALLENGE



These two years 1893-4 saw Oscar Wilde at the very zenith of success.
Thackeray, who always felt himself a monetary failure in comparison with
Dickens, calls success "one of the greatest of a great man's qualities," and
Oscar was not successful merely, he was triumphant.  Not Sheridan the day after
his marriage, not Byron when he awoke to find himself famous, ever reached such
a pinnacle.  His plays were bringing in so much that he could spend money like
water; he had won every sort of popularity; the gross applause of the many, and
the finer incense of the few who constitute the jury of Fame; his personal
popularity too was extraordinary; thousands admired him, many liked him; he
seemed to have everything that heart could desire and perfect health to boot.
Even his home life was without a cloud.  Two stories which he told at this time
paint him.  One was about his two boys, Vyvyan and Cyril.

"Children are sometimes interesting," he began.  "The other night I was reading
when my wife came and asked me to go upstairs and reprove the elder boy: Cyril,
it appeared, would not say his prayers.  He had quarrelled with Vyvyan, and
beaten him, and when he was shaken and told he must say his prayers, he would
not kneel down, or ask God to make him a good boy.  Of course I had to go
upstairs and see to it.  I took the chubby little fellow on my knee, and told
him in a grave way that he had been very naughty; naughty to hit his younger
brother, and naughty because he had given his mother pain.  He must kneel down
at once, and ask God to forgive him and make him a good boy.

"'I was not naughty,' he pouted, 'it was Vyvyan; he was naughty.'

"I explained to him that his temper was naughty, and that he must do as he was
told.  With a little sigh he slipped off my knee, and knelt down and put his
little hands together, as he had been taught, and began 'Our Father.'  When he
had finished the 'Lord's Prayer,' he looked up at me and said gravely, 'Now I'll
pray to myself.'

"He closed his eyes and his lips moved.  When he had finished I took him in my
arms again and kissed him.  "That's right," I said.

"'You said you were sorry,' questioned his mother, leaning over him, 'and asked
God to make you a good boy?'

"'Yes, mother,' he nodded, 'I said I was sorry and asked God to make Vyvyan
a good boy.'

"I had to leave the room, Frank, or he would have seen me smiling.  Wasn't it
delightful of him! We are all willing to ask God to make others good."

This story shows the lovable side of him.  There was another side not so
amiable.  In April, 1893, "A Woman of No Importance" was produced by Herbert
Beerbohm Tree at The Haymarket and ran till the end of the season, August 16th,
surviving even the festival of St. Grouse.  The astonishing success of this
second play confirmed Oscar Wilde's popularity, gave him money to spend and
increased his self-confidence.  In the summer he took a house up the river at
Goring, and went there to live with Lord Alfred Douglas.  Weird stories came to
us in London about their life together.  Some time in September, I think it was,
I asked him what was the truth underlying these reports.

"Scandals and slanders, Frank, have no relation to truth," he replied.

"I wonder if that's true," I said, "slander often has some substratum of
truth; it resembles the truth like a gigantic shadow; there is a likeness
at least in outline."

"That would be true," he retorted, "if the canvas, so to speak, on which the
shadows fall were even and true; but it is not.  Scandals and slander are
related to the hatred of the people who invent them and are not in any shadowy
sense even, effigies or images of the person attacked."

"Much smoke, then," I queried, "and no fire?"

"Only little fires," he rejoined, "show much smoke.  The foundation for what you
heard is both small and harmless.  The summer was very warm and beautiful, as
you know, and I was up at Goring with Bosie.  Often in the middle of the day we
were too hot to go on the river.  One afternoon it was sultry-close, and Bosie
proposed that I should turn the hose pipe on him.  He went in and threw his
things off and so did I.  A few minutes later I was seated in a chair with a
bath towel round me and Bosie was lying on the grass about ten yards away, when
the vicar came to pay us a call.  The servant told him that we were in the
garden, and he came and found us there.  Frank, you have no idea the sort of
face he pulled.  What could I say?"

"'I am the vicar of the parish,' he bowed pompously.

"'I'm delighted to see you,' I said, getting up and draping myself carefully,
'you have come just in time to enjoy a perfectly Greek scene.  I regret that I
am scarcely fit to receive you, and Bosie there;--and I pointed to Bosie lying
on the grass.  The vicar turned his head and saw Bosie's white limbs; the sight
was too much for him; he got very red, gave a gasp and fled from the place.

"I simply sat down in my chair and shrieked with laughter.  How he may have
described the scene, what explanation he gave of it, what vile gloss he may have
invented, I don't know and I don't care.  I have no doubt he wagged his head and
pursed his lips and looked unutterable things.  But really it takes a saint to
suffer such fools gladly."

I could not help smiling when I thought of the vicar's face, but Oscar's tone
was not pleasant.

The change in him had gone further than I had feared.  He was now utterly
contemptuous of criticism and would listen to no counsel.  He was gross, too,
the rich food and wine seemed to ooze out of him and his manner was defiant,
hard.  He was like some great pagan determined to live his own life to the very
fullest, careless of what others might say or think or do.  Even the stories
which he wrote about this time show the worst side of his paganism:

"When Jesus was minded to return to Nazareth, Nazareth was so changed that He
no longer recognised His own city.  The Nazareth where he had lived was full of
lamentations and tears; this city was filled with outbursts of laughter and
song. . . . .

"Christ went out of the house and, behold, in the street he saw a woman whose
face and raiment were painted and whose feet were shod with pearls, and behind
her walked a man who wore a cloak of two colours, and whose eyes were bright
with lust.  And Christ went up to the man and laid His hand on his shoulder, and
said to him, 'Tell me, why art thou following this woman, and why dost thou look
at her in such wise?' The man turned round, recognised Him and said, 'I was
blind; Thou didst heal me; what else should I do with my sight?'"

The same note is played on in two or three more incidents, but the one I have
given is the best, and should have been allowed to stand alone.  It has been
called blasphemous; it is not intentionally blasphemous; as I have said, Oscar
always put himself quite naively in the place of any historical character.

The disdain of public opinion which Oscar now showed not only in his writings,
but in his answers to criticism, quickly turned the public dislike into
aggressive hatred.  In 1894 a book appeared, "The Green Carnation," which was a
sort of photograph of Oscar as a talker and a caricature of his thought.  The
gossipy story had a surprising success, altogether beyond its merits, which
simply testified to the intense interest the suspicion of extraordinary
viciousness has for common minds.  Oscar's genius was not given in the book
at all, but his humour was indicated and a malevolent doubt of his morality
insisted upon again and again.  Rumour had it that the book was true in every
particular, that Mr. Hichens had taken down Oscar's talks evening after evening
and simply reproduced them.  I asked Oscar if this was true.

"True enough, Frank," he replied with a certain contempt which was foreign to
him.  "Hichens got to know Bosie Douglas in Egypt.  They went up the Nile
together, I believe with 'Dodo' Denson.  Naturally Bosie talked a great deal
about me and Hichens wanted to know me.  When they returned to town, I thought
him rather pleasant, and saw a good deal of him.  I had no idea that he was
going to play reporter; it seems to me a breach of confidence--ignoble."

"It is not a picture of you," I said, "but there is a certain likeness."

"A photograph is always like and unlike, Frank," he replied; "the sun too, when
used mechanically, is merely a reporter, and traduces instead of reproducing
you."

"The Green Carnation" ruined Oscar Wilde's character with the general public.
On all sides the book was referred to as confirming the worst suspicions: the
cloud which hung over him grew continually darker.

During the summer of 1894 he wrote the "Ideal Husband," which was the outcome of
a story I had told him.  I had heard it from an American I had met in Cairo, a
Mr. Cope Whitehouse.  He told me that Disraeli had made money by entrusting the
Rothschilds with the purchase of the Suez Canal shares.  It seemed to me strange
that this statement, if true, had never been set forth authoritatively; but the
story was peculiarly modern, and had possibilities in it.  Oscar admitted
afterwards that he had taken the idea and used it in "An Ideal Husband."

It was in this summer also that he wrote "The Importance of Being Earnest," his
finest play.  He went to the seaside and completed it, he said, in three weeks,
and, when I spoke of the delight he must feel at having two plays performed in
London at the same time, he said:

"Next year, Frank, I may have four or five; I could write one every two months
with the greatest ease.  It all depends on money.  If I need money I shall write
half a dozen plays next year."

His words reminded me of what Goethe had said about himself: in each of the ten
years he spent on his "Theory of Light" he could have written a couple of plays
as good as his best.  The land of Might-have-been is peopled with these gorgeous
shadow-shapes.

Oscar had already found his public, a public capable of appreciating the very
best he could do.  As soon as "The Importance of Being Earnest" was produced
it had an extraordinary success, and success of the best sort.  Even journalist
critics had begun to cease exhibiting their own limitations in foolish fault-
finding, and now imitated their betters, parroting phrases of extravagant
laudation.

Oscar took the praise as he had taken the scandal and slander, with complacent
superiority.  He had changed greatly and for the worse: he was growing coarser
and harder every year.  All his friends noticed this.  Even M. Andre Gide, who
was a great admirer and wrote, shortly after his death, the best account of him
that appeared, was compelled to deplore his deterioration.  He says:

"One felt that there was less tenderness in his looks, that there was something
harsh in his laughter, and a wild madness in his joy.  He seemed at the same
time to be sure of pleasing, and less ambitious to succeed therein.  He had
grown reckless, hardened and conceited.  Strangely enough he no longer spoke
in fables..."

His brother Willie made a similar complaint to Sir Edward Sullivan.  Sir Edward
writes:

"William Wilde told me, when Oscar was in prison, that the only trouble between
him and his brother was caused by Oscar's inordinate vanity in the period before
his conviction.  'He had surrounded himself,' William said, 'with a gang of
parasites who praised him all day long, and to whom he used to give his
cigarette-cases, breast pins, etc., in return for their sickening flattery.  No
one, not even I, his brother, dared offer any criticism on his works without
offending him.'"

If proof were needed both of his reckless contempt for public opinion and the
malignancy with which he was misjudged, it could be found in an incident which
took place towards the end of 1894.  A journal entitled "The Chameleon" was
produced by some Oxford undergraduates.  Oscar wrote for it a handful of sayings
which he called "Phrases and Philosophies for the Use of the Young."  His
epigrams were harmless enough; but in the same number there appeared a story
entitled "The Priest and the Acolyte" which could hardly be defended.  The mere
fact that his work was printed in the same journal called forth a storm of
condemnation though he had never seen the story before it was published nor had
he anything to do with its insertion.

Nemesis was following hard after him.  Late in this year he spoke to me of his
own accord about Lord Queensberry.  He wanted my advice:

"Lord Queensberry is annoying me," he said; "I did my best to reconcile him and
Bosie.  One day at the Cafe Royal, while Bosie and I were lunching there,
Queensberry came in and I made Bosie go over and fetch his father and bring him
to lunch with us.  He was half friendly with me till quite recently; though he
wrote a shameful letter to Bosie about us.  What am I to do?"

I asked him what Lord Queensberry objected to.

"He objects to my friendship with Bosie."

"Then why not cease to see Bosie?" I asked.

"It is impossible, Frank, and ridiculous; why should I give up my friends for
Queensberry?"

"I should like to see Queensberry's letter," I said.  "Is it possible?"

"I'll bring it to you, Frank, but there's nothing in it."  A day or two later he
showed me the letter, and after I had read it he produced a copy of the telegram
which Lord Alfred Douglas had sent to his father in reply.  Here they both are;
they speak for themselves loudly enough:

Alfred,--

It is extremely painful for me to have to write to you in the strain I must; but
please understand that I decline to receive any answers from you in writing in
return.  After your recent hysterical impertinent ones I refuse to be annoyed
with such, and I decline to read any more letters.  If you have anything to say
do come here and say it in person.  Firstly, am I to understand that, having
left Oxford as you did, with discredit to yourself, the reasons of which were
fully explained to me by your tutor, you now intend to loaf and loll about and
do nothing?  All the time you were wasting at Oxford I was put off with an
assurance that you were eventually to go into the Civil Service or to the
Foreign Office, and then I was put off with an assurance that you were going to
the Bar.  It appears to me that you intend to do nothing.  I utterly decline,
however, to just supply you with sufficient funds to enable you to loaf about.
You are preparing a wretched future for yourself, and it would be most cruel and
wrong for me to encourage you in this.  Secondly, I come to the more painful
part of this letter--your intimacy with this man Wilde.  It must either cease
or I will disown you and stop all money supplies.  I am not going to try and
analyse this intimacy, and I make no charge; but to my mind to pose as a thing
is as bad as to be it.  With my own eyes I saw you both in the most loathsome
and disgusting relationship as expressed by your manner and expression.  Never
in my experience have I ever seen such a sight as that in your horrible
features.  No wonder people are talking as they are.  Also I now hear on good
authority, but this may be false, that his wife is petitioning to divorce him
for sodomy and other crimes.  Is this true, or do you not know of it?  If I
thought the actual thing was true, and it became public property, I should be
quite justified in shooting him at sight.  These Christian English cowards and
men, as they call themselves, want waking up.

Your disgusted so-called father,

Queensberry.

In reply to this letter Lord Alfred Douglas telegraphed:

"What a funny little man you are!  Alfred Douglas."

This telegram was excellently calculated to drive Queensberry frantic with rage.
There was feminine cunning in its wound to vanity.

A little later Oscar told me that Queensberry accompanied by a friend had called
on him.

"What happened?" I asked.

"I said to him, 'I suppose, Lord Queensberry, you have come to apologise for the
libellous letter you wrote about me?'

"'No,' he replied, 'the letter was privileged; it was written to my son.'

"'How dared you say such a thing about your son and me?'

"'You were both kicked out of The Savoy Hotel for disgusting conduct,'
he replied.

"'That's untrue,' I said, 'absolutely untrue.'

"'You were blackmailed too for a disgusting letter you wrote my son,'
he went on.

"'I don't know who has been telling you all these silly stories,' I replied,
'but they are untrue and quite ridiculous.'

"He ended up by saying that if he caught me and his son together again he would
thrash me.

"'I don't know what the Queensberry rules are,' I retorted, 'but my rule is to
shoot at sight in case of personal violence,' and with that I told him to leave
my house."

"Of course he defied you?" I questioned.

"He was rude, Frank, and preposterous to the end."

As Oscar was telling me the story, it seemed to me as if another person were
speaking through his mouth.  The idea of Oscar "standing up" to Queensberry or
"shooting at sight" was too absurd.  Who was inspiring him?  Alfred Douglas?

"What has happened since?" I enquired.

"Nothing," he replied, "perhaps he will be quiet now.  Bosie has written him a
terrible letter; he must see now that, if he goes on, he will only injure his
own flesh and blood."

"That won't stop him," I replied, "if I read him aright.  But if I could see
what Alfred Douglas wrote, I should be better able to judge of the effect it
will have on Queensberry."

A little later I saw the letter: it shows better than words of mine the tempers
of the chief actors in this squalid story:

"As you return my letters unopened, I am obliged to write on a postcard.  I
write to inform you that I treat your absurd threats with absolute indifference.
Ever since your exhibition at O. W.'s house, I have made a point of appearing
with him at many public restaurants such as The Berkeley, Willis's Rooms, the
Cafe Royal, etc., and I shall continue to go to any of these places whenever
I choose and with whom I choose.  I am of age and my own master.  You have
disowned me at least a dozen times, and have very meanly deprived me of money.
You have therefore no right over me, either legal or moral.  If O. W. was to
prosecute you in the Central Criminal Court for libel, you would get seven
years' penal servitude for your outrageous libels.  Much as I detest you, I am
anxious to avoid this for the sake of the family; but if you try to assault me,
I shall defend myself with a loaded revolver, which I always carry; and if I
shoot you or if he shoots you, we shall be completely justified, as we shall be
acting in self-defence against a violent and dangerous rough, and I think if you
were dead many people would not miss you.--A. D."

This letter of the son seemed to me appalling.  My guess was right; it was he
who was speaking through Oscar; the threat of shooting at sight came from him.
I did not then understand all the circumstances; I had not met Lady Queensberry.
I could not have imagined how she had suffered at the hands of her husband--a
charming, cultivated woman, with exquisite taste in literature and art; a woman
of the most delicate, aspen-like sensibilities and noble generosities, coupled
with that violent, coarse animal with the hot eyes and combative nature.  Her
married life had been a martyrdom.  Naturally the children had all taken her
side in the quarrel, and Lord Alfred Douglas, her especial favourite, had
practically identified himself with her, which explains to some extent, though
nothing can justify, the unnatural animosity of his letter.  The letter showed
me that the quarrel was far deeper, far bitterer than I had imagined--one of
those dreadful family quarrels, where the intimate knowledge each has of the
other whips anger to madness.  All I could do was to warn Oscar.

"It's the old, old story," I said.  "You are putting your hand between the
bark and the tree, and you will suffer for it."  But he would not or could not
see it.

"What is one to do with such a madman?" he asked pitiably.

"Avoid him," I replied, "as you would avoid a madman, who wanted to fight with
you; or conciliate him; there is nothing else to do."

He would not be warned.  A little later the matter came up again.  At the first
production of "The Importance of Being Earnest" Lord Queensberry appeared at the
theatre carrying a large bouquet of turnips and carrots.  What the meaning was
of those vegetables only the man himself and his like could divine.  I asked
Oscar about the matter.  He seemed annoyed but on the whole triumphant.

"Queensberry," he said, "had engaged a stall at the St. James's Theatre,
no doubt to kick up a row; but as soon as I heard of it I got Alick (George
Alexander) to send him back his money.  On the night of the first performance
Queensberry appeared carrying a large bundle of carrots.  He was refused
admittance at the box-office, and when he tried to enter the gallery the
police would not let him in.  He must be mad, Frank, don't you think?  I am
glad he was foiled."

"He is insanely violent," I said, "he will keep on attacking you."

"But what can I do, Frank?"

"Don't ask for advice you won't take," I replied.  "There's a French proverb
I've always liked: 'In love and war don't seek counsel.'  But for God's sake,
don't drift.  Stop while you can."

But Oscar would have had to take a resolution and act in order to stop, and he
was incapable of such energy.  The wild horses of Fate had run away with the
light chariot of his fortune, and what the end would be no one could foresee.
It came with appalling suddenness.

One evening, in February, '95, I heard that the Marquis of Queensberry had left
an insulting card for Oscar at the Albemarle Club.  My informant added gleefully
that now Oscar would have to face the music and we'd all see what was in him.
There was no malice in this, just an Englishman's pleasure in a desperate fight,
and curiosity as to the issue.

A little later I received a letter from Oscar, asking me if he could call on me
that afternoon.  I stayed in, and about four o'clock he came to see me.

At first he used the old imperious mask, which he had lately accustomed himself
to wear.

"I am bringing an action against Queensberry, Frank," he began gravely, "for
criminal libel.  He is a mere wild beast.  My solicitors tell me that I am
certain to win.  But they say some of the things I have written will be brought
up against me in court.  Now you know all I have written.  Would you in your
position as editor of "The Fortnightly" come and give evidence for me, testify
for instance that 'Dorian Gray' is not immoral?"

"Yes," I replied at once, "I should be perfectly willing, and I could say more
than that; I could say that you are one of the very few men I have ever known
whose talk and whose writings were vowed away from grossness of any sort."

"Oh! Frank, would you?  It would be so kind of you," he cried out.  "My
solicitors said I ought to ask you, but they were afraid you would not like to
come: your evidence will win the case.  It is good of you."  His whole face was
shaken; he turned away to hide the tears.

"Anything I can do, Oscar," I said, "I shall do with pleasure, and, as you know,
to the uttermost; but I want you to consider the matter carefully.  An English
court of law gives me no assurance of a fair trial or rather I am certain that
in matters of art or morality an English court is about the worst tribunal in
the civilised world."

He shook his head impatiently.

"I cannot help it, I cannot alter it," he said.

"You must listen to me," I insisted.  "You remember the Whistler and Ruskin
action.  You know that Whistler ought to have won.  You know that Ruskin was
shamelessly in fault; but the British jury and the so-called British artists
treated Whistler and his superb work with contempt.  Take a different case
altogether, the Belt case, where all the Academicians went into the witness box,
and asserted honestly enough that Belt was an impostor, yet the jury gave him a
verdict of L5,000, though a year later he was sent to penal servitude for the
very frauds which the jury in the first trial had declared by their verdict he
had not committed.  An English law court is all very well for two average men,
who are fighting an ordinary business dispute.  That's what it's made for, but
to judge a Whistler or the ability or the immorality of an artist is to ask the
court to do what it is wholly unfit to do.  There is not a judge on the bench
whose opinion on such a matter is worth a moment's consideration, and the jury
are a thousand years behind the judge."

"That may be true, Frank; but I cannot help it."

"Don't forget," I persisted, "all British prejudices will be against you.
Here is a father, the fools will say, trying to protect his young son.  If
he has made a mistake, it is only through excess of laudable zeal; you would
have to prove yourself a religious maniac in order to have any chance against
him in England."

"How terrible you are, Frank.  You know it is Bosie Douglas who wants me to
fight, and my solicitors tell me I shall win."

"Solicitors live on quarrels.  Of course they want a case that will bring
hundreds if not thousands of pounds into their pockets.  Besides they like
the fight.  They will have all the kudos of it and the fun, and you will pay
the piper.  For God's sake don't be led into it: that way madness lies."

"But, Frank," he objected weakly, "how can I sit down under such an insult.
I must do something."

"That's another story," I replied.  "Let us by all means weigh what is to be
done.  But let us begin by putting the law-courts out of the question.  Don't
forget that you are challenged to mortal combat.  Let us consider how the
challenge should be met, but we won't fight under Queensberry rules because
Queensberry happens to be the aggressor.  Don't forget that if you lose and
Queensberry goes free, everyone will hold that you have been guilty of nameless
vice.  Put the law courts out of your head.  Whatever else you do, you must not
bring an action for criminal libel against Queensberry.  You are sure to lose
it; you haven't a dog's chance, and the English despise the beaten--"vae
victis!" Don't commit suicide."

Nothing was determined when the time came to part.

This conversation took place, I believe, on the Friday or Saturday.  I spent
the whole of Sunday trying to find out what was known about Oscar Wilde and what
would be brought up against him.  I wanted to know too how he was regarded in an
ordinary middle-class English home.

My investigations had appalling results.  Everyone assumed that Oscar Wilde was
guilty of the worst that had ever been alleged against him; the very people who
received him in their houses condemned him pitilessly and, as I approached the
fountain-head of information, the charges became more and more definite; to my
horror, in the Public Prosecutor's office, his guilt was said to be known and
classified.

All "people of importance" agreed that he would lose his case against
Queensberry; "no English jury would give Oscar Wilde a verdict against anyone,"
was the expert opinion.

"How unjust!" I cried.

A careless shrug was the only reply.

I returned home from my enquiries late on Sunday afternoon, and in a few minutes
Oscar called by appointment.  I told him I was more convinced than ever that he
must not go on with the prosecution; he would be certain to lose.  Without
beating about the bush I declared that he had no earthly chance.

"There are letters," I said, "which are infinitely worse than your published
writings, which will be put in evidence against you."

"What letters do you mean, Frank?" he questioned.  "The Wood letters to Lord
Alfred Douglas I told you about?  I can explain all of them."

"You paid blackmail to Wood for letters you had written to Douglas," I replied,
"and you will not be able to explain that fact to the satisfaction of a jury.
I am told it is possible that witnesses will be called against you.  Take it
from me, Oscar, you have not a ghost of a chance."

"Tell me what you mean, Frank, for God's sake," he cried.

"I can tell you in a word," I replied; "you will lose your case.  I have
promised not to say more."

I tried to persuade him by his vanity.

"You must remember," I said, "that you are a sort of standard bearer for future
generations.  If you lose you will make it harder for all writers in England;
though God knows it is hard enough already; you will put back the hands of the
clock for fifty years."

I seemed almost to have persuaded him.  He questioned me:

"What is the alternative, Frank, the wisest thing to do in your opinion?
Tell me that."

"You ought to go abroad," I replied, "go abroad with your wife, and let
Queensberry and his son fight out their own miserable quarrels; they are
well-matched."

"Oh, Frank," he cried, "how can I do that?"

"Sleep on it," I replied; "I am going to, and we can talk it all over in a
day or two."

"But I must know," he said wistfully, "tomorrow morning, Frank."

"Bernard Shaw is lunching with me tomorrow," I replied, "at the Cafe Royal."

He made an impatient movement of his head.

"He usually goes early," I went on, "and if you like to come after three o'clock
we can have a talk and consider it all."

"May I bring Bosie?" he enquired.

"I would rather you did not," I replied, "but it is for you to do just as
you like.  I don't mind saying what I have to say, before anyone," and on that
we parted.

Somehow or other next day at lunch both Shaw and I got interested in our talk,
and we were both at the table when Oscar came in.  I introduced them, but they
had met before.  Shaw stood up and proposed to go at once, but Oscar with his
usual courtesy assured him that he would be glad if he stayed.

"Then, Oscar," I said, "perhaps you won't mind Shaw hearing what I advise?"

"No, Frank, I don't mind," he sighed with a pitiful air of depression.

I am not certain and my notes do not tell me whether Bosie Douglas came in with
Oscar or a little later, but he heard the greater part of our talk.  I put the
matter simply.

"First of all," I said, "we start with the certainty that you are going to lose
the case against Queensberry.  You must give it up, drop it at once; but you
cannot drop it and stay in England.  Queensberry would probably attack you again
and again.  I know him well; he is half a savage and regards pity as a weakness;
he has absolutely no consideration for others.

"You should go abroad, and, as ace of trumps, you should take your wife with
you.  Now for the excuse: I would sit down and write such a letter as you alone
can write to "The Times".  You should set forth how you have been insulted by
the Marquis of Queensberry, and how you went naturally to the Courts for a
remedy, but you found out very soon that this was a mistake.  No jury would
give a verdict against a father, however mistaken he might be.  The only thing
for you to do therefore is to go abroad, and leave the whole ring, with its
gloves and ropes, its sponges and pails, to Lord Queensberry.  You are a maker
of beautiful things, you should say, and not a fighter.  Whereas the Marquis of
Queensberry takes joy only in fighting.  You refuse to fight with a father under
these circumstances."

Oscar seemed to be inclined to do as I proposed.  I appealed to Shaw, and Shaw
said he thought I was right; the case would very likely go against Oscar, a jury
would hardly give a verdict against a father trying to protect his son.  Oscar
seemed much moved.  I think it was about this time that Bosie Douglas came in.
At Oscar's request, I repeated my argument and to my astonishment Douglas got up
at once, and cried with his little white, venomous, distorted face:

"Such advice shows you are no friend of Oscar's."

"What do you mean?" I asked in wonderment; but he turned and left the room on
the spot.  To my astonishment Oscar also got up.

"It is not friendly of you, Frank," he said weakly.  "It really is not
friendly."

I stared at him: he was parrotting Douglas' idiotic words.

"Don't be absurd," I said; but he repeated:

"No, Frank, it is not friendly," and went to the door and disappeared.

Like a flash I saw part at least of the truth.  It was not Oscar who had ever
misled Douglas, but Lord Alfred Douglas who was driving Oscar whither he would.

I turned to Shaw.

"Did I say anything in the heat of argument that could have offended Oscar or
Douglas?"

"Nothing," said Shaw, "not a word: you have nothing to reproach yourself with."
(I am very glad that Bernard Shaw has lately put in print his memory of this
conversation.  The above account was printed, though not published, in 1911, and
in 1914 Shaw published his recollection of what took place at this consultation.
Readers may judge from the comparison how far my general story is worthy of
credence.  In the Introduction to his playlet, "The Dark Lady of the Sonnets,"
Shaw writes:

"Yet he (Harris) knows the taste and the value of humour.  He was one of the
few men of letters who really appreciated Oscar Wilde, though he did not rally
fiercely to Wilde's side until the world deserted Oscar in his ruin.  I myself
was present at a curious meeting between the two when Harris on the eve of
the Queensberry trial prophesied to Wilde with miraculous precision exactly
what immediately afterwards happened to him and warned him to leave the country.
It was the first time within my knowledge that such a forecast proved true.
Wilde, though under no illusion as to the folly of the quite unselfish suit-at-
law he had been persuaded to begin, nevertheless so miscalculated the force of
the social vengeance he was unloosing on himself that he fancied it could be
stayed by putting up the editor of "The Saturday Review" (as Mr. Harris then
was) to declare that he considered "Dorian Gray" a highly moral book, which it
certainly is.  When Harris foretold him the truth, Wilde denounced him as a
faint-hearted friend who was failing him in his hour of need and left the room
in anger.  Harris's idiosyncratic power of pity saved him from feeling or
showing the smallest resentment; and events presently proved to Wilde how
insanely he had been advised in taking the action, and how accurately Harris
had gauged the situation.")

Left to myself I was at a loss to imagine what Lord Alfred Douglas proposed to
himself by hounding Oscar on to attack his father.  I was still more surprised
by his white, bitter face.  I could not get rid of the impression it left on
me.  While groping among these reflections I was suddenly struck by a sort of
likeness, a similarity of expression and of temper between Lord Alfred Douglas
and his unhappy father.  I could not get it out of my head--that little face
blanched with rage and the wild, hating eyes; the shrill voice, too, was
Queensberry's.




CHAPTER XIII--OSCAR ATTACKS QUEENSBERRY AND IS WORSTED



It was weakness in Oscar and not strength that allowed him to be driven to the
conflict by Lord Alfred Douglas; it was his weakness again which prevented him
from abandoning the prosecution, once it was begun.  Such a resolution would
have involved a breaking away from his associates and from his friends; a
personal assertion of will of which he was incapable.  Again and again he
answered my urging with:

"I can't, Frank, I can't."

When I pointed out to him that the defence was growing bolder--it was announced
one morning in the newspapers that Lord Queensberry, instead of pleading
paternal privilege and minimising his accusation, was determined to justify
the libel and declare that it was true in every particular--Oscar could only
say weakly:

"I can't help it, Frank, I can't do anything; you only distress me by
predicting disaster."

The fibres of resolution, never strong in him, had been destroyed by years of
self-indulgence, while the influence whipping him was stronger than I guessed.
He was hurried like a sheep to the slaughter.

Although everyone who cared to think knew that Queensberry would win the case,
many persons believed that Oscar would make a brilliant intellectual fight, and
carry off the honours, if not the verdict.

The trial took place at the Central Criminal Court on April 3rd, 1895.  Mr.
Justice Collins was the judge and the case was conducted at first with the
outward seemliness and propriety which are so peculiarly English.  An hour
before the opening of the case the Court was crowded, not a seat to be had
for love or money: even standing room was at a premium.

The Counsel were the best at the Bar; Sir Edward Clarke, Q.C., Mr. Charles
Mathews, and Mr. Travers Humphreys for the prosecution; Mr. Carson, Q.C.,
Mr. G. C. Gill and Mr. A. Gill for the defence.  Mr. Besley, Q.C., and
Mr. Monckton watched the case, it was said, for the brothers, Lord Douglas
of Hawick and Lord Alfred Douglas.

While waiting for the judge, the buzz of talk in the court grew loud;
everybody agreed that the presence of Sir Edward Clarke gave Oscar an advantage.
Mr. Carson was not so well known then as he has since become; he was regarded
as a sharp-witted Irishman who had still his spurs to win.  Some knew he had
been at school with Oscar, and at Trinity College was as high in the second
class as Oscar was in the first.  It was said he envied Oscar his reputation
for brilliance.

Suddenly the loud voice of the clerk called for silence.

As the judge appeared everyone stood up and in complete stillness Sir Edward
Clarke opened for the prosecution.  The bleak face, long upper lip and severe
side whiskers made the little man look exactly like a nonconformist parson of
the old days, but his tone and manner were modern--quiet and conversational.
The charge, he said, was that the defendant had published a false and malicious
libel against Mr. Oscar Wilde.  The libel was in the form of a card which Lord
Queensberry had left at a club to which Mr. Oscar Wilde belonged: it could not
be justified unless the statements written on the card were true.  It would,
however, have been possible to have excused the card by a strong feeling, a
mistaken feeling, on the part of a father, but the plea which the defendant
had brought before the Court raised graver issues.  He said that the statement
was true and was made for the public benefit.  There were besides a series of
accusations in the plea (everyone held his breath), mentioning names of persons,
and it was said with regard to these persons that Mr. Wilde had solicited them
to commit a grave offence and that he had been guilty with each and all of them
of indecent practices. . . ."  My heart seemed to stop.  My worst forebodings
were more than justified.  Vaguely I heard Clarke's voice, "grave responsibility
. . . . serious allegations . . . . credible witnesses . . . . Mr. Oscar
Wilde was the son of Sir William Wilde . . . ." the voice droned on and I awoke
to feverish clearness of brain.  Queensberry had turned the defence into a
prosecution.  Why had he taken the risk?  Who had given him the new and precise
information?  I felt that there was nothing before Oscar but ruin absolute.
Could anything be done?  Even now he could go abroad--even now.  I resolved
once more to try and induce him to fly.

My interest turned from these passionate imaginings to the actual.  Would Sir
Edward Clarke fight the case as it should be fought?  He had begun to tell of
the friendship between Oscar Wilde and Lord Alfred Douglas; the friendship too
between Oscar Wilde and Lady Queensberry, who on her own petition had been
divorced from the Marquis; would he go on to paint the terrible ill-feeling that
existed between Lord Alfred Douglas and his father, and show how Oscar had been
dragged into the bitter family squabble?  To the legal mind this had but little
to do with the case.

We got, instead, a dry relation of the facts which have already been set forth
in this history.  Wright, the porter of the Albemarle Club, was called to say
that Lord Queensberry had handed him the card produced.  Witness had looked
at the card; did not understand it; but put it in an envelope and gave it to
Mr. Wilde.

Mr. Oscar Wilde was then called and went into the witness box.  He looked a
little grave but was composed and serious.  Sir Edward Clarke took him briefly
through the incidents of his life: his successes at school and the University;
the attempts made to blackmail him, the insults of Lord Queensberry, and then
directed his attention to the allegations in the plea impugning his conduct with
different persons.  Mr. Oscar Wilde declared that there was no truth in any of
these statements.  Hereupon Sir Edward Clarke sat down.  Mr. Carson rose and the
death duel began.

Mr. Carson brought out that Oscar Wilde was forty years of age and Lord Alfred
Douglas twenty-four.  Down to the interview in Tite Street Lord Queensberry had
been friendly with Mr. Wilde.

"Had Mr. Wilde written in a publication called "The Chameleon"?"

"Yes."

"Had he written there a story called 'The Priest and the Acolyte'?"

"No."

"Was that story immoral?"

Oscar amused everyone by replying:

"Much worse than immoral, it was badly written," but feeling that this gibe was
too light for the occasion he added:

"It was altogether offensive and perfect twaddle."

He admitted at once that he did not express his disapproval of it; it was
beneath him "to concern himself with the effusions of an illiterate
undergraduate."

"Did Mr. Wilde ever consider the effect in his writings of inciting to
immorality?"

Oscar declared that he aimed neither at good nor evil, but tried to make a
beautiful thing.  When questioned as to the immorality in thought in the article
in "The Chameleon", he retorted "that there is no such thing as morality or
immorality in thought."  A hum of understanding and approval ran through the
court; the intellect is profoundly amoral.

Again and again he scored in this way off Mr. Carson.

"No work of art ever puts forward views; views belong to the Philistines and
not to artists." . . . .

"What do you think of this view?"

"I don't think of any views except my own."

All this while Mr. Carson had been hitting at a man on his own level; but Oscar
Wilde was above him and not one of his blows had taken effect.  Every moment,
too, Oscar grew more and more at his ease, and the combat seemed to be turning
completely in his favour.  Mr. Carson at length took up "Dorian Gray" and began
cross-examining on passages in it.

"You talk about one man adoring another.  Did you ever adore any man?"

"No," replied Oscar quietly, "I have never adored anyone but myself."

The Court roared with laughter.  Oscar went on:

"There are people in the world, I regret to say, who cannot understand the deep
affection that an artist can feel for a friend with a beautiful personality."

He was then questioned about his letter (already quoted here) to Lord Alfred
Douglas.  It was a prose-poem, he said, written in answer to a sonnet.  He had
not written to other people in the same strain, not even to Lord Alfred Douglas
again: he did not repeat himself in style.

Mr. Carson read another letter from Oscar Wilde to Lord Alfred Douglas, which
paints their relations with extraordinary exactness.  Here it is:

Savoy Hotel,

Victoria Embankment, London.

Dearest of all boys,--

Your letter was delightful, red and yellow wine to me; but I am sad and out of
sorts.  Bosie, you must not make scenes with me.  They kill me, they wreck the
loveliness of life.  I cannot see you, so Greek and gracious, distorted with
passion.  I cannot listen to your curved lips saying hideous things to me.  I
would sooner ('here a word is indecipherable,' Mr. Carson went on, 'but I will
ask the witness') (The words which Mr. Carson could not read were: "I would
sooner be rented than, etc."  Rent is a slang term for blackmail.)--than have
you bitter, unjust, hating. . . . . I must see you soon.  You are the divine
thing I want, the thing of genius and beauty; but I don't know how to do it.
Shall I come to Salisbury?  My bill here is L49 for a week.  I have also got
a new sitting-room. . . . . Why are you not here, my dear, my wonderful boy?
I fear I must leave--no money, no credit, and a heart of lead.

Your own Oscar.

Oscar said that it was an expression of his tender admiration for Lord Alfred
Douglas.

"You have said," Mr. Carson went on, "that all the statements about persons in
the plea of justification were false.  Do you still hold to that assertion?"

"I do."

Mr. Carson then paused and looked at the Judge.  Justice Collins shuffled his
papers together and announced that the cross-examination would be continued on
the morrow.  As the Judge went out, all the tongues in the court broke loose.
Oscar was surrounded by friends congratulating him and rejoicing.

I was not so happy and went away to think the matter out.  I tried to keep up
my courage by recalling the humorous things Oscar had said during the cross-
examination.  I recalled too the dull commonplaces of Mr. Carson.  I tried to
persuade myself that it was all going on very well.  But in the back of my mind
I realised that Oscar's answers, characteristic and clever as many of them were,
had not impressed the jury, were indeed rather calculated to alienate them.  He
had taken the purely artistic standpoint, had not attempted to go higher and
reach a synthesis which would conciliate the Philistine jurymen as well as the
thinking public, and the Judge.

Mr. Carson was in closer touch with the jury, being nearer their intellectual
level, and there was a terrible menace in his last words.  Tomorrow, I said to
myself, he will begin to examine about persons and not books.  He did not win
on the literary question, but he was right to bring it in.  The passages he had
quoted, and especially Oscar's letters to Lord Alfred Douglas, had created a
strong prejudice in the minds of the jury.  They ought not to have had this
effect, I thought, but they had.  My contempt for Courts of law deepened:
those twelve jurymen were anything but the peers of the accused: how could they
judge him?

. . . . . . .

The second day of the trial was very different from the first.  There seemed to
be a gloom over the Court.  Oscar went into the box as if it had been the dock;
he had lost all his spring.  Mr. Carson settled down to the cross-examination
with apparent zest.  It was evident from his mere manner that he was coming to
what he regarded as the strong part of his case.  He began by examining Oscar as
to his intimacy with a person named Taylor.

"Has Taylor been to your house and to your chambers?"

"Yes."

"Have you been to Taylor's rooms to afternoon tea parties?"

"Yes."

"Did Taylor's rooms strike you as peculiar?"

"They were pretty rooms."

"Have you ever seen them lit by anything else but candles even in the day time?"

"I think so.  I'm not sure."

"Have you ever met there a young man called Wood?"

"On one occasion."

"Have you ever met Sidney Mavor there at tea?"

"It is possible."

"What was your connection with Taylor?"

"Taylor was a friend, a young man of intelligence and education: he had been to
a good English school."

"Did you know Taylor was being watched by the police?"

"No."

"Did you know that Taylor was arrested with a man named Parker in a raid made
last year on a house in Fitzroy Square?"

"I read of it in the newspaper."

"Did that cause you to drop your acquaintance with Taylor?"

"No; Taylor explained to me that he had gone there to a dance, and that the
magistrate had dismissed the case against him."

"Did you get Taylor to arrange dinners for you to meet young men?"

"No; I have dined with Taylor at a restaurant."

"How many young men has Taylor introduced to you?"

"Five in all."

"Did you give money or presents to these five?"

"I may have done."

"Did they give you anything?"

"Nothing."

"Among the five men Taylor introduced you to, was one named Parker?"

"Yes."

"Did you get on friendly terms with him?"

"Yes."

"Did you call him 'Charlie' and allow him to call you 'Oscar'?"

"Yes."

"How old was Parker?"

"I don't keep a census of people's ages.  It would be vulgar to ask people
their age."

"Where did you first meet Parker?"

"I invited Taylor to Kettner's (A famous Italian restaurant in Soho: it had
several "private rooms.") on the occasion of my birthday, and told him to bring
what friends he liked.  He brought Parker and his brother."

"Did you know Parker was a gentleman's servant out of work, and his brother
a groom?"

"No; I did not."

"But you did know that Parker was not a literary character or an artist, and
that culture was not his strong point?"

"I did."

"What was there in common between you and Charlie Parker?"

"I like people who are young, bright, happy, careless and original.  I do not
like them sensible, and I do not like them old; I don't like social distinctions
of any kind, and the mere fact of youth is so wonderful to me that I would
sooner talk to a young man for half an hour than be cross examined by an
elderly Q.C."

Everyone smiled at this retort.

"Had you chambers in St. James's Place?"

"Yes, from October, '93, to April, '94."

"Did Charlie Parker go and have tea with you there?"

"Yes."

"Did you give him money?"

"I gave him three or four pounds because he said he was hard up."

"What did he give you in return?"

"Nothing."

"Did you give Charlie Parker a silver cigarette case at Christmas?"

"I did."

"Did you visit him one night at 12:30 at Park Walk, Chelsea?"

"I did not."

"Did you write him any beautiful prose-poems?"

"I don't think so."

"Did you know that Charlie Parker had enlisted in the Army?"

"I have heard so."

"When you heard that Taylor was arrested what did you do?"

"I was greatly distressed and wrote to tell him so."

"When did you first meet Fred Atkins?"

"In October or November, '92."

"Did he tell you that he was employed by a firm of bookmakers?"

"He may have done."

"Not a literary man or an artist, was he?"

"No."

"What age was he?"

"Nineteen or twenty."

"Did you ask him to dinner at Kettner's?"

"I think I met him at a dinner at Kettner's."

"Was Taylor at the dinner?"

"He may have been."

"Did you meet him afterwards?"

"I did."

"Did you call him 'Fred' and let him call you 'Oscar'?"

"Yes."

"Did you go to Paris with him?"

"Yes."

"Did you give him money?"

"Yes."

"Was there ever any impropriety between you?"

"No."

"When did you first meet Ernest Scarfe?"

"In December, 1893."

"Who introduced him to you?"

"Taylor."

"Scarfe was out of work, was he not?"

"He may have been."

"Did Taylor bring Scarfe to you at St. James's Place?"

"Yes."

"Did you give Scarfe a cigarette case?"

"Yes: it was my custom to give cigarette cases to people I liked."

"When did you first meet Mavor?"

"In '93."

"Did you give him money or a cigarette case?"

"A cigarette case."

"Did you know Walter Grainger?" . . . . and so on till the very air in the court
seemed peopled with spectres.

On the whole Oscar bore the cross-examination very well; but he made one
appalling slip.

Mr. Carson was pressing him as to his relations with the boy Grainger, who had
been employed in Lord Alfred Douglas' rooms in Oxford.

"Did you ever kiss him?" he asked.

Oscar answered carelessly, "Oh, dear, no.  He was a peculiarly plain boy.
He was, unfortunately, extremely ugly.  I pitied him for it."

"Was that the reason why you did not kiss him?"

"Oh, Mr. Carson, you are pertinently insolent."

"Did you say that in support of your statement that you never kissed him?"

"No.  It is a childish question."

But Carson was not to be warded off; like a terrier he sprang again and again:

"Why, sir, did you mention that this boy was extremely ugly?"

"For this reason.  If I were asked why I did not kiss a door-mat, I should say
because I do not like to kiss door-mats." . . . . . .

"Why did you mention his ugliness?"

"It is ridiculous to imagine that any such thing could have occurred under
any circumstances."

"Then why did you mention his ugliness, I ask you?"

"Because you insulted me by an insulting question."

"Was that a reason why you should say the boy was ugly?"

(Here the witness began several answers almost inarticulately and finished
none of them.  His efforts to collect his ideas were not aided by Mr. Carson's
sharp staccato repetition: "Why? why? why did you add that?") At last the
witness answered:

"You sting me and insult me and at times one says things flippantly."

Then came the re-examination by Sir Edward Clarke, which brought out very
clearly the hatred of Lord Alfred Douglas for his father.  Letters were read
and in one letter Queensberry declared that Oscar had plainly shown the white
feather when he called on him.  One felt that this was probably true:
Queensberry's word on such a point could be accepted.

In the reexamination Sir Edward Clarke occupied himself chiefly with two youths,
Shelley and Conway, who had been passed over casually by Mr. Carson.  In answer
to his questions Oscar stated that Shelley was a youth in the employ of Mathews
and Lane, the publishers.  Shelley had very good taste in literature and a great
desire for culture.  Shelley had read all his books and liked them.  Shelley
had dined with him and his wife at Tite Street.  Shelley was in every way a
gentleman.  He had never gone with Charlie Parker to the Savoy Hotel.

A juryman wanted to know at this point whether the witness was aware of the
nature of the article, "The Priest and the Acolyte," in "The Chameleon".

"I knew nothing of it; it came as a terrible shock to me."

This answer contrasted strangely with the light tone of his reply to the same
question on the previous day.

The reexamination did not improve Oscar's position.  It left all the facts where
they were, and at least a suspicion in every mind.

Sir Edward Clarke intimated that this concluded the evidence for the
prosecution, whereupon Mr. Carson rose to make the opening speech for the
defence.  I was shivering with apprehension.

He began by admitting the grave responsibility resting on Lord Queensberry, who
accepted it to the fullest.  Lord Queensberry was justified in doing all he
could do to cut short an acquaintance which must be disastrous to his son.  Mr.
Carson wished to draw the attention of the jury to the fact that all these men
with whom Mr. Wilde went about were discharged servants and grooms, and that
they were all about the same age.  He asked the jury also to note that Taylor,
who was the pivot of the whole case, had not yet been put in the box.  Why not?
He pointed out to the jury that the very same idea that was set forth in "The
Priest and the Acolyte" was contained in Oscar Wilde's letters to Lord Alfred
Douglas, and the same idea was to be found in Lord Alfred Douglas' poem, "The
Two Loves," (This early poem of Lord Alfred Douglas is reproduced in the
Appendix at the end of this book together with another poem by the same author,
which was also mentioned in the course of the trial.) which was published in
"The Chameleon".  He went on to say that when, in the story of "The Priest and
the Acolyte," the boy was discovered in the priest's bed, (Mr. Carson here made
a mistake; there is no such incident in the story: the error merely shows how
prejudiced his mind was.) the priest made the same defence as Mr. Wilde had
made, that the world does not understand the beauty of this love.  The same idea
was found again in "Dorian Gray," and he read two or three passages from the
book in support of this statement.  Mr. Wilde had described his letter to Lord
Alfred Douglas as a prose sonnet.  He would read it again to the court, and he
read both the letters.  "Mr. Wilde says they are beautiful," he went on, "I call
them an abominable piece of disgusting immorality."

At this the Judge again shuffled his papers together and whispered in a quiet
voice that the court would sit on the morrow, and left the room.

The honours of the day had all been with Mr. Carson.  Oscar left the box in a
depressed way.  One or two friends came towards him, but the majority held
aloof, and in almost unbroken silence everyone slipped out of the court.
Strange to say in my mind there was just a ray of hope.  Mr. Carson was still
laying stress on the article in "The Chameleon" and scattered passages in
"Dorian Gray"; on Oscar's letters to Lord Alfred Douglas and Lord Alfred
Douglas' poems in "The Chameleon".  He must see, I thought, that all this was
extremely weak.  Sir Edward Clarke could be trusted to tear all such arguments,
founded on literary work, to shreds.  There was room for more than reasonable
doubt about all such things.

Why had not Mr. Carson put some of the young men he spoke of in the box?  Would
he be able to do that?  He talked of Taylor as "the pivot of the case," and
gibed at the prosecution for not putting Taylor in the box.  Would he put Taylor
in the box?  And why, if he had such witnesses at his beck and call, should he
lay stress on the flimsy, weak evidence to be drawn from passages in books and
poems and letters?  One thing was clear: if he was able to put any of the young
men in the box about whom he had examined Oscar, Oscar was ruined.  Even if he
rested his defence on the letters and poems he'd win and Oscar would be
discredited, for already it was clear that no jury would give Oscar Wilde a
verdict against a father trying to protect his son.  The issue had narrowed down
to terrible straits: would it be utter ruin to Oscar or merely loss of the case
and reputation?  We had only sixteen hours to wait; they seemed to me to hold
the last hope.

I drove to Tite Street, hoping to see Oscar.  I was convinced that Carson had
important witnesses at his command, and that the outcome of the case would be
disastrous.  Why should not Oscar even now, this very evening, cross to Calais,
leaving a letter for his counsel and the court abandoning the idiotic
prosecution.

The house at Tite Street seemed deserted.  For some time no one answered my
knocking and ringing, and then a man-servant simply told me that Mr. Wilde was
not in: he did not know whether Mr. Wilde was expected back or not; did not
think he was coming back.  I turned and went home.  I thought Oscar would
probably say to me again:

"I can do nothing, Frank, nothing."

. . . . . . .

The feeling in the court next morning was good tempered, even jaunty.  The
benches were filled with young barristers, all of whom had made up their minds
that the testimony would be what one of them called "nifty."  Everyone treated
the case as practically over.

"But will Carson call witnesses?" I asked.

"Of course he will," they said, "but in any case Wilde does not stand a ghost of
a chance of getting a verdict against Queensberry; he was a bally fool to bring
such an action."

"The question is," said someone, "will Wilde face the music?"

My heart leapt.  Perhaps he had gone, fled already to France to avoid this
dreadful, useless torture.  I could see the hounds with open mouths, dripping
white fangs, and greedy eyes all closing in on the defenceless quarry.  Would
the huntsman give the word?  We were not left long in doubt.

Mr. Carson continued his statement for the defence.  He had sufficiently
demonstrated to the jury, he thought, that, so far as Lord Queensberry was
concerned, he was absolutely justified in bringing to a climax in the way he
had, the connection between Mr. Oscar Wilde and his son.  A dramatic pause.

A moment later the clever advocate resumed: unfortunately he had a more painful
part of the case to approach.  It would be his painful duty to bring before them
one after the other the young men he had examined Mr. Wilde about and allow them
to tell their tales.  In no one of these cases were these young men on an
equality in any way with Mr. Wilde.  Mr. Wilde had told them that there was
something beautiful and charming about youth which led him to make these
acquaintances.  That was a travesty of the facts.  Mr. Wilde preferred to know
nothing of these young men and their antecedents.  He knew nothing about Wood;
he knew nothing about Parker; he knew nothing about Scarfe, nothing about
Conway, and not much about Taylor.  The truth was Taylor was the procurer for
Mr. Wilde and the jury would hear from this young man Parker, who would have to
tell his unfortunate story to them, that he was poor, out of a place, had no
money, and unfortunately fell a victim to Mr. Wilde.  (Sir Edward Clarke here
left the court.)

On the first evening they met, Mr. Wilde called Parker "Charlie" and Parker
called Mr. Wilde "Oscar."  It may be a very noble instinct in some people to
wish to break down social barriers, but Mr. Wilde's conduct was not ordered by
generous instincts.  Luxurious dinners and champagne were not the way to assist
a poor man.  Parker would tell them that, after this first dinner, Mr. Wilde
invited him to drive with him to the Savoy Hotel.  Mr. Wilde had not told them
why he had that suite of rooms at the Savoy Hotel.  Parker would tell them what
happened on arriving there.  This was the scandal Lord Queensberry had referred
to in his letter as far back as June or July last year.  The jury would wonder
not at the reports having reached Lord Queensberry's ears, but that Oscar Wilde
had been tolerated in London society as long as he had been.  Parker had since
enlisted in the Army, and bore a good character.  Mr. Wilde himself had said
that Parker was respectable.  Parker would reluctantly present himself to tell
his story to the jury.

All this time the court was hushed with awe and wonder; everyone was asking what
on earth had induced Wilde to begin the prosecution; what madness had driven him
and why had he listened to the insane advice to bring the action when he must
have known the sort of evidence which could be brought against him.

After promising to produce Parker and the others Mr. Carson stopped speaking
and began looking through his papers; when he began again, everyone held his
breath; what was coming now?  He proceeded in the same matter-of-fact and
serious way to deal with the case of the youth, Conway.  Conway, it appeared,
had known Mr. Wilde and his family at Worthing.  Conway was sixteen years of
age. . . . . At this moment Sir Edward Clarke returned with Mr. Charles Mathews,
and asked permission of the judge to have a word or two with Mr. Carson.  At the
close of a few minutes' talk between the counsel, Sir Edward Clarke rose and
told the Judge that after communicating with Mr. Oscar Wilde he thought it
better to withdraw the prosecution and submit to a verdict of "not guilty."

He minimised the defeat.  He declared that, in respect to matters connected
with literature and the letters, he could not resist the verdict of "not
guilty," having regard to the fact that Lord Queensberry had not used a direct
accusation, but the words "posing as," etc.  Besides, he wished to spare the
jury the necessity of investigating in detail matter of the most appalling
character.  He wished to make an end of the case--and he sat down.

Why on earth did Sir Edward Clarke not advise Oscar in this way weeks before?
Why did he not tell him his case could not possibly be won?

I have heard since on excellent authority that before taking up the case Sir
Edward Clarke asked Oscar Wilde whether he was guilty or not, and accepted in
good faith his assurance that he was innocent.  As soon as he realised, in
court, the strength of the case against Oscar he advised him to abandon the
prosecution.  To his astonishment Oscar was eager to abandon it.  Sir Edward
Clarke afterwards defended his unfortunate client out of loyalty and pity, Oscar
again assuring him of his innocence.

Mr. Carson rose at once and insisted, as was his right, that this verdict of
"not guilty" must be understood to mean that Lord Queensberry had succeeded in
his plea of justification.

Mr. Justice Collins thought that it was not part of the function of the Judge
and jury to insist on wading through prurient details, which had no bearing on
the matter at issue, which had already been decided by the consent of the
prosecutors to a verdict of "not guilty."  Such a verdict meant of course that
the plea of justification was proved.  The jury having consulted for a few
moments, the Clerk of Arraigns asked:

"Do you find the plea of justification has been proved or not?"

Foreman: "Yes."

"You say that the defendant is 'not guilty,' and that is the verdict of
you all?"

Foreman: "Yes, and we also find that it is for the public benefit."

The last kick to the dead lion.  As the verdict was read out the spectators
in the court burst into cheers.

Mr. Carson: "Of course the costs of the defence will follow?"

Mr. Justice Collins: "Yes."

Mr. C. F. Gill: "And Lord Queensberry may be discharged?"

Mr. Justice Collins: "Certainly."

The Marquis of Queensberry left the dock amid renewed cheering, which was taken
up again and again in the street.




CHAPTER XIV--HOW GENIUS IS PERSECUTED IN ENGLAND



The English are very proud of their sense of justice, proud too of their Roman
law and the practice of the Courts in which they have incorporated it.  They
boast of their fair play in all things as the French boast of their lightness,
and if you question it, you lose caste with them, as one prejudiced or ignorant
or both.  English justice cannot be bought, they say, and if it is dear,
excessively dear even, they rather like to feel they have paid a long price for
a good article.  Yet it may be that here, as in other things, they take outward
propriety and decorum for the inward and ineffable grace.  That a judge should
be incorruptible is not so important as that he should be wise and humane.

English journalists and barristers were very much amused at the conduct of
the Dreyfus case; yet, when Dreyfus was being tried for the second time in
France, two or three instances of similar injustice in England were set forth
with circumstance in one of the London newspapers, but no one paid any effective
attention to them.  If Dreyfus had been convicted in England, it is probable
that no voice would ever have been raised in his favour; it is absolutely
certain that there would never have been a second trial.  A keen sense of
abstract justice is only to be found in conjunction with a rich fount of
imaginative sympathy.  The English are too self-absorbed to take much interest
in their neighbours' affairs, too busy to care for abstract questions of right
or wrong.

Before the trial of Oscar Wilde I still believed that in a criminal case rough
justice would be done in England.  The bias of an English judge, I said to
myself, is always in favour of the accused.  It is an honourable tradition of
English procedure that even the Treasury barristers should state rather less
than they can prove against the unfortunate person who is being attacked by all
the power and authority of the State.  I was soon forced to see that these
honourable and praiseworthy conventions were as withes of straw in the fire of
English prejudice.  The first thing to set me doubting was that the judge did
not try to check the cheering in Court after the verdict in favour of Lord
Queensberry.  English judges always resent and resist such popular outbursts:
why not in this case?  After all, no judge could think Queensberry a hero: he
was too well known for that, and yet the cheering swelled again and again, and
the judge gathered up his papers without a word and went his way as if he were
deaf.  A dreadful apprehension crept over me: in spite of myself I began to
realise that my belief in English justice might be altogether mistaken.  It was
to me as if the solid earth had become a quaking bog, or indeed as if a child
had suddenly discovered its parent to be shameless.  The subsequent trials are
among the most painful experiences of my life.  I shall try to set down all the
incidents fairly.

One peculiarity had first struck me in the conduct of the case between Oscar
Wilde and Lord Queensberry that did not seem to occur to any of the numberless
journalists and writers who commented on the trial.  It was apparent from his
letter to his son (which I published in a previous chapter), and from the fact
that he called at Oscar Wilde's house that Lord Queensberry at the beginning
did not believe in the truth of his accusations; he set them forth as a violent
man sets forth hearsay and suspicion, knowing that as a father he could do this
with impunity, and accordingly at first he pleaded privilege.  Some time between
the beginning of the prosecution and the trial, he obtained an immense amount
of unexpected evidence.  He then justified his libel and gave the names of the
persons whom he intended to call to prove his case.  Where did he get this new
knowledge?

I have spoken again and again in the course of this narrative of Oscar's
enemies, asserting that the English middle-class as puritans detested his
attitude and way of life, and if some fanatic or representative of the
nonconformist conscience had hunted up evidence against Wilde and brought him
to ruin there would have been nothing extraordinary in a vengeance which might
have been regarded as a duty.  Strange to say the effective hatred of Oscar
Wilde was shown by a man of the upper class who was anything but a puritan.
It was Mr. Charles Brookfield, I believe, who constituted himself private
prosecutor in this case and raked Piccadilly to find witnesses against Oscar
Wilde.  Mr. Brookfield was afterwards appointed Censor of Plays on the strength
apparently of having himself written one of the "riskiest" plays of the period.
As I do not know Mr. Brookfield, I will not judge him.  But his appointment
always seemed to me, even before I knew that he had acted against Wilde,
curiously characteristic of English life and of the casual, contemptuous way
Englishmen of the governing class regard letters.  In the same spirit Lord
Salisbury as Prime Minister made a journalist Poet Laureate simply because he
had puffed him for years in the columns of "The Standard."  Lord Salisbury
probably neither knew nor cared that Alfred Austin had never written a line that
could live.  One thing Mr. Brookfield's witnesses established: every offence
alleged against Oscar Wilde dated from 1892 or later--after his first meeting
with Lord Alfred Douglas.

But at the time all such matters were lost for me in the questions: would the
authorities arrest Oscar?  or would they allow him to escape?  Had the police
asked for a warrant?  Knowing English custom and the desire of Englishmen to
pass in silence over all unpleasant sexual matters, I thought he would be given
the hint to go abroad and allowed to escape.  That is the ordinary, the usual
English procedure.  Everyone knows the case of a certain lord, notorious for
similar practices, who was warned by the police that a warrant had been issued
against him: taking the hint he has lived for many years past in leisured ease
as an honoured guest in Florence.  Nor is it only aristocrats who are so
favoured by English justice: everyone can remember the case of a Canon of
Westminster who was similarly warned and also escaped.  We can come down the
social scale to the very bottom and find the same practice.  A certain
journalist unwittingly offended a great personage.  Immediately he was warned by
the police that a warrant issued against him in India seventeen years before
would at once be acted upon if he did not make himself scarce.  For some time
he lived in peaceful retirement in Belgium.  Moreover, in all these cases the
warrants had been issued on the sworn complaints of the parties damnified or of
their parents and guardians: no one had complained of Oscar Wilde.  Naturally
I thought the dislike of publicity which dictated such lenience to the lord and
the canon and the journalist would be even more operative in the case of a man
of genius like Oscar Wilde.  In certain ways he had a greater position than even
the son of a duke: the shocking details of his trial would have an appalling,
a world-wide publicity.

Besides, I said to myself, the governing class in England is steeped in
aristocratic prejudice, and particularly when threatened by democratic
innovations, all superiorities, whether of birth or wealth, or talent, are
conscious of the same "raison d'etre" and have the same self-interest.  The
lord, the millionaire and the genius have all the same reason for standing up
for each other, and this reason is usually effective.  Everyone knows that in
England the law is emphatically a respecter of persons.  It is not there to
promote equality, much less is it the defender of the helpless, the weak and the
poor; it is a rampart for the aristocracy and the rich, a whip in the hands of
the strong.  It is always used to increase the effect of natural and inherited
inequality, and it is not directed by a high feeling of justice; but perverted
by aristocratic prejudice and snobbishness; it is not higher than democratic
equality, but lower and more sordid.

The case was just a case where an aristocratic society could and should have
shown its superiority over a democratic society with its rough rule of equality.
For equality is only half-way on the road to justice.  More than once the House
of Commons has recognised this fundamental truth; it condemned Clive but added
that he had rendered "great and distinguished services to his country"; and no
one thought of punishing him for his crimes.

Our time is even more tolerant and more corrupt.  For a worse crime than
extortion Cecil Rhodes was not even brought to trial, but honoured and feted,
while his creatures, who were condemned by the House of Commons Committee, were
rewarded by the Government.

Had not Wilde also rendered distinguished services to his country?  The wars
waged against the Mashonas and Matabeles were a doubtful good; but the plays of
Oscar Wilde had already given many hours of innocent pleasure to thousands of
persons, and were evidently destined to benefit tens of thousands in the future.
Such a man is a benefactor of humanity in the best and truest sense, and
deserves peculiar consideration.

To the society favourite the discredit of the trial with Lord Queensberry was in
itself a punishment more than sufficient.  Everyone knew when Oscar Wilde left
the court that he left it a ruined and disgraced man.  Was it worth while to
stir up all the foul mud again in order to beat the beaten?  Alas! the English
are pedants, as Goethe saw; they think little of literary men, or of merely
spiritual achievements.  They love to abide by rules and pay no heed to
exceptions, unless indeed the exceptions are men of title or great wealth, or
"persons of importance" to the Government.  The majority of the people are too
ignorant to know the value of a book and they regard poetry as the thistledown
of speech.  It does not occur to Englishmen that a phrase may be more valuable
and more enduring in its effects than a long campaign and a dozen victories.
Yet, the sentence, "Let him that is without sin among you first cast the stone,"
or Shakespeare's version of the same truth: "if we had our deserts which of us
would escape whipping?" is likely to outlast the British Empire, and prove of
more value to humanity.

The man of genius in Great Britain is feared and hated in exact proportion to
his originality, and if he happens to be a writer or a musician he is despised
to boot.  The prejudice against Oscar Wilde showed itself virulently on all
hands.  Mr. Justice Collins did not attempt to restrain the cheering of the
court that greeted the success of Lord Queensberry.  Not one of the policemen
who stood round the door tried to stop the "booing" of the crowd who pursued
Oscar Wilde with hootings and vile cries when he left the court.  He was judged
already and condemned before being tried.

The police, too, acted against him with extraordinary vigour.  It has been
stated by Mr. Sherard in his "Life" that the police did not attempt to execute
the warrant against Wilde, "till after the last train had left for Dover," and
that it was only Oscar's obstinacy in remaining in London that necessitated his
arrest.  This idea is wholly imaginary.

It is worth while to know exactly what took place at this juncture.  From
Oscar's conduct in this crisis the reader will be able to judge whether he has
been depicted faithfully or not in this book.  He has been described as amiable,
weak, of a charming disposition--easily led in action, though not in thought:
now we shall see how far we were justified, for he is at one of those moments
which try the soul.  Fortunately every incident of that day is known: Oscar
himself told me generally what happened and the minutest details of the picture
were filled in for me a little later by his best friend, Robert Ross.

In the morning Mr. Mathews, one of Oscar's counsel, came to him and said:
"If you wish it, Clarke and I will keep the case going and give you time to
get to Calais."

Oscar refused to stir.  "I'll stay," was all he would say.  Robert Ross urged
him to accept Mathew's offer; but he would not: why?  I am sure he had no
reason, for I put the question to him more than once, and even after reflecting,
he had no explanation to give.  He stayed because to stay was easier than to
make an immediate decision and act on it energetically.  He had very little will
power to begin with and his mode of life had weakened his original endowment.

After the judgment had been given in favour of Queensberry, Oscar drove off
in a brougham, accompanied by Alfred Douglas, to consult with his solicitor,
Humphreys.  At the same time he gave Ross a cheque on his bank in St. James's
Street.  At that moment he intended to fly.

Ross noticed that he was followed by a detective.  He drew about L200 from the
bank and raced off to meet Oscar at the Cadogan Hotel, in Sloane Street, where
Lord Alfred Douglas had been staying for the past four or five weeks.  Ross
reached the Cadogan Hotel about 1.45 and found Oscar there with Reggie Turner.
Both of them advised Oscar to go at once to Dover and try to get to France; but
he would only say, "the train has gone; it is too late."  He had again lapsed
into inaction.

He asked Ross to go to see his wife and tell her what had occurred.  Ross did
this and had a very painful scene: Mrs. Wilde wept and said, "I hope Oscar is
going away abroad."

Ross returned to the Cadogan Hotel and told Oscar what his wife had said, but
even this didn't move him to action.

He sat as if glued to his chair, and drank hock and seltzer steadily in almost
unbroken silence.  About four o'clock George Wyndham came to see his cousin,
Alfred Douglas; not finding him, he wanted to see Oscar, but Oscar, fearing
reproaches, sent Ross instead.  Wyndham said it was a pity that Bosie Douglas
should be with Oscar, and Ross immediately told him that Wilde's friends for
years past had been trying to separate them and that if he, Wyndham, would keep
his cousin away, he would be doing Oscar the very greatest kindness.  At this
Wyndham grew more civil, though still "frightfully agitated," and begged Ross to
get Oscar to leave the country at once to avoid scandal.  Ross replied that he
and Turner had been trying to bring that about for hours.  In the middle of the
conversation Bosie, having returned, burst into the room with: "I want to see my
cousin," and Ross rejoined Oscar.  In a quarter of an hour Bosie followed him to
say that he was going out with Wyndham to see someone of importance.

About five o'clock a reporter of the "Star" newspaper came to see Oscar, a
Mr. Marlowe, who is now editor of "The Daily Mail", but again Oscar refused to
see him and sent Ross.  Mr. Marlowe was sympathetic and quite understood the
position; he informed Ross that a tape message had come through to the paper
saying that a warrant for Oscar Wilde had already been issued.  Ross immediately
went into the other room and told Oscar, who said nothing, but "went very grey
in the face."

A moment later Oscar asked Ross to give him the money he had got at the bank,
though he had refused it several times in the course of the day.  Ross gave it
to him, naturally taking it for a sign that he had at length made up his mind
to start, but immediately afterwards Oscar settled down in his chair and said,
"I shall stay and do my sentence whatever it is"--a man evidently incapable
of action.

For the next hour the trio sat waiting for the blow to fall.  Once or twice
Oscar asked querulously where Bosie was, but no one could tell him.

At ten past six the waiter knocked at the door and Ross answered it.  There were
two detectives.  The elder entered and said, "We have a warrant here, Mr. Wilde,
for your arrest on a charge of committing indecent acts."  Wilde wanted to know
whether he would be given bail; the detective replied:

"That is a question for the magistrate."

Oscar then rose and asked, "Where shall I be taken?"

"To Bow Street," was the reply.

As he picked up a copy of the Yellow Book and groped for his overcoat, they
all noticed that he was "very drunk" though still perfectly conscious of what
he was doing.

He asked Ross to go to Tite Street and get him a change of clothes and bring
them to Bow Street.  The two detectives took him away in a four-wheeler, leaving
Ross and Turner on the curb.

Ross hurried to Tite Street.  He found that Mrs. Oscar Wilde had gone to the
house of a relative and there was only Wilde's man servant, Arthur, in the
house, who afterwards went out of his mind, and is still, it is said, in an
asylum.  He had an intense affection for Oscar.  Ross found that Mrs. Oscar
Wilde had locked up Oscar's bedroom and study.  He burst open the bedroom door
and, with the help of Arthur, packed up a change of things.  He then hurried to
Bow Street, where he found a howling mob shouting indecencies.  He was informed
by an inspector that it was impossible to see Wilde or to leave any clothes for
him.

Ross returned at once to Tite Street, forced open the library door and removed
a certain number of letters and manuscripts of Wilde's; but unluckily he
couldn't find the two MSS.  which he knew had been returned to Tite Street two
days before, namely, "A Florentine Tragedy" and the enlarged version of "The
Portrait of Mr. W. H."

Ross then drove to his mother's and collapsed.  Mrs. Ross insisted that he
should go abroad, and in order to induce him to do it gave L500 for Oscar's
defence.  Ross went to the Terminus Hotel at Calais, where Bosie Douglas joined
him a little later.  They both stayed there while Oscar was being tried before
Mr. Justice Charles and one day George Wyndham crossed the Channel to see Bosie
Douglas.

There is of course some excuse to be made for the chief actor.  Oscar was
physically tired and morally broken.  He had pulled the fair building of
reputation and success down upon his own head, and, with the "booing" of the
mob still in his ears, he could think of nothing but the lost hours when he
ought to have used his money to take him beyond the reach of his pursuers.

His enemies, on the other hand, had acted with the utmost promptitude.  Lord
Queensberry's solicitor, Mr. Charles Russell, had stated that it was not his
client's intention to take the initiative in any criminal prosecution of
Mr. Oscar Wilde, but, on the very same morning when Wilde withdrew from the
prosecution, Mr. Russell sent a letter to the Hon. Hamilton Cuffe, the Director
of Public Prosecutions, with a copy of "all our witnesses' statements, together
with a copy of the shorthand notes of the trial."

The Treasury authorities were at least as eager.  As soon as possible after
leaving the court Mr. C. F. Gill, Mr. Angus Lewis, and Mr. Charles Russell
waited on Sir John Bridge at Bow Street in his private room and obtained a
warrant for the arrest of Oscar Wilde, which was executed, as we have seen,
the same evening.

The police showed him less than no favour.  About eight o'clock Lord Alfred
Douglas drove to Bow Street and wanted to know if Wilde could be bailed out,
but was informed that his application could not be entertained.  He offered
to procure comforts for the prisoner: this offer also was peremptorily refused
by the police inspector just as Ross's offer of night clothes had been refused.
It is a common belief that in England a man is treated as innocent until he has
been proved guilty, but those who believe this pleasant fiction, have never been
in the hands of the English police.  As soon as a man is arrested on any charge
he is at once treated as if he were a dangerous criminal; he is searched, for
instance, with every circumstance of indignity.  Before his conviction a man is
allowed to wear his own clothes; but a change of linen or clothes is denied him,
or accorded in part and grudgingly, for no earthly reason except to gratify the
ill-will of the gaolers.

The warrant on which Oscar Wilde was arrested charged him with an offence
alleged to have been committed under Section xi.  of the Criminal Amendment Act
of 1885; in other words, he was arrested and tried for an offence which was not
punishable by law ten years before.  This Act was brought in as a result of the
shameful and sentimental stories (evidently for the most part manufactured)
which Mr. Stead had published in "The Pall Mall Gazette" under the title of
"Modern Babylon."  In order to cover and justify their prophet some of the "unco
guid" pressed forward this so-called legislative reform, by which it was made a
criminal offence to take liberties with a girl under thirteen years of age--even
with her own consent.  Intimacy with minors under sixteen was punishable if they
consented or even tempted.  Mr. Labouchere, the Radical member, inflamed, it is
said, with a desire to make the law ridiculous, gravely proposed that the
section be extended, so as to apply to people of the same sex who indulged in
familiarities or indecencies.  The Puritan faction had no logical objection to
the extension, and it became the law of the land.  It was by virtue of this
piece of legislative wisdom, which is without a model and without a copy in the
law of any other civilised country, that Oscar Wilde was arrested and thrown
into prison.

His arrest was the signal for an orgy of Philistine rancour such as even London
had never known before.  The puritan middle class, which had always regarded
Wilde with dislike as an artist and intellectual scoffer, a mere parasite of the
aristocracy, now gave free scope to their disgust and contempt, and everyone
tried to outdo his neighbour in expressions of loathing and abhorrence.  This
middle class condemnation swept the lower class away in its train.  To do them
justice, the common people, too, felt a natural loathing for the peculiar vice
attributed to Wilde; most men condemn the sins they have no mind to; but their
dislike was rather contemptuous than profound, and with customary humour they
soon turned the whole case into a bestial, obscene joke.  "Oscar" took the place
of their favourite word as a term of contempt, and they shouted it at each other
on all sides; bus-drivers, cabbies and paper sellers using it in and out of
season with the keenest relish.  For the moment the upper classes lay mum-
chance and let the storm blow over.  Some of them of course agreed with the
condemnation of the Puritans, and many of them felt that Oscar and his
associates had been too bold, and ought to be pulled up.

The English journals, which are nothing but middle-class shops, took the
side of their patrons.  Without a single exception they outdid themselves in
condemnation of the man and all his works.  You might have thought to read their
bitter diatribes that they themselves lived saintly lives, and were shocked at
sensual sin.  One rubbed one's eyes in amazement.  The Strand and Fleet Street,
which practically belong to this class and have been fashioned by them, are the
haunt of as vile a prostitution as can be found in Europe; the public houses
which these men frequent are low drinking dens; yet they all lashed Oscar Wilde
with every variety of insult as if they themselves had been above reproach.  The
whole of London seemed to have broken loose in a rage of contempt and loathing
which was whipped up and justified each morning by the hypocritical articles of
the "unco guid" in the daily this and the weekly that.  In the streets one heard
everywhere the loud jests of the vulgar, decked out with filthy anecdotes and
punctuated by obscene laughter, as from the mouth of the Pit.

In spite of the hatred of the journalists pandering to the prejudice of their
paymasters, one could hope still that the magistrate would show some regard
for fair play.  The expectation, reasonable or unreasonable, was doomed to
disappointment.  On Saturday morning, the 6th, Oscar Wilde, "described as a
gentleman," the papers said in derision, was brought before Sir John Bridge.
Mr. C. F. Gill, who had been employed in the Queensberry trial, was instructed
by Mr. Angus Lewis of the Treasury, and conducted the prosecution; Alfred Taylor
was placed in the dock charged with conspiracy with Oscar Wilde.  The witnesses
have already been described in connection with the Queensberry case.  Charles
Parker, William Parker, Alfred Wood, Sidney Mavor and Shelley all gave evidence.

After lasting all day the case was adjourned till the following Thursday.

Mr. Travers Humphreys applied for bail for Mr. Wilde, on the ground that he knew
the warrant against him was being applied for on Friday afternoon, but he made
no attempt to leave London.  Sir John Bridge refused bail.

On Thursday, the 11th, the case was continued before Sir John Bridge, and in the
end both the accused were committed for trial.  Again Mr. Humphreys applied for
bail, and again the magistrate refused to accept bail.

Now to refuse bail in cases of serious crime may be defended, but in the case of
indecent conduct it is usually granted.  To run away is regarded as a confession
of guilt, and what could one wish for more than the perpetual banishment of the
corrupt liver, consequently there is no reason to refuse bail.  But in this
case, though bail was offered to any amount, it was refused peremptorily in
spite of the fact that every consideration should have been shown to an accused
person who had already had a good opportunity to leave the country and had
refused to budge.  Moreover, Oscar Wilde had already been criticised and
condemned in a hundred papers.  There was widespread prejudice against him,
no risk to the public in accepting bail, and considerable injury done to the
accused in refusing it.  His affairs were certain to be thrown into confusion;
he was known not to be rich and yet he was deprived of the power to get money
together and to collect evidence just when the power which freedom confers was
most needed by him.

The magistrate was as prejudiced as the public; he had no more idea of standing
for justice and fair play than Pilate; probably, indeed, he never gave himself
the trouble to think of fairness in the matter.  A large salary is paid to
magistrates in London, L1,500 a year, but it is rare indeed that any of them
rises above the vulgarest prejudice.  Sir John Bridge not only refused bail but
he was careful to give his reasons for refusing it: he had not the slightest
scruple about prejudicing the case even before he had heard a word of the
defence.  After hearing the evidence for the prosecution he said:

"The responsibility of accepting or refusing bail rests upon me.  The
considerations that weigh with me are the gravity of the offences and
the strength of the evidence.  I must absolutely refuse bail and send the
prisoners for trial."

Now these reasons, which he proffered voluntarily, and especially the use of the
word "absolutely," showed not only prejudice on the part of Sir John Bridge, but
the desire to injure the unfortunate prisoner in the public mind and so continue
the evil work of the journalists.

The effect of this prejudice and rancour on the part of the whole community had
various consequences.

The mere news that Oscar Wilde had been arrested and taken to Holloway startled
London and gave the signal for a strange exodus.  Every train to Dover was
crowded; every steamer to Calais thronged with members of the aristocratic and
leisured classes, who seemed to prefer Paris, or even Nice out of the season,
to a city like London, where the police might act with such unexpected vigour.
The truth was that the cultured aesthetes whom I have already described had
been thunderstruck by the facts which the Queensberry trial had laid bare.  For
the first time they learned that such houses as Taylor's were under police
supervision, and that creatures like Wood and Parker were classified and
watched.  They had imagined that in "the home of liberty" such practices passed
unnoticed.  It came as a shock to their preconceived ideas that the police
in London knew a great many things which they were not supposed to concern
themselves with, and this unwelcome glare of light drove the vicious forth
in wild haste.

Never was Paris so crowded with members of the English governing classes; here
was to be seen a famous ex-Minister; there the fine face of the president of a
Royal society; at one table in the Cafe; de la Paix, a millionaire recently
ennobled, and celebrated for his exquisite taste in art; opposite to him a
famous general.  It was even said that a celebrated English actor took a return
ticket for three or four days to Paris, just to be in the fashion.  The mummer
returned quickly; but the majority of the migrants stayed abroad for some time.
The wind of terror which had swept them across the Channel opposed their return,
and they scattered over the Continent from Naples to Monte Carlo and from
Palermo to Seville under all sorts of pretexts.

The gravest result of the magistrate's refusal to accept bail was purely
personal.  Oscar's income dried up at the source.  His books were withdrawn from
sale; no one went to see his plays; every shop keeper to whom he owed a penny
took immediate action against him.  Judgments were obtained and an execution put
into his house in Tite Street.  Within a month, at the very moment when he most
needed money to fee counsel and procure evidence, he was beggared and sold up,
and because of his confinement in prison the sale was conducted under such
conditions that, whereas in ordinary times his effects would have covered the
claims against him three times over, all his belongings went for nothing, and
the man who was making L4,000 or L5,000 a year by his plays was adjudicated a
bankrupt for a little over L1,000.  L600 of this sum were for Lord Queensberry's
costs which the Queensberry family--Lord Douglas of Hawick, Lord Alfred Douglas
and their mother--had promised in writing to pay, but when the time came,
absolutely refused to pay.  Most unfortunately many of Oscar's MSS. were stolen
or lost in the disorder of the sheriff's legal proceedings.  Wilde could have
cried, with Shylock, "You take my life when you do take away the means whereby
I live."  But at the time nine Englishmen out of ten applauded what was
practically persecution.

A worse thing remains to be told.  The right of free speech which Englishmen
pride themselves on had utterly disappeared, as it always does disappear in
England when there is most need of it.  It was impossible to say one word in
Wilde's defence or even in extenuation of his sin in any London print.  At this
time I owned the greater part of the "Saturday Review" and edited it.  Here at
any rate one might have thought I could have set forth in a Christian country a
sane and liberal view.  I had no wish to minimise the offence.  No one condemned
unnatural vice more than I, but Oscar Wilde was a distinguished man of letters;
he had written beautiful things, and his good works should have been allowed to
speak in his favour.  I wrote an article setting forth this view.  My printers
immediately informed me that they thought the article ill-advised, and when I
insisted they said they would prefer not to print it.  Yet there was nothing in
it beyond a plea to suspend judgment and defer insult till after the trial.
Messrs. Smith and Sons, the great booksellers, who somehow got wind of the
matter (through my publisher, I believe), sent to say that they would not sell
any paper that attempted to defend Oscar Wilde; it would be better even, they
added, not to mention his name.  The English tradesman-censors were determined
that this man should have Jedburg justice.  I should have ruined the "Saturday
Review" by the mere attempt to treat the matter fairly.

In this extremity I went to the great leader of public opinion in England.  Mr.
Arthur Walter, the manager of "The Times", had always been kind to me; he was a
man of balanced mind, who had taken high honours at Oxford in his youth, and for
twenty years had rubbed shoulders with the leading men in every rank of life.  I
went down to stay with him in Berkshire, and I urged upon him what I regarded as
the aristocratic view.  In England it was manifest that under the circumstances
there was no chance of a fair trial, and it seemed to me the duty of "The Times"
to say plainly that this man should not be condemned beforehand, and that if he
were condemned his merits should be taken into consideration in his punishment,
as well as his demerits.

While willing to listen to me, Mr. Walter did not share my views.  A man who had
written a great poem or a great play did not rank in his esteem with a man who
had won a skirmish against a handful of unarmed savages, or one who had stolen a
piece of land from some barbarians and annexed it to the Empire.  In his heart
he held the view of the English landed aristocracy, that the ordinary successful
general or admiral or statesman was infinitely more important than a Shakespeare
or a Browning.  He could not be persuaded to believe that the names of
Gladstone, Disraeli, Wolseley, Roberts, and Wood, would diminish and fade from
day to day till in a hundred years they would scarcely be known, even to the
educated; whereas the fame of Browning, Swinburne, Meredith, or even Oscar
Wilde, would increase and grow brighter with time, till, in one hundred or five
hundred years, no one would dream of comparing pushful politicians like
Gladstone or Beaconsfield with men of genius like Swinburne or Wilde.  He simply
would not see it and when he perceived that the weight of argument was against
him he declared that if it were true, it was so much the worse for humanity.  In
his opinion anyone living a clean life was worth more than a writer of love
songs or the maker of clever comedies--Mr. John Smith worth more than
Shakespeare!

He was as deaf as only Englishmen can be deaf to the plea for abstract justice.

"You don't even say Wilde's innocent," he threw at me more than once.

"I believe him to be innocent," I declared truthfully, "but it is better that a
hundred guilty men go free than that one man should not have a fair trial.  And
how can this man have a fair trial now when the papers for weeks past have been
filled with violent diatribes against him and his works?"

One point, peculiarly English, he used again and again.

"So long as substantial justice is done," he said, "it is all we care about."

"Substantial justice will never be done," I cried, "so long as that is your
ideal.  Your arrow can never go quite so high as it is aimed."  But I got no
further.

If Oscar Wilde had been a general or a so-called empire builder, "The Times"
might have affronted public opinion and called attention to his virtues, and
argued that they should be taken in extenuation of his offences; but as he was
only a writer no one seemed to owe him anything or to care what became of him.

Mr. Walter was fair-minded in comparison with most men of his class.  There
was staying with him at this very time an Irish gentleman, who listened to my
pleading for Wilde with ill-concealed indignation.  Excited by Arthur Walter's
obstinacy to find fresh arguments, I pointed out that Wilde's offence was
pathological and not criminal and would not be punished in a properly
constituted state.

"You admit," I said, "that we punish crime to prevent it spreading; wipe this
sin off the statute book and you would not increase the sinners by one: then
why punish them?"

"Oi'd whip such sinners to death, so I would," cried the Irishman; "hangin's
too good for them."

"You only punished lepers," I went on, "in the middle ages, because you believed
that leprosy was catching: this malady is not even catching."

"Faith, Oi'd punish it with extermination," cried the Irishman.

Exasperated by the fact that his idiot prejudice was hurting my friend, I said
at length with a smile:

"You are very bitter: I'm not; you see, I have no sexual jealousy to inflame
me."

On this Mr. Walter had to interfere between us to keep the peace, but the
mischief was done: my advocacy remained without effect.

It is very curious how deep-rooted and enduring is the prejudice against writers
in England.  Not only is no attempt made to rate them at their true value, at
the value which posterity puts upon their work; but they are continually treated
as outcasts and denied the most ordinary justice.  The various trials of Oscar
Wilde are to the thinker an object lesson in the force of this prejudice, but
some may explain the prejudice against Wilde on the score of the peculiar
abhorrence with which the offence ascribed to him is regarded in England.

Let me take an example from the papers of today--I am writing in January, 1910.
I find in my "Daily Mail" that at Bow Street police court a London magistrate,
Sir Albert de Rutzen, ordered the destruction of 272 volumes of the English
translation of Balzac's "Les Contes Drolatiques" on the ground that the book
was obscene.  "Les Contes Drolatiques" is an acknowledged masterpiece, and is
not nearly so free spoken as "Lear" or "Hamlet" or "Tom Jones" or "Anthony and
Cleopatra."  What would be thought of a French magistrate or a German magistrate
who ordered a fair translation of "Hamlet" or of "Lear" to be burnt, because of
its obscenity?  He would be regarded as demented.  One can only understand such
a judgment as an isolated fact.  But in England this monstrous stupidity is the
rule.  Sir A. de Rutzen was not satisfied with ordering the books to be burnt
and fining the bookseller; he went on to justify his condemnation and praise
the police:

"It is perfectly clear to my mind that a more foul and filthy black spot has not
been found in London for a long time, and the police have done uncommonly well
in bringing the matter to light.  I consider that the books are likely to do a
great deal of harm."

Fancy the state of mind of the man who can talk such poisonous nonsense; who,
with the knowledge of what Piccadilly is at night in his mind, can speak of the
translation of a masterpiece as one of the "most filthy black spots" to be found
in London.  To say that such a man is insane is, I suppose, going too far; but
to say that he does not know the value or the meaning of the words he uses, to
say that he is driven by an extraordinary and brainless prejudice, is certainly
the modesty of truth.

It is this sort of perversity on the part of Sir A. de Rutzen and of nine out
of ten Englishmen that makes Frenchmen, Germans and Italians speak of them as
ingrained hypocrites.  But they are not nearly so hypocritical as they are
uneducated and unintelligent, rebellious to the humanising influence of art
and literature.  The ordinary Englishman would much prefer to be called an
athlete than a poet.  The Puritan Commonwealth Parliament ordered the pictures
of Charles I. to be sold, but such of them as were indecent to be burnt;
accordingly half a dozen Titians were solemnly burnt and the nucleus of a great
national gallery destroyed.  One can see Sir A. de Rutzen solemnly assisting
at this holocaust and devoutly deciding that all the masterpieces which showed
temptingly a woman's beautiful breasts were "foul and filthy black spots" and
must be burnt as harmful.  Or rather one can see that Sir A. de Rutzen has in
two and a half centuries managed to get a little beyond this primitive Puritan
standpoint: he might allow a pictorial masterpiece to-day to pass unburnt, but
a written masterpiece is still to him anathema.

A part of this prejudice comes from the fact that the English have a special
dislike for every form of sexual indulgence.  It is not consistent with their
ideal of manhood, and, like the poor foolish magistrate, they have not yet
grasped the truth, which one might have thought the example of the Japanese
would have made plain by now to the dullest, that a nation may be
extraordinarily brave, vigorous and self-sacrificing and at the same time
intensely sensuous, and sensitive to every refinement of passion.  If the
great English middle class were as well educated as the German middle class,
such a judgment as this of Sir A. de Rutzen would be scouted as ridiculous
and absurd, or rather would be utterly unthinkable.

In Anglo-Saxon countries both the artist and the sexual passion are under a ban.
The race is more easily moved martially than amorously and it regards its
overpowering combative instincts as virtuous just as it is apt to despise what
it likes to call "languishing love."  The poet Middleton couldn't put his dream
city in England--a city of fair skies and fairer streets:

And joy was there; in all the city's length
I saw no fingers trembling for the sword;
Nathless they doted on their bodies' strength,
That they might gentler be.  Love was their lord.

Both America and England today offer terrifying examples of the despotism of an
unenlightened and vulgar public opinion in all the highest concerns of man--in
art, in literature and in religion.  There is no despotism on earth so soul-
destroying to the artist: it is baser and more degrading than anything known
in Russia.  The consequences of this tyranny of an uneducated middle class and
a barbarian aristocracy are shown in detail in the trial of Oscar Wilde and in
the savagery with which he was treated by the English officers of justice.




CHAPTER XV--THE QUEEN VS. WILDE: THE FIRST TRIAL



As soon as I heard that Oscar Wilde was arrested and bail refused, I tried to
get permission to visit him in Holloway.  I was told I should have to see him
in a kind of barred cage; and talk to him from the distance of at least a yard.
It seemed to me too painful for both of us, so I went to the higher authorities
and got permission to see him in a private room.  The Governor met me at the
entrance of the prison: to my surprise he was more than courteous; charmingly
kind and sympathetic.

"We all hope," he said, "that he will soon be free; this is no place for him.
Everyone likes him, everyone.  It is a great pity."

He evidently felt much more than he said, and my heart went out to him.  He left
me in a bare room furnished with a small square deal table and two kitchen
chairs.  In a moment or two Oscar came in accompanied by a warder.  In silence
we clasped hands.  He looked miserably anxious and pulled down and I felt that
I had nothing to do but cheer him up.

"I am glad to see you," I cried.  "I hope the warders are kind to you?"

"Yes, Frank," he replied in a hopeless way, "but everyone else is against me:
it is hard."

"Don't harbour that thought," I answered; "many whom you don't know, and whom
you will never know, are on your side.  Stand for them and for the myriads who
are coming afterwards and make a fight of it."

"I'm afraid I'm not a fighter, Frank, as you once said," he replied sadly,
 "and they won't give me bail.  How can I get evidence or think in this place
of torture? Fancy refusing me bail," he went on, "though I stayed in London
when I might have gone abroad."

"You should have gone," I cried in French, hot with indignation; "why didn't you
go, the moment you came out of the court?"

"I couldn't think at first," he answered in the same tongue; "I couldn't think
at all: I was numbed."

"Your friends should have thought of it," I insisted, not knowing then that
they had done their best.

At this moment the warder, who had turned away towards the door, came back.

"You are not allowed, sir, to talk in a foreign language," he said quietly.
"You will understand we have to obey the rules.  Besides, the prisoner must not
speak of this prison as a place of torture.  I ought to report that; I'm sorry."

The misery of it all brought tears to my eyes: his gaolers even felt sorry for
him.  I thanked the warder and turned again to Oscar.

"Don't let yourself fear at all," I exclaimed.  "You will have your chance again
and must take it; only don't lose heart and don't be witty next time in court.
The jury hate it.  They regard it as intellectual superiority and impudence.
Treat all things seriously and with grave dignity.  Defend yourself as David
would have defended his love for Jonathan.  Make them all listen to you.  I
would undertake to get free with half your talent even if I were guilty; a
resolution not to be beaten is always half the battle. . . . . Make your trial
memorable from your entrance into the court to the decision of the jury.  Use
every opportunity and give your real character a chance to fight for you."

I spoke with tears in my eyes and rage in my heart.

"I will do my best, Frank," he said despondingly, "I will do my best.  If I were
out of this place, I might think of something, but it is dreadful to be here.
One has to go to bed by daylight and the nights are interminable."

"Haven't you a watch?" I cried.

They don't allow you to have a watch in prison," he replied.

"But why not?" I asked in amazement.  I did not know that every rule in an
English prison is cunningly devised to annoy and degrade the unfortunate
prisoner.

Oscar lifted his hands hopelessly:

"One may not smoke; not even a cigarette; and so I cannot sleep.  All the past
comes back; the golden hours; the June days in London with the sunshine dappling
the grass and the silken rustling of the wind in the trees.  Do you remember
Wordsworth speaks 'of the wind in the trees'? How I wish I could hear it now,
breathe it once again.  I might get strength then to fight."

"Is the food good?" I asked.

"It's all right; I get it from outside.  The food doesn't matter.  It is the
smoking I miss, the freedom, the companionship.  My mind will not act when I'm
alone.  I can only think of what has been and torment myself.  Already I've been
punished enough for the sins of a lifetime."

"Is there nothing I can do for you, nothing you want?" I asked.

"No, Frank," he answered, "it was kind of you to come to see me, I wish I could
tell you how kind."

"Don't think of it," I said; "if I'm any good send for me at any moment: a word
will bring me.  They allow you books, don't they?"

"Yes, Frank."

"I wish you would get the 'Apologia of Plato'," I said, "and take a big draught
of that deathless smiling courage of Socrates."

"Ah, Frank, how much more humane were the Greeks.  They let his friends see him
and talk to him by the hour, though he was condemned to death.  There were no
warders there to listen, no degrading conditions."

"Quite true," I cried, suddenly realising how much better Oscar Wilde would have
been treated in Athens two thousand years ago.  "Our progress is mainly change;
we don't shed our cruelty; even Christ has not been able to humanise us."

He nodded his head.  At first he seemed greatly distressed; but I managed to
encourage him a little, for at the close of the talk he questioned me:

"Do you really think I may win, Frank?"

"Of course you'll win," I replied.  "You must win: you must not think of being
beaten.  Take it that they will not want to convict you.  Say it to yourself
in the court; don't let yourself fear for a moment.  Your enemies are merely
stupid, unhappy creatures crawling about for a few miserable years between earth
and sun; fated to die and leave no trace, no memory.  Remember you are fighting
for all of us, for every artist and thinker who is to be born into the English
world. . . . . It is better to win like Galileo than to be burnt like Giordano
Bruno.  Don't let them make another martyr.  Use all your brains and eloquence
and charm.  Don't be afraid.  They will not condemn you if they know you."

"I have been trying to think," he said, "trying to make up my mind to bear
one whole year of this life.  It's dreadful, Frank, I had no idea that prison
was so dreadful."

The warder again drew down his brows.  I hastened to change the subject.

"That's why you must resolve not to have any more of it," I said; "I wish I had
seen you when you came out of court, but I really thought you didn't want me;
you turned away from me."

"Oh, Frank, how could I?" he cried.  "I should have been so grateful to you."

"I'm very shortsighted," I rejoined, "and I thought you did.  It is our foolish
little vanities which prevent us acting as we should.  But let me know if I can
do anything for you.  If you want me, I'll come at any moment."

I said this because the warder had already given me a sign; he now said:

"Time is up."

Once again we clasped hands.

"You must win," I said; "don't think of defeat.  Even your enemies are human.
Convert them.  You can do it, believe me," and I went with dread in my heart,
and pity and indignation.

Be still, be still, my soul; it is but for a season:
Let us endure an hour and see injustice done.

The Governor met me almost at the door.

"It is terrible," I exclaimed.

"This is no place for him," he answered.  "He has nothing to do with us here.
Everyone likes him and pities him: the warders, everyone.  Anything I can do
to make his stay tolerable shall be done."

We shook hands.  I think there were tears in both our eyes as we parted.
This humane Governor had taught me that Oscar's gentleness and kindness--his
sweetness of nature--would win all hearts if it had time to make itself known.
Yet there he was in prison.  His face and figure came before me again and again:
the unshaven face; the frightened, sad air; the hopeless, toneless voice.  The
cleanliness even of the bare hard room was ugly; the English are foolish enough
to degrade those they punish.  Revolt was blazing in me.

As I went away I looked up at the mediaeval castellated gateway of the place,
and thought how perfectly the architecture suited the spirit of the institution.
The whole thing belongs to the middle ages, and not to our modern life.  Fancy
having both prison and hospital side by side; indeed a hospital even in the
prison; torture and lovingkindness; punishment and pity under the same roof.
What a blank contradiction and stupidity.  Will civilisation never reach humane
ideals? Will men always punish most severely the sins they do not understand and
which hold for them no temptation? Did Jesus suffer in vain?

. . . . . . .

Oscar Wilde was committed on the 19th of April; a "true bill" was found against
him by the grand jury on the 24th; and, as the case was put down for trial at
the Old Bailey almost immediately, a postponement was asked for till the May
sessions, on the ground first that the defence had not had time to prepare their
case and further, that in the state of popular feeling at the moment, Mr. Wilde
would not get a fair and impartial trial.  Mr. Justice Charles, who was to try
the case, heard the application and refused it peremptorily: "Any suggestion
that the defendant would not have a fair trial was groundless," he declared; yet
he knew better.  In his summing up of the case on May 1st he stated that "for
weeks it had been impossible to open a newspaper without reading some reference
to the case," and when he asked the jury not to allow "preconceived opinions to
weigh with them" he was admitting the truth that every newspaper reference was
charged with dislike and contempt of Oscar Wilde.  A fair trial indeed!

The trial took place at the Old Bailey, three days later, April 27th, 1895,
before Mr. Justice Charles.  Mr. C. F. Gill and A. Gill with Mr. Horace Avory
appeared for the Public Prosecutor.  Mr. Wilde was again defended by Sir Edward
Clarke, Mr. Charles Mathews and Mr. Travers Humphreys, while Mr. J. P. Grain
and Mr. Paul Taylor were counsel for the other prisoner.  The trial began on a
Saturday and the whole of the day was taken up with a legal argument.  I am not
going to give the details of the case.  I shall only note the chief features of
it and the unfairness which characterised it.

Sir Edward Clarke pointed out that there was one set of charges under the
Criminal Law Amendment Act and another set of charges of conspiracy.  He urged
that the charges of conspiracy should be dropped.  Under the counts alleging
conspiracy, the defendants could not be called on as witnesses, which put
the defence at a disadvantage.  In the end the Judge decided that there were
inconveniences; but he would not accede to Sir Edward Clarke's request.  Later
in the trial, however, Mr. Gill himself withdrew the charges of conspiracy,
and the Judge admitted explicitly in his summing up that, if he had known the
evidence which was to be offered, he would not have allowed these charges of
conspiracy to be made.  By this confession he apparently cleared his conscience
just as Pilate washed his hands.  But the wrong had already been done.  Not only
did this charge of conspiracy embarrass the defence, but if it had never been
made, as it should never have been made, then Sir Edward Clarke would have
insisted and could have insisted properly that the two men should be tried
separately, and Wilde would not have been discredited by being coupled with
Taylor, whose character was notorious and who had already been in the hands of
the police on a similar charge.

This was not the only instance of unfairness in the conduct of the prosecution.
The Treasury put a youth called Atkins in the box, thus declaring him to be at
least a credible witness; but Atkins was proved by Sir Edward Clarke to have
perjured himself in the court in the most barefaced way.  In fact the Treasury
witnesses against Wilde were all blackmailers and people of the lowest
character, with two exceptions.  The exceptions were a boy named Mavor and a
youth named Shelley.  With regard to Mavor the judge admitted that no evidence
had been offered that he could place before the jury; but in his summing up he
was greatly affected by the evidence of Shelley.  Shelley was a young man who
seemed to be afflicted with a species of religious mania.  Mr. Justice Charles
gave great weight to his testimony.  He invited the jury to say that "although
there was, in his correspondence which had been read, evidence of excitability,
to talk of him as a young man who did not know what he was saying was to
exaggerate the effect of his letters."  He went on to ask with much solemnity:
"Why should this young man have invented a tale, which must have been unpleasant
to him to present from the witness box?"

In the later trial before Mr. Justice Wills the Judge had to rule out the
evidence of Shelley "in toto", because it was wholly without corroboration.
If the case before Mr. Justice Charles had not been confused with the charges
of conspiracy, there is no doubt that he too would have ruled out the evidence
of Shelley, and then his summing up must have been entirely in favour of Wilde.

The singular malevolence of the prosecution also can be estimated by their use
of the so-called "literary argument."  Wilde had written in a magazine called
"The Chameleon.  The Chameleon" contained an immoral story, with which Wilde had
nothing to do, and which he had repudiated as offensive.  Yet the prosecution
tried to make him responsible in some way for the immorality of a writing which
he knew nothing about.

Wilde had said two poems of Lord Alfred Douglas were "beautiful."  The
prosecution declared that these poems were in essence a defence of the vilest
immorality, but is it not possible for the most passionate poem, even the most
vicious, to be "beautiful"? Nothing was ever written more passionate than one
of the poems of Sappho.  Yet a fragment has been selected out and preserved by
the admiration of a hundred generations of men.  The prosecution was in the
position all the time of one who declared that a man who praised a nude picture
must necessarily be immoral.  Such a contention would be inconceivable in any
other civilised country.  Even the Judge was on much the same intellectual
level.  It would not be fair, he admitted, to condemn a poet or dramatic writer
by his works and he went on:

"It is unfortunately true that while some of our greatest writers have passed
long years in writing nothing but the most wholesome literature--literature of
the highest genius, and which anybody can read, such as the literature of Sir
Walter Scott and Charles Dickens; it is also true that there were other great
writers, more especially in the eighteenth century, perfectly noble-minded men
themselves, who somehow or other have permitted themselves to pen volumes which
it is painful for persons of ordinary modesty and decency to read."

It would have been more honest and more liberal to have brushed away the
nonsensical indictment in a sentence.  Would the Treasury have put Shakespeare
on trial for "Hamlet" or "Lear," or would they have condemned the writer of
"The Song of Solomon" for immorality, or sent St. Paul to prison for his
"Epistle to the Corinthians"?

Middle-class prejudice and hypocritic canting twaddle from Judge and advocate
dragged their weary length along for days and days.  On Wednesday Sir Edward
Clarke made his speech for the defence.  He pointed out the unfairness of the
charges of conspiracy which had tardily been withdrawn.  He went on to say that
the most remarkable characteristic of the case was the fact that it had been the
occasion for conduct on the part of certain sections of the press which was
disgraceful, and which imperilled the administration of justice, and was in the
highest degree injurious to the client for whom he was pleading.  Nothing, he
concluded, could be more unfair than the way Mr. Wilde had been criticised in
the press for weeks and weeks.  But no judge interfered on his behalf.

Sir Edward Clarke evidently thought that to prove unfairness would not even
influence the minds of the London jury.  He was content to repudiate the attempt
to judge Mr. Wilde by his books or by an article which he had condemned, or by
poems which he had not written.  He laid stress on the fact that Mr. Wilde had
himself brought the charge against Lord Queensberry which had provoked the whole
investigation: "on March 30th, Mr. Wilde," he said, "knew the catalogue of
accusations"; and he asked: did the jury believe that, if he had been guilty,
he would have stayed in England and brought about the first trial? Insane would
hardly be the word for such conduct, if Mr. Wilde really had been guilty.
Moreover, before even hearing the specific accusations, Mr. Wilde had gone
into the witness box to deny them.

Clarke's speech was a good one, but nothing out of the common: no new arguments
were used in it; not one striking illustration.  Needless to say the higher
advocacy of sympathy was conspicuous by its absence.

Again, the interesting part of the trial was the cross-examination of Oscar
Wilde.

Mr. Gill examined him at length on the two poems which Lord Alfred Douglas had
contributed to "The Chameleon", which Mr. Wilde had called "beautiful."  The
first was in "Praise of Shame," the second was one called "Two Loves."  Sir
Edward Clarke, interposing, said:

"That's not Mr. Wilde's, Mr. Gill."

Mr. Gill: "I am not aware that I said it was."

Sir Edward Clarke: "I thought you would be glad to say it was not."

Mr. Gill insisted that Mr. Wilde should explain the poem in "Praise of Shame."

Mr. Wilde said that the first poem seemed obscure, but, when pressed as to the
"love" described in the second poem, he let himself go for the first time and
perhaps the only time during the trial; he said:

"The 'love' that dare not speak its name in this century is such a great
affection of an older for a younger man as there was between David and Jonathan,
such as Plato made the very base of his philosophy and such as you find in the
sonnets of Michaelangelo and Shakespeare--a deep spiritual affection that is as
pure as it is perfect, and dictates great works of art like those of Shakespeare
and Michaelangelo and those two letters of mine, such as they are, and which is
in this century misunderstood--so misunderstood that on account of it, I am
placed where I am now.  It is beautiful; it is fine; it is the noblest form of
affection.  It is intellectual, and it repeatedly exists between an elder and
younger man, when the elder man has intellect, and the younger man has all the
joy, hope and glamour of life.  That it should be so the world does not
understand.  It mocks at it and sometimes puts one into the pillory for it."

At this stage there was loud applause in the gallery of the court, and the
learned Judge at once said: "I shall have the Court cleared if there is the
slightest manifestation of feeling.  There must be complete silence preserved."

Mr. Justice Charles repressed the cheering in favour of Mr. Oscar Wilde with
great severity, though Mr. Justice Collins did not attempt to restrain the
cheering which filled his court and accompanied the dispersing crowd into the
street on the acquittal of Lord Queensberry.

In spite, however, of the unfair criticisms of the press; in spite of the unfair
conduct of the prosecution, and in spite of the manifest prejudice and
Philistine ignorance of the Judge, the jury disagreed.

Then followed the most dramatic incident of the whole trial.  Once more Sir
Edward Clarke applied for bail on behalf of Oscar Wilde.  "After what has
happened," he said, "I do not think the Crown will make any objection to this
application."  The Crown left the matter to the Judge, no doubt in all security;
for the Judge immediately refused the application.  Sir Edward Clarke then
went on to say that, in the case of a re-trial, it ought not to take place
immediately.  He continued:

"The burden of those engaged in the case is very heavy, and I think it only
right that the Treasury should have an opportunity between this and another
session of considering the mode in which the case should be presented, if indeed
it is presented at all."

Mr. Gill immediately rose to the challenge.

"The case will certainly be tried again," he declared, "whether it is to be
tried again at once or in the next sessions will be a matter of convenience.
Probably the most desirable course will be for the case to go to the next
sessions.  That is the usual course."

Mr. Justice Charles: "If that is the usual course, let it be so."

The next session of the Central Criminal Court opened on the 20th of the same
month.

Not three weeks' respite, still it might be enough: it was inconceivable that
a Judge in Chambers would refuse to accept bail: fortunately the law allows him
no option.

. . . . .

The application for bail was made in due course to a Judge in Chambers, and in
spite of the bad example of the magistrate, and of Mr. Justice Charles, it was
granted and Wilde was set free in his own recognizance of L2,500 with two other
sureties for L1,250 each.  It spoke volumes for the charm and fascination of the
man that people were found to undertake this onerous responsibility.  Their
names deserve to be recorded; one was Lord Douglas of Hawick, the other a
clergyman, the Rev. Stewart Headlam.  I offered to be one bail: but I was not a
householder at the time and my name was, therefore, not acceptable.  I suppose
the Treasury objected, which shows, I am inclined to think, some glimmering of
sense on its part.

As soon as the bail was accepted I began to think of preparations for Oscar's
escape.  It was high time something was done to save him from the wolves.  The
day after his release a London morning journal was not ashamed to publish what
it declared was a correct analysis of the voting of the jury on the various
counts.  According to this authority, ten jurors were generally for conviction
and two against, in the case of Wilde; the statement was widely accepted because
it added that the voting was more favourable to Taylor than to Wilde, which was
so unexpected and so senseless that it carried with it a certain plausibility:
"Credo quia incredible".

I had seen enough of English justice and English judges and English journals to
convince me that Oscar Wilde had no more chance of a fair trial than if he had
been an Irish "Invincible."  Everyone had made up his mind and would not even
listen to reason: he was practically certain to be convicted, and if convicted
perfectly certain to be punished with savage ferocity.  The judge would probably
think he was showing impartiality by punishing him for his qualities of charm
and high intelligence.  For the first time in my life I understood the full
significance of Montaigne's confession that if he were accused of stealing the
towers of Notre Dame, he would fly the kingdom rather than risk a trial, and
Montaigne was a lawyer.  I set to work at once to complete my preparations.

I did not think I ran any risk in helping Oscar to get away.  The newspapers had
seized the opportunity of the trials before the magistrate and before Mr.
Justice Charles and had overwhelmed the public with such a sea of nauseous filth
and impurity as could only be exposed to the public nostrils in pudibond
England.  Everyone, I thought, must be sick of the testimony and eager to have
done with the whole thing.  In this I may have been mistaken.  The hatred of
Wilde seemed universal and extraordinarily malignant.

I wanted a steam yacht.  Curiously enough on the very day when I was thinking of
running down to Cowes to hire one, a gentleman at lunch mentioned that he had
one in the Thames.  I asked him could I charter it?

"Certainly," he replied, "and I will let you have it for the bare cost for the
next month or two."

"One month will do for me," I said.

"Where are you going?" he asked.

I don't know why, but a thought came into my head: I would tell him the truth,
and see what he would say.  I took him aside and told him the bare facts.  At
once he declared that the yacht was at my service for such work as that without
money: he would be too glad to lend it to me: it was horrible that such a man as
Wilde should be treated as a common criminal.

He felt as Henry VIII felt in Shakespeare's play of that name:

". . . . there's some of ye, I see,
More out of malice than integrity,
Would try him to the utmost, . . . ."

It was not the generosity in my friend's offer that astonished me, but the
consideration for Wilde; I thought the lenity so singular in England that I feel
compelled to explain it.  Though an Englishman born and bred my friend was by
race a Jew--a man of the widest culture, who had no sympathy whatever with the
vice attributed to Oscar.  Feeling consoled because there was at least one
generous, kind heart in the world, I went next day to Willie Wilde's house in
Oakley Street to see Oscar.  I had written to him on the previous evening that
I was coming to take Oscar out to lunch.

Willie Wilde met me at the door; he was much excited apparently by the notoriety
attaching to Oscar; he was volubly eager to tell me that, though we had not been
friends, yet my support of Oscar was most friendly and he would therefore bury
the hatchet.  He had never interested me, and I was unconscious of any hatchet
and careless whether he buried it or blessed it.  I repeated drily that I had
come to take Oscar to lunch.

"I know you have," he said, "and it's most kind of you; but he can't go."

"Why not?" I asked as I went in.

Oscar was gloomy, depressed, and evidently suffering.  Willie's theatrical
insincerity had annoyed me a little, and I was eager to get away.  Suddenly
I saw Sherard, who has since done his best for Oscar's memory.  In his book
there is a record of this visit of mine.  He was standing silently by the wall.

"I've come to take you to lunch," I said to Oscar.

"But he cannot go out," cried Willie.

"Of course he can," I insisted, "I've come to take him."

"But where to?" asked Willie.

"Yes, Frank, where to?" repeated Oscar meekly.

"Anywhere you like," I said, "the Savoy if you like, the Cafe Royal for choice."

"Oh, Frank, I dare not," cried Oscar.

"No, no," cried Willie, "there would be a scandal; someone'll insult him and
it would do harm; set people's backs up."

"Oh, Frank, I dare not," echoed Oscar.

"No one will insult him.  There will be no scandal," I replied, "and it will
do good."

"But what will people say?" cried Willie.

"No one ever knows what people will say," I retorted, "and people always speak
best of those who don't care a damn what they do say."

"Oh, Frank, I could not go to a place like the Savoy where I am well known,"
objected Oscar.

"All right," I agreed, "you shall go where you like.  All London is before us.
I must have a talk with you, and it will do you good to get out into the air,
and sun yourself and feel the wind in your face.  Come, there's a hansom at
the door."

It was not long before I had conquered his objections and Willie's absurdities
and taken him with me.  Scarcely had we left the house when his spirits began
to lift, and he rippled into laughter.

"Really, Frank, it is strange, but I do not feel frightened and depressed any
more, and the people don't boo and hiss at me.  Is it not dreadful the way they
insult the fallen?"

"We are not going to talk about it," I said; "we are going to talk of victories
and not of defeats."

"Ah, Frank, there will be no more victories for me."

"Nonsense," I cried; "now where are we going?"

"Some quiet place where I shall not be known."

"You really would not like the Cafe Royal?" I asked.  "Nothing will happen to
you, and I think you would probably find that one or two people would wish
you luck.  You have had a rare bad time, and there must be some people who
understand what you have gone through and know that it is sufficient punishment
for any sin."

"No, Frank," he persisted, "I cannot, I really cannot."

At length we decided on a restaurant in Great Portland Street.  We drove there
and had a private room.

I had two purposes in me, springing from the one root, the intense desire to
help him.  I felt sure that if the case came up again for trial he would only be
convicted through what I may call good, honest testimony.  The jury with their
English prejudice; or rather I should say with their healthy English instincts
would not take the evidence of vile blackmailers against him; he could only be
convicted through untainted evidence such as the evidence of the chambermaids
at the Savoy Hotel, and their evidence was over two years old and was weak,
inasmuch as the facts, if facts, were not acted upon by the management.  Still
their testimony was very clear and very positive, and, taken together with that
of the blackmailers, sufficient to ensure conviction.  After our lunch I laid
this view before Oscar.  He agreed with me that it was probably the
chambermaids' testimony which had weighed most heavily against him.  Their
statement and Shelley's had brought about the injurious tone in the Judge's
summing up.  The Judge himself had admitted as much.

"The chambermaids' evidence is wrong," Oscar declared.  "They are mistaken,
Frank.  It was not me they spoke about at the Savoy Hotel.  It was ----.  I was
never bold enough.  I went to see ---- in the morning in his room."

"Thank God," I said, "but why didn't Sir Edward Clarke bring that out?"

"He wanted to; but I would not let him.  I told him he must not.  I must be true
to my friend.  I could not let him."

"But he must," I said, "at any rate if he does not I will.  I have three weeks
and in that three weeks I am going to find the chambermaid.  I am going to get a
plan of your room and your friend's room, and I'm going to make her understand
that she was mistaken.  She probably remembered you because of your size: she
mistook you for the guilty person; everybody has always taken you for the
ringleader and not the follower."

"But what good is it, Frank, what good is it?" he cried.  "Even if you convinced
the chambermaid and she retracted; there would still be Shelley, and the Judge
laid stress on Shelley's evidence as untainted."

"Shelley is an accomplice," I cried, "his testimony needs corroboration.
You don't understand these legal quibbles; but there was not a particle of
corroboration.  Sir Edward Clarke should have had his testimony ruled out.
'Twas that conspiracy charge," I cried, "which complicated the matter.
Shelley's evidence, too, will be ruled out at the next trial, you'll see."

"Oh, Frank," he said, "you talk with passion and conviction, as if I were
innocent."

"But you are innocent," I cried in amaze, "aren't you?"

"No, Frank," he said, "I thought you knew that all along."

I stared at him stupidly.  "No," I said dully, "I did not know.  I did not
believe the accusation.  I did not believe it for a moment."

I suppose the difference in my tone and manner struck him, for he said, timidly
putting out his hand:

"This will make a great difference to you, Frank?"

"No," I said, pulling myself together and taking his hand; and after a pause I
went on: "No: curiously enough it has made no difference to me at all.  I do not
know why; I suppose I have got more sympathy than morality in me.  It has
surprised me, dumbfounded me.  The thing has always seemed fantastic and
incredible to me and now you make it exist for me; but it has no effect on my
friendship; none upon my resolve to help you.  But I see that the battle is
going to be infinitely harder than I imagined.  In fact, now I don't think we
have a chance of winning a verdict.  I came here hoping against fear that it
could be won, though I always felt that it would be better in the present state
of English feeling to go abroad and avoid the risk of a trial.  Now there is
no question: you would be insane, as Clarke said, to stay in England.  But
why on earth did Alfred Douglas, knowing the truth, ever wish you to attack
Queensberry?"

"He's very bold and obstinate, Frank," said Oscar weakly.

"Well, now I must play Crito," I resumed, smiling, "and take you away before
the ship comes from Delos."

"Oh, Frank, that would be wonderful; but it's impossible, quite impossible.  I
should be arrested before I left London, and shamed again in public: they would
boo at me and shout insults. . . . . Oh, it is impossible; I could not risk it."

"Nonsense," I replied, "I believe the authorities would be only too glad if you
went.  I think Clarke's challenge to Gill was curiously ill-advised.  He should
have let sleeping dogs lie.  Combative Gill was certain to take up the gauntlet.
If Clarke had lain low there might have been no second trial.  But that can't be
helped now.  Don't believe that it's even difficult to get away; it's easy.  I
don't propose to go by Folkestone or Dover."

"But, Frank, what about the people who have stood bail for me? I couldn't leave
them to suffer; they would lose their thousands."

"I shan't let them lose," I replied, "I am quite willing to take half on my own
shoulders at once and you can pay the other thousand or so within a very short
time by writing a couple of plays.  American papers would be only too glad to
pay you for an interview.  The story of your escape would be worth a thousand
pounds; they would give you almost any price for it.

"Leave everything to me, but in the meantime I want you to get out in the air
as much as possible.  You are not looking well; you are not yourself."

"That house is depressing, Frank.  Willie makes such a merit of giving me
shelter; he means well, I suppose; but it is all dreadful."

My notes of this talk finish in this way, but the conversation left on me a deep
impression of Oscar's extraordinary weakness or rather extraordinary softness of
nature backed up and redeemed by a certain magnanimity: he would not leave the
friends in the lurch who had gone bail for him; he would not give his friend
away even to save himself; but neither would he exert himself greatly to win
free.  He was like a woman, I said to myself in wonder, and my pity for him grew
keener.  He seemed mentally stunned by the sudden fall, by the discovery of how
violently men can hate.  He had never seen the wolf in man before; the vile
brute instinct that preys upon the fallen.  He had not believed that such
exultant savagery existed; it had never come within his ken; now it appalled
him.  And so he stood there waiting for what might happen without courage to do
anything but suffer.  My heart ached with pity for him, and yet I felt a little
impatient with him as well.  Why give up like that? The eternal quarrel of the
combative nature with those who can't or won't fight.

Before getting into the carriage to drive back to his brother's, I ascertained
that he did not need any money.  He told me that he had sufficient even for the
expenses of a second trial: this surprised me greatly, for he was very careless
about money; but I found out from him later that a very noble and cultured
woman, a friend of both of us, Miss S----, a Jewess by race tho' not by
religion, had written to him asking if she could help him financially, as she
had been distressed by hearing of his bankruptcy, and feared that he might be in
need.  If that were the case she begged him to let her be his banker, in order
that he might be properly defended.  He wrote in reply, saying that he was
indeed in uttermost distress, that he wanted money, too, to help his mother as
he had always helped her, and that he supposed the expenses of the second trial
would be from L500 to L1,000.  Thereupon Miss S---- sent him a cheque for
L1,000, assuring him that it cost her little even in self-sacrifice, and
declaring that it was only inadequate recognition of the pleasure she had had
through his delightful talks.  Such actions are beyond praise; it is the perfume
of such sweet and noble human sympathy that makes this wild beasts' cage of a
world habitable for men.

Before parting we had agreed to meet a few nights afterwards at Mrs. Leverson's,
where he had been invited to dinner, and where I also had been invited.  By that
time, I thought to myself, all my preparations would be perfected.

Looking back now I see clearly that my affection for Oscar Wilde dates from his
confession to me that afternoon.  I had been a friend of his for years; but what
had bound us together had been purely intellectual, a community of literary
tastes and ambitions.  Now his trust in me and frankness had thrown down the
barrier between us; and made me conscious of the extraordinary femininity and
gentle weakness of his nature, and, instead of condemning him as I have always
condemned that form of sexual indulgence, I felt only pity for him and a desire
to protect and help him.  From that day on our friendship became intimate: I
began to divine him; I knew now that his words would always be more generous
and noble than his actions; knew too that I must take his charm of manner and
vivacity of intercourse for real virtues, and indeed they were as real as the
beauty of flowers; and I was aware as by some sixth sense that, where his vanity
was concerned, I might expect any injustice from him.  I was sure beforehand,
however, that I should always forgive him, or rather that I should always accept
whatever he did and love him for the charm and sweetness and intellect in him
and hold myself more than recompensed for anything I might be able to do, by his
delightful companionship.




CHAPTER XVI--ESCAPE REJECTED: THE SECOND TRIAL AND SENTENCE



In spite of the wit of the hostess and her exquisite cordiality, our dinner at
Mrs. Leverson's was hardly a success.  Oscar was not himself; contrary to his
custom he sat silent and downcast.  From time to time he sighed heavily, and his
leaden dejection gradually infected all of us.  I was not sorry, for I wanted
to get him away early; by ten o'clock we had left the house and were in the
Cromwell Road.  He preferred to walk: without his noticing it I turned up
Queen's Gate towards the park.  After walking for ten minutes I said to him:

"I want to speak to you seriously.  Do you happen to know where Erith is?"

"No, Frank."

"It is a little landing place on the Thames," I went on, "not many miles away:
it can be reached by a fast pair of horses and a brougham in a very short time.
There at Erith is a steam yacht ready to start at a moment's notice; she has
steam up now, one hundred pounds pressure to the square inch in her boilers;
her captain's waiting, her crew ready--a greyhound in leash; she can do fifteen
knots an hour without being pressed.  In one hour she would be free of the
Thames and on the high seas--(delightful phrase, eh?)--high seas indeed where
there is freedom uncontrolled.

"If one started now one could breakfast in France, at Boulogne, let us say, or
Dieppe; one could lunch at St. Malo or St. Enogat or any place you like on the
coast of Normandy, and one could dine comfortably at the Sables d'Olonne, where
there is not an Englishman to be found, and where sunshine reigns even in May
from morning till night.

"What do you say, Oscar, will you come and try a homely French bourgeois dinner
tomorrow evening at an inn I know almost at the water's edge?  We could sit out
on the little terrace and take our coffee in peace under the broad vine leaves
while watching the silver pathway of the moon widen on the waters.  We could
smile at the miseries of London and its wolfish courts shivering in cold grey
mist hundreds of miles away.  Does not the prospect tempt you?"

I spoke at leisure, tasting each delight, looking for his gladness.

"Oh, Frank," he cried, "how wonderful; but how impossible!"

"Impossible! don't be absurd," I retorted.  "Do you see those lights yonder?"
and I showed him some lights at the Park gate on the top of the hill in front
of us.

"Yes, Frank."

"That's a brougham," I said, "with a pair of fast horses.  It will take us for
a midnight visit to the steam yacht in double-quick time.  There's a little
library on board of French books and English; I've ordered supper in the cabin--
lobster a l'Americaine and a bottle of Pommery.  You've never seen the mouth of
the Thames at night, have you?  It's a scene from wonderland; houses like blobs
of indigo fencing you in; ships drifting past like black ghosts in the misty
air, and the purple sky above never so dark as the river, the river with its
shifting lights of ruby and emerald and topaz, like an oily, opaque serpent
gliding with a weird life of its own. . . . . Come; you must visit the yacht."

I turned to him, but he was no longer by my side.  I gasped; what had happened?
The mist must have hidden him; I ran back ten yards, and there he was leaning
against the railing, hung up with his head on his arm shaking.

"What's the matter, Oscar?" I cried.  "What on earth's the matter?"

"Oh, Frank, I can't go," he cried, "I can't.  It would be too wonderful; but
it's impossible.  I should be seized by the police.  You don't know the police."

"Nonsense," I cried, "the police can't stop you and not a man of them will see
you from start to finish.  Besides, I have loose money for any I do meet, and
none of them can resist a 'tip.'  You will simply get out of the brougham and
walk fifty yards and you will be on the yacht and free.  In fact, if you like
you shall not come out of the brougham until the sailors surround you as a guard
of honour.  On board the yacht no one will touch you.  No warrant runs there.
Come on, man!"

"Oh, Frank," he groaned, "it's impossible!"

"What's impossible?" I insisted.  "Let's consider everything anew at breakfast
to-morrow morning in France.  If you want to come back, there's nothing to
prevent you.  The yacht will take you back in twenty-four hours.  You will not
have broken your bail; you'll have done nothing wrong.  You can go to France,
Germany or Siberia so long as you come back by the twentieth of May.  Take it
that I offer you a holiday in France for ten days.  Surely it is better to spend
a week with me than in that dismal house in Oakley Street, where the very door
gives one the creeps."

"Oh, Frank, I'd love to," he groaned.  "I see everything you say, but I can't.
I dare not.  I'm caught, Frank, in a trap, I can only wait for the end."

I began to get impatient; he was weaker than I had imagined, weaker a hundred
times.

"Come for a trip, then, man," I cried, and I brought him within twenty yards of
the carriage; but there he stopped as if he had made up his mind.

"No, no, I can't come.  I could not go about in France feeling that the
policeman's hand might fall on my shoulder at any moment.  I could not live
a life of fear and doubt: it would kill me in a month."  His tone was decided.

"Why let your imagination run away with you?" I pleaded.  "Do be reasonable for
once.  Fear and doubt would soon be over.  If the police don't get you in France
within a week after the date fixed for the trial, you need have no further fear,
for they won't get you at all: they don't want you.  You're making mountains out
of molehills with nervous fancies."

"I should be arrested."

"Nonsense," I replied, "who would arrest you?  No one has the right.  You are
out on bail: your bail answers for you till the 20th.  Money talks, man;
Englishmen always listen to money.  It'll do you good with the public and the
jury to come back from France to stand your trial.  Do come," and I took him
by the arm; but he would not move.  To my astonishment he faced me and said:

"And my sureties?"

"We'll pay 'em," I replied, "both of 'em, if you break your bail.  Come,"
but he would not.

"Frank, if I were not in Oakley Street to-night Willie would tell the police."

"Your brother?" I cried.

"Yes," he said, "Willie."

"Good God!" I exclaimed; "but let him tell.  I have not mentioned Erith or the
steam yacht to a soul.  It's the last place in the world the police would
suspect and before he talks we shall be out of reach.  Besides they cannot do
anything; you are doing nothing wrong.  Please trust me, you do nothing
questionable even till you omit to enter the Old Bailey on the 20th of May."

"You don't know Willie," he continued, "he has made my solicitors buy letters
of mine; he has blackmailed me."

"Whew!" I whistled.  "But in that case you'll have no compunction in leaving him
without saying 'goodbye.'  Let's go and get into the brougham."

"No, no," he repeated, "you don't understand; I can't go, I cannot go."

"Do you mean it really?" I asked.  "Do you mean you will not come and spend
a week yachting with me?"

"I cannot."

I drew him a few paces nearer the carriage: something of desolation and despair
in his voice touched me: I looked at him.  Tears were pouring down his face;
he was the picture of misery, yet I could not move him.

"Come into the carriage," I said, hoping that the swift wind in his face would
freshen him up, give him a moment's taste of the joy of living and sharpen the
desire of freedom.

"Yes, Frank," he said, "if you will take me to Oakley Street."

"I would as soon take you to prison," I replied; "but as you wish."

The next moment we had got in and were swinging down Queen's Gate.  The mist
seemed to lend keenness to the air.  At the bottom of Queen's Gate the coachman
swept of himself to the left into the Cromwell Road; Oscar seemed to wake out of
his stupor.

"No, Frank," he cried, "no, no," and he fumbled at the handle of the door, "I
must get out; I will not go.  I will not go."

"Sit still," I said in despair, "I'll tell the coachman," and I put my head out
of the window and cried: "Oakley Street, Oakley Street, Chelsea, Robert."

I do not think I spoke again till we got to Oakley Street.  I was consumed with
rage and contemptuous impatience.  I had done the best I knew and had failed.
Why?  I had no idea.  I have never known why he refused to come.  I don't think
he knew himself.  Such resignation I had never dreamt of.  It was utterly new
to me.  I used to think of resignation in a vague way as of something rather
beautiful; ever since, I have thought of it with impatience: resignation is the
courage of the irresolute.  Oscar's obstinacy was the obverse of his weakness.
It is astonishing how inertia rules some natures.  The attraction of waiting and
doing nothing is intense for those who live in thought and detest action.  As we
turned into Oakley Street, Oscar said to me:

"You are not angry with me, Frank?" and he put out his hand.

"No, no," I said, "why should I be angry?  You are the master of your fate.
I can only offer advice."

"Do come and see me soon," he pleaded.

"My bolt is shot," I replied; "but I'll come in two or three days' time, as
soon as I have anything of importance to say. . . . . Don't forget, Oscar, the
yacht is there and will be there waiting until the 20th; the yacht will always
be ready and the brougham."

"Good night, Frank," he said, "good night, and thank you."

He got out and went into the house, the gloomy sordid house where the brother
lived who would sell his blood for a price!

. . . . . . .

Three or four days later we met again, but to my amaze Oscar had not changed
his mind.  To talk of him as cast down is the precise truth; he seemed to me as
one who had fallen from a great height and lay half conscious, stunned on the
ground.  The moment you moved him, even to raise his head, it gave him pain and
he cried out to be left alone.  There he lay prone, and no one could help him.
It was painful to witness his dumb misery: his mind even, his sunny bright
intelligence, seemed to have deserted him.

Once again he came out with me to lunch.  Afterwards we drove through Regent's
Park as the quietest way to Hampstead and had a talk.  The air and swift motion
did him good.  The beauty of the view from the heath seemed to revive him.
I tried to cheer him up.

"You must know," I said, "that you can win if you want to.  You can not only
bring the jury to doubt, but you can make the judge doubt as well.  I was
convinced of your innocence in spite of all the witnesses, and I knew more
about you than they did.  In the trial before Mr. Justice Charles, the thing
that saved you was that you spoke of the love of David and Jonathan and the
sweet affection which the common world is determined not to understand.  There
is another point against you which you have not touched on yet: Gill asked you
what you had in common with those serving-men and stable boys.  You have not
explained that.  You have explained that you love youth, the brightness and the
gaiety of it, but you have not explained what seems inexplicable to most men,
that you should go about with servants and strappers."

"Difficult to explain, Frank, isn't it, without the truth?" Evidently his mind
was not working.

"No," I replied, "easy, simple.  Think of Shakespeare.  How did he know Dogberry
and Pistol, Bardolph and Doll Tearsheet?  He must have gone about with them.
You don't go about with public school boys of your own class, for you know them;
you have nothing to learn from them: they can teach you nothing.  But the stable
boy and servant you cannot sketch in your plays without knowing him, and you
can't know him without getting on his level, and letting him call you 'Oscar'
and calling him 'Charlie.'  If you rub this in, the judge will see that he is
face to face with the artist in you and will admit at least that your
explanation is plausible.  He will hesitate to condemn you, and once he
hesitates you'll win.

"You fought badly because you did not show your own nature sufficiently; you did
not use your brains in the witness box and alas--" I did not continue; the truth
was I was filled with fear; for I suddenly realised that he had shown more
courage and self-possession in the Queensberry trial than in the trial before
Mr. Justice Charles when so much more was at stake; and I felt that in the next
trial he would be more depressed still, and less inclined to take the initiative
than ever.  I had already learned too that I could not help him; that he would
not be lifted out of that "sweet way of despair," which so attracts the artist
spirit.  But still I would do my best.

"Do you understand?" I asked.

"Of course, Frank, of course, but you have no conception how weary I am of the
whole thing, of the shame and the struggling and the hatred.  To see those
people coming into the box one after the other to witness against me makes me
sick.  The self-satisfied grin of the barristers, the pompous foolish judge
with his thin lips and cunning eyes and hard jaw.  Oh, it's terrible.  I feel
inclined to stretch out my hands and cry to them, 'Do what you will with me, in
God's name, only do it quickly; cannot you see that I am worn out?  If hatred
gives you pleasure, indulge it.'  They worry one, Frank, with ravening jaws,
as dogs worry a rabbit.  Yet they call themselves men.  It is appalling."

The day was dying, the western sky all draped with crimson, saffron and rosy
curtains: a slight mist over London, purple on the horizon, closer, a mere wash
of blue; here and there steeples pierced the thin veil like fingers pointing
upward.  On the left the dome of St. Paul's hung like a grey bubble over the
city; on the right the twin towers of Westminster with the river and bridge
which Wordsworth sang.  Peace and beauty brooding everywhere, and down there
lost in the mist the "rat pit" that men call the Courts of Justice.  There they
judge their fellows, mistaking indifference for impartiality, as if anyone could
judge his fellowman without love, and even with love how far short we all come
of that perfect sympathy which is above forgiveness and takes delight in
succouring the weak, comforting the broken-hearted.

. . . . . . .

The days went swiftly by and my powerlessness to influence him filled me with
self-contempt.  Of course, I said to myself, if I knew him better I should be
able to help him.  Would vanity do anything?  It was his mainspring; I could but
try.  He might be led by the hope of making Englishmen talk of him again, talk
of him as one who had dared to escape; wonder what he would do next.  I would
try, and I did try.  But his dejection foiled me: his dislike of the struggle
seemed to grow from day to day.

He would scarcely listen to me.  He was counting the days to the trial: willing
to accept an adverse decision; even punishment and misery and shame seemed
better than doubt and waiting.  He surprised me by saying:

"A year, Frank, they may give me a year? half the possible sentence: the middle
course, that English Judges always take: the sort of compromise they think
safe?" and his eyes searched my face for agreement.

I felt no such confidence in English Judges; their compromises are usually
bargainings; when they get hold of an artist they give rein to their intuitive
fear and hate.

But I would not discourage him.  I repeated:

"You can win, Oscar, if you like:--" my litany to him.  His wan dejected smile
brought tears to my eyes.

. . . . . . .

"Don't you want to make them all speak of you and wonder at you again?  If you
were in France, everyone would be asking: will he come back or disappear
altogether?  or will he manifest himself henceforth in some new comedies, more
joyous and pagan than ever?"

I might as well have talked to the dead: he seemed numbed, hypnotised with
despair.  The punishment had already been greater than he could bear.  I began
to fear that prison, if he were condemned to it, would rob him of his reason;
I sometimes feared that his mind was already giving way, so profound was his
depression, so hopeless his despair.

. . . . . . .

The trial opened before Mr. Justice Wills on the 21st of May, 1895.  The
Treasury had sent Sir Frank Lockwood, Q.C., M.P., to lead Mr. C. F. Gill,
Mr. Horace Avory, and Mr. Sutton.  Oscar was represented by the same counsel
as on the previous occasion.

The whole trial to me was a nightmare, and it was characterised from the very
beginning by atrocious prejudice and injustice.  The High Priests of Law were
weary of being balked; eager to make an end.  As soon as the Judge took his
seat, Sir Edward Clarke applied that the defendants should be tried separately.
As they had already been acquitted on the charge of conspiracy, there was no
reason why they should be tried together.

The Judge called on the Solicitor-General to answer the application.

The Solicitor-General had nothing to say, but thought it was in the interests
of the defendants to be tried together; for, in case they were tried separately,
it would be necessary to take the defendant Taylor first.

Sir Edward Clarke tore this pretext to pieces, and Mr. Justice Wills brought the
matter to a conclusion by saying that he was in possession of all the evidence
that had been taken at the previous trials, and his opinion was that the two
defendants should be tried separately.

Sir Edward Clarke then applied that the case of Mr. Wilde should be taken first
as his name stood first on the indictment, and as the first count was directed
against him and had nothing to do with Taylor. . . . . "There are reasons
present, I am sure, too, in your Lordship's mind, why Wilde should not be tried
immediately after the other defendant."

Mr. Justice Wills remarked, with seeming indifference, "It ought not to make the
least difference, Sir Edward.  I am sure I and the jury will do our best to take
care that the last trial has no influence at all on the present."

Sir Edward Clarke stuck to his point.  He urged respectfully that as Mr. Wilde's
name stood first on the indictment his case should be taken first.

Mr. Justice Wills said he could not interfere with the discretion of the
prosecution, nor vary the ordinary procedure.  Justice and fair play on the one
side and precedent on the other: justice was waved out of court with serene
indifference.  Thereupon Sir Edward Clarke pressed that the trial of Mr. Oscar
Wilde should stand over till the next sessions.  But again Mr. Justice Wills
refused.  Precedent was silent now but prejudice was strong as ever.

The case against Taylor went on the whole day and was resumed next morning.
Taylor went into the box and denied all the charges.  The Judge summed up dead
against him, and at 3.30 the jury retired to consider their verdict: in forty-
five minutes they came into court again with a question which was significant.
In answer to the judge the foreman stated that "they had agreed that Taylor
had introduced Parker to Wilde, but they were not satisfied with Wilde's guilt
in the matter."

Mr. Justice Wills: "Were you agreed as to the charge on the other counts?"

Foreman: "Yes, my Lord."

Mr. Justice Wills: "Well, possibly it would be as well to take your verdict
upon the other counts."

Through the foreman the jury accordingly intimated that they found Taylor guilty
with regard to Charles and William Parker.

In answer to his Lordship, Sir F. Lockwood said he would take the verdict given
by the jury of "guilty" upon the two counts.

A formal verdict having been entered, the judge ordered the prisoner to stand
down, postponing sentence.  Did he postpone the sentence in order not to
frighten the next jury by the severity of it?  Other reason I could find none.

Sir Edward Clarke then got up and said that as it was getting rather late,
perhaps after the second jury had disagreed as to Mr. Wilde's guilt--

Sir F. Lockwood here interposed hotly: "I object to Sir Edward Clarke making
these little speeches."

Mr. Justice Wills took the matter up as well.

"You can hardly call it a disagreement, Sir Edward," though what else he could
call it, I was at a loss to imagine.

He then adjourned the case against Oscar Wilde till the next day, when a
different jury would be impanelled.  But whatever jury might be called they
would certainly hear that their forerunners had found Taylor guilty and they
would know that every London paper without exception had approved the finding.
What a fair chance to give Wilde! It was like trying an Irish Secretary before
a jury of Fenians.

The next morning, May 23d, Oscar Wilde appeared in the dock.  The Solicitor-
General opened the case, and then called his witnesses.  One of the first was
Edward Shelley, who in cross-examination admitted that he had been mentally ill
when he wrote Mr. Wilde those letters which had been put in evidence.  He was
"made nervous from over-study," he said.

Alfred Wood admitted that he had had money given him quite recently, practically
blackmailing money.  He was as venomous as possible.  "When he went to America,"
he said, "he told Wilde that he wanted to get away from mixing with him (Wilde)
and Douglas."

Charlie Parker next repeated his disgusting testimony with ineffable impudence
and a certain exultation.  Bestial ignominy could go no lower; he admitted
that since the former trial he had been kept at the expense of the prosecution.
After this confession the case was adjourned and we came out of court.

When I reached Fleet Street I was astonished to hear that there had been a row
that same afternoon in Piccadilly between Lord Douglas of Hawick and his father,
the Marquis of Queensberry.  Lord Queensberry, it appears, had been writing
disgusting letters about the Wilde case to Lord Douglas's wife.  Meeting him
in Piccadilly Percy Douglas stopped him and asked him to cease writing obscene
letters to his wife.  The Marquis said he would not and the father and son came
to blows.  Queensberry it seems was exasperated by the fact that Douglas of
Hawick was one of those who had gone bail for Oscar Wilde.  One of the telegrams
which the Marquis of Queensberry had sent to Lady Douglas I must put in just to
show the insane nature of the man who could exult in a trial which was damning
the reputation of his own son.  The letter was manifestly written after the
result of the Taylor trial:

Must congratulate on verdict, cannot on Percy's appearance.  Looks like a
dug up corpse.  Fear too much madness of kissing.  Taylor guilty.  Wilde's
turn tomorrow.

Queensberry.

In examination before the magistrate, Mr. Hannay, it was stated that Lord
Queensberry had been sending similar letters to Lady Douglas "full of the
most disgusting charges against Lord Douglas, his wife, and Lord Queensberry's
divorced wife and her family."  But Mr. Hannay thought all this provocation was
of no importance and bound over both father and son to keep the peace--an
indefensible decision, a decision only to be explained by the sympathy
everywhere shown to Queensberry because of his victory over Wilde, otherwise
surely any honest magistrate would have condemned the father who sent obscene
letters to his son's wife--a lady above reproach.  These vile letters and the
magistrate's bias, seemed to me to add the final touch of the grotesque to the
horrible vileness of the trial.  It was all worthy of the seventh circle of
Dante, but Dante had never imagined such a father and such judges!

. . . . . . .

Next morning Oscar Wilde was again put in the dock.  The evidence of the
Queensberry trial was read and therewith the case was closed for the Crown.

Sir Edward Clarke rose and submitted that there was no case to go to the jury on
the general counts.  After a long legal argument for and against, Mr. Justice
Wills said that he would reserve the question for the Court of Appeal.  The view
he took was that "the evidence was of the slenderest kind"; but he thought the
responsibility must be left with the jury.  To this judge "the slenderest kind"
of evidence was worthful so long as it told against the accused.

Sir Edward Clarke then argued that the cases of Shelley, Parker, and Wood failed
on the ground of the absence of corroboration.  Mr. Justice Wills admitted that
Shelley showed "a peculiar exaltation" of mind; there was, too, mental
derangement in his family, and worst of all there was no corroboration of his
statements.  Accordingly, in spite of the arguments of the Solicitor-General,
Shelley's evidence was cut out.  But Shelley's evidence had already been taken,
had already prejudiced the jury.  Indeed, it had been the evidence which had
influenced Mr. Justice Charles in the previous trial to sum up dead against the
defendant: Mr. Justice Charles called Shelley "the only serious witness."

Now it appeared that Shelley's evidence should never have been taken at all,
that the jury ought never to have heard Shelley's testimony or the Judge's
acceptance of it!

. . . . . . .

When the court opened next morning I knew that the whole case depended on Oscar
Wilde, and the showing he would make in the box, but alas! he was broken and
numbed.  He was not a fighter, and the length of this contest might have wearied
a combative nature.  The Solicitor-General began by examining him on his letters
to Lord Alfred Douglas and we had the "prose poem" again and the rest of the
ineffable nonsensical prejudice of the middle-class mind against passionate
sentiment.  It came out in evidence that Lord Alfred Douglas was now in Calais.
His hatred of his father was the "causa causans" of the whole case; he had
pushed Oscar into the fight and Oscar, still intent on shielding him, declared
that he had asked him to go abroad.

Sir Edward Clarke again did his poor best.  He pointed out that the trial rested
on the evidence of mere blackmailers.  He would not quarrel with that and
discuss it, but it was impossible not to see that if blackmailers were to be
listened to and believed, their profession might speedily become a more deadly
mischief and danger to society than it had ever been.

The speech was a weak one; but the people in court cheered Sir Edward Clarke;
the cheers were immediately suppressed by the Judge.

The Solicitor-General took up the rest of the day with a rancorous reply.  Sir
Edward Clarke even had to remind him that law officers of the Crown should try
to be impartial.  One instance of his prejudice may be given.  Examining Oscar
as to his letters to Lord Alfred Douglas, Sir Frank Lockwood wanted to know
whether he thought them "decent"?

The witness replied, "Yes."

"Do you know the meaning of the word, sir?" was this gentleman's retort.

I went out of the court feeling certain that the case was lost.  Oscar had not
shown himself at all; he had not even spoken with the vigour he had used at the
Queensberry trial.  He seemed too despairing to strike a blow.

The summing up of the Judge on May 25th was perversely stupid and malevolent.
He began by declaring that he was "absolutely impartial," though his view of the
facts had to be corrected again and again by Sir Edward Clarke: he went on to
regret that the charge of conspiracy should have been introduced, as it had to
be abandoned.  He then pointed out that he could not give a colourless summing
up, which was "of no use to anybody."  His intelligence can be judged from one
crucial point: he fastened on the fact that Oscar had burnt the letters which
he bought from Wood, which he said were of no importance, except that they
concerned third parties.  The Judge had persuaded himself that the letters were
indescribably bad, forgetting apparently that Wood or his associates had
selected and retained the very worst of them for purposes of blackmail and that
this Judge himself, after reading it, couldn't attribute any weight to it; still
he insisted that burning the letters was an act of madness; whereas it seemed to
everyone of the slightest imagination the most natural thing in the world for an
innocent man to do.  At the time Oscar burnt the letters he had no idea that he
would ever be on trial.  His letters had been misunderstood and the worst of
them was being used against him, and when he got the others he naturally threw
them into the fire.  The Judge held that it was madness, and built upon this
inference a pyramid of guilt.  "Nothing said by Wood should be believed, as he
belongs to the vilest class of criminals; the strength of the accusation depends
solely upon the character of the original introduction of Wood to Wilde as
illustrated and fortified by the story with regard to the letters and their
burning."

A pyramid of guilt carefully balanced on its apex! If the foolish Judge had only
read his Shakespeare! What does Henry VI say:

Proceed no straiter 'gainst our uncle Gloucester
Than from true evidence of good esteem
He be approved in practice culpable.

There was no "true evidence of good esteem" against Wilde, but the Judge turned
a harmless action into a confession of guilt.

Then came an interruption which threw light on the English conception of
justice.  The foreman of the jury wanted to know, in view of the intimate
relations between Lord Alfred Douglas and the defendant, whether a warrant
against Lord Alfred Douglas was ever issued.

Mr. Justice Wills: "I should say not; we have never heard of it."

Foreman: "Or ever contemplated?"

Mr. Justice Wills: "That I cannot say, nor can we discuss it.  The issue of such
a warrant would not depend upon the testimony of the parties, but whether there
was evidence of such act.  Letters pointing to such relations would not be
sufficient.  Lord Alfred Douglas was not called, and you can give what weight
you like to that."

Foreman: "If we are to deduce any guilt from these letters, it would apply
equally to Lord Alfred Douglas."

Mr. Justice Wills concurred in that view, but after all he thought it had
nothing to do with the present trial, which was the guilt of the accused.

The jury retired to consider their verdict at half past three.  After being
absent two hours they returned to know whether there was any evidence of
Charles Parker having slept at St. James's Place.

His Lordship replied, "No."

The jury shortly afterwards returned again with the verdict of "Guilty" on all
the counts.

It may be worth while to note again that the Judge himself admitted that the
evidence on some of the counts was of "the slenderest kind"; but, when backed
by his prejudiced summing up, it was more than sufficient for the jury.

Sir Edward Clarke pleaded that sentence should be postponed till the next
sessions, when the legal argument would be heard.

Mr. Justice Wills would not be balked: sentence, he thought, should be given
immediately.  Then, addressing the prisoners, he said, and again I give his
exact words, lest I should do him wrong:


"Oscar Wilde and Alfred Taylor, the crime of which you have been convicted is so
bad that one has to put stern restraint upon one's self to prevent one's self
from describing in language which I would rather not use the sentiments which
must rise to the breast of every man of honour who has heard the details of
these two terrible trials.

"That the jury have arrived at a correct verdict in this case I cannot persuade
myself to entertain the shadow of a doubt; and I hope, at all events, that those
who sometimes imagine that a Judge is half-hearted in the cause of decency and
morality because he takes care no prejudice shall enter into the case may see
that that is consistent at least with the utmost sense of indignation at the
horrible charges brought home to both of you.

"It is no use for me to address you.  People who can do these things must be
dead to all sense of shame, and one cannot hope to produce any effect upon them.
It is the worst case I have ever tried. . . . . That you, Wilde, have been the
centre of a circle of extensive corruption of the most hideous kind among young
men it is impossible to doubt.

"I shall under such circumstances be expected to pass the severest sentence
that the law allows.  In my judgment it is totally inadequate for such a case
as this.

"The sentence of the court is that each of you be imprisoned and kept to hard
labour for two years."

The sentence hushed the court in shocked surprise.

Wilde rose and cried, "Can I say anything, my lord?"

Mr. Justice Wills waved his hand deprecatingly amid cries of "Shame" and hisses
from the public gallery; some of the cries and hisses were certainly addressed
to the Judge and well deserved.  What did he mean by saying that Oscar was a
"centre of extensive corruption of the most hideous kind"?  No evidence of this
had been brought forward by the prosecution.  It was not even alleged that a
single innocent person had been corrupted.  The accusation was invented by this
"absolutely impartial" Judge to justify his atrocious cruelty.  The unmerited
insults and appalling sentence would have disgraced the worst Judge of the
Inquisition.

Mr. Justice Wills evidently suffered from the peculiar "exaltation" of mind
which he had recognised in Shelley.  This peculiarity is shared in a lesser
degree by several other Judges on the English bench in all matters of sexual
morality.  What distinguished Mr. Justice Wills was that he was proud of his
prejudice and eager to act on it.  He evidently did not know, or did not care,
that the sentence which he had given, declaring it was "totally inadequate,"
had been condemned by a Royal Commission as "inhuman."  He would willingly
have pushed "inhumanity" to savagery, out of sheer bewigged stupidity, and
that he was probably well-meaning only intensified the revolt one felt at such
brainless malevolence.

The bitterest words in Dante are not bitter enough to render my feeling:

"Non ragioniam di lor ma guarda e passa."

The whole scene had sickened me.  Hatred masquerading as justice, striking
vindictively and adding insult to injury.  The vile picture had its fit setting
outside.  We had not left the court when the cheering broke out in the streets,
and when we came outside there were troops of the lowest women of the town
dancing together and kicking up their legs in hideous abandonment, while the
surrounding crowd of policemen and spectators guffawed with delight.  As I
turned away from the exhibition, as obscene and soul-defiling as anything
witnessed in the madness of the French revolution, I caught a glimpse of Wood
and the Parkers getting into a cab, laughing and leering.


These were the venal creatures Oscar Wilde was punished for having corrupted!










This etext was produced by Tony Adam <anthony-adam@tamu.edu>





THE LONDON PRODIGAL, As it was played by the King's Majesties
servants.



The Actor's Names in the London Prodigal.

M. FLOWERDALE (Senior), a Merchant trading at Venice.
MATTH. FLOWERDALE, his Prodigal Son.
M. FLOWERDALE (Junior), Brother to the Merchant.
SIR LANCELOT SPURCOCK, of Lewsome in Kent.
FRANCES, LUCY, DELIA, Daughters to Sir Lancelot Spurcock.
DAFFODIL, ARTICHOKE, Servants to Sir Lancelot Spurcock.
SIR ARTHUR GREENSHOOD, a Commander, in love with Lucy.
OLIVER, a Devonshire Clothier, in love with Lucy.
WEATHERCOCK, a Parasite to Sir Lancelot Spurcock.
TOM CIVET, in love with Frances.
DICK and RALPH, two cheating Gamesters.
RUFFIAN, a Pander to Mistress Apricot a Bawd.
SHERIFF and OFFICERS.
A CITIZEN and his wife.
Drawers.

The Scene:  London (and the Parts adjacent).



ACT I.

SCENE I.  London.  A room in Flowerdale Junior's house.

[Enter old Flowerdale and his brother.]

FATHER.
Brother, from Venice, being thus disguised,
I come to prove the humours of my son.
How hath he borne himself since my departure,
I leaving you his patron and his guide?

UNCLE.
Ifaith, brother, so, as you will grieve to hear,
And I almost ashamed to report it.


FATHER.
Why, how ist, brother? what, doth he spend beyond
the allowance I left him?

UNCLE.
How! beyond that? and far more:  why, your exhibition
is nothing.  He hath spent that, and since hath borrowed; 
protested with oaths, alleged kindred to wring money 
from me,--by the love I bore his father, by the fortunes
might fall upon himself, to furnish his wants:  that done,
I have had since his bond, his friend and friend's bond.
Although I know that he spends is yours; yet it grieves 
me to see the unbridled wildness that reins over him.

FATHER.
Brother, what is the manner of his life? how is the name
of his offences?  If they do not relish altogether of
damnation, his youth may privilege his wantonness:  I
myself ran an unbridled course till thirty, nay, almost 
till forty;--well, you see how I am:  for vice, once looked
into with the eyes of discretion, and well-balanced with
the weights of reason, the course past seems so abominable,
that the Landlord of himself, which is the heart of the body,
will rather entomb himself in the earth, or seek a new 
Tenant to remain in him:--which once settled, how much
better are they that in their youth have known all these
vices, and left it, than those that knew little, and in their
age runs into it?  Believe me, brother, they that die most
virtuous hath in their youth lived most vicious, and none
knows the danger of the fire more than he that falls into
it.  But say, how is the course of his life? let's hear his
particulars.

UNCLE.
Why, I'll tell you, brother; he is a continual swearer, and
a breaker of his oaths, which is bad.

FATHER.
I grant indeed to swear is bad, but not in keeping those
oaths is better:  for who will set by a bad thing?  Nay, by
my faith, I hold this rather a virtue than a vice.  Well, I pray,
proceed.

UNCLE.
He is a mighty brawler, and comes commonly by the worst.

FATHER.
By my faith, this is none of the worst neither, for if he brawl 
and be beaten for it, it will in time make him shun it:  For 
what brings man or child more to virtue than correction?
What reigns over him else?

UNCLE.
He is a great drinker, and one that will forget himself.

FATHER.
O best of all! vice should be forgotten; let him drink on,
so he drink not churches.  Nay, and this be the worst, I
hold it rather a happiness in him, than any iniquity.  Hath
he any more attendants?

UNCLE.
Brother, he is one that will borrow of any man.

FATHER.
Why, you see, so doth the sea:  it borrows of all the small
currents in the world, to increase himself.

UNCLE.
Aye, but the sea pales it again, and so will never your son.

FATHER.
No more would the sea neither, if it were as dry as my son.

UNCLE.
Then, brother, I see you rather like these vices in your son, 
than any way condemn them.

FATHER.
Nay, mistake me not, brother, for tho I slur them over now, 
as things slight and nothing, his crimes being in the bud, it
would gall my heart, they should ever reign in him.

FLOWERDALE.
Ho! who's within? ho!

[Flowerdale knocks within.]

UNCLE.
That's your son, he is come to borrow more money.

FATHER.
For Godsake give it out I am dead; see how he'll take it.
Say I have brought you news from his father.  I have here
drawn a formal will, as it were from my self, which I'll
deliver him.

UNCLE.
Go to, brother, no more:  I will.

FLOWERDALE.
[Within.]  Uncle, where are you, Uncle?

UNCLE.
Let my cousin in there.

FATHER.
I am a sailor come from Venice, and my name is Christopher.

[Enter Flowerdale.]

FLOWERDALE.
By the Lord, in truth, Uncle--

UNCLE.
In truth would a served, cousin, without the Lord.

FLOWERDALE.
By your leave, Uncle, the Lord is the Lord of truth.  A couple
of rascals at the gate set upon me for my purse.

UNCLE.
You never come, but you bring a brawl in your mouth.

FLOWERDALE.
By my truth, Uncle, you must needs lend me ten pound.

UNCLE.
Give my cousin some small beer here.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, look you, you turn it to a jest now:  by this light, I
should ride to Croyden fair, to meet Sir Lancelot Spurcock.
I should have his daughter Lucy, and for scurvy ten pound, 
a man shall lose nine hundred three-score and odd pounds,
and a daily friend beside.  By this hand, Uncle, tis true.

UNCLE.
Why, any thing is true for ought I know.

FLOWERDALE.
To see now! why, you shall have my bond, Uncle, or Tom 
White's, James Brock's, or Nick Hall's:  as good rapier and
dagger men, as any be in England.  Let's be damned if we do
not pay you:  the worst of us all will not damn ourselves for
ten pound.  A pox of ten pound!

UNCLE.
Cousin, this is not the first time I have believed you.

FLOWERDALE.
Why, trust me now, you know not what may fall.  If one
thing were but true, I would not greatly care, I should not
need ten pound, but when a man cannot be believed,--there's
it.

UNCLE.
Why, what is it, cousin?

FLOWERDALE.
Marry, this, Uncle:  can you tell me if the Katern-hue be
come home or no?

UNCLE.
Aye, marry, ist.

FLOWERDALE.
By God I thank you for that news.  What, ist in the pool, can
you tell?

UNCLE.
It is; what of that?

FLOWERDALE.
What? why then I have six pieces of velvet sent me; I'll give
you a piece, Uncle:  for thus said the letter,--a piece of 
Ashcolour, a three piled black, a colour de roi, a crimson, a
sad green, and a purple:  yes, yfaith.

UNCLE.
From whom should you receive this?

FLOWERDALE.
From who? why, from my father; with commendations to you,
Uncle, and thus he writes:  I know, said he, thou hast much
troubled thy kind Uncle, whom God-willing at my return I
will see amply satisfied.  Amply, I remember was the very word,
so God help me.

UNCLE.
Have you the letter here?

FLOWERDALE.
Yes, I have the letter here, here is the letter:  no, yes, no;--let me
see, what breeches wore I a Saturday? let me see:  a Tuesday my
Salamanca; a Wednesday my peach colour Satin; a Thursday my
Vellour; a Friday my Salamanca again; a Saturday--let me see--a
Saturday,--for in those breeches I wore a Saturday is the letter:  O,
my riding breeches, Uncle, those that you thought been velvet; in
those very breeches is the letter.

UNCLE.
When should it be dated?

FLOWERDALE.
Marry, Decimo tertio septembris--no, no--decimo tertio Octobris;
Aye, Octobris, so it is.

UNCLE.
Decimo tertio Octobris! and here receive I a letter that your father
died in June:  how say you, Kester?

FATHER.
Yes, truly, sir, your father is dead, these hands of mine holp to
wind him.

FLOWERDALE.
Dead?

FATHER.
Aye, sir, dead.

FLOWERDALE.
Sblood, how should my father come dead?

FATHER.
Yfaith, sir, according to the old Proverb:
The child was born and cried, became man,
After fell sick, and died.

UNCLE.
Nay, cousin, do not take it so heavily.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, I cannot weep you extempore:  marry, some
two or three days hence, I shall weep without any
stintance.  But I hope he died in good memory.

FATHER.
Very well, sir, and set down every thing in good
order; and the Katherine and Hue you talked of, I
came over in:  and I saw all the bills of lading, and
the velvet that you talked of, there is no such aboard.

FLOWERDALE.
By God, I assure you, then, there is knavery abroad.

FATHER.
I'll be sworn of that:  there's knavery abroad,
Although there were never a piece of velvet in Venice.

FLOWERDALE.
I hope he died in good estate.

FATHER.
To the report of the world he did, and made his will,
Of which I am an unworthy bearer.

FLOWERDALE.
His will! have you his will?

FATHER.
Yes, sir, and in the presence of your Uncle
I was willed to deliver it.

UNCLE.
I hope, cousin, now God hath blessed you with wealth,
you will not be unmindful of me.

FLOWERDALE.
I'll do reason, Uncle, yet, yfaith, I take the denial of 
this ten pound very hardly.

UNCLE.
Nay, I denied you not.

FLOWERDALE.
By God, you denied me directly.

UNCLE.
I'll be judged by this good fellow.

FATHER.
Not directly, sir.

FLOWERDALE.
Why, he said he would lend me none, and that had wont to be a 
direct denial, if the old phrase hold.  Well, Uncle, come, we'll
fall to the Legacies:  (reads)  'In the name of God, Amen.  Item,
I bequeath to my brother Flowerdale three hundred pounds, to pay
such trivial debts as I owe in London.  Item, to my son Matt
Flowerdale, I bequeath two bale of false dice; Videlicet, high 
men and low men, fullomes, stop cater traies, and other bones of 
function.'  
Sblood, what doth he mean by this?

UNCLE.
Proceed, cousin.

FLOWERDALE.
"These precepts I leave him:  let him borrow of his
oath, for of his word no body will trust him.  Let him
by no means marry an honest woman, for the other
will keep her self.  Let him steal as much as he can,
that a guilty conscience may bring him to his destinate
repentance."--I think he means hanging.  And this were
his last will and Testament, the Devil stood laughing at 
his bed's feet while he made it.  Sblood, what, doth he 
think to fop of his posterity with Paradoxes?

FATHER.
This he made, sir, with his own hands.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, well; nay, come, good Uncle, let me have this ten
pound.  Imagine you have lost it, or been robbed of it, or
misreckoned your self so much:  any way to make it come
easily off, good Uncle.

UNCLE.
Not a penny.

FATHER.
Yfaith, lend it him, sir.  I my self have an estate in the
City worth twenty pound:  all that I'll engage for him; he
saith it concerns him in a marriage.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, marry, it doth.  This is a fellow of some sense, this:
Come, good Uncle.

UNCLE.
Will you give your word for it, Kester?

FATHER.
I will, sir, willingly.

UNCLE.
Well, cousin, come to me some hour hence, you shall
have it ready.

FLOWERDALE.
Shall I not fail?

UNCLE.
You shall not, come or send.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, I'll come my self.

FATHER.
By my troth, would I were your worship's man.

FLOWERDALE.
What, wouldst thou serve?

FATHER.
Very willingly, sir.

FLOWERDALE.
Why, I'll tell thee what thou shalt do:  thou saith thou
hast twenty pound:  go into Burchin Lane, put thy self
into clothes; thou shalt ride with me to Croyden fair.

FATHER.
I thank you, sir; I will attend you.

FLOWERDALE.
Well, Uncle, you will not fail me an hour hence?

UNCLE.
I will not, cousin.

FLOWERDALE.
What's thy name?  Kester?

FATHER.
Aye, sir.

FLOWERDALE.
Well, provide thy self:  Uncle, farewell till anon.

[Exit Flowerdale.]

UNCLE.
Brother, how do you like your son?

FATHER.
Yfaith, brother, like a mad unbridled colt,
Or as a Hawk, that never stooped to lure:
The one must be tamed with an iron bit,
The other must be watched, or still she is wild.
Such is my son; awhile let him be so:
For counsel still is folly's deadly foe.
I'll serve his youth, for youth must have his course,
For being restrained, it makes him ten times worse;
His pride, his riot, all that may be named,
Time may recall, and all his madness tamed.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  The high street in Croydon.  An inn
appearing, with an open drinking booth before it.

[Enter Sir Lancelot, Master Weathercock, Daffodil, 
Artichoke, Lucy, and Frances.]

LANCELOT.
Sirrah Artichoke, get you home before,
And as you proved yourself a calf in buying,
Drive home your fellow calves that you have bought.

ARTICHOKE.
Yes, forsooth; shall not my fellow Daffodil go along
with me?

LANCELOT.
No, sir, no; I must have one to wait on me.

ARTICHOKE.
Daffodil, farewell, good fellow Daffodil.
You may see, mistress, I am set up by the halves;
Instead of waiting on you, I am sent to drive home calves.

LANCELOT.
Yfaith, Frances, I must turn away this Daffodil,
He's grown a very foolish saucy fellow.

FRANCES.  
Indeed law, father, he was so since I had him:
Before he was wise enough for a foolish serving-man.

WEATHERCOCK.
But what say you to me, Sir Lancelot?

LANCELOT.
O, about my daughters? well, I will go forward.
Here's two of them, God save them:  but the third,
O she's a stranger in her course of life.
She hath refused you, Master Weathercock.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, by the Rood, Sir Lancelot, that she hath,
But had she tried me,
She should a found a man of me indeed.

LANCELOT.
Nay be not angry, sir, at her denial.
She hath refused seven of the worshipfulest
And worthiest housekeepers this day in Kent:
Indeed she will not marry, I suppose.

WEATHERCOCK.
The more fool she.

LANCELOT.
What, is it folly to love Chastity?

WEATHERCOCK.
No, mistake me not, Sir Lancelot,
But tis an old proverb, and you know it well,
That women dying maids lead apes in hell.

LANCELOT.
That's a foolish proverb, and a false.

WEATHERCOCK.
By the mass I think it be, and therefore let it go:
But who shall marry with mistress Frances?

FRANCES.
By my troth, they are talking of marrying me, sister.

LUCY.
Peace, let them talk;
Fools may have leave to prattle as they walk.

DAFFODIL.
Sentesses still, sweet mistress;
You have a wit, and it were your Alliblaster.

LUCY.
Yfaith, and thy tongue trips trenchmore.

LANCELOT.
No, of my knighthood, not a suitor yet:
Alas, God help her, silly girl, a fool, a very fool:
But there's the other black-brows, a shrewd girlie,
She hath wit at will, and suitors two or three:
Sir Arthur Greenshield one, a gallant knight,
A valiant soldier, but his power but poor.
Then there's young Oliver, the Devonshire lad,
A wary fellow, marry, full of wit,
And rich by the rood: but there's a third all air,
Light as a feather, changing as the wind:
Young Flowerdale.

WEATHERCOCK.
O he, sir, he's a desperate dick indeed.
Bar him you house.

LANCELOT.
Fie, not so, he's of good parentage.

WEATHERCOCK.
By my fai' and so he is, and a proper man.

LANCELOT.
Aye, proper, enough, had he good qualities.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, marry, there's the point, Sir Lancelot,
For there's an old saying:
Be he rich, or be he poor,
Be he high, or be he low:
Be he born in barn or hall,
Tis manners makes the man and all.

LANCELOT.
You are in the right, Master Weathercock.

[Enter Monsieur Civet.]

CIVET.
Soul, I think I am sure crossed, or witched with an
owl.  I have haunted them, Inn after Inn, booth after
booth, yet cannot find them:  ha, yonder they are;
that's she.  I hope to God tis she! nay, I know tis she
now, for she treads her shoe a little awry.

LANCELOT.
Where is this Inn? we are past it, Daffodil.

DAFFODIL.
The good sign is here, sir, but the back gate is before.

CIVET.
Save you, sir.  I pray, may I borrow a piece of a word
with you?

DAFFODIL.
No pieces, sir.

CIVET.
Why, then, the whole.  I pray, sir, what may yonder
gentlewomen be?

DAFFODIL.
They may be ladies, sir, if the destinies and mortalities
work.

CIVET.
What's her name, sir?

DAFFODIL.
Mistress Frances Spurcock, Sir Lancelot Spurcock's 
daughter.

CIVET.
Is she a maid, sir?

DAFFODIL.
You may ask Pluto, and dame Proserpine that:  I would
be loath to be riddled, sir.

CIVET.
Is she married, I mean, sir?

DAFFODIL.
The Fates knows not yet what shoemaker shall make her
wedding shoes.

CIVET.
I pray, where Inn you sir?  I would be very glad to bestow
the wine of that gentlewoman.

DAFFODIL.
At the George, sir.

CIVET.
God save you, sir.

DAFFODIL.
I pray your name, sir?

CIVET.
My name is Master Civet, sir.

DAFFODIL.
A sweet name.  God be with you, good Master Civet.

[Exit Civet.]

LANCELOT.
Aye, have we spied you, stout Sir George?
For all your dragon, you had best sells good wine,
That needs no yule-bush:  well, we'll not sit by it,
As you do on your horse.  This room shall serve:
Drawer, let me have sack for us old men:
For these girls and knaves small wines are best.
A pint of sack, no more.

DRAWER.
A quart of sack in the three Tuns.

LANCELOT.
A pint, draw but a pint.--Daffodil, call for wine to
make your selves drink.

FRANCES.
And a cup of small beer, and a cake, good Daffodil.

[Enter young Flowerdale.]

FLOWERDALE.
How now? fie, sit in the open room? now, good Sir 
Lancelot, & my kind friend worshipful Master
Weathercock!  What, at your pint? a quart for shame.

LANCELOT.
Nay, Royster, by your leave we will away.

FLOWERDALE.
Come, give's some Music, we'll go dance.  Begone,
Sir Lancelot? what, and fair day too?

LUCY.
Twere foully done, to dance within the fair.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, if you say so, fairest of all fairs, then I'll not dance.
A pox upon my tailor, he hath spoiled me a peach colour
satin shirt, cut upon cloth of silver, but if ever the rascal
serve me such another trick, I'll give him leave, yfaith, to 
put me in the calendar of fools:  and you, and you, Sir
Lancelot and Master Weathercock.  My goldsmith too, on
tother side--I bespoke thee, Lucy, a carkenet of gold, and
thought thou shouldst a had it for a fairing, and the rogue
puts me in rearages for Orient Pearl:  but thou shalt have it
by Sunday night, wench.

[Enter the Drawer.]

DRAWER.
Sir, here is one hath sent you a pottle of rennish wine, brewed
with rosewater.

FLOWERDALE.
To me?

DRAWER.
No, sir, to the knight; and desires his more acquaintance.

LANCELOT.
To me? what's he that proves so kind?

DAFFODIL.
I have a trick to know his name, sir.  He hath a month's
mind here to mistress Frances, his name is Master Civet.

LANCELOT.
Call him in, Daffodil.

FLOWERDALE.
O I know him, sir, he is a fool, but reasonable rich; his
father was one of these lease-mongers, these corn-mongers, 
these money-mongers, but he never had the wit to be a
whore-monger.

[Enter Master Civet.]

LANCELOT.
I promise you, sir, you are at too much charge.

CIVET.
The charge is small charge, sir; I thank God my father left
me wherewithal:  if it please you, sir, I have a great mind 
to this gentlewoman here, in the way of marriage.

LANCELOT.
I thank you, sir:  please you come to Lewsome,
To my poor house, you shall be kindly welcome:
I knew your father, he was a wary husband.--
To pale here, Drawer.

DRAWER.
All is paid, sir:  this gentleman hath paid all.


LANCELOT.
Yfaith, you do us wrong,
But we shall live to make amends ere long:
Master Flowerdale, is that your man?

FLOWERDALE.
Yes, faith, a good old knave.

LANCELOT.
Nay, then I think
You will turn wise, now you take such a servant:
Come, you'll ride with us to Lewsome; let's away.
Tis scarce two hours to the end of day.

[Exit Omnes.]


ACT II.

SCENE I.  A road near Sir Lancelot Spurcock's
house, in Kent.

[Enter Sir Arthur Greenshood, Oliver, Lieutenant
and Soldiers.]

ARTHUR.
Lieutenant, lead your soldiers to the ships,
There let them have their coats, at their arrival
They shall have pay:  farewell, look to your charge.

SOLDIER.
Aye, we are now sent away, and cannot so much as speak 
with our friends.

OLIVER.
No, man; what, ere you used a zutch a fashion, thick you 
cannot take your leave of your vrens?

ARTHUR.
Fellow, no more.  Lieutenant, lead them off.

SOLDIER.
Well, if I have not my pay and my clothes, I'll venture a
running away tho I hang for't.

ARTHUR.
Away, sirrah, charm your tongue.

[Exit Soldiers.]

OLIVER.
Been you a presser, sir?

ARTHUR.
I am a commander, sir, under the King.

OLIVER.
Sfoot, man, and you be ne'er zutch a commander,
should a spoke with my vrens before I should agone,
so should.

ARTHUR.
Content yourself, man, my authority will stretch to
press so good a man as you.

OLIVER.
Press me?  I deuve ye, press scoundrels, and thy messels:
Press me! chee scorns thee, yfaith:  For seest thee, here's
a worshipful knight knows cham not to be pressed by thee.

[Enter Sir Lancelot, Weathercock, young Flowerdale, old
Flowerdale, Lucy, Frances.]

LANCELOT.
Sir Arthur, welcome to Lewsome, welcome by my troth.
What's the matter, man? why are you vexed?

OLIVER.
Why, man, he would press me.

LANCELOT.
O fie, Sir Arthur, press him? he is a man of reckoning.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, that he is, Sir Arthur, he hath the nobles,
The golden ruddocks he.

ARTHUR.
The fitter for the wars:  and were he not
In favour with your worships, he should see,
That I have power to press so good as he.

OLIVER.
Chill stand to the trial, so chill.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, marry, shall he, press-cloth and karsie,
white pot and drowsen broth:  tut, tut, he cannot.

OLIVER.
Well, sir, tho you see vlouten cloth and karsie,
chee a zeen zutch a karsie coat wear out the town
sick a zilken jacket, as thick a one you wear.

FLOWERDALE.
Well said, vlitan vlattan.

OLIVER.
Aye, and well said, cocknell, and bo-bell too:  what,
doest think cham a veard of thy zilken coat? nefer 
vere thee.

LANCELOT.
Nay, come, no more, be all lovers and friends.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, tis best so, good master Oliver.

FLOWERDALE.
Is your name master Oliver, I pray you?

OLIVER.
What tit and be tit, and grieve you.

FLOWERDALE.
No, but I'd gladly know if a man might not have
a foolish plot out of master Oliver to work upon.

OLIVER.
Work thy plots upon me! stand aside:--work thy 
foolish plots upon me! chill so use thee, thou weart
never so used since thy dame bound thy head.  Work
upon me?

FLOWERDALE.
Let him come, let him come.

OLIVER.
Zirrah, zirrah, if it were not vor shame, chee would a
given thee zutch a whisterpoop under the ear, chee 
would a made thee a vanged an other at my feet:  stand
aside, let me loose, cham all of a vlaming fire-brand;
Stand aside.

FLOWERDALE.
Well, I forbear you for your friend's sake.

OLIVER.
A vig for all my vrens! doest thou tell me of my vrens?

LANCELOT.
No more, good master Oliver; no more,
Sir Arthur.  And, maiden, here in the sight
Of all your suitors, every man of worth,
I'll tell you whom I fainest would prefer
To the hard bargain of your marriage bed.--
Shall I be plain among you, gentlemen?

ARTHUR.
Aye, sir, tis best.

LANCELOT.
Then, sir, first to you:--
I do confess you a most gallant knight,
A worthy soldier, and an honest man:
But honesty maintains not a french-hood,
Goes very seldom in a chain of gold,
Keeps a small train of servants:  hath few friends.--
And for this wild oats here, young Flowerdale,
I will not judge:  God can work miracles,
But he were better make a hundred new,
Then thee a thrifty and an honest one.

WEATHERCOCK.
Believe me, he hath bit you there, he hath
touched you to the quick, that hath he.

FLOWERDALE.
Woodcock a my side! why, master Weathercock,
you know I am honest, however trifles--

WEATHERCOCK.
Now, by my troth, I know no otherwise.
O your old mother was a dame indeed:
Heaven hath her soul, and my wives too, I trust:
And your good father, honest gentleman,
He is gone a Journey, as I hear, far hence.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, God be praised, he is far enough.
He is gone a pilgrimage to Paradice,
And left me to cut a caper against care.
Lucy, look on me that am as light as air.

LUCY.
Yfaith, I like not shadows, bubbles, breath
I hate a light a love, as I hate death.

LANCELOT.
Girl, hold thee there:  look on this Devonshire lad:
Fat, fair, and lovely, both in purse and person.

OLIVER.
Well, sir, cham as the Lord hath made me.  You
know me well, uyine:  cha have three-score pack a 
karsie, and black-em hal, and chief credit beside,
and my fortunes may be so good as an others, zo
it may.

LUCY.
[Aside to Arthur.]  Tis you I love, whatsoever
others say.

ARTHUR.
Thanks, fairest.

FLOWERDALE.
[Aside to Father.]  What, wouldnst thou have me
quarrel with him?

FATHER.
Do but say he shall hear from you.

LANCELOT.
Yet, gentleman, howsoever I prefer
This Devonshire suitor, I'll enforce no love;
My daughter shall have liberty to choose
Whom she likes best; in your love suit proceed:
Not all of you, but only one must speed.

WEATHERCOCK.
You have said well:  indeed, right well.

[Enter Artichoke.]

ARTICHOKE.
Mistress, here's one would speak with you.  My
fellow Daffodil hath him in the cellar already:  he
knows him; he met him at Croyden fair.

LANCELOT.
O, I remember, a little man.

ARTICHOKE.
Aye, a very little man.

LANCELOT.
And yet a proper man.

ARTICHOKE.
A very proper, very little man.

LANCELOT .
His name is Monsieur Civet.

ARTICHOKE.
The same, sir.

LANCELOT.
Come, Gentlemen, if other suitors come,
My foolish daughter will be fitted too:
But Delia my saint, no man dare move.

[Exeunt all but young Flowerdale and Oliver,
and old Flowerdale.]

FLOWERDALE.
Hark you, sir, a word.

OLIVER.
What haan you to say to me now?

FLOWERDALE.
Ye shall hear from me, and that very shortly.

OLIVER.
Is that all? vare thee well, chee vere thee not
a vig.

[Exit Oliver.]

FLOWERDALE.
What if he should come now?  I am fairly dressed.

FATHER.
I do not mean that you shall meet with him,
But presently we'll go and draw a will:
Where we'll set down land that we never saw,
And we will have it of so large a sum,
Sir Lancelot shall entreat you take his daughter:
This being formed, give it Master Weathercock,
And make Sir Lancelot's daughter heir of all:
And make him swear never to show the will
To any one, until that you be dead.
This done, the foolish changing Weathercock
Will straight discourse unto Sir Lancelot
The form and tenor of your Testament.
Nor stand to pause of it, be ruled by me:
What will ensue, that shall you quickly see.

FLOWERDALE.
Come, let's about it:  if that a will, sweet Kit,
Can get the wench, I shall renown thy wit.

[Exit Omnes.]


SCENE II.  A room in Sir Lancelot's house.

[Enter Daffodil.]

DAFFODIL.
Mistress, still froward?  No kind looks
Unto your Daffodil? now by the Gods--

LUCY.
Away, you foolish knave, let my hand go.

DAFFODIL.
There is your hand, but this shall go with me:
My heart is thine, this is my true love's fee.

LUCY.
I'll have your coat stripped o'er your ears for this,
You saucy rascal.

[Enter Lancelot and Weathercock.]

LANCELOT.
How now, maid, what is the news with you?

LUCY.
Your man is something saucy.

[Exit Lucy.]

LANCELOT.
Go to, sirrah, I'll talk with you anon.

DAFFODIL.
Sir, I am a man to be talked withal, 
I am no horse, I tro:
I know my strength, then no more than so.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, by the matkins, good Sir Lancelot,
I saw him the other day hold up the bucklers,
Like an Hercules.  Yfaith, God a mercy, lad,
I like thee well.

LANCELOT.
Aye, I like him well:  go, sirrah, fetch me a
  cup of wine,
That ere I part with Master Weathercock,
We may drink down our farewell in French wine.

WEATHERCOCK.
I thank you, sir, I thank you, friendly knight,
I'll come and visit you, by the mouse-foot I will:
In the meantime, take heed of cutting Flowerdale.
He is a desperate dick, I warrant you.

LANCELOT.
He is, he is:  fill, Daffodil, fill me some wine.  Ha,
what wears he on his arm?  My daughter Lucy's
bracelet.  Aye, tis the same.--Ha to you, Master 
Weathercock.

WEATHERCOCK.
I thank you, sir:  Here, Daffodil, an honest fellow
and a tall thou art.  Well, I'll take my leave, good 
knight, and hope to have you and all your daughters
at my poor house; in good sooth I must.

LANCELOT.
Thanks, Master Weathercock, I shall be bold to
trouble you, be sure.

WEATHERCOCK.
And welcome heartily; farewell.

[Exit Weathercock.]

LANCELOT.
Sirrah, I saw my daughter's wrong, and withal her
bracelet on your arm:  off with it, and with it my
livery too.  have I care to see my daughter matched 
with men of worship, and are you grown so bold?  Go,
sirrah, from my house, or I'll whip you hence.

DAFFODIL.
I'll not be whipped, sir, there's your livery.
This is a servingman's reward:  what care I?
I have means to trust to:  I scorn service, I.

[Exit Daffodil.]

LANCELOT.
Aye, a lusty knave, but I must let him go,
Our servants must be taught what they should know.

[Exit.]


SCENE III.  The same.

[Enter Sir Arthur and Lucy.]

LUCY.
Sir, as I am a maid, I do affect
You above any suitor that I have,
Although that soldiers scarce knows how to love.

ARTHUR.
I am a soldier, and a gentleman,
Knows what belongs to war, what to a lady:
What man offends me, that my sword shall right:
What woman loves me, I am her faithful knight.

LUCY.
I neither doubt your valour, nor your love,
But there be some that bares a soldier's form,
That swears by him they never think upon,
Goes swaggering up and down from house to house,
Crying God peace:  and--

ARTHUR.
Yfaith, Lady, I'll discry you such a man,
of them there be many which you have spoke of,
That bear the name and shape of soldiers,
Yet God knows very seldom saw the war:
That haunt your taverns, and your ordinaries,
Your ale-houses sometimes, for all a-like
To uphold the brutish humour of their minds,
Being marked down, for the bondmen of despair:
Their mirth begins in wine, but ends in blood,
Their drink is clear, but their conceits are mud.

LUCY.
Yet these are great gentlemen soldiers.

ARTHUR.
No, they are wretched slaves,
Whose desperate lives doth bring them timeless graves.

LUCY.
Both for your self, and for your form of life,
If I may choose, I'll be a soldier's wife.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE IV.  The same.

[Enter Sir Lancelot and Oliver.]

OLIVER.
And tyt trust to it, so then.

LANCELOT.
Assure your self,
You shall be married with all speed we may:
One day shall serve for Frances and for Lucy.

OLIVER.
Why che would vain know the time, for providing
wedding raiments.

LANCELOT.
Why, no more but this:  first get your assurance made,
touching my daughter's jointer; that dispatched, we will
in two days make provision.

OLIVER.
Why, man, chil have the writings made by tomorrow.

LANCELOT.
Tomorrow be it then:  let's meet at the king's head in
fish street.

OLIVER.
No, fie, man, no, let's meet at the Rose at Temple-Bar,
That will be nearer your counsellor and mine.

LANCELOT.
At the Rose be it then, the hour nine:
He that comes last forfeits a pint of wine.

OLIVER.
A pint is no payment, let it be a whole quart or nothing.

[Enter Artichoke.]

ARTICHOKE.
Master, here is a man would speak with Master Oliver:  he
comes from young Master Flowerdale.

OLIVER.
Why, chill speak with him, chill speak with him.

LANCELOT.
Nay, son Oliver, I'll surely see what young Flowerdale hath
sent to you.  I pray God it be no quarrel.

OLIVER.
Why, man, if he quarrel with me, chill give him, his hands full.

[Enter old Flowerdale.]

FATHER.
God save you, good Sir Lancelot.

LANCELOT.
Welcome, honest friend.

FATHER.
To you and yours my master wisheth health,
But unto you, sir, this, and this he sends:
There is the length, sir, of his rapier,
And in that paper shall you know his mind.

OLIVER.
Here, chill meet him, my vrend, chill meet him.

LANCELOT.
Meet him! you shall not meet the ruffian, fie.

OLIVER.
And I do not meet him, chill give you leave to call me cut;
where ist, sirrah, where ist? where ist?

FATHER.
The letter shows both the time and place,
And if you be a man, then keep your word.

LANCELOT.
Sir, he shall not keep his word, he shall not meet.

FATHER.
Why, let him choose, he'll be the better known
For a base rascal, and reputed so.

OLIVER.
Zirrah, zirrah:  and tweare not an old fellow, and sent after
an arrant, chid give thee something, but chud be no money:
But hold thee, for I see thou art somewhat testorne; hold thee,
there's vorty shillings:  bring thy master a veeld, chil give
thee vorty more; look thou bring him:  chil mall him, tell
him, chill mar his dauncing tressels, chil use him, he was ne'er
so used since his dam bound his head; chill make him for 
capyring any more, chy vor thee.

FATHER.
You seem a man, stout and resolute,
And I will so report, what ere befall.

LANCELOT.
And fall out ill, assure your master this,
I'll make him fly the land, or use him worse.

FATHER.
My master, sir, deserves not this of you,
And that you'll shortly find.

LANCELOT.
Thy master is an unthrift, you a knave,
And I'll attach you first, next clap him up
Or have him bound unto his good behavior.

OLIVER.
I would you were a sprite, if you do him any harm for
this.  And you do, chill ne'er see you, nor any of yours, 
while chill have eyes open:  what, do you think, chil be
abaffled up and down the town for a messell and a 
scoundrel? no, chy vor you:  zirrah, chil come; zay no
more, chil come, tell him.

FATHER.
Well, sir, my Master deserves not this of you,
And that you'll shortly find.

[Exit.]

LANCELOT.
No matter, he's an unthrift; I defy him.
Now, gentle son, let me know the place. 

OLIVER.
No, chy vore you.

LANCELOT.
Let me see the note.

OLIVER.
Nay, chill watch you for zutch a trick.  But if che meet
him, zoe, if not, zoe:  chill make him know me, or chill
know why I shall not, chill vare the worse.

LANCELOT.
What, will you then neglect my daughter's love?
Venture your state and hers, for a loose brawl?

OLIVER.
Why, man, chill not kill him; marry, chill veze him too,
and again; and zoe God be with you, vather.  What, man,
we shall meet tomorrow.

[Exit.]

LANCELOT.
Who would a thought he had been so desperate.
Come forth, my honest servant Artichoke.

[Enter Artichoke.]

ARTICHOKE.
Now, what's the matter? some brawl toward, I warrant you.

LANCELOT.
Go get me thy sword bright scoured, thy buckler mended.
O for that knave, that villain Daffodil would have done
good service.  But to thee.

ARTICHOKE.
Aye, this is the tricks of all you gentlemen, when you
stand in need of a good fellow.  O for that Daffodil, O 
where is he? but if you be angry, and it be but for the
wagging of a straw, then:  out a doors with the knave,
turn the coat over his ears.  This is the humour of you all.

LANCELOT.
O for that knave, that lusty Daffodil.

ARTICHOKE.
Why, there tis now:  our year's wages and our vails will
scarce pay for broken swords and bucklers that we use in
our quarrels.  But I'll not fight if Daffodil be a tother side,
that's flat.

LANCELOT.
Tis no such matter, man.  Get weapons ready, and be at
London ere the break of day:  watch near the lodging of
the Devonshire youth, but be unseen:  and as he goes out,
as he will go out, and that very early without doubt--

ARTICHOKE.
What, would you have me draw upon him, as he goes in
the street?

LANCELOT.
Not for a world, man:  into the fields; for to the field he
goes, there to meet the desperate Flowerdale.  Take thou
the part of Oliver my son, for he shall be my son, and marry
Lucy.  Doest understand me, knave?

ARTICHOKE.
Aye, sir, I do understand you, but my young mistress might
be better provided in matching with my fellow Daffodil.

LANCELOT.
No more; Daffodil is a knave:
That Daffodil is a most notorious knave.

[Exit Artichoke.]

[Enter Weathercock.]

Master Weathercock, you come in happy time.  The
desperate Flowerdale hath writ a challenge:  And who think
you must answer it, but the Devonshire man, my son Oliver?

WEATHERCOCK.
Marry, I am sorry for it, good Sir Lancelot,
But if you will be ruled by me, we'll stay the fury.

LANCELOT.
As how, I pray?

WEATHERCOCK.
Marry, I'll tell you:  by promising young Flowerdale the
red lipped Lucy.

LANCELOT.
I'll rather follow her unto her grave.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, Sir Lancelot, I would have thought so too, but you
and I have been deceived in him:  come read this will, or
deed, or what you call it, I know not.  Come, come, your
spectacles I pray.

LANCELOT.
Nay, I thank God, I see very well.

WEATHERCOCK.
Marry, bless your eyes, mine hath been dim almost this
thirty years.

LANCELOT.
Ha, what is this? what is this?

WEATHERCOCK.
Nay, there is true love, indeed:
He gave it to me but this very morn,
And bid me keep it unseen from any one.
Good youth, to see how men may be deceived!

LANCELOT.
Passion of me, what a wretch am I
To hate this loving youth:  he hath made me,
Together with my Lucy he loves so dear,
Executors of all his wealth.

WEATHERCOCK.
All, all, good man; he hath given you all.

LANCELOT.
Three ships now in the straits & homeward bound,
Two Lordships of two hundred pound a year,
The one in Wales, the other in Glostershire:
Debts and accounts are thirty thousand pound;
Plate, money, jewels, 16 thousand more;
Two housen furnished well in Cole-man street:
Beside whatsoever his Uncle leaves to him,
Being of great demeans and wealth at Peckham.

WEATHERCOCK.
How like you this, good knight? how like you this?

LANCELOT.
I have done him wrong, but now I'll make amends,
The Devonshire man shall whistle for a wife:
He marry Lucy!  Lucy shall be Flowerdale's.

WEATHERCOCK.
Why, that is friendly said.
Let's ride to London and prevent their match,
By promising your daughter to that lovely lad.

LANCELOT.
We'll ride to London:--or it shall not need,
We'll cross to Dedfort-strand, and take a boat.
Where be these knaves? what, Artichoke? what, Fop?

[Enter Artichoke.]

ARTICHOKE.
Here be the very knaves, but not the merry knaves.

LANCELOT.
Here, take my cloak, I'll have a walk to Dedford.

ARTICHOKE.
Sir, we have been scouring of our swords and bucklers
in your defence.

LANCELOT.
Defence me no defence! let your swords rust, I'll have no 
fighting:  Aye, let blows alone; bid Delia see all things be
in readiness against the wedding.  We'll have two at once,
and that will save charges, Master Weathercock.

ARTICHOKE.
Well, we will do it, sir.

[Exit Omnes.]


ACT III.

SCENE I.  A walk before Sir Lancelot's house.

[Enter Civet, Frances, and Delia.]

CIVET.
By my truth, this is good luck, I thank God for this.  In
good sooth, I have even my heart's desire:  sister Delia,
now I may boldly call you so, for your father hath frank 
and freely given me his daughter Frances.

FRANCES.
Aye, by my troth, Tom; thou hast my good will too, for
I thank God I longed for a husband, and, would I might
never stir, for one his name was Tom.

DELIA.
Why, sister, now you have your wish.

CIVET.
You say very true, sister Delia:  and I prithee call me
nothing but Tom and I'll call thee sweetheart, and Frances:
will it not do well, sister Delia?

DELIA.
It will do very well with both of you.

FRANCES.
But, Tom, must I go as I do now when I am married?

CIVET.
No, Frances, I'll have thee go like a Citizen
In a garded gown, and a French-hood.

FRANCES.
By my troth, that will be excellent indeed.

DELIA.
Brother, maintain your wife to your estate:
Apparel you yourself like to your father,
And let her go like to your ancient mother.
He sparing got his wealth, left it to you;
Brother, take heed of pride, it soon bids thrift adieu.

CIVET.
So as my father and my mother went! that's a jest
indeed:  why she went in a fringed gown, a single 
ruffle, and a white cap; and my father in a mocado
coat, a pair of red satin sleeves, and a canvas back.

DELIA.
And yet his wealth was all as much as yours,

CIVET.
My estate, my estate, I thank God, is forty pound a
year, in good leases and tenements, besides twenty
mark a year at cuckolds-haven, and that comes to us
all by inheritance.

DELIA.
That may, indeed, tis very fitly plied.
I know not how it comes, but so it falls out,
That those whose fathers have died wondrous rich,
And took no pleasure but to gather wealth,
Thinking of little that they leave behind
For them, they hope, will be of their like mind,--
But it falls out contrary:  forty years sparing
Is scarce three seven years spending,--never caring
What will ensue, when all their coin is gone,
And all too late, then thrift is thought upon:
Oft have I heard, that pride and riot kissed,
And then repentence cries, 'for had I wist.'

CIVET.
You say well, sister Delia, you say well:  but I mean 
to live within my bounds:  for look you, I have set
down my rest thus far, but to maintain my wife in her
French-hood, and her coach, keep a couple of geldings,
and a brace of gray hounds, and this is all I'll do.

DELIA.
And you'll do this with forty pound a year?

CIVET.
Aye, and a better penny, sister.

FRANCES.
Sister, you forget that at cuckolds-haven.

CIVET.
By my troth, well remembered, Frances;
I'll give thee that to buy thee pins.

DELIA.
Keep you the rest for points:  alas the day.
Fools shall have wealth, tho all the world say nay:
Come, brother, will you in? dinner stays for us.

CIVET.
Aye, good sister, with all my heart.

FRANCES.
Aye, by my troth, Tom, for I have a good stomach.

CIVET.
And I the like, sweet Frances.  No, sister, do not think
I'll go beyond my bounds.

DELIA.
God grant you may not.

[Exit Omnes.]


SCENE II.  London.  The street before young
Flowerdale's house.

[Enter young Flowerdale and his father, with foils in
their hands.]

FLOWERDALE.
Sirrah Kit, tarry thou there, I have spied Sir Lancelot,
and old Weathercock coming this way; they are hard at
hand.  I will by no means be spoken withal.

FATHER.
I'll warrant you; go, get you in.

[Enter Lancelot and Weathercock.]

LANCELOT.
Now, my honest friend, thou doest belong to Master
Flowerdale.

FATHER.
I do, sir.

LANCELOT.
Is he within, my good fellow?

FATHER.
No, sir, he is not within.

LANCELOT.
I prithee, if he be within, let my speak with him.

FATHER.
Sir, to tell you true, my master is within, but indeed
would not be spoke withal:  there be some terms that
stands upon his reputation, therefore he will not admit
any conference till he hath shook them off.

LANCELOT.
I prithee tell him his very good friend, Sir Lancelot
Spurcock, entreats to speak with him.

FATHER.
By my troth, sir, if you come to take up the matter 
between my master and the Devonshire man, you do
not but beguile your hopes, and lose your labour.

LANCELOT.
Honest friend, I have not any such thing to him; I come
to speak with him about other matters.

FATHER.
For my master, sir, hath set down his resolution, either
to redeem his honour, or leave his life behind him.

LANCELOT.
My friend, I do not know any quarrel touching thy
master or any other person:  my business is of a different
nature to him, and I prithee so tell him.

FATHER.
For howsoever the Devonshire man is, my master's mind
is bloody:  that's a round o,
And therefore, sir, entreat is but vain:

LANCELOT.
I have no such thing to him, I tell thee once again.

FATHER.
I will then so signify to him.

[Exit Father.]

LANCELOT.
Aye, sirrah, I see this matter is hotly carried,
But I'll labour to dissuade him from it.--

[Enter Flowerdale.]

Good morrow, Master Flowerdale.

FLOWERDALE.
Good morrow, good Sir Lancelot; good morrow,
Master Weathercock.  By my troth, gentlemen, I have
been a reading over Nick Matchivill; I find him good
to be known, not to be followed:  a pestilent humane
fellow.  I have made certain annotations of him such 
as they be.--And how ist Sir Lancelot? ha? how ist?
A mad world, men cannot live quiet in it.

LANCELOT.
Master Flowerdale, I do understand there is
Some jar between the Devonshire man and you.

FATHER.
They, sir? they are good friends as can be.

FLOWERDALE.
Who? Master Oliver and I? as good friends as can be.

LANCELOT.
It is a kind of safety in you to deny it, and a generous
silence, which too few are indued withal:  But, sir, such
a thing I hear, and I could wish it otherwise.

FLOWERDALE.
No such thing, Sir Lancelot, a my reputation, as I am an
honest man.

LANCELOT.
Now I do believe you, then, if you do
Engage your reputation there is none.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, I do not engage my reputation there is not.  You
shall not bind me to any condition of hardness:  but if
there be anything between us, then there is; if there be
not, then there is not:  be or be not, all is one.

LANCELOT.
I do perceive by this, that there is something between
you, and I am very sorry for it.

FLOWERDALE.
You may be deceived, Sir Lancelot.  The Italian hath a
pretty paying, Questo--I have forgot it too, tis out of my
head, but in my translation, ift hold, thus:  If thou hast a
friend, keep him; if a foe, trip him.


LANCELOT.
Come, I do see by this there is somewhat between you,
and, before God, I could wish it other wise.

FLOWERDALE.
Well what is between us can hardly be altered.  Sir
Lancelot, I am to ride forth tomorrow.  That way which I
must ride, no man must deny me the sun; I would not by
any particular man be denied common and general passage.
If any one saith, Flowerdale, thou passest not this way:  my
answer is, I must either on or return, but return is not my
word, I must on:  if I cannot, then, make my way, nature
hath done the last for me, and there's the fine.

LANCELOT.
Master Flowerdale, every man hath one tongue, and two
ears:  nature, in her building, is a most curious work-master.

FLOWERDALE.
That is as much as to say, a man should hear more than he
should speak.

LANCELOT.
You say true, and indeed I have heard more than at this
time I will speak.

FLOWERDALE.
You say well.

LANCELOT.
Slanders are more common than truths, Master Flowerdale:
but proof is the rule for both.

FLOWERDALE.
You say true; what do you call him hath it there in his
third canton.

LANCELOT.
I have heard you have been wild:  I have believed it.

FLOWERDALE.
Twas fit, twas necessary.

LANCELOT.
But I have seen somewhat of late in you, that hath
confirmed in my an opinion of goodness toward you.

FLOWERDALE.
Yfaith, sir, I am sure I never did you harm:  some good
I have done, either to you or yours, I am sure you know
not; neither is it my will you should.

LANCELOT.
Aye, your will, sir.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, my will, sir? sfoot, do you know ought of my will?
Begod, and you do, sir, I am abused.

LANCELOT.
Go, Master Flowerdale; what I know, I know:  and know
you thus much out of my knowledge, that I truly love you.
For my daughter, she's yours.  And if you like a marriage
better than a brawl, all quirks of reputation set aside, go
with me presently:  And where you should fight a bloody
battle, you shall be married to a lovely lady.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay but, Sir Lancelot--

LANCELOT.
If you will not embrace my offer, yet assure your self thus
much, I will have order to hinder your encounter.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, but hear me, Sir Lancelot.

LANCELOT.
Nay, stand not you upon imputative honour.  Tis merely
unsound, unprofitable, and idle inferences:  your business
is to wed my daughter, therefore give me your present word
to do it.  I'll go and provide the maid, therefore give me your
present resolution, either now or never.

FLOWERDALE.
Will you so put me to it?

LANCELOT.
Aye, afore God, either take me now, or take me never.  Else
what I thought should be our match, shall be our parting; so
fare you well forever.

FLOWERDALE.
Stay:  fall out what may fall, my love is above all:  I will come.

LANCELOT.
I expect you, and so fare you well.

[Exit Sir Lancelot.]

FATHER.
Now, sir, how shall we do for wedding apparel?

FLOWERDALE.
By the mass, that's true:  now help, Kit;
The marriage ended, we'll make amends for all.

FATHER.
Well, no more, prepare you for your bride,
We will not want for clothes, what so ere betide.

FLOWERDALE.
And thou shalt see, when once I have my dower,
In mirth we'll spend full many a merry hour:
As for this wench I not regard a pin,
It is her gold must bring my pleasures in.

[Exit.]

FATHER.
Ist possible, he hath his second living,
Forsaking God, himself to the devil giving?
But that I knew his mother firm and chaste,
My heart would say my head she had disgraced:
Else would I swear he never was my son,
But her fair mind so foul a deed did shun.

[Enter Uncle.]

UNCLE.
How now, brother, how do you find your son?

FATHER.
O brother, heedless as a libertine,
Even grown a master in the school of vice,
One that doth nothing but invent deceit:
For all the day he humours up and down,
How he the next day might deceive his friend.
He thinks of nothing but the present time:
For one groat ready down, he'll pay a shilling,
But then the lender must needs stay for it.
When I was young, I had the scope of youth,
Both wild, and wanton, careless and desperate:
But such made strains as he's possessed withal,
I thought it wonder for to dream upon.

UNCLE.
I told you so, but you would not believe it.

FATHER.
Well, I have found it, but one thing comforts me:
Brother, tomorrow he's to be married
To beauteous Lucy, Sir Lancelot Spurcock's daughter.

UNCLE.
Ist possible?

FATHER.
Tis true, and thus I mean to curb him.
This day, brother, I will you shall arrest him:
If any thing will tame him, it must be that,
For he is ranked in mischief, chained to a life,
That will increase his shame, and kill his wife.

UNCLE.
What, arrest him on his wedding day?
That were unchristian, and an unhumane part:
How many couple even for that very day
Hath purchased 7 year's sorrow afterward?
Forbear him then today, do it tomorrow,
And this day mingle not his joy with sorrow.

FATHER.
Brother, I'll have it done this very day,
And in the view of all, as he comes from Church:
Do but observe the course that he will take.
Upon my life he will forswear the debt:
And for we'll have the sum shall not be slight,
Say that he owes you near three thousand pound:
Good brother, let it be done immediately.

UNCLE.
Well, seeing you will have it so,
Brother, I'll do it, and straight provide the Sheriff.

FATHER.
So, brother, by this means shall we perceive
What Sir Lancelot in this pinch will do:
And how his wife doth stand affected to him--
Her love will then be tried to the uttermost--
And all the rest of them.  Brother, what I will do,
Shall harm him much, and much avail him too.

[Exit.]


SCENE III.  A high road near London.

[Enter Oliver: afterwards Sir Arthur Greenshood.]

OLIVER.
Cham assured thick be the place, that the scoundrel
appointed to meet me:  if a come, zo:  if a come not,
zo.  And che war avise, he should make a coystrell
an us, ched vese him, and che vang him in hand; che 
would hoist him, and give it him to and again, zo chud:
Who bin a there? Sir Arthur! chil stay aside.

ARTHUR.
I have dogged the Devonshire man into the field,
For fear of any harm that should befall him:
I had an inkling of that yesternight,
That Flowerdale and he should meet this morning:
Tho, of my soul, Oliver fears him not,
Yet for I'd see fair play on either side,
Made me to come, to see their valours tried.
God morrow to Master Oliver.

OLIVER.
God an good morrow.

ARTHUR.  
What, Master Oliver, are you angry?

OLIVER.
Why an it be, tit and grieven you?

ARTHUR.
Not me at all, sir, but I imagine by
Your being here thus armed, you stay for some
That you should fight withall.

OLIVER.
Why, and he do, che would not dezire you to take
his part.

ARTHUR.
No, by my troth, I think you need it not,
For he you look for, I think means not to come.

OLIVER.
No, and che war assur a that, ched avese him in 
another place.

[Enter Daffodil.]

DAFFODIL.
O Sir Arthur, Master Oliver, aye me!
Your love, and yours, and mine, sweet mistress Lucy,
This morn is married to young Flowerdale.

ARTHUR.
Married to Flowerdale! tis impossible.

OLIVER.
Married, man, che hope thou doest but jest,
To make an a volowten merriment of it.

DAFFODIL.
O, tis too true.  Here comes his Uncle.

[Enter Flowerdale, Sheriff, Officers.]

UNCLE.
God morrow, Sir Arthur, good morrow, master Oliver.

OLIVER.
God and good morn, Master Flowerdale.  I pray you tellen us,
Is your scoundrel kinsman married?

UNCLE.
Master Oliver, call him what you will, but he is married
to Sir Lancelot's daughter here.

ARTHUR.
Unto her?

OLIVER.
Aye, ha the old yellow zarved me thick trick?
Why, man, he was a promise, chil chud a had her.
Is a zitch a vox? chil look to his water, che vor him.

UNCLE.
The music plays, they are coming from the Church.
Sheriff, do your Office:  fellows, stand stoutly to it.

[Enter all to the Wedding.]

OLIVER.
God give you joy, as the old zaid Proverb is, and some
zorrow among.  You met us well, did you not?

LANCELOT.
Nay, be not angry, sir, the fault is in me.  I have done
all the wrong, kept him from coming to the field to you,
as I might, sir, for I am a Justice, and sworn to keep the 
peace.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, marry, is he, sir, a very Justice, and sworn to keep
the peace:  you must not disturb the wedding.

LANCELOT.
Nay, never frown nor storm, sir; if you do,
I'll have an order taken for you.

OLIVER.
Well, well, chill be quiet.

WEATHERCOCK.
Master Flowerdale! Sir Lancelot, look you who here is.
Master Flowerdale.

LANCELOT.
Master Flowerdale, welcome with all my heart.

FLOWERDALE.
Uncle, this is she, yfaith:  master under-sheriff,
Arrest me? at whose suit? draw, Kit.

UNCLE.
At my suit, sir.

LANCELOT.
Why, what's the matter, Master Flowerdale?

UNCLE.
This is the matter, sir:  this unthrift here hath 
cozened you, and hath had of me, in several sums,
three thousand pound.

FLOWERDALE.
Why, Uncle, Uncle.

UNCLE.
Cousin, cousin, you have uncled me, and if you be
not staid, you'll prove a cozener unto all who know you.

LANCELOT.
Why, sir, suppose he be to you in debt
Ten thousand pound, his state to me appears,
To be at least three thousand a year.

UNCLE.
O sir, I was too late informed of that plot,
How that he went about to cozen you:
And formed a will, and sent it
To your good friend here, Master Weathercock,
In which was nothing true, but brags and lies.

LANCELOT.
Ha, hath he not such Lordships, lands, and ships?

UNCLE.
Not worth a groat, not worth a halfpenny, he.

LANCELOT.
I pray, tell us true, be plain, young Flowerdale?

FLOWERDALE.
My uncle here's mad, and disposed to do my wrong, 
but here's my man, an honest fellow, by the lord, and
of good credit, knows all is true.

FATHER.
Not I, sir.
I am too old to lie, I rather know
You forged a will, where every line you writ,
You studied where to coat your lands might lie.

WEATHERCOCK.
And I prithee, where be they, honest friend?

FATHER.
Yfaith, no where, sir, for he hath none at all.

WEATHERCOCK.
Benedicite, we are o'er wretched, I believe.

LANCELOT.
I am cozened, and my hopefulst child undone.

FLOWERDALE.
You are not cozened, nor is she undone.  They
slander me, by this light they slander me:  Look
you, my uncle here's an usurer, and would undo me,
but I'll stand in law; do you but bail me, you shall
do no more:  you, brother Civet, and Master
Weathercock, do but bail me, and let me have my 
marriage money paid me, and we'll ride down, and
there your own eyes shall see, how my poor tenants 
there will welcome me.  You shall but bail me, you
shall do no more, and, you greedy gnat, their bail 
will serve.

UNCLE.
Aye, sir, I'll ask no better bail.

LANCELOT.
No, sir, you shall not take my bail, nor his,
Nor my son Civet's; I'll not deal with him:
Let's Uncle make false dice with his false bones,
I will not have to do with him: mocked, gulled, & wronged!
Come, girl, though it be late, it falls out well,
Thou shalt not live with him in beggar's hell.

LUCY.
He is my husband, & high heaven doth know,
With what unwillingness I went to Church.
But you enforced me, you compelled me to it:
The holy Church-man pronounced these words but now:
I must not leave my husband in distress,
Now I must comfort him, not go with you.

LANCELOT.
Comfort a cozener? on my curse, forsake him.

LUCY.
This day you caused me on your curse to take him:
Do not, I pray, my grieved soul oppress,
God knows my heart doth bleed at his distress.

LANCELOT.
O Master Weathercock,
I must confess I forced her to this match,
Led with opinion his false will was true.

WEATHERCOCK.
Aye, he hath over-reached me too.

LANCELOT.
She might have lived like Delia, in a happy virgin's
state.

DELIA.
Father, be patient, sorrow comes too late.

LANCELOT.
And on her knees she begged & did entreat,
If she must needs taste a sad marriage life,
She craved to be Sir Arthur Greenshood's wife.

ARTHUR.
You have done her & me the greater wrong.

LANCELOT.
O, take her yet.

ARTHUR.
Not I.

LANCELOT.
Or, Master Oliver, accept my child,
And half my wealth is yours.

OLIVER.
No, sir, chil break no laws.

LUCY.
Never fear, she will not trouble you.

DELIA.
Yet, sister, in this passion,
Do not run headlong to confusion.
You may affect him, though not follow him.

FRANCES.
Do, sister; hang him, let him go.

WEATHERCOCK.
Do, faith, Mistress Lucy, leave him.

LUCY.
You are three gross fools, let me alone.
I swear I'll live with him in all his moan.

OLIVER.
But an he have his legs at liberty,
Cham averd he will never live with you.

ARTHUR.
Aye, but he is now in hucksters handling for
running away.

LANCELOT.
Huswife, you hear how you and I am wronged,
And if you will redress it yet you may:
But if you stand on terms to follow him,
Never come near my sight nor look on me,
Call me not father, look not for a groat,
For all thy portion I will this day give
Unto thy sister Frances.

FRANCES.
How say you to that, Tom, I shall have a good
deal.  Besides I'll be a good wife:  and a good wife
is a good thing, I can tell.

CIVET.
Peace Frances, I would be sorry to see thy sister
cast away, as I am a gentleman.

LANCELOT.
What, are you yet resolved?

LUCY.
Yes, I am resolved.

LANCELOT.
Come then, away; or now, or never, come.

LUCY.
This way I turn, go you unto your feast,
And I to weep, that am with grief oppressed.

LANCELOT.
For ever fly my sight:  come, gentlemen,
Let's in, I'll help you to far better wives than her.
Delia, upon my blessing talk not to her.
Bace Baggage, in such hast to beggary?

UNCLE.
Sheriff, take your prisoner to your charge.

FLOWERDALE.
Uncle, be-god you have used me very hardly,
By my troth, upon my wedding day.

[Exit all but Lucy, young Flowerdale, his father,
Uncle, Sheriff, and Officers.]

LUCY.
O Master Flowerdale, but hear me speak;
Stay but a little while, good Master Sheriff,
If not for him, for my sake pity him:
Good sir, stop not your ears at my complaint,
My voice grows weak, for women's words are faint.

FLOWERDALE.
Look you, Uncle, she kneels to you.

UNCLE.
Fair maid, for you, I love you with my heart,
And grieve, sweet soul, thy fortune is so bad,
That thou shouldst match with such a graceless youth.
Go to thy father, think not upon him,
Whom hell hath marked to be the son of shame.

LUCY.
Impute his wildness, sir, unto his youth,
And think that now is the time he doth repent:
Alas, what good or gain can you receive,
To imprison him that nothing hath to pay?
And where nought is, the king doth lose his due;
O, pity him, as God shall pity you.

UNCLE.
Lady, I know his humours all too well,
And nothing in the world can do him good,
But misery it self to chain him with.

LUCY.
Say that your debts were paid, then is he free?

UNCLE.
Aye, virgin, that being answered, I have done,
But to him that is all as impossible,
As I to scale the high Pyramids.
Sheriff, take your prisoner:  Maiden, fare thee well.

LUCY.
O go not yet, good Master Flowerdale:
Take my word for the debt, my word, my bond.

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, by God, Uncle, and my bond too.

LUCY.
Alas, I ne'er ought nothing but I paid it,
And I can work; alas, he can do nothing:
I have some friends perhaps will pity me,
His chiefest friends do seek his misery.
All that I can or beg, get, or receive,
Shall be for you:  O do not turn away;
Methinks, within, a face so reverent,
So well experienced in this tottering world,
Should have some feeling of a maiden's grief:
For my sake, his father's, and your brother's sake,
Aye, for your soul's sake that doth hope for joy,
Pity my state:  do not two souls destroy.

UNCLE.
Fair maid, stand up; not in regard of him,
But in pity of thy hapless choice,
I do release him.  Master Sheriff, I thank you:
And, officers, there is for you to drink.
Here, maid, take this money; there is a 100 angels:
And for I will be sure he shall not have it,
Here, Kester, take it you, and use it sparingly,
But let not her have any want at all.
Dry your eyes, niece, do not too much lament
For him, whose life hath been in riot spent:
If well he useth thee, he gets him friends,
If ill, a shameful end on him depends.

[Exit Uncle.]

FLOWERDALE.
A plague go with you for an old fornicator.
Come, Kit, the money; come, honest Kit.

FATHER.
Nay, by my faith, sir, you shall pardon me.

FLOWERDALE.
And why, sir, pardon you? give me the money, you
old rascal, or I shall make you.

LUCY.
Pray, hold your hands:  give it him, honest friend.

FATHER.
If you be so content, with all my heart.

FLOWERDALE.
Content, sir:  sblood, she shall be content, whether
she will or no.  A rattle baby come to follow me!
Go, get you gone to the greasy chuff your father,
bring me your dowry, or never look on me.

FATHER.
Sir, she hath forsook her father and all her friends for you.

FLOWERDALE.
Hang thee, her friends and father altogether.

FATHER.
Yet part with something to provide her lodging.

FLOWERDALE.
Yes, I mean to part with her and you, but if I part with
one angel, hang me at a post.  I'll rather throw them at
a cast at dice, as I have done a thousand of their fellows.

FATHER.
Nay, then, I will be plain, degenerate boy.
Thou hadst a father would have been ashamed.

FLOWERDALE.
My father was an ass, an old ass.

FATHER.
Thy father? proud, licentious villain!
What, are you at your foils? I'll foil with you.

LUCY.
Good sir, forbear him.

FATHER.
Did not this whining woman hang on me,
I'd teach thee what it was to abuse thy father:
Go! hang, beg, starve, dice, game, that when all is gone,
Thou mayest after despair and hang thyself.

LUCY.
O, do not curse him.

FATHER.
I do not curse him, and to pray for him were vain;
It grieves me that he bears his father's name.

FLOWERDALE.
Well, you old rascal, I shall meet with you.  Sirrah,
get you gone; I will not strip the livery over your ears,
because you paid for it:  but do not use my name, sirrah,
do you hear? look you do not use my name, you were best.

FATHER.
Pay me the twenty pound, then, that I lent you,
Or give me security, when I may have it.

FLOWERDALE.
I'll pay thee not a penny, and for security, I'll give thee
none.  Minckins, look you do not follow me, look you do
not:  If you do, beggar, I shall slit your nose.

LUCY.
Alas, what shall I do?

FLOWERDALE.
Why, turn whose, that's a good trade,
And so perhaps I'll see thee now and then.

[Exit Flowerdale.]

LUCY.
Alas the day that ever I was born.

FATHER.
Sweet mistress, do not weep, I'll stick to you.

LUCY.
Alas, my friend, I know not what to do.
My father and my friends, they have despised me:
And I, a wretched maid, thus cast away,
Knows neither where to go, nor what to say.

FATHER.
It grieves me at the soul, to see her tears
Thus stain the crimson roses of her cheeks.--
Lady, take comfort, do not mourn in vain.
I have a little living in this town,
The which I think comes to a hundred pound,
All that and more shall be at your dispose.
I'll straight go help you to some strange disguise,
And place you in a service in this town,
Where you shall know all, yet yourself unknown:
Come, grieve no more, where no help can be had,
Weep not for him that is more worse than bad.

LUCY.
I thank you, sir.

[Exeunt.]


ACT IV.

SCENE I.  A room in Sir Lancelot Spurcock's house
in Kent.

[Enter Sir Lancelot, Master Weathercock and them.]

OLIVER.
Well, cha a bin zerved many a sluttish trick, but such
a lerripoop as thick yeh was ne'er a sarved.

LANCELOT.
Son Civet, daughter Frances, bear with me,
You see how I am pressed down with inward grief,
About that luckless girl, your sister Lucy.
But tis fallen out with me,
As with many families beside,
They are most unhappy, that are most beloved.

CIVET.
Father, tis so, tis even fallen out so, but what remedy?
set hand to your heart, and let it pass.  Here is your
daughter Frances and I, and we'll not say, we'll bring
forth as witty children, but as pretty children as ever
she was:  tho she had the prick and praise for a pretty
wench.  But, father, done is the mouse:  you'll come?

LANCELOT.
Aye, son Civet, I'll come.

CIVET.
And you, Master Oliver?

OLIVER.
Aye, for che a vext out this veast, chill see if a gan make
a better veast there.

CIVET.
And you, Sir Arthur?

ARTHUR.
Aye, sir, although my heart be full,
I'll be a partner at your wedding feast.

CIVET.
And welcome all indeed, and welcome:  come, Frances
are you ready?

FRANCES.
Jesu, how hasty these husbands are.  I pray, father, pray
to God to bless me.

LANCELOT.
God bless thee, and I do:  God make thee wise,
Send you both joy:  I wish it with wet eyes.

FRANCES.
But, Father, shall not my sister Delia go along with us?
She is excellent good at cookery and such things.

LANCELOT.
Yes, marry, shall she:  Delia, make you ready.

DELIA.
I am ready, sir.  I will first go to Greenwich, from
thence to my cousin Chesterfields, and so to London.

CIVET.
It shall suffice, good sister Delia, it shall suffice, but
fail us not, good sister; give order to cooks, and others,
for I would not have my sweet Frances to soil her
fingers.

FRANCES.
No, by my troth, not I:  a gentlewoman, and a married
gentlewoman too, to be companions to cooks and 
kitchen-boys! not I, yfaith:  I scorn that.

CIVET.
Why, I do not mean thou shalt, sweet heart; thou seest
I do not go about it:  well farewell to you.  God's pity,
Master Weathercock, we shall have your company too?

WEATHERCOCK.
With all my heart, for I love good cheer.

CIVET.
Well, God be with you all.  Come, Frances.

FRANCES.
God be with you, father, God be with you, Sir Arthur,
Master Oliver, and Master Weathercock, sister, God be
with you all:  God be with you, father, God be with you
every one.

[Exeunt Civet and Frances.]

WEATHERCOCK.
Why, how now, Sir Arthur? all a mort? Master Oliver,
how now man?
Cheerly, Sir Lancelot, and merrily say,
Who can hold that will away?

LANCELOT.
Aye, she is gone indeed, poor girl, undone.
But when they'll be self-willed, children must smart.

ARTHUR.
But, sir, that she is wronged, you are the chiefest cause,
Therefore tis reason, you redress her wrong.

WEATHERCOCK.
Indeed you must, Sir Lancelot, you must.

LANCELOT.
Must? who can compel me, Master Weathercock?
I hope I may do what I list.

WEATHERCOCK.
I grant you may, you may do what you list.

OLIVER.
Nay, but and you be well evisen, it were not good by
this vrampolness, and vrowardness, to cast away as
pretty a dowsabell, as any chould chance to see in a
Sommers day.  Chil tell you what chall do.  Chil go
spy up and down the town, and see if I can hear any
tale or tidings of her, and take her away from thick a
messell, vor cham ashured, he'll but bring her to the
spoil.  And so var you well; we shall meet at your
son Civet's.

LANCELOT.
I thank you, sir, I take it very kindly.

ARTHUR.
To find her out, I'll spend my dearest blood:
So well I loved her, to affect her good.

[Exit both.]

LANCELOT.
O Master Weathercock,
What hap had I, to force my daughter
From Master Oliver, and this good knight
To one that hath no goodness in his thought?

WEATHERCOCK.
Ill luck, but what remedy?

LANCELOT.
Yes, I have almost devised a remedy:
Young Flowerdale is sure a prisoner.

WEATHERCOCK.
Sure, nothing more sure.

LANCELOT.
And yet perhaps his Uncle hath released him.

WEATHERCOCK.
It may be very like, no doubt he hath.

LANCELOT.
Well, if he be in prison, I'll have warrants
To 'tach my daughter till the law be tried,
For I will sue him upon cozenage.

WEATHERCOCK.
Marry, may you, and overthrow him too.

LANCELOT.
Nay, that's not so, I may chance be soft,
And sentence past with him.

WEATHERCOCK.
Believe me, so he may, therefore take heed.

LANCELOT.
Well, howsoever, yet I will have warrants:
In prison, or at liberty, all's one:
You will help to serve them, Master Weathercock?

[Exit Omnes.]


SCENE II.  A street in London.

[Enter Flowerdale.]

FLOWERDALE.
A plague of the devil! the devil take the dice!  The dice,
and the devil, and his dam go together.  Of all my
hundred golden angels, I have not left me one denier:
A pox of come a five, what shall I do?  I can borrow
no more of my credit: there's not any of my acquaintance,
man, nor boy, but I have borrowed more or less off:  I
would I knew where to take a good purse, and go clear
away; by this light, I'll venture for it.  God's lid, my 
sister Delia!  I'll rob her, by this hand.

[Enter Delia, and Artichoke.]

DELIA.
I prithee, Artichoke, go not so fast:
The weather is hot, and I am something weary.

ARTICHOKE.
Nay, I warrant you, mistress Delia, I'll not tire you with
leading; we'll go a extreme moderate pace.

FLOWERDALE.
Stand, deliver your purse.

ARTICHOKE.
O lord, thieves, thieves!

[Exit Artichoke.]

FLOWERDALE.
Come, come, your purse, lady, your purse.

DELIA.
That voice I have heard often before this time.
What, brother Flowerdale become a thief?

FLOWERDALE.
Aye, a plague on't, I thank your father.  But, sister, come,
your money, come!  What,
The world must find me, I am borne to live,
Tis not a sin to steal, when none will give.

DELIA.
O God, is all grace banished from they heart?
Think of the shame that doth attend this fact.

FLOWERDALE.
Shame me no shame; come, give me your purse.
I'll bind you, sister, least I fair the worse.

DELIA.
No, bind me not! hold, there is all I have,
And would that money would redeem thy shame.

[Enter Oliver, Sir Arthur, and Artichoke.]

ARTICHOKE.
Thieves, thieves, thieves!

OLIVER.
Thieves? where, man? why, how now mistress Delia?
Ha you a liked to bin a robbed?

DELIA.
No, Master Oliver; tis Master Flowerdale, he did but
jest with me.

OLIVER.
How, Flowerdale, that scoundrel? sirrah, you meeten us
well:  vang thee that.

FLOWERDALE.
Well, sir, I'll not meddle with you, because I have a
charge.

DELIA.
Here, brother Flowerdale, I'll lend you this same money.

FLOWERDALE.
I thank you, sister.

OLIVER.
I wad you were ysplit, and you let the mezell have a
penny.  But since you cannot keep it, chil keep it myself.

ARTHUR.
Tis pity to relieve him in this sort,
Who makes a triumphant life his daily sport.

DELIA.
Brother, you see how all men censure you,
Farewell, and I pray God amend your life.

OLIVER.
Come, chill bring you along, and you safe enough from
twenty such scoundrels as thick a one is.  Farewell and
be hanged, zirrah, as I think so thou wilt be shortly.
Come, Sir Arthur.

[Exit all but Flowerdale.]

FLOWERDALE.
A plague go with you for a karsie rascal.
This Devonshire man, I think, is made all of pork,
His hands made only for to heave up packs:
His heart as fat and big as his face;
As differing far from all brave gallant minds
As I to serve the hogs, and drink with hinds,
As I am very near now.  Well, what remedy?
When money, means, and friends do grow so small,
Then farewell life, and there's an end of all.

[Exit.]


SCENE III.  Another street.  Before Civet's house.

[Enter Father, Lucy like a Dutch Frau, Civet, and
his wife mistress Frances.]

CIVET.
By my troth, god a mercy for this, good Christopher,
I thank thee for my maid, I like her very well.  How
doest thou like her, Frances?

FRANCES.
In good sadness, Tom, very well, excellent well; she
speaks so prettily.--I pray what's your name?

LUCY.
My name, forsooth, be called Tanikin.

FRANCES.
By my troth, a fine name.  O Tanikin, you are excellent
for dressing one's head a new fashion.

LUCY.
Me sall do every ting about da head.

CIVET.
What countrywoman is she, Kester?

FATHER.
A dutch woman, sir.

CIVET.
Why then she is outlandish, is she not?

FATHER.
I, sir, she is.

FRANCES.
O, then, thou canst tell how to help me to cheeks and
ears?

LUCY.
Yes, mistress, very vell.

FATHER.
Cheeks and ears! why, mistress Frances, want you
cheeks and ears? methinks you have very fair ones.

FRANCES.
Thou art a fool indeed.  Tom, thou knowest what I mean.

CIVET.
Aye, aye, Kester, tis such as they wear a their heads.  I
prithee, Kit, have her in, and shew her my house.

FATHER.
I will, sir.  Come, Tanikin.

FRANCES.
O Tom, you have not bussed me today, Tom.

CIVET.
No, Frances, we must not kiss afore folks.  God save me,
Frances,

[Enter Delia, and Artichoke.]

See yonder my sister Delia is come.  Welcome, good
sister.

FRANCES.
Welcome, good sister, how do you like the tier of my
head?

DELIA.
Very well, sister.

CIVET.
I am glad you're come, sister Delia, to give order for
supper; they will be here soon.

ARTICHOKE.
Aye, but if good luck had not served, she had not been
here now:  filching Flowerdale had like to peppered us;
but for Master Oliver, we had been robbed.

DELIA.
Peace, sirrah, no more.

FATHER.
Robbed! by whom?

ARTICHOKE.
Marry, by none but by Flowerdale; he is turned thief.

CIVET.
By my faith, but that is not well; but God be praised 
for your escape.  Will you draw near, sister?

FATHER.
Sirrah, come hither.  Would Flowerdale, he that was my
master, a robbed you?  I prithee, tell me true.

ARTICHOKE.
Yes, yfaith, even that Flowerdale, that was thy master.

FATHER.
Hold thee, there is a French crown, and speak no more
of this.

ARTICHOKE.
Not I, not a word.--Now do I smell knavery:
In every purse Flowerdale takes, he is half:
And gives me this to keep counsel.--No, not a word I.

FATHER.
Why, God a mercy.

FRANCES.
Sister, look here, I have a new Dutch maid, and she
speaks so fine, it would do your heart good.

CIVET.
How do you like her, sister?

DELIA.
I like your maid well.

CIVET.
Well, dear sister, will you draw near, and give
directions for supper? guests will be here presently.

DELIA.
Yes, brother; lead the way; I'll follow you.

[Exit all but Delia and Lucy.]

Hark you, Dutch frau, a word.

LUCY.
Vat is your vill wit me?

DELIA.
Sister Lucy, tis not your broken language,
Nor this same habit, can disguise your face
From I that know you:  pray tell me, what means this?

LUCY.
Sister, I see you know me; yet be secret.
This borrowed shape, that I have ta'en upon me,
Is but to keep myself a space unknown,
Both from my father, and my nearest friends,
Until I see how time will bring to pass
The desperate course of Master Flowerdale.

DELIA.
O he is worse than bad, I prithee leave him,
And let not once thy heart to think on him.

LUCY.
Do not persuade me once to such a thought.
Imagine yet, that he is worse than naught:
Yet one hour's time may all that ill undo,
That all his former life did run into.
Therefore kind sister do not disclose my estate:
If ere his heart doth turn, tis nere too late.

DELIA.
Well, seeing no counsel can remove your mind,
I'll not disclose you that art wilful blind.

LUCY.
Delia, I thank you.  I now must please her eyes,
My sister Frances, neither fair nor wise.

[Exit Omnes.]


ACT V.

SCENE I.  Scene before Civet's house.

[Enter Flowerdale solus.]

FLOWERDALE.
On goes he that knows no end of his journey.  I have
passed the very utmost bounds of shifting.  I have no
course now but to hang myself:  I have lived since
yesterday two a clock of a spice-cake I had at a burial:
and for drink, I got it at an Ale-house among Porters,
such as will bear out a man, if he have no money 
indeed--I mean out of their companies, for they are 
men of good carriage.  Who comes here?  The two 
Conycatchers, that won all my money of me.  I'll try
if they'll lend me any.

[Enter Dick and Rafe.]

What, Master Richard, how do you?  How doest thou,
Rafe?  By God, gentlemen, the world grows bare with
me:  will you do as much as lend me an angel between 
you both.  You know you won a hundred of me the
other day.

RAFE.
How, an angel?  God damn us, if we lost not every
penny, within an hour after thou wert gone.

FLOWERDALE.
I prithee lend me so much as will pay for my supper.
I'll pay you again, as I am a gentleman.

RAFE.
Yfaith, we have not a farthing, not a mite:
I wonder at it, Master Flowerdale,
You will so carelessly undo yourself.
Why, you will lose more money in an hour,
Than any honest man spend in a year.
For shame, betake you to some honest Trade,
And live not thus so like a Vagabond.

[Exit both.] 

FLOWERDALE.
A Vagabond, indeed! more villains you:
They gave me counsel that first cozened me:
Those Devils first brought me to this I am,
And being thus, the first that do me wrong.
Well, yet I have one friend left in store:
Not far from hence there dwells a Cockatrice,
One that I first put in a satin gown,
And not a tooth that dwells within her head,
But stands me at the least in 20 pound:
Her will I visit now my coin is gone,
And, as I take it, here dwells the Gentlewoman.
What ho, is Mistress Apricot within?

[Enter Ruffian.]

RUFFIAN.
What saucy Rascal is that which knocks so boldly?
O, is it you? old spend-thrift, are you here?
One that is turned Cozener about this town:
My Mistress saw you, and sends this word by me:
Either be packing quickly from the door,
Or you shall have such a greeting sent you straight,
As you will little like on:  you had best be gone.

FLOWERDALE.
Why so, this is as it should be:  being poor,
Thus art thou served by a vile painted whore.
Well, since thy damned crew do so abuse thee,
I'll try of honest men, how they will use me.

[Enter an ancient Citizen.]

Sir, I beseech you to take compassion of a man, one
whose Fortunes have been better than at this 
instant they seem to be:  but if I might crave of you
some such little portion, as would bring me to my
friends, I should rest thankful, until I had requited 
so great a courtesy.

CITIZEN.
Fie, fie, young man, this course is very bad,
Too many such have we about this City,
Yet for I have not seen you in this sort,
Nor noted you to be a common beggar:
Hold, there's an angel, to bear your charges down.
Go to your friends, do not on this depend:
Such bad beginnings oft have worser ends.

[Exit Citizen.]

FLOWERDALE.
Worser ends:  nay, if it fall out no worse than in old
angels I care not.  Nay, now I have had such a 
fortunate beginning, I'll not let a sixpenny-purse
escape me.  By the mass, here comes another.

[Enter a Citizen's wife with a torch before her.]

God bless you, fair mistress.  Now would it please
you, gentlewoman, to look into the wants of a poor
Gentle-Man, a younger brother, I doubt not but God
will treble restore it back again:  one that never before
this time demanded penny, halfpenny, nor farthing.

CITIZEN'S WIFE.
Stay, Alexander.  Now, by my troth, a very proper
man, and tis great pity:  hold, my friend, there's all
the money I have about me, a couple of shillings, and
God bless thee.

FLOWERDALE.
Now God thank you, sweet Lady:  if you have any
friend, or Garden-house, where you may employ a
poor gentleman as your friend, I am yours to command
in all secret service.

CITIZEN'S WIFE.
I thank you, good friend.  I prithee let me see that again
I gave thee:  there is one of them a brass shilling; give
me them, and here is half a crown in gold.  [He gives it
her.]  Now, out upon thee, Rascal! secret service! what
doest thou make of me? it were a good deed to have thee
whipped.  Now I have my money again, I'll see thee
hanged before I give thee a penny.  Secret service!  On,
good Alexander.

[Exit both.]

FLOWERDALE.
This is villainous luck.  I perceive dishonesty will not
thrive:  here comes more.  God forgive me, Sir Arthur,
and Master Oliver:  afore God, I'll speak to them.

[Enter Sir Arthur, and M. Oliver.]

God save you, Sir Arthur:  God save you, Master Oliver.

OLIVER.
Byn you there, zirrah? come, will you ytaken yourself
to your tools, Coystrell?

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, master Oliver, I'll not fight with you.
Alas, sir, you know it was not my doings,
It was only a plot to get Sir Lancelot's daughter:
By God, I never meant you harm.

OLIVER.
And whore is the Gentle-woman thy wife, Mezell?
Whore is shee, Zirrah, ha?

FLOWERDALE.
By my troth, Master Oliver, sick, very sick; and God
is my judge, I know not what means to make for her,
good Gentle-woman.

OLIVER.
Tell me true, is she sick? tell me true, itch vise thee.

FLOWERDALE.
Yes, faith, I tell you true:  Master Oliver, if you would
do me the small kindness, but to lend me forty shillings:
so God help me, I will pay you so soon as my ability
shall make me able, as I am a gentleman.

OLIVER.
Well, thou zaist thy wife is zick:  hold, there's vorty
shillings; give it to thy wife.  Look thou give it her, or I
shall zo veze thee, thou wert not so vezed this zeven
year; look to it.

ARTHUR.
Yfaith, Master Oliver, it is in vain 
To give to him that never thinks of her.

OLIVER.
Well, would che could yvind it.

FLOWERDALE.
I tell you true, Sir Arthur, as I am a gentleman.

OLIVER.
Well fare you well, zirrah:  come, Sir Arthur.

[Exit both.]

FLOWERDALE.
By the Lord, this is excellent.
Five golden angels compassed in an hour!
If this trade hold, I'll never seek a new.
Welcome, sweet gold:  and beggary, adieu.

[Enter Uncle and Father.]

UNCLE.
See, Kester, if you can find the house.

FLOWERDALE.
Who's here? my Uncle, and my man Kester?  By
the mass, tis they.  How do you, Uncle, how dost
thou, Kester?  By my troth, Uncle, you must needs
lend me some money:  the poor gentlewoman my
wife, so God help me, is very sick.  I was robbed of
the hundred angels you gave me; they are gone.

UNCLE.
Aye, they are gone indeed; come, Kester, away.

FLOWERDALE.
Nay, Uncle, do you hear? good Uncle.

UNCLE.
Out, hypocrite, I will not hear thee speak;
Come, leave him, Kester.

FLOWERDALE.
Kester, honest Kester.

FATHER.
Sir, I have nought to say to you.  Open the door,
Tanikin:  thou hadst best lock it fast, for there's a
false knave without.

FLOWERDALE.
You are an old lying Rascal, so you are.

[Exit both.]

[Enter Lucy.]

LUCY.
Vat is de matter?  Vat be you, yonker?

FLOWERDALE.
By this light, a Dutch Frau:  they say they are called
kind.  By this light, I'll try her.

LUCY.
Vat bin you, yonker? why do you not speak?

FLOWERDALE.
By my troth, sweet heart, a poor gentleman that 
would desire of you, if it stand with your liking, the
bounty of your purse.

[Enter Father.]

LUCY.
O here, God, so young an armine.

FLOWERDALE.
Armine, sweet-heart?  I know not what you mean by
that, but I am almost a beggar.

LUCY.
Are you not a married man? vere bin your wife?  Here
is all I have:  take dis.

FLOWERDALE.
What, gold, young Frau? this is brave.

FATHER.
--If he have any grace, he'll now repent.

LUCY.
Why speak you not? were be your vife?

FLOWERDALE.
Dead, dead, she's dead; tis she hath undone me:
spent me all I had, and kept rascals under mine
nose to brave me.

LUCY.
Did you use her vell?

FLOWERDALE.
Use her? there's never a gentle-woman in England
could be better used than I did her.  I could but
coach her; her diet stood me in forty pound a month,
but she is dead and in her grave my care are buried.

LUCY.
Indeed, dat vas not scone.

FATHER.
--He is turned more devil than he was before.

FLOWERDALE.
Thou doest belong to Master Civet here, doest thou not?

LUCY.
Yes me do.

FLOWERDALE.
Why, there's it:  there's not a handful of plate but
belongs to me, God's my judge:  if I had but such a wench
as thou art, there's never a man in England would make
more of her, than I would do, so she had any stock.

[They call within:  O, why, Tanikin.]

LUCY.
Stay, one doth call; I shall come by and by again.

FLOWERDALE.
By this hand, this Dutch wench is in love with me.
Were it not admiral to make her steal all Civet's
plate, and run away.

FATHER.
Twere beastly.  O Master Flowerdale,
Have you no fear of God, nor conscience?
What do you mean by this wild course you take?

FLOWERDALE.
What do I mean? why, to live, that I mean.

FATHER.
To live in this sort? fie upon the course:
Your life doth show, you are a very coward.

FLOWERDALE.
A coward?  I pray, in what?

FATHER.
Why, you will borrow sixpence of a boy.

FLOWERDALE.
Snails, is there such cowardice in that?  I dare
borrow it of a man, I, and of the tallest man in
England, if he will lend it me.  Let me borrow
how I can, and let them come by it how they
dare.  And it is well known, I might a rid out a 
hundred times if I would:  so I might.

FATHER.
It was not want of will, but cowardice.
There is none that lends to you, but know they gain:
And what is that but only stealth in you?
Delia might hang you now, did not her heart
Take pity of you for her sister's sake.
Go, get you hence, least, lingering where you stay,
You fall into their hands you look not for.

FLOWERDALE.
I'll tarry here, till the Dutch Frau comes, if all the
devils in hell were here.

[Exit Father.]

[Enter Sir Lancelot, Master Weathercock, and
Artichoke.]

LANCELOT.
Where is the door? are we not past it, Artichoke?

ARTICHOKE.
Bith mass, here's one; I'll ask him.  Do you hear, sir?
What, are you so proud? do you hear? which is the way
to Master Civet's house? what will you not speak? O
me, this is filching Flowerdale.

LANCELOT.
O wonderful, is this lewd villain here?
O you cheating Rogue, you cut-purse coni-catcher,
What ditch, you villain, is my daughter's grave?
A cozening rascal, that must make a will,
Take on him that strict habit--very that,
When he should turn to angel--a dying grace.
I'll father in law you, sir, I'll make a will!
Speak, villain, where's my daughter?
Poisoned, I warrant you, or knocked a the head
And to abuse good Master Weathercock,
With his forged will, and Master Weathercock
To make my grounded resolution,
Than to abuse the Devonshire gentleman:
Go, away with him to prison.

FLOWERDALE.
Wherefore to prison? sir, I will not go.

[Enter Master Civet, his wife, Oliver, Sir Arthur,
Father, and Uncle, Delia.]

LANCELOT.
O here's his Uncle! welcome, gentlemen, welcome all.
Such a cozener, gentlemen, a murderer too, for any 
thing I know:  my daughter is missing:  hath been
looked for, cannot be found.  A vild upon thee.

UNCLE.
He is my kinsman, although his life be wild;
Therefore, in God's name, do with him what you will.

LANCELOT.
Marry, to prison.

FLOWERDALE.
Wherefore to prison? snick up, I owe you nothing.

LANCELOT.
Bring forth my daughter then:  away with him.

FLOWERDALE.
Go seek your daughter; what do you lay to my charge.

LANCELOT.
Suspicion of murder: go, away with him.

FLOWERDALE.
Murder, you dogs?   I murder your daughter!
Come, Uncle, I know you'll bail me.

UNCLE.
Not I, were there no more, than I the Jailor, thou the
prisoner.

LANCELOT.
Go; away with him.

[Enter Lucy like a Frau.]

LUCY.
O my life, here; where will you ha de man?
Vat ha de yonker done?

WEATHERCOCK.
Woman, he hath killed his wife.

LUCY.
His vife:  dat is not good, dat is not seen.

LANCELOT.
Hang not upon him, huswife; if you do, I'll lay you by him.

LUCY.
Have me no oder way dan you have him:
He tell me dat he love me heartily.

FRANCES.
Lead away my maid to prison! why, Tom, will you suffer
that?

CIVET.
No, by your leave, father, she is no vagrant:  she is my
wife's chamber maid, & as true as the skin between any 
man's brows here.

LANCELOT.
Go to, you're both fools:
Son Civet, of my life, this is a plot,
Some straggling counterfeit preferred to you,
No doubt to rob you of your plate and jewels.
I'll have you led away to prison, trull.

LUCY.
I am no trull, neither outlandish Frau.
Nor he, nor I shall to the prison go:
Know you me now? nay, never stand amazed.
Father, I know I have offended you,
And though that duty wills me bend my knees
To you in duty and obedience:
Yet this ways do I turn, and to him yield
My love, my duty and my humbleness.

LANCELOT.
Bastard in nature! kneel to such a slave?

LUCY.
O Master Flowerdale, if too much grief
Have not stopped up the organs of your voice,
Then speak to her that is thy faithful wife:
Or doth contempt of me thus tie thy tongue?
Turn not away, I am no Aethiope,
No wanton Cressida, nor a changing Helen:
But rather one made wretched by thy loss.
What, turnst thou still from me?  O then
I guess thee woefulst among hapless men.

FLOWERDALE.
I am, indeed, wife, wonder among wives!
Thy chastity and virtue hath infused
Another soul in me, red with defame,
For in my blushing cheeks is seen my shame.

LANCELOT.
Out, hypocrite.  I charge thee, trust him not.

LUCY.
Not trust him? by the hopes of after bliss,
I know no sorrow can be compared to his.

LANCELOT.
Well, since thou wert ordained to beggary,
Follow thy fortune; I defy thee, I.

OLIVER.
Ywood che were so well ydoussed as was ever
white cloth in a tocking mill, and che ha not made
me weep.

FATHER.
If he hath any grace, he'll now repent.

ARTHUR.
It moves my heart.

WEATHERCOCK.
By my troth, I must weep, I can not choose.

UNCLE.
None but a beast would such a maid misuse.

FLOWERDALE.
Content thy self, I hope to win his favour,
And to redeem my reputation lost:
And, gentlemen, believe me, I beseech you:
I hope your eyes shall behold such change,
As shall deceive your expectation.

OLIVER.
I would che were ysplit now, but che believe him.

LANCELOT.
How, believe him?

WEATHERCOCK.
By the mackins, I do.

LANCELOT.
What, do you think that ere he will have grace?

WEATHERCOCK.
By my faith, it will go hard.

OLIVER.
Well, che vor ye, he is changed:  and Master
Flowerdale, in hope you been so, hold, there's
vorty pound toward your zetting up:  what, be not
ashamed; vang it, man, vang it:  be a good husband,
loven your wife:  and you shall not want for vorty
more, I che vor thee.

ARTHUR.
My means are little, but if you'll follow me,
I will instruct my ablest power:
But to your wife I give this diamond,
And prove true diamond fair in all your life.

FLOWERDALE.
Thanks, good Sir Arthur, Master Oliver,
You being my enemy, and grown so kind,
Binds me in all endeavor to restore--

OLIVER.
What! restore me no restorings, man.  I have vorty
pound more for Lucy; here, vang it:  Zouth, chil
devie London else.  What, do not think me a Mezel
or a Scoundrel to throw away my money:  che have 
a hundred pound more to pace of any good spotation:
I hope your vader and your uncle here wil vollow my
examples.

UNCLE.
You have guessed right of me; if he leave of this
course of life, he shall be mine heir.

LANCELOT.
But he shall never get a groat of me:
A cozener, a deceiver, one that killed
His painful father, honest gentleman
That passed the fearful danger of the sea,
To get him living and maintain him brave.

WEATHERCOCK.
What, hath he killed his father?

LANCELOT.
Aye, sir, with conceit of his wild courses.

FATHER.
Sir, you are misinformed.

LANCELOT.
Why, thou old knave, thou toldst me so thy self.

FATHER.
I wronged him then:  and toward my Master's stock,
There's twenty nobles for to make amends.

FLOWERDALE.
No, Kester, I have troubled thee, and wronged thee more.
What thou in love gives, I in love restore.

FRANCES.
Ha, ha, sister, there you played bo-peep with Tom.  What
shall I give her toward household?  Sister Delia, shall I
give her my fan?

DELIA.
You were best ask your husband.

FRANCES.
Shall I, Tom?

CIVET.
Aye, do, Frances; I'll buy thee a new one, with a longer
handle.

FRANCES.
A russet one, Tom.

CIVET.
Aye, with russet feathers.

FRANCES.
Here, sister, there's my fan towad household, to keep
you warm.

LUCY.
I thank you, sister.

WEATHERCOCK.
Why this is well, and toward fair Lucy's stock, here's
forty shillings:  and forty good shillings more, I'll give
her, marry.  Come, Sir Lancelot, I must have you friends.

LANCELOT.
Not I, all this is counterfeit;
He will consume it, were it a million.

FATHER.
Sir, what is your daughter's dower worth?

LANCELOT.
Had she been married to an honest man,
It had been better than a thousand pound.

FATHER.
Pay it him, and I'll give you my bond,
To make her jointer better worth than three.

LANCELOT.
Your bond, sir? why, what are you?

FATHER.
One whose word in London, though I say it,
Will pass there for as much as yours.

LANCELOT.
Wert not thou late that unthrift's serving-man?

FATHER.
Look on me better, now my scar is off.
Ne'er muse, man, at this metamorphosis.

LANCELOT.
Master Flowerdale!

FLOWERDALE.
My father!  O, I shame to look on him.
Pardon, dear father, the follies that are past.

FATHER.
Son, son, I do, and joy at this thy change,
And applaud thy fortune in this virtuous maid,
Whom heaven hath sent to thee to save thy soul

LUCY.
This addeth joy to joy, high heaven be praised.

FATHER.
I caused that rumour to be spread myself,
Because I'd see the humours of my son,
Which to relate the circumstance is needless:
And, sirrah, see you run no more into
That same disease:
For he that's once cured of that malady,
Of Riot, Swearing, Drunkenness, and Pride,
And falls again into the like distress,
That fever is deadly, doth till death endure:
Such men die mad as of a callenture.

FLOWERDALE.
Heaven helping me, I'll hate the course as hell.

UNCLE.
Say it and do it, cousin, all is well.

LANCELOT.
Well, being in hope you'll prove an honest man,
I take you to my favour.  Brother Flowerdale,
Welcome with all my heart:  I see your care
Hath brought these acts to this conclusion,
And I am glad of it:  come, let's in and feast.

OLIVER.
Nay, zoft you awhile:  you promised to make Sir
Arthur and me amends.  Here is your wisest daughter;
see which ans she'll have.

LANCELOT.
A God's name, you have my good will, get hers.

OLIVER.
How say you then, damsel, tyters hate?

DELIA.
I, sir, am yours.

OLIVER.
Why, then, send for a Vicar, and chil have it dispatched
in a trice, so chill.

DELIA.
Pardon me, sir, I mean I am yours,
In love, in duty, and affection,
But not to love as wife:  shall ne'er be said,
Delia was buried married, but a maid.

ARTHUR.
Do not condemn yourself forever,
Virtuous fair, you were born to love.

OLIVER.
Why, you say true, Sir Arthur, she was ybere to it 
so well as her mother:  but I pray you shew us some
zamples or reasons why you will not marry.

DELIA.
Not that I do condemn a married life,
For tis no doubt a sanctimonious thing:
But for the care and crosses of a wife,
The trouble in that world that children bring;
My vow is in heaven in earth to live alone,
Husbands, howsoever good, I will have none.

OLIVER.
Why, then che will live Bachelor too.  Che zet not a
vig by a wife, if a wife zet not a vig by me.  Come,
shalls go to dinner?

FATHER.
Tomorrow I crave your companies in Mark-lane:
Tonight we'll frolic in Master Civet's house,
And to each health drink down a full carouse.


FINIS









This etext was produced by Tony Adam <anthony-adam@tamu.edu>




THE PURITAINE WIDDOW

THE
ACTORS
NAME
In the Play Intitled
The Puritan Widow.

The Scene London.

Lady Plus, a Citizens Widow.
Frances,
Moll, her two Daughters.
Sir Godfrey, Brother-in-Law to the Widow Plus.
Master Edmond, Son to the Widow Plus.
George Pye-boord, a Scholar and a Citizen.
Peter Skirmish, an old Soldier.
Captain Idle, a Highway-man.
Corporal Oath, a vain-glorious Fellow.
Nichols St. Antlings,
Simon St. Mary Overies,
Frailty, Serving-men to the Lady Plus.
Sir Oliver Muck-hill, a Suitor to the Lady Plus.
Sir John Penny-Dub, a Suitor to Moll.
Sir Andrew Tipstaff, a Suitor to Frances.
The Sheriff of London.
Puttock,
Ravenshaw, Two of the Sheriffs Sergeants.
Dogson, a Yeoman.
A Noble-man.
A Gentleman Citizen.
Officers.


ACTUS PRIMUS.

Scene I.  A Garden behind the widow's house.

[Enter the Lady Widdow-Plus, her two daughters Frank and Moll,
her husband's Brother an old Knight Sir Godfrey, with her Son
and heir Master Edmond, all in mourning apparel, Edmond in a
Cyrpess Hat.  The Widdow wringing her hands, and bursting out
Into passion, as newly come from the Burial of her husband.


WIDOW.
Oh, that ever I was borne, that ever I was borne!

SIR GODFREY.
Nay, good Sister, dear sister, sweet sister, be of good
comfort; show your self a woman, now or never.

WIDOW.
Oh, I have lost the dearest man, I have buried the sweetest
husband that ever lay by woman.

SIR GODFREY.
Nay, give him his due, he was indeed an honest, virtuous,
Discreet, wise man,--he was my Brother, as right as right.

WIDOW.
O, I shall never forget him, never forget him; he was a man
so well given to a woman--oh!

SIR GODFREY.
Nay, but, kind Sister, I could weep as much as any woman,
but, alas, our tears cannot call him again:  me thinks you
are well read, Sister, and know that death is as common as
Homo, a common name to all men:--a man shall be taken when
he's making water.--Nay, did not the learned Parson, Master
Pigman, tell us e'en now, that all Flesh is frail, we are
borne to die, Man ha's but a time:  with such like deep and
profound persuasions, as he is a rare fellow, you know, and
an excellent Reader:  and for example, (as there are
examples aboundance,) did not Sir Humfrey Bubble die tother
day?  There's a lusty Widdow; why, she cried not above half
an hour--for shame, for shame! Then followed him old Master
Fulsome, the Usurer:  there's a wise Widdow; why, she cried
ne'er a whit at all.

WIDOW.
O, rank not me with those wicked women:  I had a husband
Out-shined 'em all.

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, that he did, yfaith:  he out-shined 'em all.

WIDOW.
Doost thou stand there and see us all weep, and not once
shed a tear for thy father's death? oh, thou ungratious son
and heir, thou!

EDMOND.
Troth, Mother, I should not weep, I'm sure; I am past a
child, I hope, to make all my old School fellows laugh at
me; I should be mocked, so I should.  Pray, let one of my
Sisters weep for me.  I'll laugh as much for her another
time.

WIDOW.
Oh, thou past-Grace, thou! out of my sight, thou graceless
imp, thou grievest me more than the death of thy Father! oh,
thou stubborn only son! hadst thou such an honest man to thy
Father--that would deceive all the world to get riches for
thee--and canst thou not afford a little salt water? he that
so wisely did quite over-throw the right heir of those lands,
which now you respect not:  up every morning betwixt four
and five; so duly at Westminster Hall every Term-Time, with
all his Cards and writings, for thee, thou wicked Absolon--
oh, dear husband!

EDMOND.
Weep, quotha?  I protest I am glad he's Churched; for now
he's gone, I shall spend in quiet.

FRANCES.
Dear mother, pray cease; half your Tears suffice.
Tis time for you to take truce with your eyes;
Let me weep now.

WIDOW.
Oh, such a dear knight! such a sweet husband have I lost,
have I lost!--If Blessed be the coarse the rain rains upon,
he had it pouring down.

SIR GODFREY.
Sister, be of good cheer, we are all mortal our selves.  I
come upon you freshly.  I near speak without comfort, hear
me what I shall say:--my brother ha's left you wealthy,
y'are rich.

WIDOW.
Oh!

SIR GODFREY.
I say y'are rich:  you are also fair.

WIDOW.
Oh!

SIR GODFREY.
Go to, y'are fair, you cannot smother it; beauty will come
to light; nor are your years so far enter'd with you, but
that you will be sought after, and may very well answer
another husband; the world is full of fine Gallants, choice
enow, Sister,--for what should we do with  all our Knights,
I pray, but to marry rich widows, wealthy Citizens' widows,
lusty fair-browed Ladies? go to, be of good comfort, I say:
leave snobbing and weeping--Yet my Brother was a kind hearted
man--I would not have the Elf see me now!--Come, pluck up a
woman's heart--here stands your Daughters, who be well
estated, and at maturity will also be enquir'd after with
good husbands, so all these tears shall be soon dried up and
a better world than ever--What, Woman? you must not weep
still; he's dead, he's buried--yet I cannot choose but weep
for him!

WIDOW.
Marry again! no! let me be buried quick then!
And that same part of Quire whereon I tread
To such intent, O may it be my grave;
And that the priest may turn his wedding prayers,
E'en with a breath, to funeral dust and ashes!
Oh, out of a million of millions, I should ne'er find such
a husband; he was unmatchable,--unmatchable! nothing was
too hot, nor too dear for me, I could not speak of that
one thing, that I had not:  beside I had keys of all, kept
all, receiv'd all, had money in my purse, spent what I would,
came home when I would, and did all what I would.  Oh, my
sweet husband!  I shall never have the like.

SIR GODFREY.
Sister, ne'er say so; he was an honest brother of mine, and
so, and you may light upon one as honest again, or one as
honest again may light upon you:  that's the properer
phrase, indeed.

WIDOW.
Never! Oh, if you love me, urge it not.

[Kneels.]

Oh may I be the by-word of the world,
The common talk at Table in the mouth
Of every Groom and Waiter, if e'er more
I entertain the carnal suite of Man!

MOLL.
I must kneel down for fashion too.

FRANCES.
And I, whom never man as yet hath scald,
E'ev in this depth of general sorrow, vow
Never to marry, to sustain such loss
As a dear husband seems to be, once dead.

MOLL.
I lov'd my father well, too; but to say,
Nay, vow, I would not marry for his death--
Sure, I should speak false Latin, should I not?
I'd as soon vow never to come in Bed.
Tut!  Women must live by th' quick, and not by th' dead.

WIDOW.
Dar Copy of my husband, oh let me kiss thee.
How like is this Model! This brief Picture

[Drawing out her husband's Picture.]

Quickens my tears:  my sorrows are renew'd
At this fresh sight.

SIR GODFREY.
Sister--

WIDOW.
Away,
All honesty with him is turn'd to clay.
Oh my sweet husband, oh--

FRANCES.
My dear father!

[Exeunt mother and Frances.]

MOLL.
Here's a pulling, indeed!  I think my Mother weeps for all
the women that ever buried husbands; for if from time to
time all the Widowers' tears in England had been bottled
up, I do not think all would have filled a three-half-penny
Bottle.  Alas, a small matter bucks a hand-kercher,--and
sometimes the spittle stands to nie Saint Thomas a Watrings.
Well, I can mourn in good sober sort as well as another;
but where I spend one tear for a dead Father, I could give
twenty kisses for a quick husband.

[Exit Moll.]

SIR GODFREY.
Well, go thy ways, old Sir Godfrey, and thou mayest be
proud on't, thou hast a kind loving sister-in-law; how
constant! how passionate! how full of April the poor soul's
eyes are!  Well, I would my Brother knew on't, he would
then know what a kind wife he had left behind him:  truth,
and twere not for shame that the Neighbours at th' next
garden should hear me, between joy and grief I should e'en
cry out-right!

[Exit Sir Godfrey.]

EDMOND.
So, a fair riddance!  My father's laid in dust; his Coffin
and he is like a whole-meat-pye, and the worms will cut
him up shortly.  Farewell, old Dad, farewell.  I'll be
curb'd in no more.  I perceived a son and heir may quickly
be made a fool, and he will be one, but I'll take another
order.--Now she would have me weep for him, for-sooth, and
why? because he cozn'd the right heir, being a fool, and
bestow'd those Lands upon me his eldest Son; and therefore
I must weep for him, ha, ha.  Why, all the world knows, as
long as twas his pleasure to get me, twas his duty to get
for me:  I know the law in that point; no Attorney can
gull me.  Well, my Uncle is an old Ass, and an Admirable
Cockscomb.  I'll rule the Roast my self.  I'll be kept
under no more; I know what I may do well enough by my
Father's Copy:  the Law's in mine own hands now:  nay, now
I know my strength, I'll be strong enough for my Mother,
I warrant you.

[Exit.]


SCENE II.  A street.

[Enter George Pye-board, a scholar and a Citizen, and unto
him an old soldier, Peter Skirmish.]

PYE.
What's to be done now, old Lad of War? thou that wert wont
to be as hot as a turn-spit, as nimble as a fencer, and as
lousy as a school-master; now thou art put to silence like
a Sectary.--War sits now like a Justice of peace, and does
nothing.  Where be your Muskets, Caleiuers and Hotshots? in
Long-lane, at Pawn, at Pawn.--Now keys are your only Guns,
Key-guns, Key-guns, and Bawds the Gunners, who are your
Sentinels in peace, and stand ready charg'd to give warning,
with hems, hums, and pockey-coffs; only your Chambers are
licenc'st to play upon you, and Drabs enow to give fire to 'em.

SKIRMISH.
Well, I cannot tell, but I am sure it goes wrong with me, for
since the cessure of the wars, I have spent above a hundred
crowns out a purse.  I have been a soldier any time this
forty years, and now I perceive an old soldier and an old
Courtier have both one destiny, and in the end turn both into
hob-nails.

PYE.
Pretty mystery for a begger, for indeed a hob-nail is the true
emblem of a begger's shoe-sole.

SKIRMISH.
I will not say but that war is a blood-sucker, and so; but,
in my conscience, (as there is no soldier but has a piece of
one, though it be full of holes like a shot Antient; no matter,
twill serve to swear by) in my conscience, I think some kind
of Peace has more hidden oppressions, and violent heady sins,
(though looking of a gentle nature) then a profest war.

PYE.
Troth, and for mine own part, I am a poor Gentleman, and a
Scholar:  I have been matriculated in the University, wore
out six Gowns there, seen some fools, and some Scholars, some
of the City, and some of the Country, kept order, went bare-
headed over the Quadrangle, eat my Commons with a good
stomach, and Battled with Discretion; at last, having done
many slights and tricks to maintain my wit in use (as my brain
would never endure me to be idle,) I was expeld the University,
only for stealing a Cheese out of Jesus College.

SKIRMISH.
Ist possible?

PYE.
Oh! there was one Welshman (God forgive him) pursued it hard;
and never left, till I turned my staff toward London, where
when I came, all my friends were pitt-hold, gone to Graves,
(as indeed there was but a few left before.)  Then was I turned
to my wits, to shift in the world, to tower among Sons and
Heirs, and Fools, and Gulls, and Lady's eldest Sons, to work
upon nothing, to feed out of Flint, and ever since has my
belly been much beholding to my brain.  But, now, to return
to you, old Skirmish:  I say as you say, and for my part wish
a Turbulency in the world, for I have nothing to lose but my
wits, and I think they are as mad as they will be:  and to
strengthen your Argument the more, I say an honest war is
better than a bawdy peace, as touching my profession.  The
multiplicity of Scholars, hatcht and nourisht in the idle
Calms of peace, makes 'em like Fishes one devour another; and
the community of Learning has so played upon affections, and
thereby almost Religion is come about to Phantasy, and
discredited by being too much spoken off-in so many and mean
mouths, I my self, being a Scholar and a Graduate, have no
other comfort by my learning, but the Affection of my words,
to know how Scholar-like to name what I want, and can call my
self a Begger both in Greek and Latin:  and therefore, not to
cog with Peace, I'll not be afraid to say, 'tis a great
Breeder, but a barren Nourisher:  a great getter of Children,
which mus either be Thieves or Rich-men, Knaves or Beggers.

SKIRMISH.
Well, would I had been born a Knave then, when I was born
a Begger; for if the truth were known, I think I was begot
when my Father had never a penny in his purse.

PYE.
Puh, faint not, old Skirmish; let this warrant thee, Facilis
Descensus Averni, 'tis an easy journey to a Knave; thou
mayest be a Knave when thou wilt; and Peace is a good Madam
to all other professions, and an arrant Drab to us, let us
handle her accordingly, and by our wits thrive in despite of
her; for since the law lives by quarrels, the Courtier by
smooth God-morrows; and every profession makes it self
greater by imperfections, why not we then by shifts, wiles,
and forgeries? and seeing our brains are our only Patrimonies,
let's spend with judgment, not like a desperate son and heir,
but like a sober and discreet Templar,--one that will never
march beyond the bounds of his allowance.  And for our
thriving means, thus:  I my self will put on the Deceit of a
Fortune-teller.

SKIRMISH.
A Fortune-teller?  Very proper.

PYE.
And you of a figure-caster, or a Conjurer.

SKIRMISH.
A Conjurer?

PYE.
Let me alone; I'll instruct you, and teach you to deceive all
eyes, but the Devil's.

SKIRMISH.
Oh aye, for I would not deceive him, and I could choose, of
all others.

PYE.
Fear not, I warrant you; and so by those means we shall help
one another to Patients, as the condition of the age affords
creatures enow for cunning to work upon.

SKIRMISH.
Oh wondrous! new fools and fresh Asses.

PYE.
Oh, fit, fit! excellent.

SKIRMISH.
What, in the name of Conjuring?

PYE.
My memory greets me happily with an admirable subject to
gaze upon:  The Lady-Widdow, who of late I saw weeping in
her Garden for the death of her Husband; sure she 'as but a
watrish soul, and half on't by this time is dropt out of her
Eyes:  device well managed may do good upon her:  it stands
firm, my first practise shall be there.

SKIRMISH.
You have my voice, George.

PYE.
Sh'as a gray Gull to her Brother, a fool to her only son,
and an Ape to her youngest Daughter.--I overheard 'em
severally, and from their words I'll derive my device; and
thou, old Peter Skirmish, shall be my second in all slights.

SKIRMISH.
Ne'er doubt me, George Pye-board,--only you must teach me
to conjure.

[Enter Captain Idle, pinioned, and with a guard of Officers
passeth over the Stage.]

PYE.
Puh, I'll perfect thee, Peter.--How now? what's he?

SKIRMISH.
Oh George! this sight kills me.  Tis my sworn Brother,
Captain Idle.

PYE.
Captain Idle!

SKIRMISH.
Apprehended for some felonious act or other.  He has started
out, h'as made a Night on't, lackt silver.  I cannot but
commend his resolution; he would not pawn his Buff-Jerkin.
I would either some of us were employed, or might pitch our
Tents at Usurers' doors, to kill the slaves as they peep out
at the Wicket.

PYE.
Indeed, those are our ancient Enemies; they keep our money
in their hands, and make us to be hangd for robbing of 'em.
But, come, let's follow after to the Prison, and know the
Nature of his offence; and what we can steed him in, he
shall be sure of; and I'll uphold it still, that a charitable
Knave is better then a soothing Puritain.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE III.  A Street.

[Enter at one door Corporal Oath, a Vain-glorious fellow;
and at the other, three of the Widdow Puritain's Servingmen,
Nicholas Saint-Tantlings, Simon Saint-Mary-Overaries, and
Frailty, in black scurvy mourning coats, and Books at their
Girdles, as coming from Church.  They meet.]


NICHOLAS.
What, Corporal Oath?  I am sorry we have met with you,
next our hearts; you are the man that we are forbidden to
keep company withall.  We must not swear I can tell you,
and you have the name for swearing.

SIMON.
Aye, Corporal Oath, I would you would do so much as forsake
us, sir; we cannot abide you, we must not be seen in your
company.

FRAILTY.
There is none of us, I can tell you, but shall be soundly
whipt for swearing.

CORPORAL.
Why, how now, we three?  Puritanical Scrape-shoes, Flesh
a good Fridays! a hand.

ALL.
Oh!

CORPORAL.
Why, Nicholas Saint-Tantlings, Simon Saint Mary Ovaries,
ha's the De'el possest you, that you swear no better? you
half-Christned Catomites, you ungod-mothered Varlets, do's
the first lesson teach you to be proud, and the second to
be Cocks-combs? proud Cocks-combs! not once to do duty to
a man of Mark!

FRAILTY.
A man of Mark, quatha!  I do not think he can shew a Begger's
Noble.

CORPORAL.
A Corporal, a Commander, one of spirit, that is able to blow
you up all dry with your Books at your Girdles.

SIMON.
We are not taught to believe that, sir, for we know the
breath of man is weak.

[Corporal breathes upon Frailty.]

FRAILTY.
Foh, you lie, Nicholas; for here's one strong enough.  Blow
us up, quatha:  he may well blow me above twelve-score off
an him.  I warrant, if the wind stood right, a man might
smell him from the top of Newgate, to the Leads of Ludgate.

CORPORAL.
Sirrah, thou Hollow-Book of Max-candle--

NICHOLAS.
Aye, you may say what you will, so you swear not.

CORPORAL.
I swear by the--

NICHOLAS.
Hold, hold, good Corporal Oath; for if you swear once, we
shall all fall down in a swoon presently.

CORPORAL.
I must and will swear: you quivering Cocks-combs, my Captain
is imprisoned, and by Vulcan's Leather Cod-piece point--

NICHOLAS.
O Simon, what an oath was there.

FRAILTY.
If he should chance to break it, the poor man's Breeches
would fall down about his heels, for Venus allows him but
one point to his hose.

CORPORAL.
With these my Bully-Feet I will thump ope the Prison doors,
and brain the Keeper with the begging Box, but I'll see my
honest sweet Captain Idle at liberty.

NICHOLAS.
How, Captain Idle? my old Aunt's son, my dear Kinsman, in
Capadochio?

CORPORAL.
Aye, thou Church-peeling, thou Holy-paring, religious outside,
thou! if thou hadst any grace in thee, thou would'st visit
him, relieve him, swear to get him out.

NICHOLAS.
Assure you, Corporal, indeed-lam tis the first time I heard
on't.

CORPORAL.
Why do't now, then, Marmaset:  bring forth thy yearly-wages,
let not a Commander perish!

SIMON.
But, if he be one of the wicked, he shall perish.

NICHOLAS.
Well, Corporal, I'll e'en them along with you, to visit my
Kinsman:  if I can do him any good, I will,--but I have
nothing for him.  Simon Saint Mary Ovaries and Frailty, pray
make a lie for me to the Knight my Master, old Sir Godfrey.

CORPORAL.
A lie? may you lie then?

FRAILTY.
O, aye, we may lie, but we must not swear.

SIMON.
True, we may lie with our Neighbor's wife, but we must not
swear wedid so.

CORPORAL.
Oh, an excellent Tag of religion!

NICHOLAS.
Oh Simon, I have thought upon a sound excuse; it will go
currant:  say that I am gone to a Fast.

SIMON.
To a Fast? very good.

NICHOLAS.
Aye, to a Fast, say, with Master Fullbelly the Minister.

SIMON.
Master Fullbelly? an honest man:  he feeds the flock well,
for he's an excellent feeder.

[Exit Corporal, Nicholas.]

FRAILTY.
Oh, aye, I have seen him eat up a whole Pig, and afterward
fall to the pittitoes.

[Exit Simon and Frailty.]


SCENE IV.


The Prison, Marshalsea.

[Enter Captain Idle at one door, and later Pye-board and old
soldier at the other.  George Pye-board, speaking within.]


PYE.
Pray turn the key.

SKIRMISH.
Turn the key, I pray.

CAPTAIN.
Who should those be?  I almost know their voices.--
O my friends!

[Entering.]

Ya're welcome to a smelling Room here.  You newly took leave
of the air; ist not a strange savour?

PYE.
As all prisons have:  smells of sundry wretches,
Who, tho departed, leave their scents behind 'em.
By Gold, Captain, I am sincerely sorry for thee.

CAPTAIN.
By my troth, George, I thank thee; but pish,--what must be,
must be.

SKIRMISH.
Captain, what do you lie in for? ist great? what's your
offence?

CAPTAIN.
Faith, my offence is ordinary,--common:  A High-way; and I
fear me my penalty will be ordinary and common too: a halter.

PYE.
Nay, prophecy not so ill; it shall go heard,
But I'll shift for thy life.

CAPTAIN.
Whether I live or die, thou'art an honest George.  I'll tell
you--silver flowed not with me, as it had done, (for now the
tide runs to Bawds and flatterers.)  I had a start out, and
by chance set upon a fat steward, thinking his purse had been
as pursey as his body; and the slave had about him but the
poor purchase of ten groats:  notwithstanding, being descried,
pursued, and taken, I know the Law is so grim, in respect of
many desperate, unsettled soldiers, that I fear me I shall
dance after their pipe for't.

SKIRMISH.
I am twice sorry for you, Captain:  first that your purchase
was so small, and now that your danger is so great.

CAPTAIN.
Push, the worst is but death,--ha you a pipe of Tobacco
about you?

SKIRMISH.
I think I have there abouts about me.

[Captain blows a pipe.]

CAPTAIN.
Here's a clean Gentleman, too, to receive.

PYE.
Well, I must cast about some happy slight.
Work brain, that ever didst thy Master right!

CAPTAIN.
Keeper! let the key be turn'd!

[Corporal and Nicholas within.]

NICHOLAS.
Aye, I pray, Master keeper, give's a cast of your office.

CAPTAIN.
How now? more Visitants?--what, Corporal Oath?

PYE.
Corporal?

SKIRMISH.
Corporal?

CORPORAL.
In prison, honest Captain? this must not be.

NICHOLAS.
How do you, Captain Kinsman>

CAPTAIN.
Good Cocks-comb! what makes that pure, starch'd fool here?

NICHOLAS.
You see, Kinsman, I am somewhat bold to call in, and see how
you do.  I heard you were safe enough, and I was very glad
on't that it was no worse.

CAPTAIN.
This is a double torture now,--this fool by'th book
Do's vex me more than my imprisonment.
What meant you, Corporal, to hook him hither?

CORPORAL.
Who, he? he shall relieve thee, and supply thee;
I'll make him do 't.

CAPTAIN.
[Aside, to Oath.]  Fie, what vain breath you spend! he supply?
I'll sooner expect mercy from a Usurer when my bond's
Forfeited, sooner kindness from a Layer when my money's spent:
Nay, sooner charity from the devil, than good from a Puritan!
I'll look for relief from him, when Lucifer is restor'd to
his blood, and in Heaven again.

NICHOLAS.
I warrant, my Kinsman's talking of me, for my left ear burns
most tyrannically.

PYE.
Captain Idle, what's he there? he looks like a Monkey upward,
and a Crane down-ward.

CAPTAIN.
Pshaw, a foolish Cousin of mine; I must thank God for him.

PYE.
Why, the better subject to work a scape upon; thou shalt
o'en change clothes with him, and leave him here, and so--

CAPTAIN.
Push, I publish't him e'en now to my Corporal:  he will be
damned, ere he do me so much good; why, I know a more proper,
a more handsome device than that, if the slave would be
sociable.  Now, goodman Fleer-face.

NICHOLAS.
Oh, my Cousin begins to speak to me now:  I shall be
acquainted with him again, I hope.

SKIRMISH.
Look what ridiculous Raptures take hold of his wrinkles.

PYE.
Then, what say you to this device? a happy one, Captain?

CAPTAIN.
Speak low, George; Prison Rats have wider ears than those
in Malt-lofts.

NICHOLAS.
Cousin, if it lay in my power, as they say--to--do--

CAPTAIN.
Twould do me an exceeding pleasure, indeed, that, but ne'er
talk forder on't:  the fool will be hang'd, ere he do't.

[To the Corporal.]

CORPORAL.
Pax, I'll thump 'im to't.

PYE.
Why, do but try the Fopster, and break it to him bluntly.

CAPTAIN.
And so my disgrace will dwell in his Jaws, and the slave
slaver out our purpose to his Master, for would I were but
as sure on't as I am sure he will deny to do't.

NICHOLAS.
I would be heartily glad, Cousin, if any of my friendships,
as they say, might--stand--ah--

PYE.
Why, you see he offers his friendship foolishly to you
already.

CAPTAIN.
Aye, that's the hell on't, I would he would offer it wisely.

NICHOLAS.
Verily, and indeed la, Cousin--

CAPTAIN.
I have took note of thy fleers a good while:  if thou art
minded to do me good--as thou gapst upon me comfortably,
and giv'st me charitable faces, which indeed is but a
fashion in you all that are Puritains--wilt soon at night
steal me thy Master's chain?

NICHOLAS.
Oh, I shall swoon!

PYE.
Corporal, he starts already.

CAPTAIN.
I know it to be worth three hundred Crowns, and with the
half of that I can buy my life at a Brokers, at second hand,
which now lies in pawn to th' Law:  if this thou refuse to
do, being easy and nothing dangerous, in that thou art held
in good opinion of thy Master, why tis a palpable Argument
thou holdst my life at no price, and these thy broken and
unioynted offers are but only created in thy lip, now borne,
and now buried, foolish breath only.  What, woult do't? shall
I look for happiness in thy answer?

NICHOLAS.
Steal my Master's chain, qu'the? no, it shall ne'er be said,
that Nicholas Saint Tantlings committed Bird-lime!

CAPTAIN.
Nay, I told you as much; did I not? tho he be a Puritain, yet
he will be a true man.

NICHOLAS.
Why, Cousin, you know tis written, thou shalt not steal.

CAPTAIN.
Why, and fool, thou shalt love thy Neighbour, and help him in
extremities.

NICHOLAS.
Mass, I think it be, indeed:  in what Chapter's that, Cousin?

CAPTAIN.
Why, in the first of Charity, the 2. Verse.

NICHOLAS.
The first of Charity, quatha! that's a good jest; there's no
such Chapter in my book!

CAPTAIN.
No, I knew twas torn out of thy Book, and that makes so little
in thy heart.

PYE.
Come, let me tell you, ya're too unkind a Kinsman, yfaith;
the Captain loving you so dearly, aye, like the Pomwater of
his eye, and you to be so uncomfortable:  fie, fie.

NICHOLAS.
Pray, do not wish me to be hangd:  any thing else that I can
do, had it been to rob, I would ha don't; but I must not
steal:  that's the word, the literal, thou shalt not steal;
and would you wish me to steal, then?

PYE.
No, faith, that were too much, to speak truth:  why, woult
thou nim it from him?

NICHOLAS.
That I will!

PYE.
Why, ynough, bully; he shall be content with that, or he
shall ha none; let me alone with him now!  Captain, I ha
dealt with your Kins-man in a Corner; a good, kind-natured
fellow, me thinks:  go to, you shall not have all your own
asking, you shall bate somewhat on't: he is not contented
absolutely, as you would say, to steal the chain from him,--
but to do you a pleasure, he will nim it from him.

NICHOLAS.
Aye, that I will, Cousin.

CAPTAIN.
Well, seeing he will do no more, as far as I see, I must be
contented with that.

CORPORAL.
Here's no notable gullery!

PYE.
Nay, I'll come nearer to you, Gentleman:  because we'll have
only but a help and a mirth on't, the knight shall not lose
his chain neither, but it shall be only laid out of the way
some one or two days.

NICHOLAS.
Aye, that would be good indeed, Kinsman.

PYE.
For I have a farder reach to profit us better by the missing
on't only, than if we had it out-right, as my discourse shall
make it known to you.--When thou hast the chain, do but
convey it out at back-door into the Garden, and there hang it
close in the Rosemary bank but for a small season; and by that
harmless device, I know how to wind Captain Idle out of prison:
the Knight thy Master shall get his pardon and release him,
and he satisfy thy Master with his own chain, and wondrous
thanks on both hands.

NICHOLAS.
That were rare indeed, la:  pray, let me know how.

PYE.
Nay, tis very necessary thou shouldst know, because thou
must be employed as an Actor.

NICHOLAS.
An Actor?  O no, that's a Player; and our Parson rails again
Players mightily, I can tell you, because they brought him
drunk up'oth Stage once,--as he will be horribly drunk.

CORPORAL.
Mass, I cannot blame him then, poor Church-spout.

PYE.
Why, as an Intermedler, then?

NICHOLAS.
Aye, that, that.

PYE.
Give me Audience, then: when the old Knight thy Master has
raged his fill for the loss of the chain, tell him thou hast
a Kinsman in prison, of such exquisite Art, that the devil
himself is French Lackey to him, and runs bare-headed by his
horse-belly (when he has one) whom he will cause with most
Irish Dexterity to fetch his chain, tho twere hid under a
mine of sea-coal, and ne'er make Spade or Pickaxe his
instruments: tell him but this, with farder instructions thou
shalt receive from me, and thou shoust thy self a Kinsman
indeed.

CORPORAL.
A dainty Bully.

SKIRMISH.
An honest Book-keeper.

CAPTAIN.
And my three times thrice honey Cousin.

NICHOLAS.
Nay, grace of God, I'll rob him on't suddenly, and hang it in
the Rosemary bank; but I bear that mind, Cousin, I would not
steal any thing, me thinks, for mine own Father.

SKIRMISH.
He bears a good mind in that, Captain!

PYE.
Why, well said; he begins to be an honest felow, faith.

CORPORAL.
In troth, he does.

NICHOLAS.
You see, Cousin, I am willing to do you any kindness, always
saving my self harmless.

[Exit Nicholas.]

CAPTAIN.
Why, I thank thee; fare thee well, I shall requite it.

CORPORAL.
Twill be good for thee, Captain, that thou has such an
egregious Ass to thy Cousin.

CAPTAIN.
Aye, is he not a fine fool, Corporal?  But, George, thou
talkst of Art and Conjuring; How shall that be?

PYE.
Puh, be't not in your care:
Leave that to me and my directions.
Well, Captain, doubt not thy delivery now,
E'en with the vantage, man, to gain by prison,
As my thoughts prompt me: hold on, brain and plot!
I aim at many cunning far events,
All which I doubt not but to hit at length.
I'll to the Widdow with a quaint assault.
Captain, be merry.

CAPTAIN.
Who, I?  Kerrie, merry, Buff-Jerkin.

PYE.
Oh, I am happy in more slights, and one will knit strong in
another.--Corporal Oath.

CORPORAL.
Hoh, Bully?

PYE.
And thou, old Peter Skirmish; I have a necessary task for you
Both.

SKIRMISH.
Lay't upon, George Pye-board.

CORPORAL.
What ere it be, we'll manage it.

PYE.
I would have you two maintain a quarrel before the Lady Widdow's
door, and draw your swords i'th edge of the Evening; clash a
little, clash, clash.

CORPORAL.
Fuh!
Let us alone to make our Blades ring noon,
Tho it be after Supper.

PYE.
I know you can.  And out of that false fire, I doubt not but to
raise strange belief--And, Captain, to countenance my device
the better, and grace my words to the Widdow, I have a good
plain Satin suit, that I had of a young Reveller t'other night:
for words pass not regarded now a days, unless they come from
a good suit of clothes, which the Fates and my wits have
bestowed upon me.  Well, Captain Idle, if I did not highly
love thee, I would ne'er be seen within twelve score of a
prison, for I protest at this instant, I walk in great danger
of small debts; I owe money to several Hostesses, and you know
such Jills will quickly be upon a man's Jack.

CAPTAIN.
True, George.

PYE.
Fare thee well, Captain.  Come, Corporal and Ancient! thou
Shalt hear more news next time we greet thee.

CORPORAL.
More news!  Aye, by yon Bear at Bridge-Foot in heaven shalt
thou.

[Exeunt Pye-board, Skirmish, and Oath.]

CAPTAIN.
Enough:  my friends, farewell.
This prison shows as if Ghosts did part in Hell.


ACT II.

SCENE I.  A room in the widow's house.

[Enter Moll youngest Daughter to the Widdow: alone.]

MOLL.
Not Marry? forswear Marriage? why, all women know 'tis as
honorable a thing as to lie with a man; and I to spite my
Sisters vow the more, have entertained a suitor already,
a fine gallant Knight of the last Feather:  he says he will
Coach me too, and well appoint me, allow me money to Dice
with-all, and many such pleasing protestations he sticks
upon my lips; indeed, his short-winded Father ith' Country
is wondrous wealthy, a most abominable Farmer, and therefore
he may doote in time:  troth, I'll venture upon him.  Women
are not without ways enow to help them-selves:  if he prove
wise and good as his word, why, I shall love him, and use
him kindly:  and if he prove an Ass, why, in a quarter of
an hour's warning I can transform him into an Ox;--there
comes in my Relief again.

[Enter Frailty.]

FRAILTY.
O, Mistress Moll, Mistress Moll.

MOLL.
How now? what's the news?

FRAILTY.
The Knight your suitor, sir John Penny-Dub--

MOLL.
Sir John Penny-Dub? where? where?

FRAILTY.
He's walking in the Gallery.

MOLL.
Has my Mother seen him yet?

FRAILTY.
O no, she's--spitting in the Kitchen.

MOLL.
Direct him hither softly, good Frailty,--
I'll meet him half way.

FRAILTY.
That's just like running a Tilt; but I hope he'll break
nothing this time.

[Exit.]

[Enter Sir John Penny-Dub.]

MOLL.
'Tis happiness my Mother saw him not:
O welcome, good Sir John.

PENNY-DUB.
I thank you, faith.--Nay, you must stand me, till I kiss
you:  'tis the fashion every where, I-faith, and I came
from Court enow.

MOLL.
Nay, the Fates forfend that I should anger the fashion!

PENNY-DUB.
Then, not forgetting the sweet of new ceremonies, I first
fall back, then recovering my self, make my honour to your
lip thus:  and then accost it.

MOLL.
Trust me, very pretty, and moving; y'are worthy on't, sir.

[Kissing:  Enter Widdow and Sir Godfrey.]

O, my Mother, my Mother! now she's here, we'll steal into
the Gallery.

[Exeunt.]

SIR GODFREY.
Nay, Sister, let Reason rule you, do not play the fool;
stand not in your own light.  You have wealthy offers, large
tendrings; do not with-stand your good fortune:  who comes a
wooing to you, I pray? no small fool; a rich Knight ath City,
Sir Oliver Muck-Hill--no small fool I can tell you:  and
Furthermore, as I heard late by your Maid-servants, (as your
Maid-servants will say to me any thing, I thank 'em) both your
Daughters are not without Suitors, aye, and worthy ones too!
one a Brisk Courtier, Sir Andrew Tip-Staff, suitor a far off
to your eldest Daughter, and the third a huge-wealthy Farmer's
son, a fine young Country Knight, they call him Sir John
Penny-Dub:  a good name, marry; he may have it coined when
he lacks money.  What blessings are these, Sister!

WIDDOW.
Tempt me not, Satan.

SIR GODFREY.
Satan? do I look like Satan?  I hope the Devil's not so old
as I, I tro.

WIDDOW.
You wound my senses, Brother, when you name
A suitor to me:--oh, I cannot abide it,
I take in poison, when I hear one nam'd.

[Enter Simon.]

How now, Simon? where's my son Edmund?

SIMON.
Verily Madame, he is at vain Exercise, dripping in the
Tennis-court.

WIDDOW.
At Tennis-court? oh, now his father's gone, I shall have no
rule with him; oh, wicked Edmond, I might well compare this
with the Prophecy in the Chronicle, tho far inferior:  as
Harry of Monmouth won all, and Harry of Windsor lost all;
so Edmund of Bristow, that was the Father, got all, and
Edmond of London, that's his son now, will spend all.

SIR GODFREY.
Peace, Sister, we'll have him reformed, there's hope on him
yet, tho it be but a little.

[Enter Frailty.]

FRAILTY.
Forsooth, Madam, there are two or three Archers at door
would very gladly speak with your Ladyship.

WIDDOW.
Archers?

SIR GODFREY.
Your husband's Fletcher, I warrant.

WIDDOW.
Oh!
Let them come near, they bring home things of his.
Troth, I should ha forgot 'em.  How now, Villain?
Which be those Archers?

[Enter the suitors Sir Andrew Tip-staff, Sir Oliver Muck-hill,
and Penny-dub.]

FRAILTY.
Why, do you not see 'em before you? are not these Archers?
what do you call 'em?  Shooters:  Shooters and Archers are
all one, I hope.

WIDDOW.
Out, ignorant slave.

MUCK-HILL.
Nay, pray be patient, Lady,
We come in way of honorable love.

TIP-STAFF.
We do.

PENNY-DUB.
We do.

MUCK-HILL.
To you.

TIP-STAFF.
And to your Daughters.

PENNY-DUB.
And to your Daughters.

WIDDOW.
O, why will you offer me this Gentlemen? indeed I will not
look upon you--when the Tears are scarce out of mine Eyes,
not yet washt off from my Cheeks, and my deer husband's body
scarce so cold as the Coffin, what reason have you to offer
it?  I am not like some of your Widdows that will bury one
in the Evening, and be sure to another ere morning.  Pray,
away; pray, take your answers, good Knights, and you be sweet
Knights.  I have vow'd never to marry;--and so have my
daughters too!

PENNY-DUB.
Aye, two of you have, but the third's a good wench!

MUCK-HILL.
Lady, a shrewd answer, marry; the best is, tis but the first,
and he's a blunt wooer, that will leave for one sharp answer.

TIP-STAFF.
Where be your daughters, Lady?  I hope they'll give us better
encouragements.

WIDDOW.
Indeed, they'll answer you so; tak't a my word, they'll give
you the very same answer Verbatim, truly la.

PENNY-DUB.
Mum:  Moll's a good wench still, I know what she'll do.

MUCK-HILL.
Well, Lady, for this time we'll take our leaves, hoping for
better comfort.

WIDDOW.
O never, never! and I live these thousand years! and you be
good Knights, do not hope; twill be all Vain, Vain,--look
you, put off all your suits, and you come to me again.

[Exeunt Sir John and Sir Andrew.]

FRAILTY.
Put off all their suits, quatha?  Aye, that's the best
wooing of a Widdow, indeed, when a man's Nonsuited; that is,
when he's a bed with her.

[Going out, Muck-hill and Sir Godfrey.]

MUCK-HILL.
Sir Godfrey, here's twenty Angels more: work hard for me;
there's life int yet.

[Exit Muck-hill.]

SIR GODFREY.
Fear not, Sir Oliver Muck-hill, I'll stick close for you;
leave all with me.

[Enter George Pye-board, the scholar.]

PYE.
By your leave, Lady Widdow.

WIDDOW.
What, another suitor now?

PYE.
A suitor! no, I protest, Lady, if you'd give me your self,
I'd not be troubled with you.

WIDDOW.
Say you so, Sir? then you're the better welcome, sir.

PYE.
Nay, Heaven bless me from a Widdow, unless I were sure to
bury her speedily!

WIDDOW.
Good bluntness:  well, your business, sir?

PYE.
Very needful; if you were in private once.

WIDDOW.
Needful? brother, pray leave us; and you, sir.

FRAILTY.
I should laugh now, if this blunt fellow should put 'em all
by side the stirrup, and vault into the saddle himself.  I
have seen as mad a trick.

[Exit Frailty.]

[Enter Daughters.]

WIDDOW.
Now Sir?--here's none but we--Daughters, forbear.

PYE.
O no, pray, let 'em stay, for what I have to speak importeth
equally to them as to you.

WIDDOW.
Then you may stay.

PYE.
I pray bestow on me a serious ear,
For what I speak is full of weight and fear.

WIDDOW.
Fear?

PYE.
Aye, ift pass unregarded, and uneffected; Else peace and
joy:--I pray, Attention.  Widdow, I have been a mere
stranger for these parts that you live in, nor did I ever
know the Husband of you, and Father of them, but I truly
know by certain spiritual Intelligence, that he is in
Purgatory.

WIDDOW.
Purgatory? tuh; that word deserves to be spit upon.  I
wonder that a man of sober tongue, as you seem to be, should
have the folly to believe there's such a place.

PYE.
Well, Lady, in cold blood I speak it; I assure you that
there is a Purgatory, in which place I know your husband to
reside, and wherein he is like to remain, till the dissolution
of the world, till the last general Bon-fire, when all the
earth shall melt into nothing and the Seas scald their finny
labourers; so long is his abidance, unless you alter the
property of your purpose, together with each of your Daughters
theirs; that is, the purpose of single life in your self and
your eldest Daughter, and the speedy determination of marriage
in your youngest.

MOLL.
How knows he that? what, has some Devil told him?

WIDDOW.
Strange he should know our thoughts:--Why, but, Daughter, have
you purposed speedy Marriage?

PYE.
You see she tells you aye, for she says nothing.  Nay, give me
credit as you please.  I am a stranger to you, and yet you see I
know your determinations, which must come to me Metaphysically,
and by a super-natural intelligence.

WIDDOW.
This puts Amazement on me.

FRANCES.
Know our secrets!

MOLL.
I'd thought to steal a marriage: would his tongue
Had dropt out when be blabbed it!

WIDDOW.
But, sir, my husband was too honest a dealing man to be now
in any purgatories--

PYE.
O, Do not load your conscience with untruths;
Tis but mere folly now to gild him o'er,
That has past but for Copper.  Praises here
Cannot unbind him there:  confess but truth.
I know he got his wealth with a hard grip:
Oh hardly, hardly.

WIDDOW.
This is most strange of all:  how knows he that?

PYE.
He would eat fools and ignorant heirs clean up;
And had his drink from many a poor man's brow,
E'en as their labour brewed it.
He would scrape riches to him most unjustly;
The very dirt between his nails was Ill-got,
And not his own,--oh, I groan to speak on't,
The thought makes me shudder--shudder!

WIDDOW.
It quakes me too, now I think on't.--Sir, I am much grieved,
that you, a stranger, should so deeply wrong my dead husband!

PYE.
Oh!

WIDDOW.
A man that would keep Church so duly; rise early, before his
servants, and e'en for Religious hast, go ungartered,
unbuttoned, nay, sir Reverence, untrust, to Morning Prayer.

PYE.
Oh, uff.

WIDDOW.
Dine quickly upon high-days, and when I had great guests,
would e'en shame me and rise from the Table, to get a good
seat at an after-noon Sermon.

PYE.
There's the devil, there's the devil! true, he thought it
Sactity enough, if he had killed a man, so tad been done in
a Pew, or undone his Neighbour, so ta'd been near enough to
th' Preacher.  Oh,--a Sermon's a fine short cloak of an hour
long, and will hide the upper-part of a dissembler.--Church!
Aye, he seemed all Church, and his conscience was as hard as
the Pulpit!

WIDDOW.
I can no more endure this.

PYE.
Nor I, widdow, endure to flatter.

WIDDOW.
Is this all your business with me?

PYE.
No, Lady, tis but the induction too'te.  You may believe my
strains, I strike all true, And if your conscience would leap
up to your tongue, your self would affirm it:  and that you
shall perceive I know of things to come as well as I do of
what is present, a Brother of your husband's shall shortly
have a loss.

WIDDOW.
A loss; marry, heaven for-fend!  Sir Godfrey, my brother?

PYE.
Nay, keep in your wonders, will I have told you the fortunes
of you all; which are more fearful, if not happily prevented:
--for your part and your daughters, if there be not once this
day some blood-shed before your door, whereof the human
creature dies, two of you--the elder--shall run mad.

MOTHER AND FRANCES.
Oh!

MOLL.
That's not I yet!

PYE.
And with most impudent prostitution show your naked bodies
to the view of all beholders.

WIDDOW.
Our naked bodies? fie, for shame!

PYE.
Attend me: and your younger daughter be strocken dumb.

MOLL.
Dumb? out, alas:  tis the worst pain of all for a Woman.  I'd
rather be mad, or run naked, or any thing:  dumb?

PYE.
Give ear:  ere the evening fall upon Hill, Bog, and Meadow,
this my speech shall have past probation, and then shall I be
believed accordingly.

WIDDOW.
If this be true, we are all shamed, all undone.

MOLL.
Dumb?  I'll speak as much as ever I can possible before
evening!

PYE.
But if it so come to pass (as for your fair sakes I wish it
may) that this presage of your strange fortunes be prevented
by that accident of death and blood-shedding which I before
told you of:  take heed upon your lives that two of you, which
have vow'd never to marry, seek you out husbands with all
present speed, and you, the third, that have such a desire to
out-strip chastity, look you meddle not with a husband.

MOLL.
A double torment.

PYE.
The breach of this keeps your father in Purgatory, and the
punishments that shall follow you in this world would with
horror kill the Ear should hear 'em related.

WIDDOW.
Marry? why I vowed never to marry.

FRANCES.
And so did I.

MOLL.
And I vowed never to be such an Ass, but to marry:  what a
cross Fortune's this!

PYE.
Ladies, tho I be a Fortune-teller, I cannot better Fortunes;
you have 'em from me as they are revealed to me: I would they
were to your tempers, and fellows with your bloods, that's
all the bitterness I would you.

WIDDOW.
Oh, 'tis a just vengeance for my husband's hard purchases.

PYE.
I wish you to be-think your selves, and leave 'em.

WIDDOW.
I'll to Sir Godfrey, my Brother, and acquaint him with these
fearful presages.

FRANCES.
For, Mother, they portend losses to him.

WIDDOW.
Oh, aye, they do, they do.
If any happy issue crown thy words,
I will reward thy cunning.

PYE.
'Tis enough Lady; I wish no higher.

[Exit Widdow and Frances.]

MOLL.
Dumb! and not marry, worse!
Neither to speak, nor kiss, a double curse.

[Exit.]

PYE.
So all this comes well about yet.  I play the Fortune-teller
as well as if I had had a Witch to my Grannam:  for by good
happiness, being in my Hostesses' Garden, which neighbours
the Orchard o the Widdow, I laid the hole of mine ear to a
hole in the wall, and heard 'em make these vows, and speak
those words upon which I wrought these advantages; and to
encourage my forgery the more, I may now perceive in 'em a
natural simplicity which will easily swallow an abuse, if
any covering be over it:  and to confirm my former presage
to the Widdow, I have advised old Peter Skirmish, the Soldier,
to hurt Corporal Oath upon the Leg; and in that hurry I'll
rush amongst 'em, and in stead of giving the Corporal some
Cordial to comfort him, I'll power into his mouth a potion
of a sleepy Nature, to make him seem as dead; for the which
the old soldier being apprehended, and ready to be born to
execution, I'll step in, and take upon me the cure of the
dead man, upon pain of dying the condemned's death:  the
Corporal will wake at his minute, when the sleepy force has
wrought it self, and so shall I get my self into a most
admired opinion, and under the pretext of that cunning,
beguile as I see occasion:  and if that foolish Nicholas
Saint Tantlings keep true time with the chain, my plot will
be sound, the Captain delivered, and my wits applauded among
scholars and soldiers for ever.

[Exit Pye-board.]


SCENE II.  A Garden.

[Enter Nicholas Saint Tantlings with the chain.]

NICHOLAS.
Oh, I have found an excellent advantage to take away the
chain:  my Master put it off e'en now to say on a new
Doublet, and I sneak't it away by little and little most
Puritanically.  We shall have good sport anon when ha's
missed it about my Cousin the Conjurer.  The world shall
see I'm an honest man of my word, for now I'm going to hang
it between Heaven and Earth among the Rosemary branches.

[Exit Nicholas.]


ACTUS 3.


SCENE I.  The street before the Widow's house.

[Enter Simon Saint Mary-Ovaries and Frailty.]


FRAILTY.
Sirrah Simon Saint Mary-Ovaries, my Mistress sends away all
her suitors and puts fleas in their ears.

SIMON.
Frailty, she does like an honest, chaste, and virtuous woman;
for widdows ought not to wallow in the puddle of iniquity.

FRAILTY.
Yet, Simon, many widdows will do't, what so comes on't.

SIMON.
True, Frailty, their filthy flesh desires a Conjunction
Copulative.  What strangers are within, Frailty?

FRAILTY.
There's none, Simon, but Master Pilfer the Tailor:  he's
above with Sir Godfrey praising of a Doublet:  and I must
trudge anon to fetch Master Suds, the Barber.

SIMON.
Master Suds,--a good man; he washes the sins of the Beard
clean.

[Enter old Skirmish the soldier.]

SKIRMISH.
How now, creatures? what's a clock?

FRAILTY.
Why, do you take us to be Jack ath' Clock-house?

SKIRMISH.
I say again to you what's a clock.

SIMON.
Truly la, we go by the clock our conscience:  all worldly
Clocks, we know, go false, and are set by drunken Sextons.

SKIRMISH.
Then what's a clock in your conscience?--oh, I must break
off, here comes the corporal--hum, hum!--what's a clock?

[Enter Corporal.]

CORPORAL.
A clock? why, past seventeen.

FRAILTY.
Past seventeen? nay, ha's met with his match now, Corporal
Oath will fit him.

SKIRMISH.
Thou doost not bawk or baffle me, doost thou?  I am a
Soldier--past seventeen!

CORPORAL.
Aye, thou art not angry with the figures, art thou?  I will
prove it unto thee:  12. and 1. is thirteen, I hope, 2.
fourteen, 3. fifteen, 4. sixteen, and 5. Seventeen; then past
seventeen:  I will take the Dials part in a just cause.

SKIRMISH.
I say 'tis but past five, then.

CORPORAL.
I'll swear 'tis past seventeen, then:  doost thou not know
numbers? Canst thou not cast?

SKIRMISH.
Cast? dost thou speak of my casting ith' street?

CORPORAL.
Aye, and in the Market place.

SIMON.
Clubs, clubs, clubs!

[Simon runs in.]

FRAILTY.
Aye, I knew by their shuffling, Clubs would be Trump; mass,
here's the Knave, and he can do any good upon 'em:  Clubs,
clubs, clubs.

[Enter Pye-board.]

CORPORAL.
O villain, thou hast opened a vein in my leg.

PYE.
How no! for shame, for shame; put up, put up.

CORPORAL.
By yon blue Welkin, 'twas out of my part, George, to be hurt
on the leg.

[Enter Officers.]

PYE.
Oh peace now--I have a Cordial here to comfort thee.

OFFICER.
Down with 'em, down with em; lay hands upon the villain.

SKIRMISH.
Lay hands on me?

PYE.
I'll not be seen among em now.

[Exit Pye-board.]

CORPORAL.
I'm hurt, and had more need have Surgeons
Lay hands upon me then rough Officers.

OFFICER.
Go, carry him to be dressed then.

[Exeunt some of the Sheriff's Officers with Corporal Oath.]

This mutinous Soldier shall along with me to prison.

SKIRMISH.
To prison? where's George?

OFFICER.
Away with him.

[Exeunt with Skirmish.]

[Re-enter Pye-board.]

PYE.
So.
All lights as I would wish.  The amazed widdow
Will plant me strongly now in her belief,
And wonder at the virtue of my words:
For the event turns those presages from em
Of being mad and dumb, and begets joy
Mingled with admiration.  These empty creatures,
Soldier and Corporal, were but ordained
As instruments for me to work upon.
Now to my patient; here's his potion.

[Exit Pye-board.]


SCENE II.  An apartment in the Widow's house.]


[Enter the Widdow with her two Daughters.]

WIDDOW.
O wondrous happiness, beyond our thoughts:
O lucky fair event!  I think our fortunes,
Were blest e'en in our Cradles:  we are quitted
Of all those shameful violent presages
By this rash bleeding chance.  Go, Frailty, run, and know,
Whether he be yet living, or yet dead,
That here before my door received his hurt.

FRAILTY.
Madam, he was carried to the superiour, but if he had no
money when he came there, I warrant he's dead by this time.

[Exit Frailty.]

FRANCES.
Sure, that man is a rare fortune-teller; never looked upon
our hands, nor upon any mark about us:  a wondrous fellow,
surely.

MOLL.
I am glad, I have the use of my tongue yet:  tho of nothing
else.  I shall find the way to marry too, I hope, shortly.

WIDDOW.
O where's my Brother, Sir Godfrey?  I would he were here,
that I might relate to him how prophetically the cunning
Gentleman spoke in all things.

[Enter Sir Godfrey in a rage.]

SIR GODFREY.
O my Chain, my Chain!  I have lost my Chain.  Where be these
Villains, Varlets?

WIDDOW.
Oh! has lost his Chain.

SIR GODFREY.
My Chain, my chain!

WIDDOW.
Brother, be patient, hear me speak:  you know I told you
that a cunning man told me that you should have a loss, and
he has prophecied so true.

SIR GODFREY.
Out, he's a villain, to prophecy of the loss of my chain:
twas worth above three hundred Crowns,--besides, twas my
Fathers, my fathers fathers, my Grand-fathers huge grant-
fathers.  I had as lieve ha lost my Neck, as the chain that
hung about it.  O, my chain, my chain!

WIDDOW.
Oh, brother, who can be against a misfortune! tis happy twas
no more.

SIR GODFREY.
No, more!  O goodly godly sister, would you had me lost more?
my best gown, too, with the cloth of gold-lace? my holiday
Gascoines, and my Jerkin set with pearl? No more!

WIDDOW.
Oh, Brother! you can read--

SIR GODFREY.
But I cannot read where my chain is.--What strangers have
been here? you let in strangers, Thieves, and Catch-poles;
how comes it gone? there was none above with me but my Tailor;
and my Tailor will not--steal, I hope?

MOLL.
No, he's afraid of a chain!

[Enter Frailty.]

WIDDOW.
How now, sirrah? the news?

FRAILTY.
O Mistress, he may well be called a Corporal now, for his
corps are as dead as a cole Capons.

WIDDOW.
More happiness.

SIR GODFREY.
Sirrah, what's this to my chain? where's my chain, knave?

FRAILTY.
Your chain, sir?

SIR GODFREY.
My chain is lost, villain.

FRAILTY.
I would he were hang'd in chains that has it then for me.
Alas, sir, I saw none of your chain, since you were hung
with it your self.

SIR GODFREY.
Out, varlet! it had full three thousand Links.
I have oft told it over at my prayers:
Over and over, full three thousand Links.

FRAILTY.
Had it so, sir:  sure, it cannot be lost then; I'll put you
in that comfort.

SIR GODFREY.
Why, why?

FRAILTY.
Why, if your chain had so many Links, it cannot choose but
come to light.

[Enter Nicholas.]

SIR GODFREY.
Delusion! now, long Nicholas, where's my chain?

NICHOLAS.
Why, about your Neck, ist not, sir?

SIR GODFREY.
About my neck, Varlet!  My chain is lost.
Tis stole away, I'm robbed.

WIDDOW.
Nay, Brother, show your self a man.

NICHOLAS.
Aye, if it be lost or stole, if he would be patient, Mistress,
I could bring him to a Cunning Kinsman of mine that would
fetcht again with a Sesarara.

SIR GODFREY.
Canst thou? I will be patient: say, where dwells he?

NICHOLAS.
Marry, he dwells now, Sir, where he would not dwell, and he
could choose:  in the Marshalsea, sir; but he's a exlent
fellow if he were out; has traveled all the world o'er, he,
and been in the seven and twenty Provinces; why, he would
make it be fetcht, Sir, if twere rid a thousand mile out of
town.

SIR GODFREY.
An admirable fellow: what lies he for?

NICHOLAS.
Why, he did but rob a Steward of ten groats tother Night, as
any man would ha done, and there he lies fort.

SIR GODFREY.
I'll make his peace:  a Trifle!  I'll get his pardon,
Beside a bountiful reward.  I'll about it.
But see the Clerks, the Justice will do much.
I will about it straight:  good sister, pardon me.
All will be well, I hope, and turn to good,
The name of Conjurer has laid my blood.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE III.  A street.

[Enter two servants with Yeoman Dogson to arrest the Scholar,
George Pye-board.]


PUT.
His Hostess where he lies will trust him no longer: she
has feed me to arrest him; and if you will accompany me,
because I know not of what Nature the Scholar is, whether
desperate or swift, you shall share with me, Servant Raven-
shaw.  I have the good Angell to arrest him.

RAVEN.
Troth, I'll take part with thee, then, Sergeant, not for the
sake of the money so much, as for the hate I bear to a
Scholar:  why, Sergeant, tis Natural in us, you know, to
hate Scholars, natural:  besides, the will publish our
imperfections, Knaveries, and Convayances upon Scaffolds
and Stages.

PUT.
Aye, and spitefully, too; troth, I have wondered how the
slaves could see into our breasts so much, when our doublets
are buttoned with Pewter.

RAVEN.
Aye, and so close without yielding; oh, they're parlous
fellows, they will search more with their wits than a
Constable with all his officers.

PUT.
Whist, whist, whist!  Yeoman Dogson Yeoman Dogson.

DOGSON.
Ha, what says Sergeant?

PUT.
Is he in the Pothecaries shop still?

DOGSON.
Aye, aye.

PUT.
Have an eye, have an eye.

RAVEN.
The best is, Sergeant, if he be a true Scholar, he wears no
weapon, I think.

PUT.
No, no, he wears no weapon.

RAVEN.
Mass, I am right glad of that:  'tas put me in better heart.
Nay, if I clutch him once, let me alone to drag him if he be
stiff-necked.  I have been one of the six my self, that has
dragged as tall men of their hands, when their weapons have
been gone, as ever bastinadoed a Sergeant--I have done, I can
tell you.

DOGSON.
Sergeant Puttock, Sergeant Puttock.

PUT.
Hoh.

DOGSON.
He's coming out single.

PUT.
Peace, peace, be not too greedy; let him play a little, let
him play a litle:  we'll jerk him up of a sudden.  I ha
fished in my time.

RAVEN.
Aye, and caught many a fool, Sergeant.

[Enter Pye-board.]

PYE.
I parted now from Nicholas: the chain's couched,
And the old Knight has spent his rage upont;
The widdow holds me in great Admiration
For cunning Art:  mongst joys I am 'een lost,
For my device can no way now be crossed.
And now I must to prison to the captain,
And there--

PUT.
I arrest you, sir.

PYE.
Oh--I spoke truer then I was a ware, I must to prison
indeed.

PUT.
They say you're a scholar:  nay, sir--Yeoman Dogson, have
care to his arms--you'll rail again Sergeants, and stage
'em! you tickle their vices!

PYE.
Nay, use me like a Gentleman, I'm little less.

PUT.
You a Gentleman? That's a good Jest, ifaith; can a Scholar
be a Gentleman,--when a Gentleman will not be a Scholar?
look upon your wealthy Citizen's sons, whether they be
Scholars or no, that are Gentlemen by their father's trades:
a Scholar a Gentleman!

PYE.
Nay, let Fortune drive all her stings into me, she cannot
hurt that in me:  a Gentleman is Accidens Inseperable to my
blood.

RAVEN.
A rablement, nay, you shall have a bloody rablement upon you,
I warrant you.

PUT.
Go, Yeoman Dogson, before, and Enter the Action 'ith Counter.

PYE.
Pray do not hand me Cruelly, I'll go,

[Exit Dogson.]

Whether you please to have me.

PUT.
Oh, he's tame; let him loose, sergeant.

PYE.
Pray, at whose suit is this?

PUT.
Why at your Hostesses suit where you lie, Mistress Cunnyburrow,
for bed and board, the sum four pound five shillings and five
pence.

PYE.
I know the sum too true, yet I presumed
Upon a farder day; well, tis my stars
And I must bear it now, tho never harder.
I swear now, my device is crossed indeed.
Captain must lie bite: this is Deceit's seed.

PUT.
Come, come away.

PYE.
Pray, give me so much time as to knit my garter, and I'll
a way with you.

PUT.
Well, we must be paid for this waiting upon you, this is no
pains to attend thus.

[Pye-board making to tie his garter.]

PYE.
I am now wretched and miserable.  I shall ne'er recover
of this disease: hot Iron gnaw their fists! they have struck
a Fever into my shoulder, which I shall ne'er shake out
again, I fear me, till with a true Habeas Corpus the Sexton
remove me.  Oh, if I take prison once, I shall be pressed
to death with Actions, but not so happy as speedily; perhaps
I may be forty year a pressing, till I be a thin old man;
That, looking through the grates, men may look through me.
All my means is confounded: what shall I do? has my wits
served me so long, and now give me the slip (like a Trained
servant) when I have most need of 'em? no device to keep my
poor carcass fro these Puttocks?--yes, happiness! have I
a paper about me now? yes, too!  I'll try it, it may hit:
Extremity is Touch-stone unto wit.  Aye, aye.

PUT.
Sfoot, how many yards are in thy Garters, that thou art so
long a tying on them? come away, sir.

PYE.
Troth, Sergeant, I protest, you could never ha took me at
a worse time; for now at this instant I have no lawful
picture about me.

PUT.
Slid, how shall we come by our fees then?

RAVEN.
We must have fees, Sirra.

PYE.
I could ha wisht, ifaith, that you had took me half an hour
hence for your own sake; for I protest, if you had not crossed
me, I was going in great joy to receive five pound of a
Gentleman, for the Device of a Mask here, drawn in this paper.
But now, come, I must be contented:  tis but so much lost, and
answerable to the rest of my fortunes.

PUT.
Why, how far hence dwells that Gentleman?

RAVEN.
Aye, well said, sergeant, tis good to cast about for money.

PUT.
Speak; if it be not far--

PYE.
We are but a little past it, the next street behind us.

PUT.
Slid, w have waited upon you grievously already:  if you'll
say you'll be liberal when you hate, give us double fees,
and spend upon's, why we'll show you that kindness, and go
along with you to the Gentleman.

RAVEN.
Aye, well said still, sergeant, urge that.

PYE.
Troth, if it will suffice, it shall be all among you; for
my part I'll not pocket a penny:  my hostess shall have her
four pound five shillings, and bate me the five pence, and
the other fifteen shillings I'll spend upon you.

RAVEN.
Why, now thou art a good Scholar.

PUT.
An excellent Scholar, ifaith; has proceeded very well alate;
come, we'll along with you.

[Exeunt with him: passing in they knock at the door with a
Knocker withinside.]


SCENE IV.  A gallery in a gentleman's house.

[Enter a servant.]

SERVANT.
Who knocks? who's at door? we had need of a Porter.

PYE.
A few friends here:--pray, is the Gentleman your master within?

SERVANT.
Yes, is your business to him?

PYE.
Aye, he knows it, when he see's me:  I pray you, have you
forgot me?

SERVANT.
Aye, by my troth, sir.  Pray come near; I'll in and tell him
of you:  please you to walk here in the Gallery till he comes.

PYE.
We will attend his worship.--Worship, I think, for so much
the Posts at his door should signify, and the fair coming
in, and the wicket; else I neither knew him nor his worship,
but 'tis happiness he is within doors, what so ere he be;
if he be not too much a formal Citizen, he may do me good.--
Sergeant and Yeoman, how do you like this house? ist not
most wholesomely plotted?

RAVEN.
Troth, prisoner, an exceeding fine house.

PYE.
Yet I wonder how he should forget me,--for he ne'er knew
me.--No matter, what is forgot in you will be remembered
in your Master.  A pretty comfortable room this, me thinks:
You have no such rooms in prison now?

PUT.
Oh, dog-holes toote.

PYE.
Dog-holes, indeed.  I can tell you, I have great hope to
have my Chamber here shortly, nay, and diet too, for he's
the most free-heartedst Gentleman where he takes:  you would
little think it! and what a fine Gallery were here for me to
walk and study, and make verses.

PUT.
O, it stands very pleasantly for a Scholar.

[Enter Gentleman.]

PYE.
Look what maps, and pictures, and devices, and things:
neatly, delicately--mass, here he comes:  he should be a
Gentleman; I like his Beard well.--All happiness to your
worship.

GENTLEMAN.
You're kindly welcome, sir.

PUT.
A simple salutation.

RAVEN.
Mass, it seems the Gentleman makes great account of him.

PYE.
I have the thing here for you, sir.  I beseech you conceal
me, sir, I'm undone else,--I have the Mask here for you,
sir, Look you, sir.--I beseech your worship first to pardon
my rudeness, for my extremes makes me bolder than I would
be.  I am a poor Gentleman and a Scholar, and now most
unfortunately fallen into the Fangs of unmerciful officers,
arrested for debt, which tho small, I am not able to
compass, by reason I'm destitute of lands, money, and
friends; so that if I fall into the hungry swallow of the
prison, I am like utterly to perish, and with fees and
extortions be pincht clean to the bone.  Now, if ever pity
had interest in the blood of a Gentleman, I beseech you
vouchsafe but to favour that means of my escape, which I
have already thought upon.

GENTLEMAN.
Go forward.

PUT.
I warrant he likes it rarely.

PYE.
In the plundge of my extremities, being giddy, and doubtful
what to do, at least it was put into my labouring thoughts,
to make happy use of this paper; and to blear their unlettered
eyes, I told them there was a Device for a Mask drawn int',
and that (but for their interception,) I was going to a
Gentleman to receive my reward for't: they, greedy at this
word, and hoping to make purchase of me, offered their
attendance, to go along with me.  My hap was to make bold
with your door, Sir, which my thoughts showed me the most
fairest and comfortablest entrance, and I hope I have
happened right upon understanding and pity: may it please
your good Worship, then, but to uphold my Device, which is
to let one of your men put me out at back-door, and I shall
be bound to your worship for ever.

GENTLEMAN.
By my troth, an excellent device.

PUT.
An excellent device, he says; he likes it wonderfully.

GENTLEMAN.
A my faith, I never heard a better.

RAVEN.
Hark, he swears he never heard a better, Sergeant.

PUT.
O, there's no talk on't, he's an excellent Scholar, and
especially for a Mask.

GENTLEMAN.
Give me your Paper, your Device; I was never better pleased
in all my life:  good wit, brave wit, finely wrought! come
in, sir, and receive your money, sir.

PYE.
I'll follow your good Worship.--
You heard how he liked it now?

PUT.
Puh, we know he could not choose but like it: go thy ways;
thou art a witty fine fellow, ifaith, thou shalt discourse
it to us at Tavern anon, wilt thou?

pye.
Aye, aye, that I will.  Look, Sergeants, here are Maps, and
pretty toys:  be doing in the mean time.  I shall quickly
have told out the money, you know.

PUT.
Go, go, little villain, fetch thy chinck.  I begin to love
thee; I'll be drunk to night in thy company.

PYE.
[Aside.]  This Gentleman I may well call a part
Of my salvation, in these earthly evils,
For he has saved me from three hungry Devils.

[Exit George.]

PUT.
Sirrah Sergeant, these Maps are pretty painted things, but
I could ne'er fancy 'em yet:  me thinks they're too busy,
and full of Circles and Conjurations; they say all the
world's in one of them, but I could ne'er find the Counter
in the Poultry.

RAVEN.
I think so:  how could you find it? for you know, it stands
behind the houses.

DOGSON.
Mass, that's true; then we must look ath' back-side fort.
Sfoot, here's nothing, all's bare.

RAVEN.
I warrant thee, that stands for the Counter, for you know
there's a company of bare fellows there.

PUT.
Faith, like enough, Sergeant; I never marked so much before.
Sirrah Sergeant, and Yeoman, I should love these Maps out
a cry now, if we could see men peep out of door in em: oh,
we might have em in a morning to our Break-fast so finely,
and ne'er knock our heels to the ground a whole day for em.

RAVEN.
Aye, marry, sir, I'd buy one then my self.  But this talk is
by the way:  where shall's sup to night?  Five pound
receiv'd! let's talk of that.  I have a trick worth all:
you two shall bear him to 'th Tavern, whilst I go close with
his Hostess, and work out of her.  I know she would be glad
of the sum to finger money, because she knows tis but a
desperate debt, and full of hazard.  What will you say, if
I bring it to pass that the Hostess shall be contented with
one half for all; and we to share tother fifty-shillings,
bullies?

PUT.
Why, I would call thee King of Sergeants, and thou shouldst
be Chronicled in the Counter book for ever.

RAVEN.
Well, put it to me, we'll make a Night on't, yfaith.

DOGSON.
Sfoot, I think he receives a more money, he stays so long.

PUT.
He tarries long, indeed:  may be, I can tell you, upon the
good liking ont the Gentleman may prove more bountiful.

RAVEN.
That would be rare; we'll search him.

PUT.
Nay, be sure of it, we'll search him! and make him light
enough.

[Enter the Gentleman.]

RAVEN.
Oh, here comes the Gentleman.  By your leave, sir.

GENTLEMAN.
God you god den, sirs,--would you speak with me?

PUT.
No, not with your worship, sir; only we are bold to stay for
a friend of ours that went in with your worship.

GENTLEMAN.
Who? not the scholar?

PUT.
Yes, e'en he, and it please your worship.

GENTLEMAN.
Did he make you stay for him? he did you wrong, then: why,
I can assure you he's gone above an hour ago.

RAVEN.
How, sir?

GENTLEMAN.
I paid him his money, and my man told me he went out at
back-door.

PUT.
Back-door?

GENTLEMAN.
Why, what's the matter?

PUT.
He was our prisoner, sir; we did arrest him.

GENTLEMAN.
What! he was not! you the Sheriff's Officers!  You were to
blame then.  Why did you no make known to me as much?  I
could have kept him for you:  I protest he received all of
me in Britain Gold of the last coining.

RAVEN.
Vengeance dog him with't!

PUT.
Sfott, has he guiled us so?

DOGSON.
Where shall we sup now Sergeant?

PUT.
Sup, Simon, now! eat Porridge for a month.  Well, we cannot
impute it to any lack of good-will in your Worship,--you did
but as another would have done: twas our hard fortunes to
miss the purchase, but if e'er we clutch him again, the
Counter shall charm him.

RAVEN.
The hole shall rot him.

DOGSON.
Amen

[Exeunt.]

GENTLEMAN.
So,
Vex out your Lungs without doors.  I am proud,
It was my hap to help him; it fell fit.
He went not empty neither for his wit.
Alas, poor wretch, I could not blame his brain
To labour his delivery, to be free
From their unpitying fangs--I'm glad it stood
Within my power to do a Scholar good.

[Exit.]


SCENE V.  A room in the Marshalsea prison.

[Enter in the Prison, meeting, George and Captain, George
coming in muffled.]

CAPTAIN.
How now, who's that? what are you?

PYE.
The same that I should be, Captain.

CAPTAIN.
George Pye-board, honest George? why camst thou in half
fac'd, muffled so?

PYE.
Oh, Captain, I thought we should ne'er ha laught again,
never spent frolick hour again.

CAPTAIN.
Why? why?

PYE.
I coming to prepare thee, and with news
As happy as thy quick delivery,
Was trac'd out by the sent, arrested, Captain.

CAPTAIN.
Arrested, George!

PYE.
Arrested:  gesse, gesse; how many Dogs do you think I'd
upon me?

CAPTAIN.
Dogs? I say? I know not.

PYE.
Almost as many as George Stone the Bear:
Three at once, three at once.

CAPTAIN.
How didst thou shake 'em off, then?

PYE.
The time is busy, and calls upon out wits.
Let it suffice,
Here I stand safe, and scapt by miracle.
Some other hour shall tell thee, when we'll steep
Our eyes in laughter.  Captain, my device
Leans to thy happiness, for ere the day
Be spent toth' Girdle, thou shalt be set free.
The Corporal's in his first sleep, the Chain is missed,
Thy Kinsman has exprest thee, and the old Knight
With Palsey-hams now labours thy release:
What rests is all in thee, to Conjure, Captain.

CAPTAIN.
Conjure! sfoot, George, you know the devil a conjuring I
can conjure.

PYE.
The Devil of conjuring? Nay, by my fay, I'd not have thee
do so much, Captain, as the Devil a conjuring: look here,
I ha brought thee a circle ready charactered and all.

CAPTAIN.
Sfoot, George, art in thy right wits? doost know what
thou sayest? why doost talk to a Captain of conjuring?
didst thou ever hear of a Captain conjure in thy life?
doost cal't a Circle? tis too wide a thing, me thinks:
had it been a lesser Circle, then I knew what to have done.

PYE.
Why, every fool knows that, Captain:  nay, then, I'll not
cog with you, Captain; if you'll stay and hang the next
Sessions, you may.

CAPTAIN.
No, by my faith, George: come, come, let's to conjuring,
let's to conjuring.

PYE.
But if you look to be released--as my wits have took
pain to work it, and all means wrought to farther it--
besides to put crowns in your purse, to make you a man
of better hopes, and whereas before you were a Captain
or poor Soldier, to make you now a Commander of rich fools,
(which is truly the only best purchase peace can allow
you) safer then High-ways, Heath, or Cunny-groves, and
yet a far better booty; for your greatest thieves are
never hangd, never hangd, for, why, they're wise, and
cheat within doors: and we geld fools of more money in
one night, then your false tailed Gelding will purchase
in a twelve-month's running; which confirms the old Beldam
saying, he's wisest, that keeps himself warmest; that is,
he that robs by a good fire--

CAPTAIN.
Well opened, yfaith, George; thou has pulled that saying
out of the husk.

PYE.
Captain Idle, tis no time now to delude or delay: the old
Knight will be here suddenly.  I'll perfect you, direct
you, tell you the trick on't: tis nothing.

CAPTAIN.
Sfoot, George, I know not what to say toot:  conjure? I
shall be hand ere I conjure.

PYE.
Nay, tell not me of that, Captain; you'll ne'er conjure
after you're hangd, I warrant you. Look you, sir, a parlous
matter, sure! First, to spread your circle upon the ground,
then, with a little conjuring ceremony, as I'll have an
Hackney-man's wand silvered ore a purpose for you,--then
arriving in the circle, with a huge word, and a great
trample, as for instance:--have you never seen a stalking-
stamping Player, that will raise a tempest with his tongue,
and thunder with his heels?

CAPTAIN.
O yes, yes, yes: often, often.

PYE.
Why, be like such a one, for any thing will blear the old
Knight's eyes: for you must note that he'll ne'er dare to
venture into the room, only perhaps peep fearfully through
the Key hold, to see how the Play goes forward.

CAPTAIN.
Well, I may go about it when I will, but mark the end ont:
I shall but shame my self, ifaith, George.  Speak big words,
and stamp and stare, and he look in at Key-hold! why, the
very thought of that would make me laugh out-right, and
spoil all:  nay, I'll tell thee, George, when I apprehend
a thing once, I am of such a laxative laughter, that if the
Devil him-self stood by, I should laugh in his face.

PYE.
Puh, that's but the babe of a man, and may easily be husht;
as to think upon some disaster, some sad misfortune, as the
death of thy Father ithe Country!

CAPTAIN.
Sfoot, that would be the more to drive me into such an
extasy, that I should ne'er lin laughing.

PYE.
Why, then, think upon going to hanging else.

CAPTAIN.
Mass, that's well remembred; now I'll do well, I warrant
thee, ne'er fear me now: but how shall I do, George, for
boisterous words, and horrible names?

PYE.
Puh, any fustian invocations, Captain, will serve as well
as the best, so you rant them out well; or you may go to a
Pothecaries shop, and take all the words from the Boxes.

CAPTAIN.
Troth, and you say true, George; there's strange words
enow to raise a hundred Quack-salvers, tho they be ne'er
so poor when they begin.  But here lies the fear on't, how
if in this false conjuration, a true Devil should pop up
indeed?

PYE.
A true Devil, Captain? why there was ne'er such a one: nay,
faith, he that has this place is as false a Knave as our
last Church-warden.

CAPTAIN.
Then he's false enough a conscience, ifaith, George.

[The Crie at Marshalsea.]

CRIE PRISONERS.
Good Gentlemen over the way, send your relief.  Good
Gentlemen over the way,--Good sir Godfrey!

PYE.
He's come, he's come.

NICHOLAS.
Master, that's my Kinsman yonder in the Buff-jerkin--Kinsman,
that's my Master yonder ith' Taffetie Hat--pray salute him
entirely!

[They salute: and Pye-board salutes Master Edmond.]

SIR GODFREY.
Now, my friend.

PYE.
May I pertake your name, sir?

EDMOND.
My name is Master Edmond.

PYE.
Master Edmond?--are you not a Welshman, sir?

EDMOND.
A Welshman? why?

PYE.
Because Master is your Christian name, and Edmond your
sir name.

EDMOND.
O no; I have more names at home: Master Edmond Plus is my
full name at length.

PYE.
O, cry you mercy, sir.  [Whispering]

CAPTAIN.
I understand that you are my Kinsman's good Master, and in
regard of that, the best of my skill is at your service:
but had you fortuned a mere stranger, and made no means to
me by acquaintance, I should have utterly denied to have
been the man; both by reason of the act past in Parliament
against Conjurers and Witches, as also, because I would not
have my Art vulgar, trite, and common.

SIR GODFREY.
I much commend your care therein, good Captain Conjurer,
and that I will be sure to have it private enough, you
shall doot in my Sister's house,--mine own house, I may
call it, for both our charges therein are proportioned.

CAPTAIN.
Very good, sir--what may I call your loss, sir?

SIR GODFREY.
O you may call't a great loss, sir, a grievous loss, sir;
as goodly a Chain of gold, tho I say it, that wore it: how
sayest thou, Nicholas?

NICHOLAS.
O 'twas as delicious a Chain a Gold!  Kinsman, you know,--

SIR GODFREY.
You know? did you know't, Captain?

CAPTAIN.
Trust a fool with secrets!--Sir, he may say I know: his
meaning is, because my Art is such, that by it I may gather
a knowledge of all things.

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, very true.

CAPTAIN.
A pax of all fools--the excuse struck upon my tongue like
Ship-pitch upon a Mariner's gown, not to come off in haste--
Ber-lady, Knight, to loose such a fair Chain a gold were a
foul loss.  Well, I can put you in this good comfort on't:
if it be between Heaven and Earth, Knight, I'll ha't for you.

SIR GODFREY.
A wonderful Conjurer!--O, aye, tis between heaven and earth,
I warrant you; it cannot go out of the realm.--I know tis
some-where above the earth.

CAPTAIN.
Aye, nigher the earth then thou wotst on.

SIR GODFREY.
For, first, my Chain was rich, and no rich thing shall
enter into heaven, you know.

NICHOLAS.
And as for the Devil, Master, he has no need on't, for you
know he ha's a great chain of his own.

SIR GODFREY.
Thou sayest true, Nicholas, but he has put off that now;
that lies by him.

CAPTAIN.
Faith, Knight, in few words, I presume so much upon the
power of my Art; that I could warrant your Chain again.

SIR GODFREY.
O dainty Captain!

CAPTAIN.
Marry, it will cost me much sweat; I were better go to
sixteen whot-houses.

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, good man, I warrant thee.

CAPTAIN.
Beside great vexation of Kidney and Liver.

NICHOLAS.
O, twill tickle you here-abouts, Coozen, because you have
not been used toot.

SIR GODFREY.
No? have you not been used too't, Captain?

CAPTAIN.
Plague of all fools still!--Indeed, Knight, I have not used
it a good while, and therefore twill strain me so much the
more, you know.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, it will, it will.

CAPTAIN.
What plunges he puts me to! were not this Knight a fool,
I had been twice spoiled now; that Captain's worse than
accurst that has an ass to his Kinsman.  Sfoot, I fear he
will drivell't out before I come toot.--Now, sir--to come
to the point in deed--you see I stick here in the jaw of
the Marshalsea, and cannot doo't.

SIR GODFREY.
Tut, tut, I know thy meaning; thou wouldst say thou'rt a
prisoner.  I tell thee thou'rt none.

CAPTAIN.
How none? why, is not this the Marshallsea?

SIR GODFREY.
Woult hear me speak? I hard of thy rare conjuring;
My chain was lost; I sweat for thy release,
As thou shalt do the like at home for me.
Keeper.

[Enter Keeper.]

KEEPER.
Sir.

SIR GODFREY.
Speak, is not this man free?

KEEPER.
Yes, at his pleasure, sir, the fee's discharged.

SIR GODFREY.
Go, go, I'll discharge them I.

KEEPER.
I thank your worship.

[Exit Keeper.]

CAPTAIN.
Now, trust me, yar a dear Knight.  Kindness unexpected!
oh, there's nothing to a free Gentle man.--I will conjure
for you, sir, till Froth come through my Buff-jerkin!

SIR GODFREY,
Nay, then thou shalt not pass with so little a bounty, for
at the first sight of my chain again, Forty fine Angells
shall appear unto thee.

CAPTAIN.
Twil be a glorious show, ifaith, Knight, a very fine show;
but are all these of your own house? are you sure of that,
sir?

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, aye--no, no, what's he yonder, talking with my wild
Nephew? pray heaven, he give him good counsel.

CAPTAIN.
Who, he? he's a rare friend of mine, an admirable fellow,
Knight, the finest fortune-teller.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, tis he indeed that came to my Lady sister, and foretold
the loss of my chain.  I am not angry with him now, for I
see twas my fortune to loose it.--By your leave, Master
Fortune-teller, I had a glimpse on you at home at my
Sisters the Widdows, there you prophesied of the loss of a
chain:--simply tho I stand here, I was he that lost it.

PYE.
Was it you, sir?

EDMOND.
A my troth, Nuckle, he's the rarest fellow: has told me my
fortune so right; I find it so right to my nature.

SIR GODFREY.
What ist?  God send it a good one!

EDMOND.
O, tis a passing good one, Nuncle: for he says I shall prove
such an excellent gamester in my time, that I shall spend
all faster then my father got it.

SIR GODFREY.
There's a fortune, in deed!

EDMOND.
Nay, it hits my humour so pat.

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, that will be the end ont: will the Curse of the beggar
prevail so much, that the son shall consume that foolishly,
which the father got craftily?  Aye, aye, aye; twill, twill,
twill.

PYE.
Stay, stay, stay.

[Pye-board with an Almanack and the Captain.]

CAPTAIN.
Turn over, George.

PYE.
June--July:  here, July; that's this month.  Sunday thirteen,
yester day forteen, to day fifteen.

CAPTAIN.
Look quickly for the fifteen day:--if within the compass of
these two days there would be some Boystrous storm or other,
it would be the best, I'd defer him off till then: some
tempest, and it be thy will.

PYE.
Here's the fifteen day--hot and fair.

CAPTAIN.
Puh, would t'ad been hot and foul.

PYE.
The sixteen day; that's to morrow: the morning for the most
part fair and pleasant--

CAPTAIN.
No luck.

PYE.
But about high-noon, lightning and thunder.

CAPTAIN.
Lightning and thunder! admirable, best of all: I'll conjure
to morrow just at high noon, George.

PYE.
Happen but true to morrow, Almanack, and I'll give thee
leave to lie all the year after.

CAPTAIN.
Sir, I must crave your patience, to bestow this day upon
me, that I may furnish my self strongly.  I sent a spirit
into Lancashire tother day, to fetch back a knave Drover,
and I look for his return this evening.  To morrow morning
my friend here and I will come and break-fast with you.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, you shall be both most welcome.

CAPTAIN.
And about Noon, without fail, I purpose to conjure.

SIR GODFREY.
Mid noon will be a fine time for you.

EDMOND.
Conjuring! do you mean to conjure at our house to morrow,
sir?

CAPTAIN.
Marry, do I, sir: tis my intent, young Gentleman.

EDMOND.
By my troth, I'll love you while I live fort.  O rare,
Nicholas, we shall have conjuring to morrow.

NICHOLAS.
Puh!  Aye, I could ha told you of that.

CAPTAIN.
Law, he could ha told him of that! fool, cockscomb, could
ye?

EDMOND.
Do you hear me, sir?  I desire more acquaintance on you:
you shall earn some money of me, now I know you can conjure;
but can you fetch any that is lost?

CAPTAIN.
Oh, any thing that's lost.

EDMOND.
Why, look you, sir, I tel't you as a friend and a Conjurer,
I should marry a Poticaries daughter, and twas told me she
lost her maidenhead at Stonie-stratford; now if you'll do
but so much as conjure fort, and make all whole again--

CAPTAIN.
That I will, sir.

EDMOND.
By my troth, I thanks you, la.

CAPTAIN.
A little merry with your sister's son, sir.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, a simple young man, very simple: come, Captain, and you,
sir, we'll e'en part with a gallon of wine till to morrow
break-fast.

PYE AND CAPTAIN.
Troth, agreed, sir.

NICHOLAS.
Kinsman--Scholar?

PYE.
Why, now thou art a good Knave, worth a hundred Brownists.

NICHOLAS.
Am I indeed, la? I thank you truly, la.

[Exeunt.]


ACTUS 4.

SCENE I.  An apartment in the Widow's house.

[Enter Moll, and Sir John Penny-dub.]


PENNY.
But I hope you will not serve a Knight so, Gentlewoman, will
you? to cashier him, and cast him off at your pleasure? what,
do you thiunk I was dubbed for nothing? no, by my faith,
Ladies daughter.

MOLL.
Pray, Sir John Pennydub, let it be deferred awhile.  I have
as big a heart to marry as you can have; but as the Fortune-
teller told me--

PENNY.
Pax a'th Fortune-teller! would Derecke had been his fortune
seven year ago, to cross my love thus! did he know what case
I was in? why, this is able to make a man drown himself in's
Father's fish-pond.

MOLL.
And then he told me more-over, Sir John, that the breach of
it kept my Father in Purgatory.

PENNY.
In Purgatory? why let him purge out his heart there, what
have we to do with that? there's Philistions enow there to
cast his water: is that any matter to us? how can he hinder
our love? why, let him be hangd now he's dead!--Well, have I
rid my post day and night, to bring you merry news of my
father's death, and now--

MOLL.
Thy Father's death? is the old Faarmer dead?

PENNY.
As dead as his Barn door, Moll.

MOLL.
And you'll keep your word with me now, Sir John, that I shall
have my Coach and my Coach-man?

PENNY.
Aye, faith.

MOLL.
And two white Horses with black Feathers to draw it?

PENNY.
Too.

MOLL.
A guarded Lackey to run befor't, and pied liveries to come
trashing after't.

PENNY.
Thou shalt, Moll.

MOLL.
And to let me have money in my purse to go whether I will.

PENNY.
All this.

MOLL.
Then come what so ere comes on't, we'll be made sure
together before the Maids a' the Kitchen.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  A room in the Widow's house, with a door at the
side, leading to another apartment.

[Enter Widdow, with her eldest Daughter Frances and Frailty.]


WIDOW.
How now? where's my Brother, Sir Godfrey? went he forth this
morning?

FRAILTY.
O no, Madame, he's above at break-fast, with, sir reverence,
a Conjurer.

WIDOW.
A Conjurer? what manner a fellow is he?

FRAILTY.
Oh, a wondrous rare fellow, Mistress, very strongly made
upward, for he goes in a Buff-jerkin: he says he will fetch
Sir Godfrey's Chain again, if it hang between heaven and
earth.

WIDOW.
What, he will not? then he's an exlent fellow, I warrant.
How happy were that woman to be blest with such a Husband!
a man a cunning! how do's he look, Frailty? very swartly,
I warrant, with black beard, scorcht cheeks, and smoky
eyebrows.

FRAILTY.
Fooh, he's neither smoke-dried, nor scorcht, nor black, nor
nothing. I tell you, Madame, he looks as fair to see to, as
one of us; I do not think but if you saw him once, you'd
take him to be a Christian.

FRANCES.
So fair, and yet so cunning: that's to be wonderd at,
Mother.

[Enter Sir Oliver Muck-hill, and Sir Andrew Tip-staff.]

MUCK.
Bless you, sweet Lady.

TIP.
And you, fair Mistress.

[Exit Frailty.]

WIDOW.
Coades? what do you mean, Gentlemen? fie, did I not give
you your answers?

MUCK.
Sweet Lady.

WIDOW.
Well, I will not stick with you now for a kiss.
Daughter, kiss the Gentleman for once.

FRANCES.
Yes, forsooth.

TIP.
I'm proud of such a favour.

WIDOW.
Truly la, sir Oliver, y'are much to blame to come again,
when you know my mind, so well deliverd as a Widdow could
deliver a thing.

MUCK.
But I expect a farther comfort, Lady.

WIDOW.
Why la you now, did I not desire you to put off your suit
quite and clean, when you came to me again? how say you?
did I not?

MUCK.
But the sincere love which my heart bears you--

WIDOW.
Go to, I'll cut you off: and Sir Oliver, to put you in
comfort a far off, my fortune is read me: I must marry
again.

MUCK.
O blest fortune!

WIDOW.
But not as long as I can choose;--nay, I'll hold out well.

MUCK.
Yet are my hopes now fairer.

[Enter Frailty.]

FRAILTY.
O Madam, Madam.

WIDOW.
How now, what's the haste?

[In her ear.]

TIP.
Faith, Mistress Frances, I'll maintain you gallantly.  I'll
bring you to Court, wean you among the fair society of
ladies, poor Kinswomen of mine, in cloth of silver: beside,
you shall have your Monkey, your Parrot, your Muskrat, and
your pisse, pisse, pisse.

FRANCES.
It will do very well.

WIDOW.
What, dos he mean to conjure here then? how shall I do be
rid of these Knights?--Please you, Gentlemen, to walk a
while ith Garden: go gather a pink, or a Lily-flower.

BOTH.
With all our hearts, Lady, and court us favourd.

[Exit.  Within Sir Godfrey.]

SIR GODFREY.
Step in, Nicholas; look, is the coast clear.

NICHOLAS.
Oh, as clear as a Cat's eye, sir.

SIR GODFREY.
Then enter, Captain Conjurer:--now--how like you your Room,
sir?

[Enter Sir Godfrey, Captain Pye-board, Edmond, Nicholas.]

CAPTAIN.
O, wonderful convenient.

EDMOND.
I can tell you, Captain, simply tho it lies here, tis the
fairest Room in my Mother's house: as dainty a Room to
Conjure in, me thinks--why, you may bid, I cannot tell how
many devils welcome in't; my Father has had twenty here at
once.

PYE.
What, devils?

EDMOND.
Devils? no, Deputies, and the wealthiest men he could get.

SIR GODFREY.
Nay, put by your chats now, fall to your business roundly:
the feskewe of the Dial is upon the Chrisse-crosse of Noon,
but oh, hear me, Captain, a qualm comes ore my stomach.

CAPTAIN.
Why, what's the matter, sir?

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, how if the devil should prove a knave, and tear the
hangings?

CAPTAIN.
Fuh, I warrant you, Sir Godfrey.

EDMOND.
Aye, Nuncle, or spit fire up'oth ceiling!

SIR GODFREY.
Very true, too, for tis but thin plastered, and twill
quickly take hold a the laths, and if he chance to spit
downward too, he will burn all the boards.

CAPTAIN.
My life for yours, Sir Godfrey.

SIR GODFREY.
My Sister is very curious and dainty ore this Room, I can
tell, and therefore if he must needs spit, I pray desire
him to spit ith Chimney.

PYE.
Why, assure you, Sir Godfrey, he shall not be brought up
with so little manners to spit and spaul a'th flower.

SIR GODFREY.
Why, I thank you, good Captain; pray have a care.  Aye, fall
to your Circle; we'll not trouble you, I warrant you: come,
we'll in to the next Room, and be cause we'll be sure to
keep him out there, we'll bar up the door with some of the
Godlies zealous work.

EDMOND.
That will be a find device, Nuncle, and because the ground
shall be as holy as the door, I'll tear two or three
rosaries in pieces, and strew the leaves about the Chamber.

[Thunders.]

Oh, the devil already.

[Runs in.]

PYE.
Sfoot, Captain, speak somewhat for shame; it lightens and
thunders before thou wilt begin: why, when?

CAPTAIN.
Pray, peace, George,--thou'lt make me laugh anon and spoil
all.

PYE.
Oh, now it begins again: now, now, now, Captain.

CAPTAIN.
Rumbos--ragdayon, pur, pur, colucundrion, Hois-Plois.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh admirable Conurer! has fetcht Thunder already:

[Sir Godfrey through the keyhole; within.]

PYE.
Hark, hark! again, Captain!

CAPTAIN.
Benjamino,--gaspois--kay--gosgothoteron--umbrois.

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, I would the devil would come away quickly, he has no
conscience to put a man to such pain.

PYE.
Again!

CAPTAIN.
Floste--Kakopumpos--dragone--Leloomenos--hodge--podge.

PYE.
Well said, Captain.

SIR GODFREY.
So long a coming? oh, would I had ne'er begun't now, for I
fear me these roaring tempests will destroy all the fruits
of the earth, and tread upon my corn--oh!--ith Country.

CAPTAIN.
Gog de gog, hobgoblin, huncks, hounslow, hockley te coome
parke.

WIDOW.
[At the door.]  O brother, brother, what a tempests ith
Garden: sure there's some conjuration abroad.

SIR GODFREY.
Tis at home, sister!

PYE.
By and by, I'll step in, Captain.

CAPTAIN.
Nunck--Nunck--Rip--Gascoynes, Ipis, Drip--Dropite.

SIR GODFREY.
He drips and drops, poor man! alas, alas.

PYE.
Now I come.

CAPTAIN.
O Sulphure Sooteface--

PYE.
Arch-conjurer, what wouldst thou with me?

SIR GODFREY.
O the devil, sister, ith dining Chamber! sing, Sister, I
warrant you that will keep him out: quickly, quickly, quickly.

[Goes in.]

PYE.
So, so, so, I'll release thee: ynough, Captain, ynough; allow
us some time to laugh a little: they're shuddering and shaking
by this time, as if an Earth-quake were in their kidneys.

CAPTAIN.
Sirrah, Goerge, how wast, how wast? did I doo't well ynough?

PYE.
Woult believe me, Captain? better then any Conjurer, for here
was no harm in this, and yet their horrible expectation
satisfied well.  You were much beholding to thunder and lightning
at this time: it gracst you well I can tell you.

CAPTAIN.
I must needs say so, George.  Sirrah, if we could ha convoid
hither cleanly a cracker or a fire-wheel t'ad been admirable.

PYE.
Blurt, blurt! there's nothing remains to put thee to pain now,
Captain.

CAPTAIN.
Pain?  I protest, George, my heels are sorer, then a Whitson
Morris-dancer.

PYE.
All's past now,--only to reveal that the chains ith Garden
where thou knowst it has lain these two days.

CAPTAIN.
But I fear that fox Nicholas has revealed it already.

PYE.
Fear not, Captain, you must put it to'th venture now.  Nay,
tis time: call upon e'm, take pity on e'm, for I believe some
of 'em are in a pitiful case by this time.

CAPTAIN.
Sir Godfrey?  Nicholas, Kinsman--Sfoot, they're fast at it
still, George.  Sir Godfrey!

SIR GODFREY.
Oh, is that the devil's voice? how comes he to know my name?

CAPTAIN.
Fear not, Sir Godfrey, all's quieted.

SIR GODFREY.
What, is he laid?

CAPTAIN.
Laid; and has newly dropt your chain ith Garden.

SIR GODFREY.
Ith Garden! in our Garden?

CAPTAIN.
Your Garden.

SIR GODFREY.
O sweet Conjurer! where abouts there?

CAPTAIN.
Look well about a bank of Rosemary.

SIR GODFREY.
Sister, the Rosemary bank! come, come, there's my chain, he
says.

WIDOW.
Oh happiness! run, run.

[Supposed to go.]

EDMOND.
Captain Conjurer?

[Edmond at keyhole.]

CAPTAIN.
Who?  Master Edmond?

EDMOND.
Aye, Master Edmond: may I come in safely, without danger,
think you?

CAPTAIN.
Fuh, long ago:  tis all as twas at first.  Fear nothing, pray
come near--how now, man?

EDMOND.
Oh this Room's mightily hot, ifaith: slid, my shirt sticks to
my Belly already.  What a steam the Rogue has left behind him!
foh, this room must be aired, Gentlemen; it smells horribly of
Brimstone--let's open the windows.

PYE.
Faith, master Edmond, tis but your conceit.

EDMOND.
I would you could make me believe that, ifaith.  Why, do you
think I cannot smell his savour from another? yet I take it
kindly from you, because you would not put me in a fear,
ifaith; a my troth, I shall love you for this the longest day
of my life.

CAPTAIN.
Puh, tis nothing, sir: love me when you see more.

EDMOND.
Mass, now I remember, I'll look whether he has singed the
hangings or no.

PYE.
Captain, to entertain a little sport till they come, make him
believe you'll charm him invisible:  he's apt to admire any
thing, you see. Let him alone to give force too'te.

CAPTAIN.
Go, retire to yonder end then.

EDMOND.
I protest you are a rare fellow, are you not?

CAPTAIN.
O master Edmond, you know but the least part of me yet: why,
now at this instant I could but florish my wand thrice o'er
your head, and charm you invisible.

EDMOND.
What, you could not? make me walk invisible, man!  I should
laugh at that, ifaith; troth, I'll requite your kindness and
you'll do't, good Captain conjurer.

CAPTAIN.
Nay, I should hardly deny you such a small kindness, Master
Edmond Plus: why, look you, sir, tis no more but this and thus
and again, and now yar invisible!

EDMOND.
Am I, ifaith? who would think it?

CAPTAIN.
You see the fortune-teller yonder at farder end ath chamber:
go toward him, do what you will with him; he shall ne'er find
you.

EDMOND.
Say you so? I'll try that, ifaith,--

[Justles him.]

PYE.
How now?  Captain, who's that justled me?

CAPTAIN.
Justled you?  I saw no body.

EDMOND.
Ha, ha, ha!--say twas a spirit.

CAPTAIN.
Shall I?--may be some spirit that haunts the circle.

[Edmond pulls him by the Nose.]

PYE.
O my nose again! pray conjure then, Captain.

EDMOND.
Troth, this is exlent; I may do any knavery now and never be
Seen,--and now I remember me, Sir Godfrey my Uncle abused me
Tother day, and told tales of me to my Mother--Troth, now I'm
Invisible, I'll hit him a sound wherrit ath' ear, when he
comes out ath' garden.--I may be revengd on him now finely.

[Enter Sir Godfrey, Widdow, Frances, Nicholas with the Chain.]

SIR GODFREY.
I have my Chain again, my Chain's found again.  O sweet
Captain, O admirable Conjurer.  [Edmond strikes him.]  Oh!
what mean you by that, Nephew?

EDMOND.
Nephew?  I hope you do not know me, Uncle?

WIDOW.
Why did you strike your Uncle, sir?

EDMOND.
Why, Captain, am I not invisible?

CAPTAIN.
A good jest, George!--not now you are not, Sir.
Why, did you not see me when I did uncharm you?

EDMOND.
Not I by my troth, Captain.  Then pray you pardon me, Uncle;
I thought I'd been invisible when I struck you.

SIR GODFREY.
So, you would doo't? go,--y'are a foolish Boy,
And were I not o'er-come with greater joy,
I'd make you taste correction.

EDMOND.
Correction, push!--no, neither you nor my Mother shall think
to whip me as you have done.

SIR GODFREY.
Captain, my joy is such, I know not how to thank you: let me
embrace you, hug you.  O my sweet Chain!  Gladness 'een makes
me giddy.  Rare man! twas as just ith' Rosemary bank, as if
one should ha' laid it there--oh, cunning, cunning!

WIDOW.
Well, seeing my fortune tells me I must marry, let me marry
a man of wit, a man of parts.  Here's a worthy Captain, and
'tis a fine Title truly la to be a Captain's Wife.  A Captain's
Wife, it goes very finely; beside all the world knows that a
worthy Captain is a fit Companion to any Lord, then why not a
sweet bed-fellow for any Lady,--I'll have it so--

[Enter Frailty.]

FRAILTY.
O Mistress, Gentlemen, there's the bravest sight coming along
this way.

WIDOW.
What brave sight?

FRAILTY.
Oh, one going to burying, & another going to hanging.

WIDOW.
A rueful sight.

PYE.
Sfoot, Captain, I'll pawn my life the Corporal's confined,
and old Skirmish the soldier going to execution, and 'tis
now full about the time of his waking; hold out a little
longer, sleepy potion, and we shall have exlent admiration;
for I'll take upon me the cure of him.


SCENE III.  The street before the Widow's house.

[Enter the Coffin of the Corporal, the soldier bound, and
lead by Officers, the Sheriff there.  From the house, Sir
Godfrey, the Widow, Idle, Pyeboard, Edmond, Frailty, and
Nicholas.]


FRAILTY.
Oh here they come, here they come!

PYE.
Now must I close secretly with the Soldier, prevent his
impatience, or else all's discovered.

WIDOW.
O lamentable seeing! these were those Brothers, that fought
and bled before our door.

SIR GODFREY.
What, they were not, Sister?

SKIRMISH.
George, look toot, I'll peach at Tyburn else.

PYE.
Mum,--Gentles all, vouchsafe me audience, and you especially,
Master Sheriff:
Yon man is bound to execution,
Because he wounded this that now lies coffined?

SHERIFF.
True, true; he shall have the law,--and I know the law.

PYE.
But under favour, Master Sheriff, if this man had been cured
and safe again, he should have been released then?

SHERIFF.
Why make you question of that, Sir?

PYE.
Then I release him freely, and will take upon me the death
that he should die, if within a little season, I do not cure
him to his proper health again.

SHERIFF.
How Sir? recover a dead man?
That were most strange of all.

[Frances comes to him.]

FRANCES.
Sweet Sir, I love you dearly, and could wish my best part
yours,--oh do not undertake such an impossible venture.

PYE.
Love you me? then for your sweet sake I'll doo't:
Let me entreat the corpse to be set down.

SHERIFF.
Bearers, set down the Coffin.--This were wonderful, and
worthy Stoes Chronicle.

PYE.
I pray bestow the freedom of the air upon our wholesome Art.--
Mass, his cheeks begin to receive natural warmth: nay, good
Corporal, wake betime, or I shall have a longer sleep then
you.--Sfoot, if he should prove dead indeed now, he were fully
revenged upon me for making a property on him, yet I had
rather run upon the Ropes, then have the Rope like a Tetter
run upon me.  Oh--he stirs--he stirs again--look, Gentlemen,
he recovers, he starts, he rises.

SHERIFF.
Oh, oh, defend us!--out, alas.

PYE.
Nay, pray be still; you'll make him more giddy else:--he knows
no body yet.

CORPORAL.
Zounes:  where am I? covered with Snow? I marvel.

PYE.
Nay, I knew he would swear the first thing he did, as soon as
ever he came to life again.

CORPORAL.
Sfoot, Hostess, some hot Porridge,--oh, oh, lay on a dozen
of Fagots in the Moon parlor, there.

PYE.
Lady, you must needs take a little pity of him, yfaith, and
send him in to your Kitchen fire.

WIDOW.
Oh, with all my heart, sir.  Nicholas and Frailty, help to
bear him in.

NICHOLAS.
Bear him in, quatha? pray call out the Maids, I shall ne'er
have the heart to doo't, indeed la.

FRAILTY.
Nor I neither, I cannot abide to handle a Ghost of all men.

CORPORAL.
Sblood, let me see: where was I drunk last night, heh--

WIDOW.
Oh, shall I bid you once again take him away?

FRAILTY.
Why, we're as fearful as you, I warrant you--oh--

WIDOW.
Away, villains; bid the Maids make him a Cawdle presently to
settle his brain,--or a Posset of Sack; quickly, quickly.

[Exeunt Frailty and Nicholas, pushing in the corpses.]

SHERIFF.
Sir, what so ere you are, I do more then admire you.

WIDOW.
O, aye, if you knew all, Master Sheriff, as you shall do, you
would say then, that here were two of the rarest men within
the walls of Christendome.

SHERIFF.
Two of 'em?  O wonderful.  Officers, I discharge you, set
him free, all's in tune.

SIR GODFREY.
Aye, and a banquet ready by this time, Master Sheriff, to
which I most cheerfully invite you, and your late prisoner
there.  see you this goodly chain, sir? mun, no more words,
twas lost, and is found again; come, my inestimable bullies,
we'll talk of your noble Acts in sparkling Charnico, and in
stead of a Jester, we'll ha the ghost ith white sheet sit
at upper end a'th Table.

SHERIFF.
Exlent merry, man, yfaith.

[Exeunt all but Frances.]

FRANCES.
Well, seeing I am enjoined to love and marry,
My foolish vow thus I cashier to Air
Which first begot it.--Now, love, play thy part;
The scholar reads his lecture in my heart.

[Exit.]


ACTUS 5

SCEN. I.  The street before the Widow's house.

[Enter in haste Master Edmond and Frailty.]


EDMOND.
This is the marriage morning for my mother and my sister.

FRAILTY.
O me, Master Edmund; we shall ha rare doings.

EDMOND.
Nay, go, Frailty, run to the Sexton; you know my mother
will be married at Saint Antlings.  Hie thee, tis past
five; bid them open the Church door; my sister is almost
ready.

FRAILTY.
What, all ready, Master Edmond?

EDMOND.
Nay, go, hie thee:  first run to the Sexton, and run to the
Clarke, and then run to Master Pigman the Parson, and then
run to the Milliner, and then run home again.

FRAILTY.
Here's run, run, run--

EDMOND.
But hark, Frailty.

FRAILTY.
What, more yet?

EDMOND.
Has the maids remembered to strew the way to the Church.

FRAILTY.
Fagh, an hour ago; I helpt 'em my self.

EDMOND.
Away, away, away, away then.

FRAILTY.
Away, away, away then.

[Exit Frailty.]

EDMOND.
I shall have a simple Father inlaw, a brave Captain able to
beat all our street: Captain Idle.  Now my Lady Mother will
be fitted for a delicate name: my Lady Idle, my Lady Idle,
the finest name that can be for a woman; and then the Scholar,
Master Pye-board, for my sister Frances, that will be Mistress
Frances Pye-board.--Mistress Frances Pye-board! they'll keep
a good table I warrant you.  Now all the knights' noses are
put out of joint; they may go to a bone setters now.

[Enter Captain and Pye-board.]

Hark, hark! oh who comes here with two Torches before 'em?
my sweet Captain, and my fine Scholar! oh, how bravely they
are shot up in one night; they look like fine Brittains now,
me thinks.  Here's a gallant change, ifaith:  slid, they have
hir'd men and all by the clock.

CAPTAIN.
Master Edmond, kind, honest, dainty Master Edmond.

EDMOND.
Fogh, sweet Captain Father inlaw, a rare perfume, ifaith.

PYE.
What, are the Brides stirring? may we steal upon 'em,
thinkst thou, Master Edmond?

EDMOND.
Faw, there e'en upon readiness, I can assure you, for they
were at their Torch e'en now: by the same token I tumbled
down the stairs.

PYE.
Alas, poor Master Edmond.

[Enter musicians.]

CAPTAIN.
O, the musicians!  I pray thee, Master Edmond, call 'em in
and liquor 'em a little.

EDMOND.
That I will, sweet Captain father in law, and make each of
them as drunk as a common fiddler.

[Exeunt omnes.]


SCENE II.  The same.

[Enter Sir John Pennydub, and Moll above lacing of her
clothes.]


PENNYDUB.
Whewh, Mistress Moll, Mistress Moll.

MOLL.
Who's there?

PENNYDUB.
Tis I.

MOLL.
Who?  Sir John Pennydub?  O you're an early cock, ifaith:
who would have thought you to be so rare a stirrer?

PENNYDUB.
Preethe, Moll, let me come up.

MOLL.
No, by my faith, Sir John, I'll keep you down, for you
Knights are very dangerous in once you get above.

PENNYDUB.
I'll not stay, ifaith.

MOLL.
Ifaith, you shall stay, for, Sir John, you must note the
nature of the Climates:  your Northern wench in her own
Country may well hold out till she be fifteen, but if she
touch the South once, and come up to London, here the Chimes
go presently after twelve.

PENNYDUB.
O th'art a mad wench, Moll, but I pree thee make haste, for
the priest is gone before.

MOLL.
Do you follow him, I'll not be long after.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE III.  A room in Sir Oliver Muckhill's house.

[Enter Sir Oliver Muckhill, Sir Andrew Tipstaff, and old
Skirmish talking.]


MUCK.
O monstrous, un-heard of forgery.

TIP.
Knight, I never heard of such villainy in our own country
in my life.

MUCH.
Why, 'tis impossible; dare you maintain your words?

SKIRMISH.
Dare we? een to their wezen pipes.  We know all their plots,
they cannot squander with us; they have knavishly abused us,
made only properties on's to advance their selves upon our
shoulders, but they shall rue their abuses.  This morning
they are to be married.

MUCK.
Tis too true; yet if the Widdow be not too much besotted on
slights and forgeries, the revelation of their villainies will
make 'em loathsome: and to that end, be it in private to you,
I sent late last night to an honorable personage, to whom I
am much indebted in kindness, as he is to me, and therefore
presume upon the payment of his tongue, and that he will lay
out good words for me:  and to speak truth, for such needful
occasions, I only preserve him in bond, and some-times he may
do me more good here in the City by a free word of his mouth,
then if he had paid one half in hand, and took Doomesday for
t'other.

TIP.
In troth, Sir, without soothing be it spoken, you have publisht
much judgment in these few words.

MUCK.
For you know, what such a man utters will be though effectual
and to weighty purpose, and therefore into his mouth we'll put
the approved theme of their forgeries.

SKIRMISH.
And I'll maintain it, Knight, if ye'll be true.

[Enter a servant.]

MUCK.
How now, fellow?

SERVANT.
May it please you, Sir, my Lord is newly lighted from his
Coach.

MUCK.
Is my Lord come already? His honor's early.
You see he loves me well:  up before seven!
Trust me, I have found his night capt at eleven.
There's good hope yet; come, I'll relate all to him.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE IV.  A street; a church appearing.

[Enter the two Bridegrooms, Captain and Scholar; after them,
Sir Godfrey and Edmond, Widdow changed in apparel, Mistress
Frances led between two Knights, Sir John Pennydub and Moll:
there meets them a Noble man, Sir Oliver Muckhill, and Sir
Andrew Tipstaff.]

NOBLE.
By your leave, Lady.

WIDOW.
My Lord, your honour is most chastely welcome.

NOBLE.
Madam, tho I came now from court, I come now from court, I
come not to flatter you:  upon whom can I justly cast this
blot, but upon your own forehead, that know not ink from
milk? such is the blind besotting in the state of an unheaded
woman that's a widdow.  For it is the property of all you that
are widdowes (a hand full excepted) to hate those that honestly
and carefully love you, to the maintenance of credit, state,
and posterity, and strongly to dote on those, that only love
you to undo you:  who regard you least are best regarded, who
hate you most are best beloved.  And if there be but one man
amongst ten thousand millions of men that is accurst,
disastrous, and evilly planeted, whom Fortune beats most,
whom God hates most, and all Societies esteem least, that man
is sure to be a husband.--Such is the peevish Moon that rules
your bloods.  An Impudent fellow best woes you, a flattering
lip best wins you, or in a mirth who talks roughliest is most
sweetest; nor can you distinguish truth from forgeries, mists
from Simplicity:  witness those two deceitful monsters that
you have entertaind for bride-grooms.

WIDOW.
Deceitful!

PYE.
All will out.

CAPTAIN.
Sfoot, who has blabd, George? that foolish Nicholas?

NOBLE.
For what they have besotted your easy blood withall wear
nought but forgeries: the fortune telling for husbands, the
conjuring for the chain Sir Godfrey heard the falshod of:
all mere knavery, deceit, and coozenage.

WIDOW.
O wonderful! Indeed I wondred that my husband with all his
Craft could not keep himself out of purgatory.

SIR GODFREY.
And I more wonder that my chain should be gone and my Tailor
had none of it.

MOLL.
And I wondred most of all that I should be tied from marriage,
having such a mind too't.  Come, Sir John Pennydub, fair
weather on our side; the moon has changed since yester night.

PYE.
The Sting of every evil is with-in me.

NOBLE.
And that you may perceive I fain not with you, behold their
fellow actor in those forgeries; who, full of Spleen and
envy at their so sudden advancements, revealed all their plot
in anger.

PYE.
Base Soldier, to reveal us/

WIDOW.
Ist possible we should be blinded so, and our eye open?

NOBLE.
Widdow, will you now believe that false, which too soon you
believed true?

WIDOW.
O, to my shame I do.

SIR GODFREY.
But under favour, my Lord, my chain was truly lost and
strangely found again.

NOBLE.
Resolve him of that, Soldier.

SKIRMISH.
In few words, Knight, then, thou were the arch-gull of all.

SIR GODFREY.
How, Sir?

SKIRMISH.
Nay, I'll prove it: for the chain was but hid in the rosemary
bank all this while, and thou gotst him out of prison to
Conjure for it, who did it admirably fustianly; for indeed
what need any others when he knew where it was?

SIR GODFREY.
O villainy of villainies! But how came my chain there?

SKIRMISH.
Where's truly la, in deed la, he that will not swear, but lie,
He that will not steal, But rob: pure Nicholas Saint Antlings?

SIR GODFREY.
O Villain! one of our society,
Deemd always holy, pure, religious.
A Puritan a thief, when wast ever heard?
Sooner we'll kill a man then Steal, thou knowst.
Out, slave! I'll rend my lion from thy back
With mine own hands.

NICHOLAS.
Dear Master, oh.

NOBLE.
Nay, Knight, dwell in patience.  And now, widdow, being so
near the Church, twer great pity, nay uncharity, to send you
home again without a husband: draw nearer you of true worship,
state and credit, that should not stand so far off from a
widdow, and suffer forged shapes to come between you.  Not
that in these I blemish the true Title of a Captain, or blot
the fair margent of a Scholar; For I honor worthy and deserving
parts in the one, and cherish fruitful Vertues in the other.
Come Lady, and you, Virgin; bestow your eyes and your purest
affections upon men of estimation both in Court and City, that
hath long wooed you, and both with there hearts and wealth
sincerely love you.

SIR GODFREY.
Good Sister, do:  Sweet little Franke, these are men of
reputation; you shall be welcome at Court: a great credit for
a Citizen, sweet Sister.

NOBLE.
Come, her silence does consent too't.

WIDDOW.
I know not with what face--

NOBLE.
Pah, pah! why, with your own face; they desire no other.

WIDDOW.
Pardon me, worthy Sirs; I and my daughter have wrongd your
loves.

MUCK.
Tis easily pardon'd, Lady,
If you vouchsafe it now.

WIDDOW.
With all my soul.

FRANCES.
And I with all my heart.

MOLL.
And I, Sir John, with soul, heart, lights and all.

SIR JOHN.
They are all mine, Moll.

NOBLE.
Now, Lady,
What honest Spirit but will applaud your choice,
And gladly furnish you with hand and voice?
A happy change which makes e'en heaven rejoice.
Come, enter into your Joys, you shall not want
For fathers now; I doubt it not, believe me,
But that you shall have hands enough to give ye.

[Exeunt omnes.]

Deus dedit his quoque finem.


FINIS







This etext was produced by Tony Adam.

Shakespeare, William.  A Yorkshire Tragedy.  Not So New as Lamentable
and True.  In C.F. Tucker Brooke, ed., The Shakespeare Apocrypha
(Oxford, 1918).



ALL'S ONE,
OR, ONE OF THE FOUR PLAYS IN ONE, CALLED
A YORK-SHIRE TRAGEDY
AS IT WAS PLAYED BY THE KING'S MAJESTY'S PLAYERS.



Dramatis Personae.

Husband.
Master of a College.
Knight, a Justice of Peace.
Oliver,
Ralph,
Samuel, serving-men.
Other Servants, and Officers.
Wife.
Maid-servant.
A little Boy.



SCENE I.  A room in Calverly Hall.

[Enter Oliver and Ralph, two servingmen.]


OLIVER.
Sirrah Ralph, my young Mistress is in such a pitiful passionate
humor for the long absence of her love--

RALPH.
Why, can you blame her? why, apples hanging longer on the tree
then when they are ripe makes so many fallings; viz., Mad
wenches, because they are not gathered in time, are fain to
drop of them selves, and then tis Common you know for every
man to take em up.

OLIVER.
Mass, thou sayest true, Tis common indeed: but, sirrah, is
neither our young master returned, nor our fellow Sam come
from London?

RALPH.
Neither of either, as the Puritan bawd says.  Slidd, I hear
Sam: Sam's come, her's!  Tarry! come, yfaith, now my nose
itches for news.

OLIVER.
And so does mine elbow.

[Sam calls within.  Where are you there?]

SAM.
Boy, look you walk my horse with discretion; I have rid him
simply.  I warrant his skin sticks to his back with very heat:
if a should catch cold and get the Cough of the Lungs I were
well served, were I not?

[Enter Sam.  Furnisht with things from London.]

What, Ralph and Oliver.

AMBO.
Honest fellow Sam, welcome, yfaith! what tricks hast thou
brought from London?

SAM.
You see I am hangd after the truest fashion: three hats, and
two glasses, bobbing upon em, two rebato wires upon my breast,
a capcase by my side, a brush at my back, an Almanack in my
pocket, and three ballats in my Codpiece:  nay, I am the true
picture of a Common servingman.

OLIVER.
I'll swear thou art.  Thou mayest set up when thou wilt.
There's many a one begins with less, I can tell thee, that
proves a rich man ere he dies.  But what's the news from
London, Sam?

RALPH.
Aye, that's well said; what's the news from London, Sirrah?
My young mistress keeps such a puling for her love.

SAM.
Why, the more fool she; aye, the more ninny hammer she.

OLIVER.
Why, Sam, why?

SAM.
Why, he's married to another Long ago.

AMBO.
Yfaith, ye jest.

SAM.
Why, did you not know that till now? why, he's married, beats
his wife, and has two or three children by her: for you must
note that any woman bears the more when she is beaten.

RALPH.
Aye, that's true, for she bears the blows.

OLIVER.
Sirrah Sam, I would not for two years wages, my young mistress
knew so much; she'd run upon the left hand of her wit, and
ne'er be her own woman again.

SAM.
And I think she was blest in her Cradle, that he never came
in her bed; why, he has consumed all, pawnd his lands, and
made his university brother stand in wax for him--There's a
fine phrase for a scrivener! puh, he owes more then his skin's
worth.

OLIVER.
Is't possible?

SAM.
Nay, I'll tell you moreover, he calls his wife whore as
familiarly as one would call Mal and Dol, and his children
bastards as naturally as can be.--But what have we here?  I
thought twas somewhat puld down my breeches: I quite forgot
my two potingsticks.  These came from London; now any thing
is good here that comes from London.

OLIVER.
Aye, far fetcht you know.

SAM.
But speak in your conscience, yfaith, have not we as good
Potingsticks ith Country as need to be put ith fire.  The mind
of a thing's all, and as thou saidst e'en now, far fetcht is
the best things for Ladies.

OLIVER.
Aye, and for waiting gentle women too.

SAM.
But, Ralph, what, is our beer sower this thunder?

OLIVER.
No, no, it holds countenance yet.

SAM.
Why, then, follow me; I'll teach you the finest humor to be
drunk in't; they call it knighting in London, when they drink
upon their knees.

AMBO.
Faith, that's excellent.  Come, follow me:  I'll give you all
the degrees ont in order.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  Another apartment in the same.

WIFE.
What will become of us? all will away.
My husband never ceases in expense,
Both to consume his credit and his house;
And tis set down by heaven's just decree,
That Riot's child must needs be beggery.
Are these the vertues that his you did promise?
Dice, and voluptuous meetings, midnight Revels,
Taking his bed with surfetts: Ill beseeming
The ancient honor of his house and name!
And this not all: but that which kills me most,
When he recounts his Losses and false fortunes,
The weakness of his state so much dejected,
Not as a man repentant, but half mad,
His fortunes cannot answer his expense:
He sits and sullenly locks up his Arms,
Forgetting heaven looks downward, which makes him
Appear so dreadful that he frights my heart,
Walks heavily, as if his soul were earth:
Not penitent for those his sins are past,
But vext his money cannot make them last:--
A fearful melancholy, ungodly sorrow.
Oh yonder he comes, now in despite of ills
I'll speak to him, and I will hear him speak,
And do my best to drive it from his heart.

[Enter Husband.]

HUSBAND.
Pox oth Last throw! it made
Five hundred Angels vanish from my sight.
I'm damnd, I'm damnd: the Angels have forsook me.
Nay, tis certainly true: for he that has
No coin is damnd in this world: he's gone, he's gone.

WIFE.
Dear husband.

HUSBAND.
Oh! most punishment of all, I have a wife.

WIFE.
I do intreat you as you love your soul,
Tell me the cause of this your discontent.

HUSBAND.
A vengeance strip thee naked! thou art cause,
Effect, quality, property, thou, thou, thou!

[Exit.]

WIFE.
Bad, turnd to worse! both beggery of the soul,
As of the body.  And so much unlike
Him self at first, as if some vexed spirit
Had got his form upon him.--

[Enter Husband again.]

He comes again.
He says I am the cause; I never yet
Spoke less then words of duty, and of love.

HUSBAND.
If marriage be honourable, then Cuckolds are honourable, for
they cannot be made without marriage.  Fool! what meant I to
marry to get beggars? now must my eldest son be a knave or
nothing; he cannot live uppot'h fool, for he will have no
land to maintain him: that mortgage sits like a snaffle upon
mine inheritance, and makes me chaw upon Iron.  My second
son must be a promoter, and my third a thief, or an underputter,
a slave pander.
Oh beggery, beggery, to what base uses dost thou put a man!
I think the Devil scorns to be a bawd.  He bears himself more
proudly, has more care on's credit.  Base, slavish, abject,
filthy poverty!

WIFE.
Good sir, by all our vows I do beseech you,
Show me the true cause of your discontent.

HUSBAND.
Money, money, money, and thou must supply me.

WIFE.
Alas, I am the lest cause of your discontent,
Yet what is mine, either in rings or Jewels,
Use to your own desire, but I beseech you,
As y'are a gentleman by many bloods,
Though I my self be out of your respect,
Think on the state of these three lovely boys
You have been father to.

HUSBAND.
Puh!  Bastards, bastards, bastards; begot in tricks, begot
in tricks.

WIFE.
Heaven knows how those words wrong me, but I may
Endure these griefs among a thousand more.
Oh, call to mind your lands already mortgage,
Your self wound with debts, your hopeful brother
At the university in bonds for you,
Like to be ceasd upon; And--

HUSBAND.
Ha done, thou harlot,
Whom, though for fashion sake I married,
I never could abide; thinkst thou thy words
Shall kill my pleasures?  Fall off to thy friends,
Thou and thy bastards beg: I will not bate
A whit in humor! midnight, still I love you,
And revel in your Company.  Curbd in,
Shall it be said in all societies,
That I broke custom, that I flagd in money?
No, those thy jewels I will play as freely
As when my state was fullest.

WIFE.
Be it so.

HUSBAND.
Nay I protest, and take that for an earnest,

[spurns her]

I will for ever hold thee in contempt,
And never touch the sheets that cover thee,
But be divorst in bed till thou consent,
Thy dowry shall be sold to give new life
Unto those pleasures which I most affect.

WIFE.
Sir, do but turn a gentle eye on me,
And what the law shall give me leave to do
You shall command.

HUSBAND.
Look it be done:  shall I want dust and like a slave
Wear nothing in my pockets but my hands
To fill them up with nails?

[holding his hands in his pockets]

Oh much against my blood!  Let it be done.
I was never made to be a looker on,
A bawd to dice; I'll shake the drabs my self
And made em yield.  I say, look it be done.

WIFE.
I take my leave: it shall.

[Exit.]

HUSBAND.
Speedily, speedily.  I hate the very hour I chose a wife: a
trouble, trouble! three children like three evils hang upon
me.  Fie, fie, fie, strumpet and bastards, strumpet and
bastards!

[Enter three Gentlemen hearing him.]

1 GENTLEMAN.
Still do those loathsome thoughts
Jar on your tongue?
Your self to stain the honour of your wife,
Nobly descended!  Those whom men call mad
Endanger others; but he's more than mad
That wounds himself, whose own words do proclaim
Scandals unjust, to soil his better name:
It is not fit; I pray, forsake it.

2 GENTLEMAN.
Good sir, let modesty reprove you.

3 GENTLEMAN.
Let honest kindness sway so much with you.

HUSBAND.
God den, I thank you, sir, how do you? adieu!  I'm glad to
see you.  Farewell
Instructions, Admonitions.

[Exeunt Gentlemen.]

[Enter a servant.]

HUSBAND.
How now, sirra; what would you?

SERVANT.
Only to certify you, sir, that my mistress was met by the way,
by them who were sent for her up to London by her honorable
uncle, your worships late guardian.

HUSBAND.
So, sir, then she is gone and so may you be:  But let her look
that the thing be done she wots of: or hell will stand more
pleasant then her house at home.

[Exit servant.]

[Enter a Gentleman.]

GENTLEMAN.
Well or ill met, I care not.

HUSBAND.
No, nor I.

GENTLEMAN.
I am come with confidence to chide you.

HUSBAND.
Who? me?
Chide me?  Doo't finely then: let it not move me,
For if thou chidst me angry, I shall strike.

GENTLEMAN.
Strike thine own follies, for it is they deserve
To be well beaten.  We are now in private:
There's none but thou and I.  Thou'rt fond and peevish,
An unclean rioter: thy lands and Credit
Lie now both sick of a consumption.
I am sorry for thee: that man spends with shame
That with his riches does consume his name:
And such thou art.

HUSBAND.
Peace.

GENTLEMAN.
No, thou shalt hear me further:
Thy fathers and forefathers worthy honors,
Which were our country monuments, our grace,
Follies in thee begin now to deface.
The spring time of thy youth did fairly promise
Such a most fruitful summer to thy friends
It scarce can enter into mens beliefs,
Such dearth should hang on thee.  We that see it,
Are sorry to believe it: in thy change,
This voice into all places will be hurld:
Thou and the devil has deceived the world.

HUSBAND.
I'll not indure thee.

GENTLEMAN.
But of all the worst:
Thy vertuous wife, right honourably allied,
Thou hast proclaimed a strumpet.

HUSBAND.
Nay, the, I know thee.
Thou art her champion, thou, her private friend,
The party you wot on.

GENTLEMAN.
Oh ignoble thought.
I am past my patient blood: shall I stand idle
And see my reputation toucht to death?

HUSBAND.
Ta's galde you, this, has it?

GENTLEMAN.
No, monster, I will prove
My thoughts did only tend to vertuous love.

HUSBAND.
Love of her vertues? there it goes.

GENTLEMEN.
Base spirit,
To lay thy hate upon the fruitful Honor
Of thine own bed.

[They fight and the Husband's hurt.]

HUSBAND.
Oh!

GENTLEMAN.
Woult thou yield it yet?

HUSBAND.
Sir, Sir, I have not done with you.

GENTLEMAN.
I hope nor nere shall do.

[Fight again.]

HUSBAND.
Have you got tricks? are you in cunning with me?

GENTLEMAN.
No, plain and right.
He needs no cunning that for truth doth fight.

[Husband falls down.]

HUSBAND.
Hard fortune, am I leveld with the ground?

GENTLEMAN.
Now, sir, you lie at mercy.

HUSBAND.
Aye, you slave.

GENTLEMAN.
Alas, that hate should bring us to our grave.
You see my sword's not thirsty for your life,
I am sorrier for your wound then your self.
Y'are of a vertuous house, show vertuous deeds;
Tis not your honour, tis your folly bleeds;
Much good has been expected in your life,
Cancel not all men's hopes: you have a wife
Kind and obedient: heap not wrongful shame
On her and your posterity, nor blame
Your overthrow; let only sin be sore,
And by this fall, rise never to fall more.
And so I leave you.

[Exit.]

HUSBAND
Has the dog left me, then,
After his tooth hath left me? oh, my heart
Would fain leap after him.  Revenge, I say,
I'm mad to be reveng'd.  My strumpet wife,
It is thy quarrel that rips thus my flesh,
And makes my breast spit blood, but thou shalt bleed.
Vanquisht? got down? unable e'en to speak?
Surely tis want of money makes men weak.
Aye, twas that orethrew me; I'd nere been down else.

[Exit.]


SCENE III.  The same.

[Enter wife in a riding suit with a servingman.]


SERVINGMAN.
Faith, mistress, If it might not be presumption
In me to tell you so, for his excuse
You had small reason, knowing his abuse.

WIFE.
I grant I had; but, alas,
Why should our faults at home be spread abroad?
Tis grief enough within doors.  At first sight
Mine Uncle could run o'er his prodigal life
As perfectly, as if his serious eye
Had numbered all his follies:
Knew of his mortgaged lands, his friends in bonds,
Himself withered with debts:  And in that minute
Had I added his usage and unkindness,
Twould have confounded every thought of good:
Where now, fathering his riots on his youth,
Which time and tame experience will shake off,
Guessing his kindness to me (as I smoothd him
With all the skill I had) though his deserts
Are in form uglier then an unshaped Bear,
He's ready to prefer him to some office
And place at Court, A good and sure relief
To all his stooping fortunes: twill be a means, I hope
To make new league between us, and redeem
His vertues with his lands.

SERVINGMAN.
I should think so, mistress.  If he should not now be kind
to you and love you, and cherish you up, I should think the
devil himself kept open house in him.

WIFE.
I doubt not but he will now:  prethe, leave me; I think I
hear him coming.

SERVINGMAN.
I am gone.

[Exit.]

WIFE.
By this good means I shall preserve my lands,
And free my husband out of usurers hands:
Now there is no need of sale, my Uncle's kind,
I hope, if ought, this will content his mind.--
Here comes my husband.

[Enter Husband.]

HUSBAND.
Now, are you come? where's the money? let's see the money.
Is the rubbish sold, those wiseakers your lands? why, when?
the money! where ist? powr't down, down with it, down with it:
I say powr't oth ground! lets see't, lets see't.

WIFE.
Good sir, keep but in patience and I hope
My words shall like you well:  I bring you better
Comfort then the sale of my Dowrie.

HUSBAND.
Ha, whats that?

WIFE.
Pray, do not fright me, sir, but vouchsafe me hearing: my
Uncle, glad of your kindness to me and mild usage--for so I
made it to him--has in pity of your declining fortunes,
provided a place for you at Court of worth and credit, which
so much overjoyed me--

HUSBAND.
Out on thee, filth! over and over-joyed, [spurns her] when I'm
in torments?  Thou pollitick whore, subtiller then nine Devils,
was this thy journey to Nuncke, to set down the history of me,
of my state and fortunes?  Shall I that Dedicated my self to
pleasure, be now confind in service to crouch and stand like
an old man ith hams, my hat off?  I that never could abide to
uncover my head ith Church? base slut! this fruit bears thy
complaints.

WIFE.
Oh, heaven knows
That my complaints were praises, and best words
Of you and your estate: only my friends
Knew of our mortgaged Lands, and were possest
Of every accident before I came.
If thou suspect it but a plot in me
To keep my dowrie, or for mine own good
Or my poor childrens:  (though it suits a mother
To show a natural care in their reliefs)
Yet I'll forget my self to calm your blood:
Consume it, as your pleasure counsels you,
And all I wish e'en Clemency affords:
Give me but comely looks and modest words.

HUSBAND.
Money, hore, money, or I'll--

[Draws his dagger.]

[Enters a servant very hastily.]

What the devil? how now? thy hasty news?

[To his man.]

SERVINGMAN.
May it please you, sir--

[Servant in a fear.]

HUSBAND.
What? May I not look upon my dagger? Speak villain, or I will
execute the point on thee:  quick, short.

SERVINGMAN.
Why, sir, a gentleman from the University stays below to speak
with you.

HUSBAND.
From the University? so! University--
That long word runs through me.

[Exit.]

WIFE.
Was ever wife so wretchedly beset?

[Wife alone.]

Had not this news stept in between, the point
Had offered violence unto my breast.
That which some women call great misery
Would show but little here:  would scarce be seen
Amongst my miseries.  I may Compare
For wretched fortunes with all wives that are.
Nothing will please him, until all be nothing.
He calls it slavery to be preferd,
A place of credit a base servitude.
What shall become of me, and my poor children,
Two here, and one at nurse, my pretty beggers?
I see how ruin with a palsy hand
Begins to shake the auncient seat to dust:
The heavy weight of sorrow draws my lids
Over my dankish eyes: I can scarce see:
Thus grief will last; it wakes and sleeps with me.

[Exit.]


SCENE IV.  Another apartment in the same.

[Enter the Husband with the master of the College.]


HUSBAND.
Please you draw near, sir, y'are exceeding welcome.

MASTER.
Thats my doubt; I fear, I come not to be welcome.

HUSBAND.
Yes, howsoever.

MASTER.
Tis not my fashion, Sir, to dwell in long circumstance, but
to be plain, and effectual; therefore, to the purpose.  The
cause of my setting forth was piteous and lamentable: that
hopeful young gentleman, your brother, whose vertues we all
love dearly, through your default and unnatural negligence,
lies in bond executed for your debt, a prisoner, all his
studies amazed, his hope struck dead, and the pride of his
youth muffled in these dark clouds of oppression.

HUSBAND.
Hum, um, um.

MASTER.
Oh, you have kild the towardest hope of all our university:
Wherefore, without repentance and ameds, expect pondrous and
sudden Judgements to fall grievously upon you.  Your brother,
a man who profited in his divine Imployments, might have made
ten thousand souls fit for heaven, now by your careless courses
cast in prison, which you must answer for, and assure your
spirit it will come home at length.

HUSBAND.
Oh god! oh!

MASTER.
Wise men think ill of you, others speak ill of you, no man
loves you, nay, even those whom honesty condemns, condemn
you:  and take this from the vertuous affection I bear your
brother; never look for prosperous hour, good thought, quiet
sleeps, contented walks, nor any thing that makes man perfect
til you redeem him.  What is your answer? how will you bestow
him? upon desperate misery, or better hopes?  I suffer, till I
have your answer.

HUSBAND.
Sir, you have much wrought with me.  I feel you in my soul,
you are your arts master.  I never had sense til now; your
syllables have cleft me.  Both for your words and pains I
thank you:  I cannot but acknowledge grievous wrongs done to
my brother, mighty, mighty, mighty wrongs.--Within there!

[Enter a servingman.]

HUSBAND.
Sir, Fill me a bowl of wine.  Alas, poor brother,
Brus'd with an execution for my sake.

[Exit servant for wine.]

MASTER.
A bruse indeed makes many a moral sore
Till the grave cure em.

[Enter with wine.]

HUSBAND.
Sir, I begin to you, y'ave chide your welcome.

MASTER.
I could have wisht it better for your sake.
I pledge you, sir, to the kind man in prison.

HUSBAND.
Let it be so.  Now, Sir, if you so please.

[Drink both.]

To spend but a few minutes in a walk
About my grounds below, my man here shall
Attend you.
I doubt not but by that time to be furnisht
Of a sufficient answer, and therein
My brother fully satisfied.

MASTER.
Good sir, in that the Angells would be pleased,
And the worlds murmurs calmd, and I should say
I set forth then upon a lucky day.

[Exit.]

HUSBAND.
Oh thou confused man! thy pleasant sins have undone thee, thy
damnation has beggerd thee!  That heaven should say we must
not sin, and yet made women! gives our senses way to find
pleasure, which being found confounds us.  Why should we know
those things so much misuse us?--oh, would vertue had been
forbidden! we should then have proved all vertuous, for tis our
blood to love that were forbidden.  Had not drunkenness been
forbidden, what man would have been fool to a beast, and Zany
to a swine, to show tricks in the mire? what is there in three
dice to make a man draw thrice three thousand acres into the
compass of a round little table, and with the gentlemans
palsy in the hand shake out his posterity thieves or beggars?
Tis done!  I ha dont, yfaith: terrible, horrible misery.--
How well was I left! very well, very well.  My Lands shewed
like a full moon about me, but now the moon's ith last
quarter, waning, waning:  And I am mad to think that moon
was mine; Mine and my fathers, and my forefathers--generations,
generations: down goes the house of us, down, down it sinks.
Now is the name a beggar, begs in me! that name, which
hundreds of years has made this shiere famous, in me, and my
posterity, runs out.
  In my seed five are made miserable besides my self: my riot
is now my brothers jailer, my wives sighing, my three boys
penury, and mine own confusion.

[Tears his hair.]

Why sit my hairs upon my cursed head?
Will not this poison scatter them? oh my brother's
In execution among devils that
Stretch him and make him give.  And I in want,
Not able for to live, nor to redeem him.
Divines and dying men may talk of hell,
But in my heart her several torments dwell.
Slavery and misery!  Who in this case
Would not take up money upon his soul,
Pawn his salvation, live at interest?
I, that did ever in abundance dwell,
For me to want, exceeds the throws of hell.

[Enter his little son with a top and a scourge.]

SON.
What, ail you father? are you not well?  I cannot scourge my
top as long as you stand so: you take up all the room with
your wide legs. Puh, you cannot make me afeard with this; I
fear no vizards, nor bugbears.

[Husband takes up the child by the skirts of his long coat in
one hand and draws his dagger with th' other.]

HUSBAND.
Up, sir, for here thou hast no inheritance left.

SON.
Oh, what will you do, father?  I am your white boy.

HUSBAND.
Thou shalt be my red boy: take that.

[Strikes him.]

SON.
Oh, you hurt me, father.

HUSBAND.
My eldest beggar! thou shalt not live to ask an usurer bread,
to cry at a great mans gate, or follow, good your honour, by
a Couch; no, nor your brother; tis charity to brain you.

SON.
How shall I learn now my heads broke?

HUSBAND.
Bleed, bleed rather than beg, beg!

[Stabs him.]

Be not thy names disgrace:
Spurn thou thy fortunes first if they be base:
Come view thy second brother.--Fates,
My childrens blood
Shall spin into your faces, you shall see
How Confidently we scorn beggery!

[Exit with his Son.]


SCENE V.  A bed-room in the same.

[Enter a maid with a child in her arms, the mother by her a
step.]


MAID.
Sleep, sweet babe; sorrow makes thy mother sleep:
It bodes small good when heaviness falls so deep.
Hush, pretty boy, thy hopes might have been better.
Tis lost at Dice what ancient honour won:
Hard when the father plays away the son!
No thing but misery serves in this house.
Ruin and desolation, oh!

[Enter husband with the boy bleeding.]

HUSBAND.
Whore, give me that boy.

[Strives with her for the child.]

MAID.
Oh help, help! out alas, murder, murder!

HUSBAND.
Are you gossiping, prating, sturdy queane?
I'll break your clamor with your neck: down stairs!
Tumble, tumble, headlong!

[Throws her down.]

So!
The surest way to charm a womans tongue
Is break her neck: a politician did it.

SON.
Mother, mother; I am kild, mother.

WIFE WAKES.
Ha, whose that cried? oh me, my children!
Both, both, both; bloody, bloody.

[Catches up the youngest.]

HUSBAND.
Strumpet, let go the boy, let go the beggar.

WIFE.
Oh my sweet husband!

HUSBAND.
Filth, harlot.

WIFE.
Oh what will you do, dear husband?

HUSBAND.
Give me the bastard.

WIFE.
Your own sweet boy!

HUSBAND.
There are too many beggars.

WIFE.
Good my husband--

HUSBAND.
Doest thou prevent me still?

WIFE.
Oh god!

HUSBAND.
Have at his heart!

[Stabs at the child in her arms.]

WIFE.
Oh my dear boy!

[Gets it from her.]

HUSBAND.
Brat, thou shalt not live to shame thy house!

WIFE.
Oh heaven!

[She's hurt and sinks down.]

HUSBAND.
And perish! now begone:
There's whores enow, and want would make thee one.

[Enter a lusty servant.]

SERVANT.
Oh Sir, what deeds are these?

HUSBAND.
Base slave, my vassail:
Comst thou between my fury to question me?

SERVANT.
Were you the Devil, I would hold you, sir.

HUSBAND.
Hold me? presumption!  I'll undo thee for't.

SERVANT.
Sblood, you have undone us all, sir.

HUSBAND.
Tug at thy master!

SERVANT.
Tug at a Monster.

HUSBAND.
Have I no power? shall my slave fetter me?

SERVANT.
Nay, then, the Devil wrestles, I am thrown.

HUSBAND.
Oh, villain, now I'll tug thee,

[Overthrows him]

now I'll tear thee;
Set quick spurs to my vassail, bruize him, trample him.
So! I think thou wilt not follow me in haste.
My horse stands ready saddled.  Away, away;
Now to my brat at nurse, my suckling begger.
Fates, I'll not leave you one to trample on.


SCENE VI.  Court before the house.

[The Master meets him.]


MASTER.
How ist with you, sir? me thinks you look
Of a distracted colour.

HUSBAND.
Who?  I, sir? tis but your fancy.
Please you walk in, Sir, and I'll soon resolve you:
I want one small part to make up the sum,
And then my brother shall rest satisfied.

MASTER.
I shall be glad to see it: sir, I'll attend you.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE VII.  The same as Scene V.

SERVANT.
Oh I am scarce able to heave up my self:
Ha's so bruizd me with his devilish weight,
And torn my flesh with his blood-hasty spur,
A man before of easy constitution
Till now hell's power supplied, to his soul's wrong.
Oh, how damnation can make weak men strong.

[Enter Master, and two servants.]

SERVANT.
Oh, the most piteous deed, sir, since you came.

MASTER.
A deadly greeting! has he somde up these
To satisfy his brother? here's an other:
And by the bleeding infants, the dead mother.

WIFE.
Oh, oh.

MASTER.
Surgeons, Surgeons! she recovers life.
One of his men all faint and bloodied.

1 SERVANT.
Follow, our murderous master has took horse
To kill his child at nurse: oh, follow quickly.

MASTER.
I am the readiest, it shall be my charge
To raise the town upon him.

[Exit Master and servants.]

1 SERVANT.
Good sir, do follow him.

WIFE.
Oh my children.

1 SERVANT.
How is it with my most afflicted Mistress?

WIFE.
Why do I now recover? Why half live?
To see my children bleed before mine eyes?
A sight able to kill a mothers breast
Without an executioner! what, art thou
Mangled too?

1 SERVANT.
I, thinking to prevent what his quick mischiefs
Had so soon acted, came and rusht upon him.
We struggled, but a fouler strength then his
O'er threw me with his arms; then did me bruize me
And rent my flesh, and robd me of my hair,
Like a man mad in execution;
Made me unfit to rise and follow him.

WIFE.
What is it has beguild him of all grace
And stole away humanity from his breast?
To slay his children, purpose to kill his wife,
And spoil his servants.

[Enter two guards.]

AMBO.
Sir, please you leave this most accursed place,
A surgeon waits within.

WIFE.
Willing to leave it!
Tis guilty of sweet blood, innocent blood:
Murder has took this chamaber with full hands,
And will ne'er out as long as the house stands.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE VIII.  A high road.

[Enter Husband as being thrown off his horse,
And falls.]


HUSBAND.
Oh stumbling Jade, the spavin overtake thee,
The fifty disease stop thee!
Oh, I am sorely bruisde; plague founder thee:
Thou runst at ease and pleasure.  Hart of chance!
To Throw me now within a flight oth Town,
In such plain even ground, sfoot, a man
May dice up on't, and throw away the Meadows.
Filthy beast.

CRY WITHIN.
Follow, follow, follow.

HUSBAND.
Ha!  I hear sounds of men, like hew and cry:
Up, up, and struggle to thy horse, make on;
Dispatch that little begger and all's done.

KNIGHT.
Here, this way, this way!

HUSBAND.
At my back? Oh,
What fate have I? my limbs deny me go,
My will is bated: beggery claims a part.
Oh, could I here reach to the infants heart.

[Enter Master of the College, 3. Gentlemen, and others with
Holberds.]

[Find him.]

ALL.
Here, here:  yonder, yonder.

MASTER.
Unnatural, flinty, more than barbarous:
The Scythians or the marble hearted fates
Could not have acted more remorseless deeds
In their relentless natures, then these of thine:
Was this the answer I long waited on,
The satisfaction for thy prisoned brother?

HUSBAND.
Why, he can have no more on's then our skins,
And some of em want but fleaing.

1 GENTLEMAN.
Great sins have made him imprudent.

MASTER.
H'as shed so much blood that he cannot blush.

2 GENTLEMAN.
Away with him, bear him a long to the Justices;
A gentleman of worship dwells at hand;
There shall his deeds be blazed.

HUSBAND.
Why, all the better.
My glory tis to have my action known:
I grieve for nothing, but I mist of one.

MASTER.
There's little of a father in that grief:
Bear him away.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE IX.  A room in the house of a Magistrate.

[Enter a knight with two or three Gentlemen.]


KNIGHT.
Endangered so his wife? murdered his children?

1 GENTLEMAN.
So the Cry comes.

Knight.
I am sorry I ere knew him,
That ever he took life and natural being
From such an honoured stock, and faira descent;
Til this black minute without stain or blemish.

1 GENTLEMAN.
Here come the men.

[Enter the master of the college and the rest, with the
prisoner.]

KNIGHT.
The serpent of his house!  I'm sorry
For this time that I am in place of justice.

MASTER.
Please you, Sir.

KNIGHT.
Do not repeat it twice I know too much,
Would it had ne'er been thought on:
Sir, I bleed for you.

1 GENTLEMAN.
Your fathers sorrows are alive in me:
What made you shew such monstrous cruelty?

HUSBAND.
In a word, Sir, I have consumd all, played away long acre,
and I thought it the charitablest deed I could do to cussen
beggery and knock my house oth head.

KNIGHT.
Oh, in a cooler blood you will repent it.

HUSBAND.
I repent now, that ones left unkild,
My brat at nurse.  Oh, I would full fain have weand him.

KNIGHT.
Well, I do not think but in to morrows judgement,
The terror will sit closer to your soul,
When the dread thought of death remembers you;
To further which, take this sad voice from me:
Never was act played more unnaturally.

HUSBAND.
Thank you, Sir.

KNIGHT.
Go, lead him to the Jail:
Where justice claims all, there must pity fail.

HUSBAND.
Come, come, away with me.

[Exit prisoner.]

MASTER.
Sir, you deserve the worship of your place.
Would all did so: in you the law is grace.

KNIGHT.
It is my wish it should be so.--Ruinous man,
The desolation of his house, the blot
Upon his predecessors honord name!
That man is nearest shame that is past shame.

[Exit.]


SCENE X.  Before Calverly Hall.

[Enter Husband with the officers, The Master and gentlemen,
as going by his house.]


HUSBAND.
I am right against my house, seat of my Ancestors: I hear my
wife's alive; but much endangered. Let me intreat to speak
with her, before the prison gripe me.

[Enter his wife, brought in a chair.]

GENTLEMAN.
See here she comes of her self.

WIFE.
Oh my sweet Husband, my dear distressed husband,
Now in the hands of unrelenting laws!
My greatest sorrow, my extremest bleeding,
Now my soul bleeds.

HUSBAND.
How now? kind to me? did I not wound thee, left thee for dead?

WIFE.
Tut, far greater wounds did my breast feel:
Unkindness strikes a deeper wound than steel;
You have been still unkind to me.

HUSBAND.
Faith, and so I think I have:
I did my murthers roughly, out of hand,
Desperate and sudden, but thou hast deviz'd
A fine way now to kill me, thou hast given mine eyes
Seven wounds a piece; now glides the devil from me,
Departs at every joint, heaves up my nails.
Oh catch him new torments, that were near invented,
Bind him one thousand more, you blessed Angels,
In that pit bottomless; let him not rise
To make men act unnatural tragedies,
To spread into a father, and in fury,
Makes him his childrens executioners:
Murder his wife, his servants, and who not?
For that man's dark, where heaven is quite forgot.

WIFE.
Oh my repentant husband.

HUSBAND.
My dear soul, whom I too much have wrongd,
For death I die, and for this have I longd.

WIFE.
Thou sholdst not (be assurde) for these faults die,
I ft he law could forgive as soon as I.

HUSBAND.
What sight is yonder?

[Children laid out.]

WIFE.
Oh, our two bleeding boys
Laid forth upon the thresholds.

HUSBAND.
Here's weight enough to make a heart-string crack.
Oh, were it lawful that your pretty souls
Might look from heaven into your fathers eyes,
Then should you see the penitent glasses melt,
And both your murthers shoot upon my cheeks;
But you are playing in the Angels laps,
And will not look on me,
Who void of grace, kild you in beggery.
Oh that I might my wishes now attain,
I should then wish you living were again,
Though I did beg with you, which thing I feard:
Oh, twas the enemy my eyes so bleard.
Oh, would you could pray heaven me to forgive,
That will unto my end repentant live.

WIFE.
It makes me e'en forget all other sorrows
And live apart with this.

OFFICER.
Come will you go?

HUSBAND.
I'll kiss the blood I spilt and then I go:
My soul is bloodied, well may my lips be so.
Farewell, dear wife, now thou and I must part,
I of thy wrongs repent me with my heart.

WIFE.
Oh stay, thou shalt not go.

HUSBAND.
That's but in vain, you see it must be so.
Farewell, ye bloody ashes of my boys!
My punishments are their eternal joys.
Let every father look into my deeds,
And then their heirs may prosper, while mine bleeds.

WIFE.
More wretched am I now in this distress,

[Exeunt Husband with holberds.]

Then former sorrows made me.

MASTER.
Oh kind wife,
Be comforted.  One joy is yet unmurdered:
You have a boy at nurse; your joy's in him.

WIFE.
Dearer then all is my poor husbands life:
Heaven give my body strength, which yet is faint
With much expence of blood, and I will kneel,
Sue for his life, number up all my friends,
To plead for pardon for my dear husbands life.

MASTER.
Was it in man to wound so kind a creature?
I'll ever praise a woman for thy sake.
I must return with grief; my answer's set:
I shall bring news ways heavier then the debt.--
Two brothers: one in bond lies overthrown,
This on a deadlier execution.


FINIS.







This etext was produced by John Mamoun <mamounjo@umdnj.edu> with the
Online Distributed Proofreading Team of Charles Franks.





Letters of Franz Liszt, Volume 2: "From Rome to the End"

by Franz Liszt; letters collected by La Mara and translated by
Constance Bache




CONTENTS



BRIEF BIOGRAPHICAL SKETCH
FRONTISPIECE TO VOLUME II, HONORING LISZT
TABLE OF LETTER CONTENTS
THE LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOL. 2
INFO ABOUT THIS E-TEXT EDITION



BRIEF BIOGRAPHICAL SKETCH



The Austrio-Hungarian composer Franz Liszt (1811-1886) was a
pianistic miracle. He could play anything on site and composed
over 400 works centered around "his" instrument. Among his key
works are his Hungarian Rhapsodies, his Transcendental Etudes,
his Concert Etudes, his Etudes based on variations of
Paganinini's Violin Caprices and his Sonata, one of the most
important of the nineteenth century. He also wrote thousands of
letters, of which 399 are translated into English in this second
of a 2-volume set of letters (the first volume contains 260
letters).

Those who knew him were struck by his extremely sophisticated
personality. He was surely one of the most civilized people of
the nineteeth century, internalizing within himself a complex
conception of human civility, and attempting to project it in his
music and his communications with people. His life was centered
around people; he knew them, worked with them, remembered them,
thought about them, and wrote about them using an almost poetic
language, while pushing them to reflect the high ideals he
believed in. His personality was the embodiment of a refined,
idealized form of human civility. He was the consummate musical
artist, always looking for ways to communicate a new civilized
idea through music, and to work with other musicians in
organizing concerts and gatherings to perform the music publicly.
He also did as much as he could to promote and compliment those
whose music he believed in.

He was also a superlative musical critic, knowing, with few
mistakes, what music of his day was "artistic" and what was not.
But, although he was clearly a musical genius, he insisted on
projecting a tonal, romantic "beauty" in his music, confining his
music to a narrow range of moral values and ideals. He would have
rejected 20th-century music that entertained cynical notions of
any kind, or notions that obviated the concept of beauty in any
way. There is little of a Prokofiev, Stravinsky, Shostakovich,
Cage, Adams, and certainly none of a Schoenberg, in Liszt's
music. His music has an ideological "ceiling," and that ceiling
is "beauty." It never goes beyond that. And perhaps it was never
as "beautiful" as the music of Mozart, Bach or Beethoven, nor
quite as rational (Are all the emotions in Liszt's music truly
"controlled?"). But it certainly was original and instructive,
and it certainly will linger.



FRONTISPIECE TO VOLUME II, HONORING LISZT


I.

We welcome thee, from southern sunnier clime,
To England's shore,
And stretch glad hands across the lapse of time
To the once more.

II.

Full twice two decades swiftly have rolled by
Since thou wast here;
A meteor flashing through our northern sky
Thou didst appear.

III.

Thy coming now we greet with pleasure keen,
And loyal heart,
Adding tradition of what thou hast been
To what thou art.

IV.

No laurel can we weave into the crown
Long years entwine,
Nor add one honour into the renown
Already thine:

V.

Yet might these roses waft to thee a breath
Of memory,
Recalling thy fair Saint Elizabeth
Of Hungary

VI.

We welcome her, from out those days of old,
In song divine,
But thee we greet a thousand fold,
The song is thine!

--C.B.

[Presumably written by Constance Bache, this trite paean would
likely not have appealed to Liszt, who repeatedly affirmed his
humility.]



TABLE OF LETTER CONTENTS (LETTER NUMBER, FOLLOWED BY ADDRESSEE)



1.    Dr. Franz Brendel. December 20th, 1861
2.    A. W. Gottschalg in Tieffurt. March 11th, 1862
3.    Dr. Franz Brendel. April 12th, 1862
4.    Mme. Jessie Laussot in Florence. May 3rd, 1862
5.    Dr. Franz Brendel. June 12th, 1862
6.    the same. July 12th, 1862
7.    the same. August 10th, 1862
8.    the same. August 29th, 1862
9.    the same. November 8th, 1862
10.   A.W. Gottschalg. November 15th, 1862
11.   Eduard Liszt. November 19th, 1862
12.   Dr. Franz Brendel. December 30th, 1862
13.   Breitkopf and Hartel. March 26th, 1863
14.   A.W. Gottschalg in Weimar. April 14th, 1863
15.   Dr. Franz Brendel. May 8th, 1863
16.   Eduard Liszt. May 22nd, 1863
17.   Dr. Franz Brendel. June 18th, 1863
18.   the same. July 18th, 1863
19.   Breitkopf and Hartel. August 28th, 1863
20.   Dr. Franz Brendel. September 7th, 1863
21.   Dr. Gille in Jena. September 10th, 1863
22.   Dr. Franz Brendel. October l0th, 1863
23.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. October 15th, 1863
24.   Dr. Franz Brendel. November 11th, 1863
25.   Breitkopf and Hartel. November 16th, 1863
26.   Dr. Franz Brendel. January 22nd, 1864
27.   the same. May 28th, 1864
28.   Dr. Franz Brendel. June 13th, 1864
29.   The Committee of the Society for the Support of Needy
Hungarian Musicians in Pest. June 18th, 1864
30.   Eduard Liszt. June 22nd, 1864
31.   Dr. Franz Brendel. July 1st, 1864
32.   Walter Bache in London. July 2nd, 1864
33.   ? August 7th, 1864
34.   Eduard Liszt. September 7th, 1864
35.   Breitkopf and Hartel. September 14th, 1864.93
36.   the same. October 1st, 1864
37.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. March 6th, 1865
38.   Dr. Franz Brendel. April 3rd, 1865
39.   Prince Constantine (Hohenzollern-Hechingen). May 11th, 1865
40.   Breitkopf and Hartel. May 27th, 1865
41.   Dr. Franz Brendel. July 21st, 1865
42.   Abbe Schwendtner. September 20th, 1865
43.   Dr. Franz Brendel. September 28th, 1865
44.   Eduard Liszt. November 1st, 1865.
45.   Dr. Franz Brendel. January 14th, 1866
46.   the same. June 19th, 1866
47.   the same. October 2nd, 1866
48.   Breitkopf and Hartel. October 4th, 1866
49.   Dr. Franz Brendel. January 6th, 1867
50.   Dr. Cuturi in Pisa. January 22nd, 1867
51.   Julius von Beliczay in Vienna. April 29th, 1867
52.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. May 24th, 1867
53.   Eduard Liszt. June 20th, 1867
54.   William Mason. July 8th, 1867
55.   E. Repos in Paris. July 12th, 1867
56.   Prince Constantine Czartoryski.October 14th, 1867
57.   Eduard Liszt. October 16th, 1867
58.   the same. October 20th, 1867
59.   Peter Cornelius. October 23rd, 1867
60.   Eduard von Liszt. November 6th, 1867
61.   E. Repos. November 8th, 1867
62.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. January 13th, 1868
63.   DP. Franz Brendel. January 26th, 1868
64.   Walter Bache. January 30th, 1868
65.   Dr. Franz Brendel. March 31st, 1868
66.   Johann von Herbeck. June 9th, 1868
67.   Dr. Franz Brendel. June 17th, 1868
68.   E. Repos. July 1st, 1868
69.   Carl Riedel in Leipzig. August 12th, 1868
70.   E. Repos. August 26th, 1868
71.   Dr. Siegmund Lebert in Stuttgart. September 10th, 1868
72.   E. Repos. September 19th, 1868
73.   C.F. Kahnt. September 20th, 1868
74.   E. Repos. September 22nd, 1868
75.   Dr. S. Lebert. October 19th, 1869
76.   Richard Pohl in Baden-Baden. November 7th, 1868
77.   Johann von Herbeck. December 1st, 1868
78.   Dr. Siegmund Lebert. December 2nd, 1868
79.   Eduard von Liszt. December 6th, 1868
80.   Johann von Herbeck. December 29th, 1868
81.   Edvard Grieg. December 29th, 1868
82.   Carl Bechstein in Berlin. January 19th, 1869
83.   Johann von Herbeck. January 27th, 1869
84.   E. Repos. March 3rd, 1869
85.   Laura Kahrer in Vienna. April 15th, 1868
86.   Franz Servais. May 21st, 1869
87.   William Mason. May 26th, 1869
88.   Heinrich Schulz-Beuthen. June 18th, 1869
89.   Franz Servais. July 4th, 1869
90.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. July 16th, 1869
91.   Camille Saint-Sa2ns. July 19th, 1869
92.   the same. August 4th, 1869
93.   Mme. Jessie Laussot. October 7th, 1869
94.   Dr. Ludwig Nohl. November i7th, 1869 188
95.   Princess Wittgenstein. November 27th, 1869
96.   Franz Servais. December 20th, 1869
97.   Dr. Franz Witt in Ratisbon. Towards end of 1869
98.   Dr. Siegmund Lebert. January loth, 1870
99.   C.F. Kahnt. February 11th, 1870
100.  Dr. Gille. February 26th, 1870
101.  Baroness Schwartz in Crete. March 15th, 1870
102.  Camille Saint-Saens. May 12th, 1870
103.  Johann von Herbeck. June 20th, 1870
104.  Sophie Menter. August 11th, 1870
105.  the same. August 29th, 1870
106.  Kornel von Abranyi in Budapest, November 2nd, 1870
107.  Sophie Menter. March 22nd, 1871
108.  Edmund von Mihalovich in Budapest. May 29th, 1871
109.  Marie Lipsius. July 23rd, 1871
110.  Franz Servais. August 25th, 1871
111.  Walter Bache. October 25th, 1871
112.  Marie Lipsius. October 25th, 1871
113.  Breitkopf and Hartel. November 22nd, 1871
114.  Mme. Anton Rubinstein. January 9th, 1872
115.  Edmund von Mihalovich. April 18th, 1872
116.  Johanna Wenzel. June 10th, 1872
117.  Wilhelm von Lenz. September 20th, 1872
118.  Otto Lessmann. September 26th, 1872
119.  Eduard von Liszt. November 6th, 1872
120.  Princess Wittgenstein. January 10th, 1873
121.  Eduard von Liszt. January 13th, 1873
122.  Dr. Emil Thewrewk von Ponor in Budapest. January 14th, 1873
123.  Dr. Franz Witt. January 20th, 1873
124.  Eduard von Liszt. January 28th, 1873
125.  the same. February 10th, 1873
126.  the same. March 3rd, 1873
127.  Mme. Jessie Laussot. March 30th, 1873
128.  Casar Cui. May, 1873
129.  Franz Servais. June 5th, 1873
130.  Adelheid von Schorn. July 30th, 1873
131.  Eduard von Liszt. August 19th, 1873
132.  Franz Servais. August 19th, 1873
133.  Walter Bache. August 20th, 1873
134.  Max Erdmannsdorfer. September 16th, 1873
135.  Otto Lessmann. September 24th, 1873
136.  Kornel von Abranyi. October ist, 1873
137.  Martha Remmert. December 27th, 1873
138.  ? 1873
139.  Countess Marie Donhoff in Vienna. January, 1874
140.  B. Bessel in St. Petersburg. February 2nd, 1874
141.  Skiwa in Vienna. March 21st, 1874
142.  C. F. Kahnt. March 29th, 1874
143.  Dr. Franz Witt. 1874?
144.  Carl Riedel. April 17th, 1874
145.  Dr. Franz Haberl, 1874?
146.  Carl Riedel. May 5th, 1874
147.  Princess Julie Waldburg. May 10th, 1874
148.  Peter Cornelius. May 16th, 1874
149.  A. F. Eggers in Liverpool. June 21st, 1874
150.  Walter Bache. June 21st, 1874
151.  Dr. Franz Witt. Early Summer, 1874
152.  Dr. Franz Haberl. Early Summer, 1874
153.  Edmund von Mihalovich. July 30th, 1874
154.  Peter Cornelius. August 23rd, 1874
155.  Ludwig Bosendorfer in Vienna. August 28th, 1874
156.  Adelheid von Schorn. October 12th, 1874
157.  Breitkopf and Hartel. November 24th, 1874
158.  Count Albert Apponyi in Budapest. December 6th, 1874
159.  Edmund von Mihalovich. December 8th, 1874
160.  Carl Hoff bauer in Munich. End of 1874
161.  Edmund von Mihalovich. December 29th, 1874
162.  Carl Hoff bauer. Beginning of 1875
163.  Julius Stern. February 4th, 1875
164.  Count Albert Apponyi. February 18th, 1875?
165.  Johann von Herbeck. March 3rd, 1875
166.  Eduard von Liszt. April 22nd, 1875
167.  Adelheid von Schorn. May 17th, 1875
168.  Eduard von Liszt. July 17th, 1875
169.  Louis Kohler. July 27th, 1875
170.  Carl Hillebrand in Florence. August 2nd, 1875
171.  Adelheid von Schorn. August 7th, 1875
172.  Dr. Franz Witt. August or September, 1875
173.  Lina Ramann. September 28th, 1875
174.  Eduard von Liszt. September 29th, 1875
175.  Kornel von Abranyi. October 14th, 1875
176.  Walter Bache. October 26th, 1875
177.  Eduard von Liszt. October 31st, 1875
178.  Mme. Jessie Laussot. November 17th, 1875
179.  Eduard von Liszt. November 26th, 1875
180   Hans Schmitt in Vienna. End of 1875
181.  Kornel von Abranyi. January 20th, 1876
182.  Eduard von Liszt. January 23rd, 1876
183.  Dr. Eduard Kulke in Vienna. January 23rd, 1876
184.  Marie Lipsius. February 3rd, 1876
185.  August von Trefort in Budapest. March 1st, 1876
186.  Walter Bache. March 8th, 1876
187.  Mme. Jessie Laussot. March 9th, 1876
188.  Dr. Leopold Damrosch in New York. April 15th, 1876
189.  Friedrich von Bodenstedt. June 8th, 1876
190.  B. Bessel. June 20th, 1876
191.  Prince Carl Lichnowsky. June 21st, 1876
192.  Max Erdmannsdorfer. June 27th, 1876
193.  Kornel von Abranyi. August 6th, 1876,
194.  Richard Wagner. August, 1876
195.  Marie Breidenstein in Erfurt. September 18th, 1876
196.  Camille Saint-Saens. October 2nd, 1876
197.  L.A. Zellner in Vienna. October 31st, 1876
198.  Hans Richter in Vienna. November 10th, 1876
199.  Breitkopf and Hartel. November 12th, 1876
200.  Constantin Sander in Leipzig. November 15th, 1876
201.  Breitkopf and Hartel. November 23rd, 1876
202.  Constantin Sander. November 29th, 1876
203.  Vera Timanoff. November 29th, 1876
204.  Otto Reubke in Halle. November, 1876
205.  Marianne Brandt in Berlin. December 3rd, 1876
206.  Committee of the Beethoven Monument. December 10th, 1876
207.  Eduard von Liszt. January 2nd, 1877
208.  Walter Bache. March 9th, 1877
209.  Eduard von Liszt. July 3rd, 1877
210.  Ludwig Bosendorfer. July 12th, 1877
211.  Edmund von Mihalovich. July 20th, 1877
212.  Kornel von Abranyi. July 28th, 1877
213.  Constantin Sander. September 5th, 1877
214.  Adelheid von Schorn. September 15th, 1877
215.  Breitkopf and Hartel. September 26th, 1877
216.  Frau Ingeborg von Bronsart. October 2lst, 1877
217.  Eduard von Liszt. November 23rd, 1877
218.  Jules de Zarembski. December 13th, 1877
219.  Mme. Jessie Laussot. January 29th, 1878
220.  the same. February 3rd, 1878
221.  B. Bessel. March 11th, 1878
222.  Walter Bache. March 19th, 1878
223.  Dr. Ludwig Nohl. March 20th, 1878
224.  Dr. Siegmund Lebert. March 27th, 1878
225.  Edmund von Mihalovich. April 13th, 1878
226.  Kornel von Abranyi. April 14th, 1878
227.  Fran Ingeborg von Bronsart. April 20th, 1878
228.  Eduard von Liszt. April 26th, 1878
229.  Edmund Singer. May 10th, 1878
230.  Adolf von Henselt. June 5th, 1878
231.  Eduard von Liszt. June 6th, 1878
232.  Carl Riedel. June 7th, 1878
233.  Vera Timanof£ Summer, 1878
234.  Eduard von Liszt. July 6th, 1878
235.  Robert Franz. July 12th, 1878
236.  Kornel von Abranyi. September 13th, 1878
237.  Eduard von Liszt. November 4th, 1878
238.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. November 15th, 1878
239.  Eduard von Liszt. November 21st, 1878
240.  the same. January 22nd, 1879
241.  Ludwig Bosendorfer. February 19th, 1879
242.  Adolf von Henselt. February, 1879
243.  Marie Lipsius. March 2nd, 1879
244.  Otto Lessmann. March 23rd, 1879
245.  Von Trefort. May 12th, 1879
246.  Walter Bache, May 25th, 1879
247.  Ludmilla Schestakoff. June 14th, 1878
248.  A. Borodin, C. Cui, An. Liadoff, and N. Rimsky-Korsakoff.
June 15th, 1879
249.  Josef Bohm. June 22nd, 1879
250.  Vera Timanoff. Summer, 1879
251.  Adolf von Henselt. July 12th, 1879
252.  Dr. Siegmund Lebert. September 25th, 1879
253.  Bassani in Venice. October 28th, 1879
254.  Anatole Liadoff. December 25th, 1879
255.  Fran Reisenauer.Pauly in Rome. January 30th, 1880
256.  Carl Klindwo1th. February 16th, 1880
257.  Herrmann Scholtz. April 29th, 1880
258.  Sophie Menter. May 26th, 1880
259.  Jules de Zarembski. June 1st, 1880
260.  Bassani. June 4th, 1880
261.  Marie Lipsius. June l0th, 1880
262.  Kornel von Abranyi. June 20th, 1880
263.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. July 28th, 1880
264.  Friedrich Hofme1ster. August 17th, 1880
265.  Baroness Helene Augusz. September 1st, 1880
266.  Mme. Anton Rubinstein. October 24th, 1880
267.  Frau Amalie von Fabry in Budapest. November 1st, 1880
268.  Frau Anna Benfey-Schuppe. November 11th, 1880
269.  Committee of Antwerp Musical Society. November 16th, 1880
270.  Sophie Menter. December 2nd, 1880
271.  Dr. Friedrich Stade. December 11th, 1880
272.  S. Jadassohn. January l0th, 1881
273.  Frau Reisenauer-Pauly in Konigsberg. January 29th, 1881
274.  Dionys von Pazmandy. February 15th, 1881
275.  Fran Colestine Bosendorfer. April 17th, 1881
276.  the Committee of the Wagner-Verein. April 25th, 1881
277.  Kornel von Abranyi. May 13th, 1881
278.  the same. May 22nd, 1881
279.  Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends. August 29th, 1881
280.  Otto Lessmann. September 8th, 1881
281.  Francois Auguste Gevaert in Brussels. September 19th, 1881
282.  the same. October 8th, 1881
283.  Edmund von Mihalovich. October 8th, 1881
284.  Jules de Zarembski. December 4th, 1881
285.  Camille Saint-Saens. December 6th, 1881
286.  Ludwig Bosendorfer. December 8th, 1881
287.  Pauline Viardot-Garcia. December 12th, 1881
288.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu in Brussels. January 20th, 1882
289.  Alexander Wereschagin. February 5th, 1882
290.  Martha Remmert. February 20th, 1882
291.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. April 11th, 1882
292.  Franz Servais. April 22nd, 1882
293.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. April 23rd, 1882
294.  Otto Lessmann. April 23rd, 1882
295.  Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends. April 23rd, 1882
296.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. April 25th, 1882
297.  Frau Henriette von Liszt. May 11th, 1882
298.  Camille Saint-Saens. May 14th, 1882
299.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. June 10th, 1882
300.  Committee of Allgemeine Deutsche Musikverein. June, 1882
301.  F. von Jagemann at Freiburg in Breisgau. July 6th, 1882
302.  Nicolaus Oesterlein in Vienna. July 16th, 1882
303.  Kornel von AbrAnyi. July 23rd, 1882
304.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. July 27th, 1882
305.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. September 12th, 1882
306.  Otto Lessmann. September 16th, 1882
307.  the same. September 20th, 1882
308.  Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends. September 27th, 1882
309.  Otto Lessmann. October 14th, 1882
310.  the same. November 4th, 1882
3ll.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. November 6th, 1882
312.  Otto Lessmann. November, 1882
313.  Adelheid von Schorn. November 20th, 1882
314.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. November 24th, 1882
315.  Franz Servais. November 26th, 1882
316.  Adelheid von Schorn. December 8th, 1882
317.  Carl Riedel. December 9th, 1882
318.  Arthur Meyer in Paris. January 28th, 1883
319.  Albert Fuchs. February 4th, 1883
320.  Saissy in Budapest. February 6th, 1883
321.  the same. February eth, 1883.
322.  Rich and Mason in Toronto. 1883
323.  Mme. Marie Jaell. February 12th, 1883
324.  Adelheid von Schorn. February 14th, 1883
325.  Otto Lessmann. February 18th, 1883
326.  Lina Ramann. February 22nd, 1883
327.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. March 6th, 1883
328.  Ferdinand Taborszky in Budapest. March 11th, 1883
329.  Baroness M. E. Schwartz. March 22nd, 1883
330.  Baroness Wrangel in St. Petersburg. May 20th, 1883
33I.  Mason and Hamlin in Boston. June 12th, 1883
332.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. December 14th, 1883
333.  Cäsar Cui. December 30th, 1883
334.  Otto Lessmann. January 10th, 1884
335.  Felix Mottl. February 8th, 1884
336.  Frau Henriette von Uszt.February 8th, 1884
337.  Camille Saint-Satins. April 29th, 1884
338.  Otto Lessmann. May 7th, 1884
339.  Camille Saint-Saëns. May 18th, 1884
340.  Walter Bache, May 23rd, 1884
341.  Carl Navratil in Prague. May 30th, 1884
342.  Baron Friedrich Podmaniczky in Budapest, 1884
343.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. June 18th, 1884
344.  Auguste Gotze. June 22nd, 1884
345.  Kornei von Abranyi. July 1st, 1884
345A. Mme. Malwine Tardieu. August 9th, 1884
346.  Rahter in Hamburg. August 28th, 1884
347.  Richard Pohl. September 12th, 1884
348.  Sophie Menter. September 13th, 1884
349.  Baron Friedrich Podmaniczky. September 2lst, 1884
350.  Walter Bache. October 18th, 1884
351.  Mili Balakireff in St. Petersburg. October 2lst, 1884
352.  Countess Mercy-Argenteau. October 24th, 1884
353.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. December 7th, 1884
354.  Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen. December 18th, 1884
355.  Camille Saint-Saens. End of 1884 or beginning of 1885
356.  Countess Mercy-Argenteau. January 20th, 1885
357.  Camille Saint-Saens. January 27th, 1885
358.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. April 6th, 1885
359.  Lina Ramann. April 27th, 1885
360.  Camille Saint-Saens. May 8th, 1885
361.  Alexander Siloti. May, 1885
362.  J. P. von Kiraly in Eisenstadt. June 5th, 1885
363.  Ferdinand Taborszky. June 8th, 1885
364.  Alfred Reisenauer. September 1st, 1885
365.  Otto Lessmann. September 5th, 1885
366.  Casar Cui. October 18th, 1885
367.  Countess Mercy-Argenteau. October 24th, 1885
368.  Eduard Reuss in Carlsruhe. November 4th, 1885
369.  Breitkopf and Hartel. November, 1885
370.  Walter Bache. November 17th, 1885
370A. the same. November 26th, 1885
370B. the Philharmonic Society. November 26th, 1885
371.  Countess Mercy-Argenteau. November 2lst, 1885
372.  Camille Saint-Sans. November 28th, 1885
373.  Eugen d'Albert. December 26th, 1885
374.  Sophie Menter. December 30th, 1885
375.  Eduard Reuss. January l0th, 1886
376.  Walter Bache. February 11th, 1886
377.  Countess Mercy- Argenteau. February 17th, 1886
379.  Sophie Menter. March 18th, 1886
379.  Countess Mercy-Argenteau. April 14th, 1886
380.  Alexander Ritter. April 24th, 1886
381.  Frau Amalie von Fabry. May 27th, 1886
382.  Mme. Malwine Tardieu. May 29th, 1886
383.  Eduard Reuss. June 5th, 1886
384.  Frau Reuss-Belce. June 5th, 1886
385.  Eduard Reuss. June 22nd, 1886
386.  Sophie Menter. July 3rd, 1886

Index of Supplemental Letters

387.  Freiherr von Spiegel in Weimar. September 30th, 1841
388.  Eugenio Gomez in Sevilla. December 27th, 1844
389.  Mme.? End of December, 1844
390.  Mme.? Beginning of 1845
391.  Mme.? in Milan. 1846
392.  Frau Charlotte Moscheles (?). June 22nd, 1848
393.  Heinrich Wilhelm Ernst. May 30th, 1801
394.  Josef Dessauer (?). Beginning of the fifties
395.  Testimonial for Joachim Raff. Beginning of the fifties.
396.  Dr. Eduard Hanslick in Vienna. January 31st, 1856.
397.  Minister von Bach in Vienna. September 18th
398.  ? in Leipzig. Spring, 1859
399.  Dr. Eduard Hanslick. September 24th, 1859



THE LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOLUME 2: FROM ROME TO THE END



1. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[Rome,] December 20th, 1861

Dear Friend,

For the New Year I bring you nothing new; my soon ageing
attachment and friendship remain unalterably yours. Let me hope
that it will be granted to me to give you more proof of it from
year to year.

Since the beginning of October I have remained without news from
Germany. How are my friends Bronsart, Draseke, Damrosch,
Weissheimer? Give them my heartiest greetings, and let me see
some notices of the onward endeavors and experiences of these my
young friends, as also of the doings of the Redactions-Hohle
[Editorial den] and the details of the Euterpe concerts.

Please send the numbers of the paper, from October onwards, to me
at the address of the library Spithover-Monaldini, Piazza di
Spagna, Rome. Address your letter "Herrn Commandeur Liszt," Via
Felice 113. "Signor Commendatore" is my title here; but don't be
afraid that any Don Juan will stab me--still less that on my
return to Germany I shall appear in your Redactions-Hohle as a
guest turned to stone!--

Of myself I have really little to tell you. Although my
acquaintance here is tolerably extensive and of an attractive
kind (if not exactly musical!), I live on the whole more retired
than was possible to me in Germany. The morning hours are devoted
to my work, and often a couple of hours in the evening also. I
hope to have entirely finished the Elizabeth in three months.
Until then I can undertake nothing else, as this work completely
absorbs me. Very soon I will decide whether I come to Germany
next summer or not. Possibly I shall go to Athens in April--
without thereby forgetting the Athens of the elms! .--.

First send me the paper, that I may not run quite wild in musical
matters. At Spithover's, where I regularly read the papers, there
are only the Augsburger Allgemeine, the Berlin Stern-Zeitung
[Doubtless the Kreusseitung], and several French and English
papers, which contain as good as nothing of what I care about in
the domain of music.

Julius Schuberth wrote a most friendly letter to me lately, and
asks me which of Draseke's works I could recommend to him next
for publication. To tell the truth it is very difficult for me in
Rome to put myself in any publisher's shoes, even in so genial a
man's as Julius Schuberth. In spite of this I shall gladly take
an opportunity of answering him, and shall advise him to consult
with Draseke himself as to the most advisable opportunity of
publishing this or that Opus of his, if a doubt should actually
come over our Julius as to whether his publisher's omniscience
were sufficiently enlightened on the matter!--

Remember me most kindly to your wife.

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Please give my best greetings to Kahnt. Later on I shall beg him
for a copy of my songs for a very charming Roman lady.



2. To A.W. Gottschalg, Cantor and Organist in Tieffurt

["Der legendarische Cantor" [the legendary Cantor] the Master
jokingly named this faithful friend of his. "I value him as a
thoroughly honest, able, earnestly striving and meritorious
comrade in Art, and interest myself in the further progress--
which is his due," wrote Liszt to the late Schuberth. Meanwhile
Gottschalg was long ago advanced to the post of Court organist in
Weimar. He is widely known as the editor of the "Chorgesang"
[chorus singing] and of the "Urania."]

Dear Friend,

Although I cannot think otherwise than that you remain ever
equally true to me, yet the living expression of your kindly
feelings towards me is always a pleasure and a comfort. First of
all then accept my warmest thanks for your two letters, which
bring back to me the best impressions of your morning and evening
visits to me in my blue room on the Altenburg.

It goes without saying that I have no objection to make to the
publication of the Andante from the Berg Symphony in the Jubilee
Album in honor of Johann Schneider. I only beg, dear friend, that
you will look the proof over accurately, and carefully correct
any omissions or mistakes in the manuscript.

I should be very glad if I could send you a new Organ work, but
unfortunately all incentive to that sort of work is wanting to me
here; and until the Tieffurt Cantor makes a pilgrimage to Rome
all my organ wares will certainly remain on the shelf.

Ad vocem of the Tieffurt Cantor, I will tell you that I have been
thinking of him very particularly these last few days, whilst I
was composing St. Francis's Hymn of Praise ("Cantico di San
Francesco"). The song is a development, an offspring as it were,
a blossom of the Chorale "in dulci jubilo," for which of course I
had to employ Organ. But how could I be writing an Organ work
without immediately flying to Tieffurt in imagination?--And lo,
at the entrance to the church our excellent Grosse [The
trombonist of the Weimar orchestra (died 1874), who was so
faithfully devoted to Liszt, and whom the latter remembered in
his will] met me with his trombone, and I recollected an old
promise--namely, to compose a "piece" for his use on Sundays. I
immediately set to work at it, and out of my "Cantico" has now
arisen a Concertante piece for Trombone and Organ. I will send
you the piece as an Easter egg by the middle of April. [Published
by Kahnt in Leipzig] Meanwhile here are the opening chords:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt of the
opening chords of the Concertante, in F major]

and on a lovely evening in May will you play the whole with
Grosse in your church at Tieffurt, and perpetuate me with Organ
and Trombone!--

It has struck me that your name is not mentioned among the
fellow-workers in the Johann Schneider Jubilee Album. If there is
still time and space you might perhaps contribute your
arrangement of the Fugue from the "Dante Symphony" (with the
ending which I composed to it for you). This proposal is open to
amendment, on the supposition that Hartels are willing to agree
to it--and, above all, that it suits you.

.--. N.B.--I beg you most particularly to make no further use of
the two Psalms "By the waters of Babylon," of which you have a
copy, because I have undertaken to make two or three essential
alterations in them, and I wish them only to be made known and
published in their present form. I send the new manuscript at the
same time as the Cantico di San Francesco.

My best greetings to your wife, and rest assured always of my
sincere thanks, and of the complete harmony of my ideas with your
own.

F. Liszt

Rome, March 11th, 1862

When I am sending several manuscripts at Easter, I will write a
couple of letters to Weimar and thank Jungmann [A pupil of
Liszt's in Weimar; died there in September 1892] for his letter.
I feel the want of time almost as much in Rome as in Weimar, and
I have observed a strict Fast in correspondence as a rule, so
that for three months past I have hardly sent as many as three to
four letters to Germany.

Remember me most particularly to Herr Regierungsrath Miller! [A
friend of Liszt's, a multifarious writer on music; died 1876]



3. To Dr. Franz Brendel.

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Alexander Meyer Cohn in
Berlin.]

Dear Friend,

Your friendly letter has again brought me a whiff of German air,
which is all the more welcome to me here as I have not too much
of it. One sees extremely few German papers in Rome--also I read
them very irregularly--and my correspondents from Germany are
limited to two, of whom friend Gottschalg, my legendary Tieffurt
Cantor, is the most zealous. His letters flow from his heart--and
are therefore always welcome to me.

For all of good news that you tell me I give you twofold thanks.
Firstly, because you have for the most part brought it about,
prefaced it, and seen it through. And then, because you tell it
me in so friendly a fashion. Although I have long been prepared
to bear the fiasco of my works quietly and unmoved, yet still it
is pleasant to me to learn that the "Faust" Symphony in Leipzig
did not have such a very bad fate. [In one of the "Euterpe"
concerts, under Bronsart's conducting, at which Schnorr of
Carolsfeld sang the tenor solo.] Do not fail, dear friend, to
give Herr Schnorr my best thanks--and if perchance my songs would
be a little pleasure to him will Kahnt be so good as to send
Schnorr a copy (bound) at my order?

With regard to the Bronsart affair, I sincerely regret that I had
not the opportunity of smoothing matters down sooner. Between
people of one mind dissension and variance should never appear--
much less lead to an outbreak. As you ask me for my opinion, I
openly confess that in the main Bronsart appears to me perfectly
justified in vindicating his choice of new compositions for the
musical directors, in spite of the fact that the two or three
experiments he has made do not show in favor of the principle (as
seen by the consequences). But between ourselves we must not
conceal the fact that a great part of the laxity and corruption
of our musical condition in Germany (as also elsewhere) is to be
attributed to the too great--or too petty--yielding and pliancy
of conductors and music-directors. I well know that the Euterpe
Committee nourishes and cherishes quite another idea than that of
the company X. Y. Z., or of the Court Theater directors A. B. C.
D. Yet the question constantly arises--Shall the cook cook? Shall
the coachman drive?--Ergo let the musician also have his own way.
The harm that may spring from that is not so very terrible.

On the other side, I consider a change of persons in the
management of a new institution is not desirable. In intellectual
movements in particular the leaders of them are especially
recommended to keep themselves conservative as regards their
people. The public requires definiteness before all else--and
just this is endangered by a change of persons. The substitute
for B., whom you mention to me (his name also begins with B.), is
certainly highly to be recommended in all that concerns talent,
position, and I think also worthy character; none the less do I
vote very decidedly that Bronsart be retained--if possible.

I do not need to add, dear friend, that this opinion of mine is a
purely objective one. I have not heard a word from Bronsart since
last September, and, as I said to you before, my musical news
from Germany is limited to two, or at most three letters which
Gottschalg wrote me.

With the wish that all difficulties may be smoothed in the best
way by your intelligent gentleness and forbearance, I remain your
warmly devoted

F. Liszt

[Rome] April 12th, 1862

P.S.--More next time (though little of interest to you, as
absolutely nothing occurs here that could touch you closely).--I
am preparing to stay here for the summer, and somewhat longer.--
In order not to lose the post I only send you today these few
lines.



4. To Madame Jessie Laussot in Florence

[Madame Laussot, an English lady, became later the wife of Dr.
Carl Hillebrand, the celebrated writer. She was the intimate
friend of Liszt, Von Bulow, etc., and is herself a musician of
great repute, to whom many artists of note, Sgambati, Bache,
Buonamici, etc., owe much of the success of their career. She
started a musical society in Florence, the "Societa Cherubini;"
which she conducted for many years, and introduced there much of
the best music of Germany (Liszt's included).]

Your charming lines, Madame, reached me at the beginning of Holy
Week. At that moment one no longer belongs to oneself in Rome;
and I have felt this more than others, for the services and
ceremonies of the Sistine Chapel and of St. Peter's, to which I
attached a special musical interest, have absorbed all my time
during the last fortnight. Pray excuse me therefore for not
having thanked you sooner for your kind remembrance, which
touches me much.

Some one has made a mistake in telling you that I am coming to
Florence. I have no longer any taste for moving about from one
place to another, and, unless something very unforeseen happens,
I shall not stir from here so soon. Rome is a more convenient
place than others for those who ask nothing better than to work
in their own fashion. Now, although I have become very
indifferent as to the fate of what I write, work none the less
continues to be the first need of my nature. I write therefore
simply to write--without any other pretensions or care--and for
this it suits me best to remain in one place.

Will you be so kind, Madame, as to give my very affectionate
respects to Madame Ritter [Mother of Carl Ritter--Wagner's
friend--and of Alexander Ritter, the composer of "Der faule
Hans."], to which please add my best remembrances to her family,
and pray accept also the expression of my very sincere and
affectionate regards.

F. Liszt

May 3rd, 1862 (Via Felice, 113--Rome.)



5. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Rome, June 12th, 1862

Grand, sublime, immeasurably great things have come to pass here
lately. The Episcopate of the whole world assembled here round
the Holy Father, who performed the ceremony of the canonisation
of the Japanese martyrs at Whitsuntide in the presence of more
than 300 bishops, archbishops, patriarchs, and cardinals. I must
abstain, dear friend, from giving you any picture of the
overpowering moment in which the Pope intoned the "Te Deum;" for
in Protestant lands that which I might call the spiritual
illumination is wanting. Let us therefore, without any other
transition, return to our everyday musical matters!

I am convinced that your determination to make a change in the
choice of conductors of the Euterpe has been made only after
mature consideration. .--. In my last letter I pointed out, as
the chief thing, that in concert societies the principle of
stability in the matter of the Musical Direction is the most
important thing, whereby I did not in the least mean to say that
one must on that account agree to extreme consequences--or rather
inconsequences. Well, as your decision is made, any further
discussion is useless. Blassmann [He moved to Dresden some years
later, and there he died.] has now to approve himself, and
actively to fulfil the favorable expectations which his talent
and good name justify. So be it, and as Schuberth says, Punktum
[a full stop.]

As regards the place of meeting for the next Tonkunstler-
Versammlung I am quite of your opinion. First of all I advise you
to consult Bulow. Owing to his long connection with the Court at
Carlsruhe he is best qualified to take the preliminary measures
("to pave the way"!). If the Grand Duke and Grand Duchess take up
the matter favorably, then without doubt all that is requisite
and necessary will be done in the most desirable manner. The most
essential things are

(a) Letting us have the theater free of charge for two to three
evenings--(as at Weimar--would not it perhaps be best to mention
this in the 1st letter?).

(b) Official preparatory measures by the Intendant to ensure the
co-operation of the Carlsruhe orchestra and chorus, also free of
charge.

You will have to consult more fully with Dr. Devrient and
Kalliwoda as to the best time for it. But the thing to be done
before all else is to gain the Grand Duke's interest--and if you
think it would be practicable for me to write a few lines to
H.R.H. later on I will do so with pleasure. I only beg that you
will give me exact particulars of the steps already made and
their results.

For my part I think that to Bulow, a priori, ought to be
entrusted the conducting of the Musical Festival, and this point
should be at once mentioned as settled in the introductory letter
to the Grand Duke. Otherwise Bedow's position in the affair would
not be sufficiently supported.

To sum up briefly: Request Bulow to undertake the conductorship
of the Musical Festival; and address the Grand Duke of Baden,
either by letter or by word of mouth (as opportunity may
warrant), with the request that H.R.H. would graciously support
the proposed Musical Festival of the third Tonkunstler-
Versammlung, by giving it his patronage, as the Grand Duke of
Weimar did last year, etc., etc.

.--. That excellent Pohl has quite forgotten me. I asked him,
through Gottschalg, to send me my Gesam- melte Lieder [complete
songs], the "Dante Symphony" (in score and arrangement for 2
Pianos), the 4-hand Symphonic Poems, and a couple of copies of my
Catalogue (published by Hartel).

I have been waiting in vain for these for two months. A few days
ago I wrote to Frau von Bulow to send Pohl an execution; perhaps
this may help matters at length!

The Berlioz parts have remained at Weimar. Grosse knows about
them--and possibly they have also gone to Pohl with the rest of
the scores. As soon as they are found I shall be happy to make a
present of them to the library of the Musikverein for their use,
as well as the scores, and I authorise you with pleasure, dear
friend, to do the same with the score and parts of the "Gran
Mass."

The newspaper has not reached me from Pohl any more than the
parcel.

Hearty greetings to your wife from yours in all friendship,

F. L.



6. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Well, as the parcel has come at last, Pohl shall not be scolded
any more, and his "innocence" shall shine out in full splendor!
.--.

I have just received a few lines from Berlioz; Schuberth, whom I
commissioned, before I left, to send the dedication-copy of the
"Faust" score to Berlioz, has again in his incompetent good
nature forgotten it, and perhaps even from motives of economy has
not had the dedication-plate engraved at all!!--Forgive me, dear
friend, if I trouble you once more with this affair, and beg you
to put an execution on Schuberth in order to force a copy with
the dedication-page from him. The dedication shall be just as
simple as that of the "Dante Symphony," containing only the name
of the dedicatee, as follows,

"To Hector Berlioz."

After this indispensable matter has been arranged I beg that you
will be so kind as to have a tasteful copy, bound in red or dark
green, sent, perhaps through Pohl (?), to Berlioz at Baden (where
he will be at the beginning of August. In case neither Pohl nor
his wife should go to Baden this summer (which however I scarcely
expect will be the case), send the copy to Fraulein Genast (who,
as I learn from the "Zeitschrift" [periodical], is at present in
Carlsruhe) with the request that she will give it to Berlioz.

Is there not any talk of bringing out an arrangement of the
"Faust Symphony" for 2 Pianofortes?--Schuberth is sure to have
far greater things in contemplation, and I almost regret having
incommoded him by giving up the manuscripts!--

Nonetheless, please take him to task about it, or, better, bully
him into action with "Faust-Recht" [Faust rights or Faust
justice.] In truth the final chorus of Part III. of the Faust
tragedy, "faithful to the spirit of Part II. as composed by
Deutobold-Symbolizetti-Allegoriowitsch-Mystifizinsky"--

"Das Abgeschmackteste
Hier ward es geschmeckt,
Das Allvertrackteste
Hier war es bezweckt"

[A parody on the concluding lines of Goethe's Faust. The parody
may be freely translated as follows:--

The most insipid
Here was tasted;
In queerest nonsense
Here all was wasted."]

can often be applied to matters of publishing. And while I am
touching on this, to me, very disagreeable chapter, may I also
take the opportunity of inquiring how long our amiable friend and
patron Julius Schuberth is intending to ignore the 2 Episodes
from Lenau's "Faust" ("Nachtlicher Zug"--and "Mephisto Walzer"),
which I recommended to his good graces more than a year ago, and
gave him in manuscript?

Must the pages perchance become quite mouldy, or will he bring
them out as an oeuvre posthume [posthumous work]? I am tired of
doing silent homage to this noble mode of proceedings, and intend
next time to help the publisher out of all his perplexities
[Untranslatable pun on "Verleger" and "Verlegenheiten."] by
putting the manuscripts back in their place again.--

--

"O Freunde, nicht diese Tone, sondern lasst uns angenchmere
anstimmen!" [A quotation from Schiller's "Ode to joy" in
Beethoven's "Choral Symphony:" "O friends, not tones like these,
but brighter ones let us sing."] (I am perhaps not quoting
exactly, although the sense of the apostrophe remains clearly
present, especially in musical enjoyments and experiences!)
Amongst the "more pleasant" things I at once place much
information given in your letter and the newspaper (which reached
me at the same time in some 16 numbers with Pohl's parcel). My
most earnest wishes are, first and foremost, bound up in the
complete prospering, upspringing, and blossoming of the "grain of
mustard-seed" of our Allgemeine Deutsche Musik-Verein. With God's
help I will also support this in other fashion than mere
"wishes." According to my opinion the third Tonkunstler-
Versammlung will be the chief factor in strengthening and
extending the Allgemeine Deutsche Musik-Verein, which comprises
in itself the entire development and advancement of Art.

Various reasons led me to recommend Carlsruhe to you in my last
letter as the most suitable place for the third Tonkunstler-
Versammlung, that is, supposing that H.R.H. the Grand Duke gives
his countenance to the matter, and grants us favorable conditions
with regard to the disposal of the theater, orchestra, and
chorus. It behoves Bulow, as conductor of the musical
performances, to undertake to "pave the way" towards a favorable
promise on the Grand Duke's side. Within two to three months the
necessary preliminaries can be fixed, and I shall then expect
fuller tidings from you about the further plans and measures.

Without wishing to make any valid objection to Prague--rather
with all due acknowledgment of what Prague has already
accomplished and may still accomplish--yet it seems to me that
the present political relations of the Austrian monarchy would
make it inopportune to hold the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Prague
just now. On the other hand I am of opinion that a more direct
influence than has yet been possible on South Germany, which is
for the most part in a stagnating condition, would be of service.
Stuttgart in particular, through Pruckner, Singer, Stark, etc.,
might behave at it differently from what it did at a previous
Musical Festival in Carlsruhe!

Dr. Gille's interest in the statutes and deliberations of the
M.V. [Musik-Verein] is very advantageous, as also Pohl's previous
removal to Leipzig. .--. The constant intercourse with you,
together with the Leipzig acids and gases, will be sure to suit
him well.

From Weimar I have received a good deal of news lately from Count
Beust, Dingelstedt, Gille, and Stor. To the latter my answer will
be little satisfactory; but I cannot continue with him on any
other road, and let the overpowering Dominant of his spasmodic
vanity serve as the Fundamental note of our relations.

I am writing to Gille by the next post, and also to Muller, who
rejoiced me lately by his Erinnerungs-Blatt [remembrance] from
Weimar, (in the 8th November issue of the "Zeitschrift," which I
have only now received). Will you, dear friend, when you have an
opportunity, give my best thanks to Kulke for his article upon
Symphony and Symphonic Poem--and also the enclosed lines to
Fraulein Nikolas, from whom I have received a charming little
note?

Already more than 140 pages of the score of my "Elizabeth" are
written out complete (in my own little cramped scrawl). But the
final chorus--about 40 pages--and the piano-arrangement have
still to be done. By the middle of August I shall send the entire
work

to Carl Gotze at Weimar to copy, together with the "Canticus of
St. Francis," which I composed in the spring. ["Cantico del
Sole," for baritone solo, men's chorus, and organ. Kahnt.] It
would certainly be pleasanter for me if I could bring the things
with me--but, between ourselves, I cannot entertain the idea of a
speedy return to Germany. If later there seems a likelihood of a
termination to my stay in Rome, you, dear friend, shall be the
first to hear of it.

With hearty greetings to your wife, I remain

Yours in sincere and friendly attachment,

F. Liszt

Rome, July 12th, 1862

Your little commission about Lowenberg shall be attended to. Let
me soon have news of you and of my intimate friends again. There
is absolutely nothing to tell you from here that could interest
you. In spite of the heat I shall spend the summer months in
Rome.



7. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[Letters 7, 8, 9, 18, and 24 to Brendel have been partially
published in La Mara's "Musikerbriefe" (Letters of Musicians),
Vol. II.]

What a delightful bunch of surprises your letter brings me, dear
friend! So Pohl has really set to work on the Faust brochure--and
Schuberth is actually not going to let the piano-arrangement of
the "Faust Symphony" lie in a box till it is out of date. How
curious it all sounds, just because it is so exactly the right
thing and what I desired!--If you are back in Leipzig please send
me soon a couple of copies of the Faust brochure (those numbers
of the journal containing Pohl's articles have not reached me),
and also send me the 2-pianoforte arrangement of the Faust
Symphony (a few copies when convenient). I have as yet received
nothing of the parcel which Kahnt announced as having sent me
with some of my 4-hand things; and as I have fished out here a
very talented young pianist, Sgambati [A pupil of Liszt's, and
now one of the first pianoforte players and composers of Italy;
has been, since 1871, Professor at the Academia Sta. Cecilia in
Rome] by name, who makes a first-rate partner in duets, and who,
for example, plays the Dante Symphony boldly and correctly, it
would be a pleasure to me to be able to go through the whole
cycle of the Symphonic Poems with him. Will you be so good
therefore, dear friend, as to ask Hartel for the whole lot in the
2-pianoforte arrangement (a double copy of each Symphonic Poem,
for with one copy alone I can do nothing, as I myself can only
play the thing from notes!), and also the 4-hand arrangement,
with the exception of the "Festklange," which Hartels have
already sent me?

Besides these, I expect in the same parcel the Marches which
Schuberth has published (the "Goethe Marsch" and the Duke of
Coburg) and the "Kunstler Festzug" [Artists' procession] (for 4
hands), which I ordered previously.--

The "Legend of St. Elizabeth" is written out to the very last
note of the score; I have now only to finish a part of the piano
arrangement, and the 4-hand arrangement of the Introduction, the
Crusaders' March, and the final procession--which shall be done
by the end of this month at latest. Then I send the whole to
Weimar to be copied, together with a couple of other smaller
manuscripts. What will be its ultimate fate will appear according
as...Meanwhile I will try one or two little excursions into the
country (to Albano, Frascati, Rocca di Papa--and a little farther
still, to the "Macchia serena" near Corneto, where in earlier
times much robbery and violence took place!), and before the end
of September I hope to be able to set steadily to work again, and
to continue my musical deeds of "robbery and murder"! Would that
I only could hear, like you, the Sondershausen orchestra, and
were able to conjure friend Stein and his brave phalanx into the
Colosseum! The locality would assuredly be no less attractive
than the "Loh," [The Sondershausen concerts are, as is well
known, given in the "Lohgarten."] and Berlioz's Harold Symphony,
or Ce que l'on entend sur la montagne [One of Liszt's Symphonic
Poems], would sound there quite "sonderschauslich" [curious]
[Play of words on Sondershausen and "sonderbar" or "sonderlich"].
I often imagine the orchestra set up there, with the execrated
instruments of percussion in an arcade--our well--wishers Rietz,
Taubert, and other braggarts of criticism close by (or in the
Aquarium!)--the directors of the Deutsche Musik-Verein resting on
the "Pulvinare," and the members all around resting on soft
cushions, and making a show in the reserved seats of the
Subsellia, as senators and ambassadors used to do!--

Tell Stein of this idea, and give him my most friendly thanks for
all the intelligent care and pains that he so very kindly gives
to my excommunicated compositions. As regards the performances of
the Sondershausen orchestra I am quite of your opinion, and I
repeat that they are not only not outdone, but are even not often
equalled in their sustained richness, their judicious and liberal
choice of works, as well as in their precision, drilling, and
refinement.--It is only a shame that no suitable concert-hall has
been built in Sondershausen. The orchestra has long deserved such
an attention; should such a thing ever fall to their lot, pray
urge upon Stein to spread out the Podium of the orchestra as far
as possible, and not to submit to the usual limited space, as
they made the mistake of doing in the Gewandhaus, the Odeonsaal
in Munich, etc., etc., and also, alas, in Lowenberg. The concert-
hall of the Paris Conservatoire offers in this respect the right
proportions, and a good part of the effect produced by the
performances there is to be ascribed to this favorable
condition.--

According to what I hear Bulow is not disposed to mix himself up
in the preliminaries of the next Tonkunstler-Versammlung.
Accordingly some one else must be entrusted with the afore-
mentioned task in Carlsruhe, although Bulow was the best suited
for it. If you do not care to enter at once into direct
communication with Devrient, Pohl would be the best man to
"pioneer" the way. It would not be any particular trouble to him
to go from Baden to Carlsruhe, and to persuade Devrient to favor
the matter. This is before all else needful, for without
Devrient's co-operation nothing of the sort can be undertaken in
Carlsruhe. If the Tonkunstler-Versammlung takes place not out of
the theater season, then one or more theatrical performances can
be given in conjunction with it, especially of Gluck's Operas; as
also an ultra-classical Oratorio of Handel's might well be given
over to the Carlsruhe Vocal Unions. .--.

What "astonishing things" are you planning, dear friend? This
word excites my curiosity; but, on the other hand, I share your
superstition to speak only of actions accomplished ("faits
accomplis"). In Schelle you will gain a really valuable
colleague. Has his "History of the Sistine Chapel" come out yet?
If so, please be so good as to send me the book with the other
musical things.--

My daughter, Frau von Bulow, writes to me that Wagner's new work
"Die Meistersinger" is a marvel, and amongst other things she
says:--

"These 'Meistersinger' are, to Wagner's other conceptions, much
the same as the 'Winter's Tale' is to Shakespeare's other works.
Its phantasy is found in gaiety and drollery, and it has called
up the Nuremberg of the Middle Ages, with its guilds, its poet-
artisans, its pedants, its cavaliers, to draw forth the most
fresh laughter in the midst of the highest, the most ideal,
poetry. Exclusive of its sense and the destination of the work,
one might compare the artistic work of it with that of the
Sacraments-Hauschen of St. Lawrence (at Nuremberg). Equally with
the sculptor, has the composer lighted upon the most graceful,
most fantastic, most pure form,--boldness in perfection; and as
at the bottom of the Sacraments-Hauschen there is Adam Kraft,
holding it up with a grave and collected air, so in the
'Meistersinger' there is Hans Sachs, calm, profound, serene, who
sustains and directs the action," etc.

This description pleased me so much that, when once I was started
on the subject, I could not help sending you the long quotation.
The Bulows, as you know, are with Wagner at Biebrich--at the end
of this month there is to be a performance of "Lohengrin" at
Frankfort under Wagner's direction. There must not fail to be a
full account of this in the Neue Zeitschrift, and for this I
could recommend my daughter as the best person. The letters in
which she has written to me here and there of musical events in
Berlin and elsewhere are really charming, and full of the finest
understanding and striking wit.--

Berlioz was so good as to send me the printed pianoforte edition
of his Opera "Les Troyens." Although for Berlioz's works
pianoforte editions are plainly a deception, yet a cursory
reading through of "Les Troyens" has nevertheless made an
uncommonly powerful impression on me. One cannot deny that there
is enormous power in it, and it certainly is not wanting in
delicacy--I might almost say subtilty--of feeling.

Pohl will let you know about the performance of Berlioz's comic
Opera "Beatrice and Benedict" in Baden, and I venture to say that
this Opera, which demands but little outside aids, and borrows
its subject from a well-known Shakespeare play, will meet with a
favorable reception. Berlin, or any other of the larger theaters
of Germany, would certainly risk nothing of its reputation by
including an Opera of Berlioz in its repertoire. [This took place
a quarter of a century later.] It is no good to try to excuse
oneself, or to make it a reason, by saying that Paris has
committed a similar sin of omission--for things in which other
people fail we should not imitate. Moreover Paris has been for
years past developing a dramatic activity and initiative which
Germany is far from attaining--and if special, regrettable
personal circumstances prevent Berlioz from performing his works
in Paris, the Germans have nothing to do with that.

Hoping soon for news of you (even if not about the "astonishing
things"), I remain, dear friend, with faithful devotion,

F. Liszt

Rome, August 10th, 1862 Via Felice, 113

Who has corrected the proofs of the "Faust Symphony"? Please
impress upon Schuberth not to send out into the world any
unworthy editions of my works. Bulow is so good as to undertake
the final revision, if only Schuberth will take the trouble to
ask him to do so.



8. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Via Felice, 113 [Rome], August 29th [1862]

Dear Friend,

In explanation of the main point of your last letter (which
crossed mine), namely, the question as to where the next
Tonkunstler-Versammlung is to be held, let me add the following
in colloquial form.

I should not, without further proof, exactly like to consider
Carlsruhe as a town altogether unsuitable for the purpose--
although Pohl and Bulow are afraid it is, and have various
reasons for assuming it to be so. As regards Bulow, I have
already asked you not to trouble him with any of the preliminary
details. When the time comes, he is certain to do his part--that
is, more than could be expected or demanded of him. Only he must
not be tormented with secondary considerations, not even where,
owing to his position and antecedents, he is best known (for
instance, in Carlsruhe, as already said). His individuality is
such an exceptional one that its singularities must be allowed
scope. Hence let us meanwhile leave him out of the question, he
being what he is, with this reservation--that he undertakes to
conduct the musical performances--as I hope and trust he will
finally arrange to do. But again as to Carlsruhe, I would propose
that unless you have important, positive objections to the place,
you should write to the Grand Duke yourself and beg him in my
name to take the Musik-Verein under his patronage, etc.--The
worst that could happen to me in return would be to receive a
courteously worded refusal; this, it is true, is not a kind of
thing I cultivate as a rule, but as a favor to such an honorable
association I would gladly face the danger, in the hope that it
might prove of some use and advantage.

Write and tell me, therefore, in what spirit Seifriz has answered
you, and what information Riedel has gathered in Prague. Prague,
for certain (yet rather uncertain?) considerations, is indeed
much to be recommended; only one would need, in some measure, to
have the support of the musical authorities and notabilities of
the place, as well as that of the civic corporation (because of
municipal approbation and human patronage). In short, if the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung were taken up and set in a good light
there by a few active and influential persons, everything else
would be easy to arrange, whereas otherwise all further steps
would be so much trouble thrown away. I cannot altogether agree
with your opinion, dear friend, that "the difficulties would in
no way be greater in Prague than in Leipzig"--you forget that you
yourself, in the capacity of a Leipzig citizen, removed most of
the difficulties by your unswerving perseverance and your
personal influence, whereas in Prague you could act only through
the intervention of others. The question, therefore, is whether
you can confidently reckon upon reliable friends there.

Until I receive further news from you, it seems to me that
Bulow's idea of preferring Lowenberg to all other places is one
very well worth consideration. Our amiable Prince would certainly
not fail to give his earnest support to the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung, and the small miseries of the little town of
Lowenberg might be put up with or put down, for a few days at all
events. Think this plan over again carefully, and do not look at
Lowenberg through the glasses of our excellent friend Frau von
Bonsart!--Of course a date would have to be fixed when the
orchestra is assembled there, and the whole programme arranged
with Seifriz and drawn up with his friendly co-operation. In my
opinion many things might be possible in Lowenberg that could
scarcely be broached elsewhere; and as, in fact, Bulow conceived
the idea I expressly recommend it you as a means for "paving the
way" to a happy issue.--

Together with your last letter I received three of the Faust
essays by Pohl. I shall send him my warm thanks for them by next
post, and shall add, for his bibliographical and statistical
edification, the little remark that Mademoiselle Bertin had an
Italian opera performed in Paris before the Revolution of July,
entitled "Faust" or "Fausto." Before Pohl's articles appear in
pamphlet form I should like to have read them all through--but if
he is in a hurry about them, do not mention this to him; perhaps,
however, if it did not make the pamphlet too thick, it might be
well to include Pohl's essay on the "Dante Symphony" (as it
appeared in Hartel's edition of the score).

In spite of the unsatisfactory performance of the "Dante
Symphony" in Dresden (partly, moreover, the fault of the bad,
incorrectly written orchestral parts, and my careless
conducting), and without regard to the rapture of the spiritual
substance (a matter which the general public tolerates only when
demanded by the higher authority of tradition, and then
immediately gapes at it upside down!)--in spite, therefore, of
this grievous Dresden performance, which brought me only theone
satisfaction of directly setting to work at some not unessential
improvements, simplifications, and eliminations in the score--
that had taken hold of me during the rehearsals and the
performance, and which I felt at once, without troubling myself
about the audience present...--Now, what was I about to say,
after all these parentheses and digressions? Yes, I remember
now:--the "Dante Symphony" is a work that does not need to be
ashamed of its title,--and what you tell me of the impression
produced by the "Bergsymphonie" (in Sondershausen) strengthens me
in my presumption. Hence I should be glad to see the preface by
Pohl printed again, and placed at the end of the "Faust"
pamphlet; for, considering what most people are, they require to
read first, before attaining the capacity for learning,
understanding, feeling, and appreciating.--

The edition of the "Faust Symphony" (arranged for two
pianofortes) is worthy of all praise, and, in the language of
music-sellers, elegant. The printer has done well in so arranging
the type that a number of lines are brought on to one page and a
number of bars on to every line. Schuberth shall ere long receive
a complimentary note from me, together with a few "proof"
indications for the "Faust Symphony." But, in fact, I have come
across only a few and unimportant errors as yet.

The publication of Lenau's two "Faust Episodes" (a point Pohl
touches upon in his essay with fine discrimination) Schuberth
might undertake according as he sees fit. I am pretty well
indifferent as to whether the pianoforte arrangement or the score
appears first; only, the two pieces must appear simultaneously,
the "Nachtlicher Zug" as No. 1 and "Mephisto's Walzer" as No. 2.
There is no thematic connection between the two pieces, it is
true; but nevertheless they belong together, owing to the
contrast of ideas. A "Mephisto" of that species could proceed
only from a poodle of that species!--.--.

With the "Elizabeth" (of which I have now to write only the
pianoforte score, which will take about a fortnight's time) I am
also sending to Weimar the three Psalms in their new definitive
form. It would please me if, some day, a performance of the 13th
Psalm, "How long wilt Thou forget me, O Lord?" could be given.
The tenor part is a very important one;--I have made myself sing
it, and thus had King David's feelings poured into me in flesh
and blood!--

It is to be hoped that Schnorr will be kind enough to adapt
himself to the tenor part (the only solo voice in the Psalm, but
which affects everything, and penetrates and sways chorus and
orchestra). Theodor Formes sang the part very well eight years
ago in Berlin; but that performance at Stern's Concert was to me
only a first trial performance!--

With notes alone nothing can be accomplished; one thirsts for
soul, spirit, and actual life. Ah! composing is a misery, and the
pitiful children of my Muse appear to me often like foundlings in
a hospital, wandering about only as Nos. so and so!--

Please give my best thanks to Schnorr for having so kindly
interested himself in my orphaned "Songs." His better self-
consciousness--the God we carry in our breasts--requite him for
it!--My daughter, Frau von Bulow, writes and tells me marvels
about Schnorr and his wife, and of the performance of "Tristan"
at Wagner's in Biebrich. If only we possessed electric telegraphs
in favor of musical ubiquity! Assuredly I would not make any
misuse of them, and only rarely put myself in correspondence with
the music-mongers; but Tristan and Isolde are my "soul's
longing"!

The French journals contain nothing but praise and exclamations
of delight at the success of "Benedict and Beatrice," Berlioz's
new opera, which was performed in Baden. Pohl is sure to give you
a full report of it. To judge from his essay, the tenor solo at
the end of the "Faust Symphony" caused less offence in Leipzig
(it was the stumbling-block in the Weimar performance, so much so
that influential and well-disposed friends have urgently advised
me to strike out the solo and chorus and to end the Symphony with
the C major common chord of the orchestra). It was really my
intention at first to have the whole "Chorus mysticus" sung
invisibly--which, however, would be possible only at performances
given in theaters, by having the curtain lowered. Besides which,
I felt doubtful whether the sound would not have thus become too
indistinct...

However it may be with this and other things, I will not fail to
exercise patience and goodwill--but neither will I make too great
a demand upon yours. Enough, therefore, for today from your
heartily devoted

F. Liszt

P.S.--N.B.--With the next sending of music please enclose the
choruses from Schumann's "Manfred" (Songs and pianoforte
accompaniment). I shall probably this autumn be engaged with the
same subject, which, in my opinion, Schumann has not exhausted.



9. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

You will have heard of the grievous shock I received in the
middle of September. [Liszt's eldest daughter, Mme. Blandine
Ollivier, had died.] Shortly afterwards Monsieur Ollivier came to
Rome, and during his stay here, which lasted till the 22nd
October, I could not calculate upon being able to take any
interest in other outward matters. This last week I have had to
spend in bed. Hence my long delay in answering you.

So far as I understand the position of affairs with regard to the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung, it seems difficult to give any definite
advice. The question here is not one of theoretical, but of
absolutely practical considerations, with regard to which
unfortunately my influence is very limited. In my last letter I
believe I told you that I am prepared, in case you decide upon
Prague, to subscribe my name to the petition addressed to the
Austrian ministry in behalf of state support. At the same time I
intimated to you that my cousin Dr. Eduard Liszt would be the
best one to draw up the said petition (in accordance with a draft
sent to him), and in fact might aid the undertaking with good
advice, and otherwise promote its interests. I, on my side, will
not spare myself any trouble in order to obtain from the Austrian
government a favorable result for the objects of the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung. I cannot, of course, guarantee success beforehand;
still I consider it not impossible, and when the time comes I
will communicate all further details to you.

In the first place, however, comes the question whether I can
take any personal part in the meeting of the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung in the year '63? [This meeting did not take place in
1863, but in 1864.] And unfortunately this question I am forced
to answer decidedly in the negative. Owing to its being my custom
not to enlighten others by giving an account of my own affairs, I
avoid, even in this case, entering further into particulars. Of
this much you may meanwhile be assured with tolerable certainty:
I have neither the intention nor the inclination to make any
lengthened stay in Germany. Probably, however, during the course
of next summer I may go to Weimar for perhaps a three weeks'
visit to my gracious Master the Grand Duke. From Weimar I should
go to Leipzig, and then return here by way of Trieste or
Marseilles.

Requests for concert performances of my works under my direction
have been addressed to me from several quarters of late.
Yesterday again I received a letter on this same subject from
London, to which, as in the case of the others, I shall reply
with grateful thanks and excuses.--

I am firmly resolved for some length of time to continue working
on here undisturbed, unremittingly and with an object. After
having, as far as I could, solved the greater part of the
"Symphonic" problem set me in Germany, I mean now to undertake
the "Oratorio" problem (together with some other works connected
with this). The "Legend of Saint Elizabeth," which was altogether
finished a couple of months ago, must not remain an isolated
work, and I must see to it that the society it needs is
forthcoming! To other people this anxiety on my part may appear
trifling, useless, at all events thankless, and but little
profitable; to me it is the one object in art which I have to
strive after, and to which I must sacrifice everything else. At
my age (51 years!) it is advisable to remain at home; what there
is to seek, is to be found within oneself, not without; and, let
me add, I am as much wanting in inclination to wander about as I
am in the necessary means for doing so. But enough of my
insignificant self. Let us pass over at once to the subject of
those two brave fellows who, in your opinion, ought to play a
chief part in the next Tonkunstler-Versammlung: Berlioz--and
Wagner.

To class them together thus seemed strange to me at first,
considering the present state of affairs. And, so far as their
two-headed personality is drawn in, I hold it to be impossible
even. So let us take each apart.

A) Berlioz. Considering what has occurred, and what has appeared
in print, it strikes me as more than doubtful whether Berlioz
would make up his mind to undertake the musical conductorship of
the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, even though Benazet should come
forward en personne as mediator. Besides which his moral
influence at the Festival and the negotiations would be hindering
and disturbing. Hence let us leave Berlioz in Paris or in Baden-
Baden, and be content in being consistent and in giving him a
proof of our admiration by getting up a performance of one of his
larger works. (Perhaps the "Te Deum?"--if I am not mistaken it
lasts a good hour. For Prague this choice would be appropriate--
unless the "Requiem" might be preferred. We might even consider
whether the two might not be given together; this would
abundantly fill one concert. Discuss the requisite means, etc.,
for giving these, with Riedel.)

B) Wagner. What am I to say to you of Wagner? Have you had any
talk with him lately in Leipzig? On what terms are you with him
at present?...Ah, it is a pity that we cannot procure a stream of
gold for him, or have some palaces of gold built for him! What
can he do with admiration, enthusiasm, devotion, and all such
non-essential things?

Nevertheless it is our indebtedness and duty to remain faithful
and devoted to him. The whole German Musik-Verein shall raise up
a brazen wall in his honor!--He is verily worthy of it!

Hence, dear friend, see what can be arranged with Wagner. Since I
left Berlin we have not corresponded. But I am surprised almost
that I did not receive a line from him after Blandine's death!
.--.

Au revoir, therefore, dear friend. In Weimar or in Leipzig only
can I tell you what I may be able to accomplish later. I must,
however, most urgently beg to be exempted from undertaking to
direct the German Musik-Verein for the year '63!--

With cordial and most friendly greetings,

Yours sincerely,

November 8th [1862]

F. Liszt

P.S.--Best thanks for your Sondershausen essays.



10. To A. W. Gottschalg

Dear Friend,

Your kind letter reached me on October 22nd, and this day, which
could not pass without sorrow, has this year been brightened by
many loving and solemn remembrances. Accept my thanks, and
present my best remembrances to all those whose names you
mention, and who have so kindly thought of me. Unfortunately
there is no prospect of my soon being able to celebrate the 22nd
October with Weimar friends; but I may tell you that I intend
paying H.R.H. the Grand Duke a visit during the course of the
summer. And we two shall then also have a bright and happy day in
Tieffurt--and look through a couple of new Organ pieces together.
Grosse must not fail to be there likewise, nor his trombone box,
which I have specially had in my mind ever since the journey to
Paris. [Grosse took his instrument with him on the journey, in
order that it might be at hand in case Liszt should want it.]
Meanwhile, however, tell dear, good Grosse not to be vexed about
the delay in connection with the promised despatch of his
"Sonntags-Posaunenstuck." [Sunday piece for trombone.] It is long
since finished, also some three or four Organ pieces, which, dear
friend, I wrote for you last spring. But the postal arrangements
are so little safe, under present circumstances, that I do not
care to send manuscripts by this means. In despatching parcels to
Vienna or Paris I could, of course, make use of the courtesy of
the embassies; but it is more difficult with Weimar...and so the
parcel with the "Legend of Saint Elizabeth," the three Psalms
instrumented (and essentially remodelled), several Pianoforte and
Organ pieces, together with Grosse's "Sunday-piece," must remain
in my box till some perfectly reliable opportunity presents
itself. If the worst comes to the worst I shall bring the whole
lot myself.

The Schneider-Organ-Album, and the one to appear later--the
Arnstadter-Bach-Organ-Album (which is to contain the magnificent
fugal subject from Bach's Cantata that I arranged for the Organ--
and not without difficulty), I beg you to keep in your library
till my return.

I am very unpleasantly affected by the hyper-mercantile
craftiness of one of my publishers whom you mention in your
letter. It would truly be unjust if you were not to receive the
usual discount, and indeed an exceptional amount, when purchasing
the "Faust Symphony." But who would ever succeed in washing a
negro white? And, in addition, one has generally to put up with
the inky blackness of his bills!--I could tell many a tale of
such doings, and indeed of persons who are afterwards not ashamed
to talk braggingly of their friendship for me! "O friends, not
these tones, rather let us strike up pleasanter ones," sings
Beethoven.

The "Elizabeth," it is to be hoped, contains something of the
sort. At least, as far as possible, I have labored carefully at
the work, and, so to say, lived it through for more than a year.
In No. 3 of the score--the "Crusaders"--you will come across the
old pilgrim song from the days of the Crusades which you had the
kindness to communicate to me. It has rendered me good service
for the second subject of the "Crusaders' March." In the
concluding notice of the score I acknowledge my thanks to you for
it and give the whole song from your copy.

Among the pleasant bits of news (exceptions to the rule!) which
reach me from our quarters is that about the improvement of your
pecuniary position, which is probably accompanied by your
appointment as teacher at the newly established Seminary classes.
In the way of merit you lack nothing, and nothing in zeal and
energetic perseverance. Let me hope, dear friend, that you may
more and more meet with your due reward!

With kindest greetings,

F. Liszt

Rome, November 15th, 1862



11. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

The feeling of our double relationship is to me always an
elevating and comforting one. Truly you abide with me, as I do
with you--cum sanguine, corde et mente.

Accept my thanks for your kind lines, and excuse my not having
written to you long ago. I might indeed have told you many a
thing of more or less interest; but all seemed to me tiresome and
insufficient in writing to you. I needed more than ever, and
above all things, ample time to compose myself, to gather my
thoughts, and to bestir myself. During the first year of my stay
here I secured this. It is to be hoped that you would not be
dissatisfied with the state of mind which my 50th year brought
me; at all events I feel it to be in perfect harmony with the
better, higher aspirations of my childhood, where heaven lies so
near the soul of every one of us and illuminates it! I may also
say that, owing to my possessing a more definite and clearer
consciousness, a state of greater peacefulness has come over me.

Blandine has her place in my heart beside Daniel. Both abide with
me bringing atonement and purification, mediators with the cry of
"Sursum corda!"--When the day comes for Death to approach, he
shall not find me unprepared or faint-hearted. Our faith hopes
for and awaits the deliverance to which it leads us. Yet as long
as we are upon earth we must attend to our daily task. And mine
shall not lie unproductive. However trifling it may seem to
others, to me it is indispensable. My soul's tears must, as it
were, have lacrymatoria made for them; I must set fires alight
for those of my dear ones that are alive, and keep my dear dead
in spiritual and corporeal urns. This is the aim and object of
the Art task to me.

Yon know that I have finished the "Legend of Saint Elizabeth"
(200 pages of score--2 and 1/2 hours' duration in performance).
In addition to this some other compositions have been produced,
such as: the "SunCanticus ("Cantico del Sole") of Saint
Franciscus"--an instrumental Evocatio in the Sistine Chapel-two
Psalms, etc. I trust you may again find us in these, in mind and
feeling.

I am now about to set myself the great task of an Oratorio on
Christ. By the 22nd October, '63, I hope to have solved the
difficulty as far as my weakness and strength will permit.

As you see, dearest Eduard, it is impossible to get out of my
head the idea of writing notes. [Notenkopfe] In spite of all good
precepts and friendly counsellors (who mean it much better by me
than I can ever understand!) I go so far as to maintain that for
several years past and in many yet to come I have not done and
shall not do anything more ingenuous than cheerfully to go on
composing. And what more harmless occupation could there be?
especially as I never force my little works upon any one, nay,
have frequently begged persons to refrain from giving certain too
unconscientious [Play on words "gewissen" and "ungewissenhaft"]
renderings of them,--and that I ask for no further appreciation
or approval than can, in fact, be granted according to taste and
disposition.

From Pest I have lately received through Baron Pronay, in the
name of the Council of the Conservatoire, an invitation to
establish my domicile there, and to promote the interests of
Hungarian music. Probably you will hear of my excusatory reply.

Between ourselves, and frankly said in plain German, it would be
of no advantage to me again to take up any outward musical
activity (such as my conductorship in Weimar which came to an end
a few years ago, and after September 1861 became a locked door to
me through my Chamberlain's key). But possibly I may later find a
fitting opportunity for composing something for Hungary. After
the precedent of the "Gran Mass" I might, for instance, on some
extraordinary occasion, be entrusted, say, with a "Te Deum" or
something of the kind. I would gladly do my best, and only on
some such terms could I regard my return to Hungary as becoming.

Meanwhile remains quietly in Rome, honestly striving to do his
duty as a Christian and an artist,

Thine from his heart,

F. Liszt

Rome, November 19th (St. Elizabeth's Day), 1862



12. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

The difficulties and troubles of the musical situation of which
you speak in your last letter but one, I can, unfortunately, only
too well understand. No one is better acquainted with such
matters than I am, and hence no one is better able to appreciate
and recognise the value of your unselfish, persevering work and
efforts, which also show you so sincere in your convictions. And
one of the dark sides in my present position, dear friend, is
that I can be of so little use to you, that I am compelled to
remain in a state of passivity and forbearance that does not at
all agree with me. However, you may rely upon my readiness to
render any assistance wherever I may still be able to help.--In
accordance with your wish I shall take an early opportunity of
writing to Prince H[ohenzollern] concerning the Tonkunstler-
Verein. It is to be hoped that our amiable, noble-minded patron
will show himself no less disposed in our favor than he has done
on former occasions. And you, on your part, do not fail to
discuss with Seifriz by letter the points and modals of the
support expected. It is a pity that Bulow's proposal to hold the
next meeting of the T.K. Verein in Lowenberg has not proved
feasible. Were it likely to be broached again I should not make
any objections to it, because, in fact, the place seems to be
precisely a favorable centre at present. But, as already said, it
is not my place to express any definite opinion on the subject,
and I am entirely satisfied in leaving all that has to be done to
your judgment and foresight.

I am delighted to hear of Bulow's extraordinary success in
Leipzig, and still more so to hear of your renewed and intimate
relations with him. He is the born prototype of progress, and
noble-minded to a degree! Without his active co-operation as
director and standard-bearer a Tonkunstler-Versammlung at the
present time would at least be an anachronism.

From Wagner I lately received a letter in which he informed me of
a performance of his "Tristan" in Vienna towards the end of
January. Afterwards he intends arranging some concerts in Berlin-
-and, it seems, in St. Petersburg also. My endeavors to secure
him comfortable quarters in Weimar seem for the time being to be
useless, because of his dislike to an insignificant appointment,
and the adverse circumstances of life in a small town. Certainly
his project of drawing annually 3,000 thalers (*450 British
pounds sterling*), by some agreement between the Grand Dukes of
Weimar and Baden, is much more to the point. The question is only
whether their Highnesses will consent to it? .--.

With heartiest greetings, most sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

December 30th, 1862



13. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Herr Doctor,

The four scores of the Beethoven Symphonies, of which you advised
me in your friendly letter, reached me yesterday. My eyes are
meanwhile revelling and delighting in all the glories of the
splendid edition, and after Easter I shall set to work. Nothing
shall be wanting on my part, in the way of goodwill and industry,
to fulfil your commission to the best of my power. A pianoforte
arrangement of these creations must, indeed, expect to remain a
very poor and far-off approximation. How instil into the
transitory hammers of the Piano breath and soul, resonance and
power, fulness and inspiration, color and accent?--However I
will, at least, endeavor to overcome the worst difficulties and
to furnish the pianoforte-playing world with as faithful as
possible an illustration of Beethoven's genius.

And I must ask you, dear Herr Doctor, in order that the statement
on all the title pages--"critically revised edition"--may be
complied with, to send me--together with your new edition of the
scores of the "Pastoral," the C minor, and A major Symphonies--a
copy of my own transcriptions of them. Probably I may alter,
simplify, and correct passages--and add some fingerings. The more
intimately acquainted one becomes with Beethoven, the more one
clings to certain singularities and finds that even insignificant
details are not without their value. Mendelssohn, at whose
recommendation you formerly published my pianoforte scores of the
"Pastoral" and C minor Symphonies, took great delight in these
minutiae and niceties!--

With regard to the agreement about the A major Symphony I mean
shortly to write to Carl Haslinger, and expect that he will be
quite willing to meet my wish. [A pianoforte transcription of
this Symphony by Liszt had been published by Haslinger.]

With grateful thanks, dear Herr Doctor, I remain yours in
readiness and sincerity,

F. Liszt

Rome, March 26th, 1863

P.S.--The four Symphonies shall be finished before the end of
summer and sent to Leipzig. If you are satisfied with my work
would you entrust the arrangement of the Overtures to me when I
have finished the Symphonies--provided, of course, that you have
not made any agreement with any one else?



14. To A. W. Gottschalg in Weimar

Dear Friend,

This year my name-day fell in the middle of Easter week, on
Maundy Thursday. Your hearty letter again brought what to me is
the pleasantest news in the world. Thank you for it, and let
those know of it who share your sincere, friendly, and faithful
sentiments! First let me mention Carl Gotze, [A chorister in
Weimar (a favorite copyist of the Master's) became a musical
conductor in Magdeburg and died in 1886.] whose kindly words I
should so gladly like to answer in accordance with his wish, and
then my dear Kammer-virtuoso, Grosse. Grosses trombone no doubt
officiated brilliantly at Bulow's concert and at the performance
of Berlioz's opera! An echo of the former reached me, thanks to
your inspired notice in Brendel's paper, where I accidentally
came across a little remark which you had addressed to one of the
most estimable and graceful of German lady-singers anent my
little-heeded songs. I certainly cannot find fault with you for
showing some interest in the songs and for thus frankly
expressing your opinion. On the contrary, your sympathetic
appreciation is always welcome, amid the direct and indirect
disparagement which falls to my lot. Unfortunately, however, I
must make up my mind that only by way of an exception can I
expect to find friends for my compositions. The blame is mine;
why should one presume to feel independently, and set the
comfortable complacency of other folks at defiance?--Everything
that I have written for several years past shows something of a
pristine delinquency which is as little to be pardoned as I am
unable to alter it. This fault, it is true, is the life-nerve of
my compositions, which, in fact, can only be what they are and
nothing else.--

In the Psalms I have made some important alterations, and shall
shortly send Kahnt the manuscript. A few passages (especially the
verse "Sing us one of the songs of Zion") which had always
appeared awkward to me in the earlier version, I have now managed
to improve. At least they now pretty well satisfy my soul's ear.

The "Christus" Oratorio is progressing but slowly, owing to the
many interruptions which I have to put up with this winter. It is
to be hoped I may obtain some entire months of work during the
summer. I thirst for it.

Of the musical undertakings here you will learn the more
noteworthy events from a paper I sent to Brendel last week.
Further and fuller news about myself is meanwhile uncertain.
Probably I shall in the end not find myself able to do anything
better than to put my whole story in the musical notes that I am
incessantly writing down, but which need not either be printed or
heard.

However that may be, I remain, dear friend, in sincere affection,
yours gratefully and in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Rome, April 14th, 1863

P.S.--The Bach-Album and other music which you say you had to
send me (e.g., your arrangement of the Dante fugue if it has been
printed) please let me have through Kahnt. Enclose also a copy of
the Ave Maria for Organ.

[Figure: Musical Score Excerpt]



15. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear friend,

The last months brought so many interruptions in my work that I
still feel quite vexed about it. Easter week I had determined
should, at last, see me regularly at work again; but a variety of
duties and engagements have prevented my accomplishing this. I
must, therefore, to be true to myself and carry out my former
intention, shut myself up entirely. To find myself in a net of
social civilities is vexatious to me; my mental activity requires
absolutely to be free, without which I cannot accomplish
anything.

How things will turn out later about my proposed journey to
Germany I do not yet know. Probably my weary bones will be buried
in Rome. Till then their immovability will serve you better than
my wandering about on railways and steamboats. On the other hand,
there is but little for me to do in Germany. War is at the door;
drums and cannon will come to the fore; God protect the faith of
heroes and give victory to the righteous among humanity! .--.

Where is Wagner, and what about the performances of "Tristan",
the "Nibelungen", and the "Meistersinger" in Weimar or elsewhere?
Tell me of this. I have not written to Weimar for long, and have
also not had any news from there. My only German correspondent
(Frau von Bulow) is suffering from some eye-trouble, which has
interrupted our exchange of letters...so I am absolutely ignorant
of what is going on. The February numbers of the "Neue
Zeitschrft" are the last I have received. Your articles on
Criticism are excellent, and, indeed, nothing else was to be
expected. Give Louis Kohler my most friendly thanks for his kind
perseverance in "paving the way for my scores to receive more
kindly appreciation." The more thankless the task the more
heartily grateful do I feel to my friends.

Most sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, May 8th, 1863



16. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Weariness or something of the sort carried my thoughts back to my
"Berceuse." Various other "Berceuses" rose up in my dreams. Do
you care to join my dreams? It shall not cost you any trouble;
without touching the keyboard yourself, you will only need to
rock yourself in the sentiments that hover over them. A really
amiable and variously gifted lady will see to this. She plays the
little piece delightfully, and has promised me to let it exercise
its charms upon you. I shall, therefore, ere long send you a copy
of the new version of the "Berceuse" addressed "to the Princess
Marcelline Czartoryska, Klostergasse 4." [A pupil of Chopin's]
Wend yourway thither--and, in case you do not find the Princess
at home, leave the manuscript with your card. I have already told
her of your contemplated visit, and have spoken of you as my
heart's kinsman and friend. You will find the Princess Cz.
possessed of a rare and fine understanding, the most charming
figure in society, and a kindly and enthusiastic worshipper of
Mozart, Beethoven, and Chopin, and, above all this, the
illuminating faith of the Catholic Church reflected in Polish
blood.

"Patria in Religione et Religio in patria" might be the motto of
Poland. God protect the oppressed!

One other commission for the Princess Cz. please undertake for
me. During her residence here she on several occasions expressed
the wish to become acquainted with some of my compositions (to
which, whether intentionally or not, she had hitherto not paid
much attention). I played with her my arrangement of the
Symphonic Poems for 2 pianofortes--the "Heroide funebre,"
"Tasso," and the "Preludes"--which she received with kindly and
courteous tolerance. Without desiring more--for ample experience
has taught me that my compositions more readily rouse
estrangement than attraction--I should, nevertheless, like the
musical threads of our pleasant relations not to be entirely
dropped, and wish therefore to present her, first of all, with
various pieces of music by way of making amends. In the badly
stocked music shops of Rome I could not find anything suited to
her talent, and promised to ask your help in the matter. I beg
you, therefore, dearest Eduard, to get the following works simply
and neatly bound in one volume (in the following order), and to
present them soon to the Princess Cz.:--

1. "Glanes de Woronice" (Leipzig, Kistner).
2. "Melodies de Chopin", transcrites par Liszt (Berlin,
Schlesinger).
3. "Mazurka" (Senff, Leipzig).
4. "2 Polonaises" (idem).
5. "2 Ballades" (1 and 2. Kistner, Leipzig.)
6. "Consolations" (Hartel, Leipzig).

If the volume is not too thick with the above you might add the
"Valse melancolique" and "Romanesca" (second edition of
Haslinger). Of course let all this, contents and binding, be put
down to my account, and given to the Princess-artist as a present
from me. If the pieces cannot be procured in Vienna, order them
speedily from Leipzig through Haslinger or Spina.

A propos of Spina: has the arrangement for 2 pianofortes of my
orchestral setting of Schubert's magnificent C major "Fantasia"
not yet been published? This delay, or, more properly, this
remissness, is by no means a pleasant matter to me. With all my
heart, thine,

F. Liszt

Rome, May 22nd, 1863



17. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I had to remain in bed all last week--and am still pretty weak on
my legs. But there is nothing further wrong: my head is free
again; the rest can be imagined. The day after tomorrow I quit my
rooms in the Via Felice and move to Monte Mario (an hour's
distance from the city). Father Theimer is kind enough to allow
me to occupy his apartments in the almost uninhabited house of
the Oratorian. The view is indescribably grand. I mean now, at
last, to try and lead a natural kind of life. I hope I may
succeed in approaching more closely to my monastico-artistic
ideal...Meanwhile you may laugh at me about it. In my next letter
I will tell you where to address me.

Pastor Landmesser will bring you further news about me to
Leipzig, before the end of July, on his way back to Dantzig. I
shall get him to take you the manuscript of the Psalms (of which
I spoke to you). They are now ready for publication, and will not
disgrace Kahnt's house of business.

The corrected copy of the Faust Symphony, too, I will send you by
this opportunity, for Schuberth.

With regard to performances of my works generally, my disposition
and inclination are more than ever completely in the negative. My
friends, and you more especially, dearest friend, have done their
part in this respect fully and in the kindest manner. It seems to
me now high time that I should be somewhat forgotten, or, at
least, placed very much in the background. My name has been too
frequently spoken of; many have taken umbrage at this, and been
uselessly annoyed at it. While "paving the way for a better
appreciation," it might be advisable to regard my things as a
reserve corps, and to introduce new works by other composers.

This will sufficiently intimate that the "Legend of St.
Elizabeth" may quietly go on slumbering in my paper-box. As may
also the work upon which I am now engaged, and which to my regret
is making but very slow progress, owing to the many interruptions
which perpetually plague me.

Should any one of the programmes be filled with one of my
compositions, it would be best to select one of those already
published, in order that, at all events, the publisher's approval
may, in some measure, be held up to view.

In my opinion you have made a good choice in Porges. The young
man is reliable, intelligent, and capable of inspiration, and
what he may still lack in skilfulness he will easily acquire. The
essential point in a task of this kind is a modest, honest, and
not too dry effort. What I have heard and know of Porges makes me
feel assured that he will best fulfil the various demands made by
the editorial office.

What is one to think of the marvels which Pohl has brought back
from Lowenberg? I haven't sufficient imagination to form any
clear idea about them from the preliminary hints you communicated
to me. Let me have a fuller report, therefore, if you think that,
under certain conditions, I should mix myself up with the matter.
And also tell me frankly, without periphrase, what the Musik-
Verein wishes and expects from the patronage of the Grand Duke of
Weimar?--One ought not to shoot about at random with Royal
Highnesses! It would only lead to a vexatious loss of powder.

How is Kap[ellmeister] Wehner? Is he still in his King's good
graces? [He was in the service of the King of Hanover; and is
long since dead.] Kapellmeister Bernhard Scholz was here last
month--but he did not honor me with a visit.

Today's post has brought me some very friendly lines from my
worthy precentor Gottschalg in Tieffurt. He tells me of a concert
in Denstedt, where several pieces of mine were performed--among
others one of the Psalms (which I shall shortly send to Kahnt by
Landmesser, an essentially improved version); they were sung by
Fraulein Genast. This lady, so Gottschalg writes, is to be
married today. Do you know to whom? I am so entirely cut off from
all my Weimar connection that I had not heard anything about
this. But as I still retain a very friendly recollection of this
excellent lady-exponent of my songs, I beg you, dear friend, to
let me have her new name and to tell me whether her husband
resides in Weimar or elsewhere.

I am perfectly satisfied with my new abode at Monte Mario.--
Pastor Landmesser will give you a description of it--and perhaps
I may find a photograph of the place--if not I shall order one
for you later.

Your sincerely devoted

F. Liszt

Rome, June 18th, 1863



18. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

You will receive these lines in the lovely Sondershausen Park.
One gladly accustoms oneself to the place, and the admirable
performances of the Loh-concerts--I derive the word from "Lohe"
[flame]--give the atmosphere a certain spiritual stimulus. My
friendly greetings to Stein--and present my warm thanks to the
courageous orchestra, which has not been scandalised by the
"Symphonic Poems"! . . .

The parcel from Kahnt reached me safely a few days after your
letter (of 26th June). Mililotti [Director of the Classical Music
Association in Rome; he had requested Professor Riedel to send
him the programmes of his concerts.] intends writing to Riedel to
thank him for his kindness in forwarding his programmes. When
Mililotti's concerts prove more of a success he may, by way of a
return, send his Roman programmes to Leipzig. But at present the
musical doings here are of but small interest to other countries.

By sending me the score edition of "Mignon" and "Loreley" Kahnt
has given me peculiar pleasure. It seems to me correct, and I am
foolish enough to find the instrumentation pretty. By the way,
other instrumental settings occur to me: those of several of
Schubert's songs ("Erlking," "Gretchen," "The Young Nun," and a
few others) that I wrote for Fraulein Genast. They are not mere
manufactured arrangements, and might not altogether displease
musicians of fine feeling. The manuscript of the scores was left
with Seifriz in Lowenberg. If any publisher should feel inclined
to accept them they are at his disposal. .--.

In answer to an important point in your letter, I quite agree
about presenting the Grand Duke of Weimar with a Report
describing the object and aims of the Allgemeine Deutsche Musik-
Verein. And on this occasion H.R.H. should be respectfully and
graciously invited to address an appeal to his illustrious
relatives to take some interest in the progress and success of
the Association; in plain language, to strengthen his
protectorship by letters of recommendation, or in some other way.
In presenting the Report (which might most appropriately be
undertaken by Pohl and Regierungsrath Muller) the Grand Duke or
His Excellency Count Beust might be addressed directly by word of
mouth, and be distinctly given to understand the desirability of
obtaining the sympathy of the Grand Duchess, the Queen of
Prussia, the King of Holland, T.R.H. the Grand Duchesses Helene
and Marie (of Russia), the Grand Duke Peter of Oldenburg (in St.
Petersburg), the Grand Duke and Grand Duchess of Baden, the
Hereditary Prince of Meiningen, the Dukes of Altenburg and
Coburg, etc. I give these names because, owing to their near
relationship with the Grand Duke and their own personal fondness
for music, they should stand first as patrons and supporters of
the Allgemeine Deutsche Musik-Verein.

Gladly would I have undertaken the duties of diplomatist to the
Association in Weimar, and endeavored to obtain the Grand Duke's
active intervention...But at this distance I cannot, for the time
being, accomplish anything. My gracious Master has no leisure for
lectures on artistic subjects that I might concoct in the Eternal
City; and if I tried to enlighten him in any such way his first
and only word in reply would be "Why does not Liszt come back, in
place of writing such allotria?" [Observations beside the mark.]-
-A short time ago I received from him a very kind, monitory
letter, calling upon me to return to Weimar for the Kunstler-
Versammlung in August. .--. I would advise you to make use of
your stay at Sondershausen by getting an introduction to the
Prince, and by obtaining his support as regards the Musik-Verein.
Discuss this matter with Stein, for he is best able to attend to
it. Possibly a larger performance in the Loh might be got up for
the benefit of the Association. .--.

This letter is so filled up with Royal Highnesses, Majesties, and
illustrious personages, that it offers me a natural transition to
tell you of an extraordinary, nay, incomparable honor I received
last Saturday evening, the 11th of July. His Holiness Pope Pius
IX. visited the Church of the Madonna del Rosario, and hallowed
my apartments with his presence. After having given His Holiness
a small proof of my skill on the harmonium and on my work-a-day
pianino, he addressed a few very significant words to me in the
most gracious manner possible, admonishing me to strive after
heavenly things in things earthly, and by means of my harmonies
that reverberated and then passed away to prepare myself for
those harmonies that would reverberate everlastingly.--His
Holiness remained a short half-hour; Monsign. de Merode and
Hohenlohe were among his suite--and the day before yesterday I
was granted an audience in the Vatican (the first since I came
here), and the Pope presented me with a beautiful cameo of the
Madonna.--

I must add one other princely personage to this letter, and with
this I am obliged to close. A visit at this very moment is
announced from the Principe della Rocca, who has driven up with
his photographic apparatus. You shall, therefore, ere long have a
little picture of the Madonna del Rosario which, since the Pope's
visit here, has been the talk of Rome.

A thousand hearty greetings.

F. L.

July 18th, 1863



19. To Breitkopf and Hartel.

Rome, August 28th, 1863

My Dear Sir,

The work that you were good enough to entrust to me is almost
finished, and by the same post you will receive the Piano score
of 8 Symphonies of Beethoven, whilst awaiting the 9th, which I
propose to send you with the proofs of the preceding ones. Nos.
1, 2, 3, 4, and 8 are bound in one volume; there is only the
"Funeral March" from the "Eroica Symphony" wanting, which is
published in the Beethoven-Album by Mechetti, Vienna. I shall
require to see this arrangement again (which you will oblige me
by sending with the next proofs), for probably I shall make
numerous corrections and modifications in it, as I have done in
the Symphonies in C minor, in A, and the "Pastoral," which were
edited some twenty years ago. The copies of these are returned to
you today with a great many alterations, errata and addenda,
inasmuch as--in order to satisfy my own criticism--I have been
obliged to apply to them the torture of red pencil and gum, and
to submit them to a very considerable alteration.

Whilst initiating myself further in the genius of Beethoven, I
trust I have also made some little progress in the manner of
adapting his inspirations to the piano, as far as this instrument
admits of it; and I have tried not to neglect to take into
account the relative facility of execution while maintaining an
exact fidelity to the original. Such as this arrangement of
Beethoven's Symphonies actually is, the pupils of the first class
in the Conservatoires will be able to play them off fairly well
on reading them at sight, save and except that they will succeed
better in them by working at them, which is always advisable.
What study is deserving of more care and assiduity than that of
these chefs d'oeuvre? The more one gives oneself to them the more
one will profit by them, firstly in relation to the sense and
aesthetic intelligence, and then also in relation to the
technical skill and the attaining of perfection in virtuosity--of
which one should only despise the bad use that is sometimes made.

By the title of Pianoforte score (which must be kept, and
translated into German by Clavier-Partitur or Pianoforte-
Partitur?) I wish to indicate my intention of associating the
spirit of the performer with the orchestral effects, and to
render apparent, in the narrow limits of the piano, sonorous
sounds and different nuances. With this in view I have frequently
noted down the names of the instruments: oboe, clarinet, kettle-
drums, etc., as well as the contrasts of strings and wind
instruments. It would certainly be highly ridiculous to pretend
that these designations suffice to transplant the magic of the
orchestra to the piano; nevertheless I don't consider them
superfluous. Apart from some little use they have as instruction,
pianists of some intelligence may make them a help in
accentuating and grouping the subjects, bringing out the chief
ones, keeping the secondary ones in the background, and--in a
word--regulating themselves by the standard of the orchestra.

In order to be perfectly satisfied with regard to my work allow
me, my dear sir, to beg you to let Mr. Ferdinand David and
Monsieur Moscheles see it before it is printed. The minute
familiarity they have acquired with the Symphonies of Beethoven
will show them in a moment any errors, oversights, faults and
misdeeds of which I, very unwittingly, may have been guilty. Will
you please assure them that any information from them in these
respects will be most valuable to me, and that I shall not fail
to profit by it for the honor of your edition. In particular I
should like to know from Mr. David whether the N.B. placed on
page 78 of the manuscript (Finale of the 8th Symphony--"the
execution of the principal figure, etc.") is authorised,--and I
should be very grateful to him for any other particulars he is
kind enough to give me. As to Mr. Moscheles, I hope he will not
disapprove of my having followed his example in putting a profuse
fingering for the greater ease of the mass of performers; but
perhaps he would be so kind as to suggest a better fingering
himself, and to let me know his observations upon such and such
an artifice of "piano arrangement" of which he is a consummate
master. There is only one point on which I would venture even to
an act of rebellion--it is that of the pedals, a bass [base]
passion of which I cannot correct myself, no matter how annoying
the reproaches it may draw upon me!--["Even if one may
presuppose," he writes on another occasion (27th August, 1861) to
Breitkopf and Hartel, "a correct use of the pedal on the part of
piano-players, I am nevertheless, through manifold unpleasant
experiences to my ears, brought back to giving the most minute
indications of it."]

If, as I venture to flatter myself, my arrangement of the
Symphonies satisfies you, I should be tempted to propose to you,
for next year, a similar work on the Quartets, those magnificent
jewels in Beethoven's crown which the piano-playing public has
not yet appropriated in a measure suitable to its musical
culture.

But I really fear to exhaust your patience by giving you proofs
of mine...consider therefore this project of the Quartets as not
having been proposed if it seems to you inopportune, and pray
accept, my dear sir, the expression of my very sincere and
devoted sentiments.

F. Liszt

(Monte Mario, Madonna del Rosario)

P.S.--As it has been impossible for me to hunt out here a copyist
who will fulfil the conditions that may reasonably be exacted
(the one whom I employed pretty much last year divides his time
between the prison and the public-house!), I am compelled to send
you the manuscript such as it is, with many apologies for its
badly written appearance. To make a fair copy of it someone with
plenty of experience is needed; and I can safely recommend you
such an one in Mr. Carl Gotze ("Member or Vice-director of the
theater chorus") at Weimar. He is accustomed of old to my
writing, and would make the copy of the Symphonies with
intelligence and care.

N.B.--A copy of the Orchestral Score of the Symphonies will be a
great help to the work of the copyist of my manuscript, for
exactness in nuances, division of parts and indication of the
instruments.

In any case it will be necessary for me to revise the final
proofs. .--.

Let me add, in conclusion, that I shall be glad to receive, with
the proofs or even sooner, a copy of my "Etudes d'execution
transcendante," and also those "d'apres Paganini" (Breitkopf and
Hartel edition), which I have promised to give to an excellent
pianist here, Mr. Sgambati, who is most capable of playing them
well in public;--and, besides these, a copy of my "Ave Maria"
(for chorus with Organ accompaniment) which is shortly to be
performed here.



20. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

This morning I sent off manuscripts and corrections to Hartel and
Schuberth--and thus had to write the word Leipzig several times.
It struck me as a reproach as regards yourself, and I mean
forthwith to get rid of it. You shall not hear of me through
others without having the trouble of reading my own bad
handwriting yourself. I have not, however, anything very special
to relate. The summer has passed quietly and I have not wandered
abroad much; have, in fact, been pretty constantly sitting at my
work. My abode continues to suit me more and more, so I intend to
spend the winter here. You no doubt received with my last letter
the photograph of the "Madonna del Rosario." Unfortunately I
cannot send you a picture of the grand, truly sublime view that
can be enjoyed from every window. So you must imagine it to
embrace all Rome, the wondrous Canmpagna, and all the past and
present glories of the district.

For some time past I have had no other news of you than your
excellent articles on "artistic individuality," etc., in which,
among many other right and fine observations, I was specially
pleased with the axiom: "The artistic temperament, when genuine,
corrects itself in consequence of the change of contrasts." May
it prove so in my case;--this much is certain,--that in the
tiresome business of self-correction few have to labor as I have,
as the process of my mental development, if not checked, is at
all events rendered peculiarly difficult by a variety of
coincidences and contingencies. A clever man, some twenty years
ago, made the not inapplicable remark to me: "You have in reality
three individuals to deal with in yourself, and they all run one
against the other; the sociable salon-individual, the virtuoso
and the thoughtfully-creative composer. If you manage one of them
properly, you may congratulate yourself."--Vedremo! [We shall
see!]

Weitzmann's "Carnival in Rome towards the Middle of the
Seventeenth Century," I read with great pleasure in the "Neue
Zeitschrift." It is a pleasant, lively sketch, spiced with
learning but without pedantic lead. Did a very remarkable
"History of the Pianoforte," etc., by the same author, appear in
your paper? Frau von Bulow wrote to me lately that Hans is busy
with some essays for the N. Z. Probably he is writing a review of
Weitzmann's "History of the Pianoforte," which would be most
appropriate; if this is not the case I would advise you to get
one of your staff to undertake the work and to give several
quotations from it. The confounded pianoforte has its
unmistakable significance, were it only because of the general
abuse to which it is put!--In honor of Hartel's edition of
Beethoven I have been occupying myself again with studies and
experiments in pianoforte pieces. The arrangements of the 8
Beethoven Symphonies which I am about to send to Leipzig are, I
trust, successful. They cost me more trouble, in attempts of
various sorts, in corrections, eliminations and additions, than I
had anticipated. As we grow old we deliberate more and are less
readily satisfied...

To Schuberth I have sent the corrections of the 2-pianoforte
arrangement of the "Faust Symphony," together with a pretty,
tuneful arrangement of the "Preludes" by Herr Klauser (of New
York), and was thus induced to play the hackneyed piece through
again, to touch up the closing movement and give it new
figuration. In the hands of a skilful player it will prove
brilliantly effective.

But enough of all this pianoforte stuff! I feel forced to set to
work again in blackening score-sheets--and first of all the
"Christus Oratorio" shall be proceeded with.--Write and tell me
whether Kahnt is publishing the two Psalms which Pastor
Landmesser took him, and advise him to request Herr von Bulow to
revise the last proofs. There is nothing more vexatious to me
than careless editions, full of errors, such as Schuberth would
like to have if one gave free reins to his good nature! From the
Committee of the Association for the Completion of Cologne
Cathedral I have received an invitation to the Festival arranged
for the 14th and 15th October. The letter reminds me, in the most
courteous terms, that in the year '42 I had the honor of being a
member of the Council. I had not forgotten this peculiar
distinction; but the worthy gentlemen seem absolutely not to have
considered how my activity could now appropriately be of service,
and they wisely guard against mentioning any of my ecclesiastical
compositions, although it might have occurred to them that I
could manage something in that species of music. However, the
worthy Committee find the old story of the "period of my
brilliancy," and the "bewitching strains I drew from the keys,"
etc., more voluble and convenient. Besides which some small sum
would have to be forthcoming were I to agree in considering
myself what the good folks would like to consider me. Fortunately
the determination of my work does not lie in their hands, and on
account of this very evident conviction I answered their
communication most courteously, modestly referring to my present
occupation in Rome, and enclosing an extract from one of the
Hymns of St. Ambrosius, from the Liturgy of the "Three Holy
Kings," an incident intimately connected with Cologne Cathedral.
At the same time I feel satisfied that I have not shown any
intention to give annoyance, and declared myself as perfectly
content to fulfil my duties as an honorary member of the Council,
in quietude, by composing a work specially for the Cathedral
(which I shall not fail to do), but without laying the slightest
claim to the sympathy--much less to the patronage--of the worthy
gentlemen of Cologne.--I flatter myself that I am not in the bad
graces of the Three Holy Kings, consequently do not need to
trouble myself about the rest of the Cologne folk!

Now my Leipzig parcels can be despatched with an easy mind.

With heartiest greetings,

Yours devotedly,

F. Liszt

September 7th, 1863

Monte Mario (Madonna del Rosario)

P.S.--Sgambati, an excellent Roman pianist, wishes to study my A
major Concerto. Schott has as yet omitted to send me the
complimentary-copy of this piece, to which I am entitled, so I
beg you to enclose in Kahnt's next sending a duplicate copy
(arranged for 2 pianofortes, as there can be no thought of an
orchestral performance of it here). From Hartel I have also
ordered for Sgambati and Bach [This is no doubt meant for Bache.]
my Etudes, the Paganini ones, and my "Ave Maria" (chorus-score
and voice parts, for a performance at the Classical Concerts
conducted by Mililotti). It would be advisable, owing to the
expense of forwarding music, to send the things all in one
parcel; please be kind enough to suggest this to Hartel, and to
get the 3 opus from him, and I do not wish to have to wait beyond
the end of October for them. Gottschalg will soon have some copy
to send me which might come at the same time.



21. To Justizrath Dr. Gille of Jena

Dear friend,

I trust you will forgive my long silence. I could not excuse
myself in any other way than by a worse lamentation about the
variety of circumstances, moods and occupations that have more
and more encouraged my habitual dislike to letter-writing. Unless
some definite object demands it of me, I do not write to any one
in Germany, with the exception of Bulow, my cousin Eduard in
Vienna, and Brendel, to whom I am very grateful for the kindness
with which he looks after the more important details connected
with my musical affairs. As regards my Weimar friends, my
inclination to communicate with them is spoilt by my imagining
that they would as gladly see me among them as I should feel at
home among them. And as I cannot write to them and say: "I am
coming to remain with you," I get more and more silent.

My stay in Rome is not an accidental one; it denotes, as it were,
the third part--(probably the close) of my life, which is often
troubled, but ever industrious and striving upwards. Hence I
require ample time to bring various long works and myself to a
good ending. This requisite I find in my retirement here, which
will probably become even more emphatic; and my present monastic
abode provides me not only with the most glorious view over all
Rome, the Campagna and the mountains, but also what I had longed
for; quiet from without and peacefulness.--Enclosed is a
photograph of the "Madonna del Rosario," as an illustration to
the notices that have lately appeared in the newspapers in
connection with the Holy Father's visit here.

Your friendly lines came strangely in conjunction with the
"Dettingen Te Deum" to which you refer, and which I was playing
through at the very moment your letter was handed to me. A very
amiable English lady delighted me a little while ago by
presenting me with the praiseworthy London edition-"Novello's
Centenary Edition"--of the Oratorios of Handel, Haydn,
Mendelssohn, etc. (and all sold at from 1 to 3 shillings each);
these works are always welcome society to me. The number
containing the "Dettingen Te Deum" also contains the "Coronation
Anthem" (composed in 1741). "Zadok the priest, and Nathan the
prophet, anointed Solomon King." [This sentence is written in
English by Liszt.]

The commencement is wonderfully grand and powerful, like the
Bible itself.--

However notwithstanding all my admiration for Handel, my
preference for Bach still holds good, and when I have edified
myself sufficiently with Handel's common chords, I long for the
precious dissonances of the Passion, the B minor Mass, and other
of Bach's polyphonic wares.

Remember me kindly to your wife, and with heartiest greetings to
M. Gille, junior, I am Your sincerely attached

F. Liszt

Rome, September 10th [1863]

(Monte Mario, Madonna Del Rosario.)

Do not omit in your next letter to tell me something about your
musical Jubilee in Jena.



22. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I am deep in my work. The more we sow a field the more it
spreads. One would need to live to the age of a Methuselah to
accomplish anything plentiful!

Your letters, unlike so many others, are always so welcome, and I
thank you most sincerely for all the goodness, kindness, honesty
and warmth of feeling that the continuance of our friendship
brings with it. For even though you may not always be able to
communicate pleasant or enjoyable news, still things disagreeable
I can tolerate more readily from you, because of your ever
moderate and characteristically steadfast interpretation. The
experience you had lately to make with Y.Z. I regret sincerely,
and would gladly make you some compensation for a loss that is as
unexpected as it is unfortunate. But I am sorry to say I do not
know of any one who would exactly suit you. There is truly a
great dearth of men [Menschen] in this world! When they are put
to the test they prove themselves useless. My ten years' service
in Weimar gave me abundant proof of this!

Probably you will just have to drag on with your contributors,
till we finally get into smoother water again. It is more than
three months since I received any numbers of the Neue Zeitschr.;
do not forget to enclose the numbers in the next sending
(together with the music I want from Hartel), and address always
to "Madonna del Rosario (of which a photograph herewith), Monte
Mario--Rome."

Kahnt's willingness to publish the score of the two Psalms is
very flattering to me. He shall have the manuscript soon, and I
should like to enclose the instrumentation of the Songs from
Wilhelm Tell. Should a convenient opportunity occur some kindly-
disposed singer might be found to bring them into notice (perhaps
Schnorr?). The instrumental-fabric is not plain or ordinary, and
enhances the effect of the vocal part. My critical ex-colleague
Stor praised it formerly when performed at one of the Court-
Concerts at which Caspari sang the songs,--and since then I have
added some dainty little bits. One must praise oneself,
especially when others too often fail in doing so!--

With regard to the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, it seems to me that
the choice of Leipzig is most advantageous for the purpose at
present, and I would advise you to adhere to this. In the course
of the winter we will have an "exchange of thoughts" ("un echange
d'idees," as Prince Gortschakoff is ever saying) about the
programme and arrangements, and this will assuredly lead to more
harmonious results than the Russian notes. Fortunately we do not
need to quarrel about the extent of the treaties of 1815!

Hearty greetings from your sincerely devoted

F. Liszt

October 10th, 1863

P.S.--About six weeks ago there appeared in the Leipzig
"Illustrirte Zeitung" a biographical notice of F. Liszt, together
with a portrait. Let me have the number, and tell me who wrote
the article.

.--. Has anything new in the way of scores or pianoforte pieces
been published that is likely to interest me? Here people speak
of Mendelssohn and even Weber as novelties!



23. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Herewith, dear Madame, are a few lines that I beg you to forward
to Madame Ritter (mere), as I do not know where to address to
her. [She had lost her daughter Emilie, the sister of Carl and
Alexander Ritter.]

The melancholy familiarity with death that I have perforce
acquired during these latter years does not in the least weaken
the grief which we feel when our dear ones leave this earth. If
at the sight of the opening graves I thrust back despair and
blasphemy, it is that I may weep more freely, and that neither
life nor death shall be able to separate me from the communion of
love.--

She whom we are mourning was especially dear to me. Her bodily
weakness had perfected the intuitive faculties in her. She took
her revenge inwardly and lived in the beyond...At our first
meeting I thought I should meet her again. It was at Zurich at
Wagner's, whose powerful and splendid genius she so deeply felt.
During several weeks she always took my arm to go into the salle
a manger at the hour of dinner and supper,--and she spread a
singular charm of amenity, of sweet and conciliatory affection in
that home to which a certain exquisite degree of intimacy was
wanting. She possessed in a rare degree the secret of making her
presence agreeable and harmonious. Everything in her, even to her
very silence, was comprehensive, for she seemed to understand, or
rather to determine the thoughts which words render in only an
unformed manner, and worked them out in her noble heart.

May her soul live for ever in the fulness of the light and peace
of God!--

Very cordially yours,

F. Liszt

October 15th, 1863

(Madonna Del Rosario, Monte Mario.)

Pray excuse my delay in these few lines. It was only yesterday
that I learned your address through Mr. Sgambati.



24. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Kahnt's last sending that reached me last week brought me much
that I found pleasant and encouraging in the numbers of the Neue
Zeitschrift. I could verily not have imagined that so mild and
kindly a ray of light could have been shed over my compositions
discussed there, as is given under cipher 8. Let me know who
writes under cipher 8--I promise not to divulge the secret--and
meanwhile present my as yet unknown reviewer with my sincerest
thanks for his appreciation of my nature, which he manifests in
so kind and sympathetic a manner in his commentary to the
"Seligkeiten" [Beatitudes] and the instrumentation of "Mignon's
Song." [The review was written by Heinrich Porges.] He has formed
the most correct estimate of my endeavors by pointing to the
result, namely, to throw life into the truly Catholic, universal
and immortal spirit--hence to develop it--and to raise the
"culture that has been handed down to us from the remote Middle
Ages, out of the heavy atmosphere of the monasteries and, as it
were, to weave it into the life-giving ether of the free spirit
pervading the universe."

I also perfectly agree with the extremely applicable close of the
same article: "Our age has not yielded its right to feel itself
connected with the Infinite," and I intend to set to work in
earnest to comply, as far as possible, with the kindly
expectations of my reviewer. His reference to my Psalms leads me
to wish that I might soon see the four Psalms published in score
(they are very diverse, both as regards feeling and musical
form). Kahnt's willingness to publish them is, therefore, welcome
news to me, and I beg he will give me a proof of his goodwill by
kindly having them ready for next Easter's sale.

He can settle everything about the form and equipment "al suo
commodo" (as people say here).

Still the Psalms should be published in the same form, and should
Kahnt decide upon retaining the form of the Prometheus score (as
he writes to me) I shall be quite content and satisfied. The day
after tomorrow I shall send him the instrumentation of the 23rd
and 137th Psalms together with the score of the 13th. The latter
is one of those I have worked out most fully, and contains two
fugue movements and a couple of passages which were written with
tears of blood. Were any one of my more recent works likely to be
performed at a concert with orchestra and chorus, I would
recommend this Psalm. Its poetic subject welled up plenteously
out of my soul; and besides I feel as if the musical form did not
roam about beyond the given tradition. It requires a lyrical
tenor; while singing he must be able to pray, to sigh and lament,
to become exalted, pacified and biblically inspired.--Orchestra
and chorus, too, have great demands made upon them. Superficial
or ordinarily careful study would not suffice...

Pardon me, dear friend, for having troubled you to such an extent
with marginal comments to my manuscripts. I will only add that I
should be glad to see the short Choral Psalm for men's voices
("The Heavens declare the glory of God") printed in time for the
Easter's sale, in score-form from the copy I left Kahnt before I
went away;--and now to return to the Articles in the Neue
Zeitschrift, I feel specially grateful, in the first place, for
the communications concerning the Hungarian orchestra in Breslau.

To hear again of my Ex-Chamber-Virtuoso Josy in so friendly a way
pleased me extremely, and I beg you to send my sincerest thanks
to the author of the article for having so carefully studied my
Rhapsodies and the less well-known book (not to speak of the
erroneous interpretation it has had to endure at other hands!) on
"Hungarian Gipsy Music"; at the same time will you beg him to
accept the enclosed photograph of my humble self, in return for
the one he gave Josy?

[An extremely musical gipsy boy of this name was presented to
Liszt in Paris in 1844 by Count Sandor Teleki. Liszt's endeavors
to train the boy as an artist failed, however, owing to the
impossibility of accustoming the child of nature to engage in
earnest study, as Liszt himself relates in "Die Zigeuner und ihre
Musik in Ungarn" [The Gipsies and their Music in Hungary] (Ges.
Schriften, Bd, vi.)]

In your next let me have some account of the position and work of
this worthy Breslau correspondent, for I have not before met with
anything from his pen in the Neue Zeitschrift. I herewith send
you a second photograph of my present abode, "Madonna del
Rosario," as the first one went astray, but to prevent a like
accident in the post I shall register this letter.

Bulow's searches into and out of the subject are splendid, and
his farewell words in memory of Fischl show the noblest beat of
heart. When are the articles on Offenbach, etc., from the same
intellectual region, to appear?...I am curious also to see what
news there will be of the Berlin Orchestral concerts, instituted
and conducted by Bulow.

You mention cursorily some new programme-form concerning which
"you rather flatter yourself." Tell me more about this and send
me a few of the programmes.

From Pohl I lately received a very cordial letter which I
answered forthwith. His Vorschlag zur Gute, etc., in the N. Z. I
have not yet read, and this is the case with many other articles
in the last numbers, which, however, I mean ere long to overtake.
In spite of my retirement and seclusion I am still very much
disturbed by visitors, duties of politeness, musical proteges--
and wearisome, mostly useless correspondence and obligations.
Among other things the St. Petersburg Philharmonic Society has
invited me, during the Lent season, to direct two of their
concerts, giving performances of my own compositions. The letter
certainly reads somewhat more rationally than that of the Cologne
Cathedral Committee (of which, I told you); but the good folks
can nevertheless not refrain from referring to the trash about
"my former triumphs, unrivalled mastery as a pianist," etc., and
this is utterly sickening to me--like so much stale, lukewarm
champagne. Committee gentlemen and others should verily feel
somewhat ashamed of their inane platitudes, in thus unwarrantably
speaking to my discredit by reminding me of a standpoint I
occupied years ago and have long since passed.--Only one Musical
Association can boast of forming an honorable exception to this
since my departure from Germany, namely the Society "Zelus pro
Domo Dei," in Amsterdam, which, in consequence of the approval
and performance of my Gran Mass last week, has conferred on me
their diploma by appointing me an honorary member, in addition to
a very kind letter written in a becoming tone.

The diploma is headed: "Roomsch Catholiek Kerkmusiek Collegie,"
and the Society was founded in 1691.

For your wife's amusement and as a piece of French reading I send
a copy of my answers to the letters from St. Petersburg and
Amsterdam. When you have read them please send both copies to my
daughter in Berlin, as an addition to her small collection of my
miscellaneous correspondence.

Most cordial greetings.--Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

November 11th, 1863



25. To Breitkopf And Hartel

Dear Sirs,

.--. Pray present my kindest thanks to Conzertmeister David for
his consent to the N.B. in the Finale of the 8th Symphony. The
method of execution, as indicated, was the one important question
to me; by the satisfactory solution of this I am now perfectly
content, and it is pleasant to me, therefore, to be able to agree
to your wish to undertake the publication of the 9 piano-scores
forthwith, without asking advice elsewhere. My former request on
this subject was meant only to serve as a proof of my sincerest
conscientiousness; as soon as you consider it superfluous let it
be so.

Your letter also settles the copyist-difficulty. Still,
notwithstanding all the model-works that issue from the House of
Breitkopf and Hartel, I could scarcely expect that the printers
would worry over my bad musical writing, that is rendered even
more indistinct by my numerous erasures and corrections--and for
this reason I recommended Herr Carl Gotze of Weimar by way of
help; he is very quick at deciphering my untidy manuscripts. But
of the best copyists it may be said "Better none," to use
Beethoven's words in pronouncing his verdict upon Malzel's
metronome.

Permit me therefore, dear sirs, to reduce all these preliminaries
and details to the simplest form, by giving you absolute power
concerning the publication of the 9 Symphonies--provided that the
last proofs are sent to me for revision.

While awaiting the Beethoven scores (Quartets, Egmont, and
"Christ on the Mount of Olives") I send you my best thanks in
advance, and shall hope to send you later a specimen of my small
savoir-faire in the matter of Quartet arrangements to look at. If
it should meet with your approval I would gladly, next summer,
proceed in working out a former pet idea of mine; to make
pianoforte transcriptions of Beethoven's Quartets "for the home
circle," and, as it were, to make them a link in the Master's
catena aurea, between his Sonatas and Symphonies.--No
considerations in the way of honorarium need form any hindrance
to this project, especially as in such matters not the smallest
difficulty has ever arisen in our relations with one another,
which have now lasted over 20 years. Besides, the way and manner
you accept my proposal offers the best prospect for its
realisation, to our mutual satisfaction in tempore opportuno.

.--. I beg you, dear sirs, to accept my sincere thanks as well as
the assurance of my respectful attachment.

F. Liszt

Rome, November 16th, 1863

(Monte Mario, Madonna Del Rosario.)



26. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

By way of excusing my delay in writing I must tell you at once of
an indisposition, which during Christmas week prevented my
undertaking any other occupation or amusement than that of
keeping in bed. For several weeks after that there were other
things, entirely unconnected with musical doings and affairs,
which, however, urgently demanded attention. Your admirable New
Year's letter I received yesterday. It perfectly confirms my
opinion of the state of affairs (as became clear to me long
since), and my agreement with you as regards our "Debit and
Credit." The latter, unfortunately, does not show the right
equilibrium--but must be made to do so. In the first place three
points have to be secured; and to save useless explanations
between us, I shall describe these in geographical style, under
the names of Weimar, Lowenberg, Carlsruhe. They at present
embrace and solve all the essential questions: division of work,
appointment of suitable persons, procuring adequate means, active
organisation of the Musik-Verein, etc., etc. And, granted that
you are not deceiving yourself about my very limited influence,
my personal presence and intervention would seem indispensable.
Still I will not conceal the fact that it is, at least,
inconvenient for me to leave Rome even for a short time, and
people should not object to my finding more satisfaction in my
retirement here than in the barren unpleasantries of a so-called
"circle of activity." But if, as you assure me, the question
affects the good cause, and I could really be of service to a few
dear friends,--well in that case every other consideration shall
give way and my willingness be put to the proof. Although it will
be very difficult for me to make up my mind to start, I will
towards the beginning of June have my passport vise'd for
Carlsruhe, in order that I may attend the Musical Festival there,
provided that Bulow conducts. In the intervals between the
rehearsals and performances we should discuss with active friends
the Whys and Wherefores connected with the Musik-Verein which,
first of all, requires to be placed on a firm footing. And so far
as I can assist in doing this (especially by advocating its cause
with our patron and the Hohenzollern princes) it certainly shall
be done.

Pohl seems to have put on wrong spectacles if he reads in my
letter that I have no greater wish than to return to unique
Germany! People may think about it what they please; the positive
truth is that I do not bother myself about fools of any species,
whether German, French, English, Russian or Italian, but am
peacefully industrious in my seclusion here. "Let me rest, let me
dream," not indeed beneath blossoming almond trees, as Hoffmann
sings, [A song which Liszt set to music] but comforted and at
peace under the protection of the Madonna del Rosario who has
provided me with this cell. My German friends would certainly be
acting much more reasonably were they to come and visit me here,
instead of tempting me abroad. However you may assure the rest of
my acquaintances that I will not inconvenience them with my
presence for any length of time, and that my interference at the
Musical Festival in Carlsruhe is only a temporary one and
altogether harmless. By the middle of July, at latest, I intend
to be back here again, or earlier if possible.

The Pro memoria of the A. D. Musik-Verein, addressed to the Grand
Duke, together with the protocol of the audience on the 17th of
November, I received through Gille. My thanks and reply I shall
send shortly. Likewise also the programme of a very exceptional
solemnity which takes place on the 5th February,  and which is
already engaging my attention in a variety of ways.

In all friendliness,

Your cordially devoted

F. Liszt

January 22nd, 1864

To Kahnt my best thanks for having sent the last parcel of music
correctly. Postage and dues cost over 13 Prussian thalers. By the
way, do not offend me any longer by franking your letters. I on
my part frank my letters only when I send you a letter-parcel
containing copies, etc.

Last postscript. .--. Do me the one other favor of seeing that my
enclosed answer safely reaches Herr B. I do not know his address-
-and, although we may have met in Weimar, as he once wrote to me,
I have scarcely any recollection of the fact.

Do not be vexed at the apparent presumption and vain-glory of
this last communication for today...My modesty will sufficiently
come to my rescue to prevent my putting too many feathers in my
cap! [The German proverb of which Liszt makes use is "allzugrosse
Rosinen im Kopfe tragen." Besides, thank God, I am too honest and
truth-loving to fall a victim to vanity.



27. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Excuse an intermezzo on music-publishers today. I have received
from Julius Schuberth and from Peters' Bureau de Musique
contradictory letters about some right or unrighteous edition of
my arrangement of Beethoven's "Septet". Schuberth's communication
is many-sided, the other very one-sided, but neither of them
enlightens me in the least, for it is a question of long since,
and I scarcely remember where and for whom I arranged the
"Septet", now more than 20 years ago. And although Schuberth has
given me but little cause to be satisfied with his editions,
still I should not wish to do him any injury by this piece of
business, [An untranslatable pun on the words Handel and Handel]
and hence I have not sent him any reply. For the same reason I
shall leave Peters' communication unanswered, and must get you,
dear friend, to make these two gentlemen understand that I cannot
mix myself up with any of their disputes as publishers. And in
order that you may obtain an insight into the matter I send you,
herewith, Peters' letter, with regard to which I can only say
that I have no recollection of having made a duet arrangement of
Beethoven's "Septet"...Yet this is precisely what I do not wish
to say. Let the two gentlemen settle the matter amicably between
themselves and ignore my existence altogether.

As Bulow is happily back, the programmes of the Carlsruhe Musical
Festival will now soon be finally drawn up. Remenyi, who has
played here some half-dozen times in the Teatro Argentina with
extraordinary success, has a decided inclination to appear at the
Musical Festival; I told him, however, that Conzertmeister Singer
had probably already been engaged. Should Singer not be able to
come, I would recommend Remenyi with absolute confidence. Of all
the violinists I know, I could scarcely name three who could
equal him as regards effect. Tell Bulow of Remenyi's friendly
offer, and let me know at your convenience whether it is
accepted.--

As soon as I hear more definitely about the programme I shall
answer Gille's friendly note. Meanwhile (after 4 months'
incessant interruptions) I have again set to work, and cannot now
leave it till the time comes for my journey.

What a royal and marvellous act is Ludwig of Bavaria's letter to
Wagner! It ought verily to be engraved in the Walhalla in letters
of gold. Oh that some other Princes would adopt a similar
style!--

In all friendship, yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, May 28th, 1864



28. To Dr. Franz Brendel.

Dear Friend,

Shortly after sending off my letter anent the Peters-Schuberth
squabble, I received the programme-sketch of your last letter but
one. Exceedingly important and indispensable are the Wagner-
numbers. Let me hope he has already given you a favorable reply.
Bulow will be the best one to arrange things and to conduct. I
wrote to him the day before yesterday to advise him again to be
strictly moderate with regard to the number of my compositions.
The half of what is given in your sketch of the programme would
be amply sufficient. People do not want to hear so much of my
things, and I do not care to force them upon them...On this
occasion, especially, my wish is only to see some of my friends
again--in no way to seek appreciative approval from the public.
Such misleading abuses have long since and entirely ceased for
me. Hence, dear friend, do not have me playing the braggart on
your programme! If a place is to be retained for Remenyi he will
fill it brilliantly. For both as a soloist and a quartet player
his accomplishments are extraordinary.

You ask me about "definite news of my journey." As already said,
I am determined to attend the Tonkunstler-Versamammlung, and
afterwards to go to Weimar for a few days. My departure from here
depends upon the date of the Carlsruhe concerts. I shall arrange
to be there a few days previously, and shall ask Bulow to secure
apartments for me. A variety of considerations (among which are
economical ones too) compel me not to extend my absence from Rome
beyond a month, and before returning I am in duty bound to pay my
mother a visit in Paris. Hence I shall have but little time for
strolls on the banks of the Ilm or elsewhere...But let me hope
that my journey will not prove pure idling, and I shall do my
best "to pave the way" to meeting all your wishes in as
satisfactory a manner as possible. Further details on this
subject I shall give you by word of mouth towards the end of
August. All mere reports about my remaining in Germany for some
length of time I beg of you to contradict most emphatically. Some
newspapers seem anxious that it should be known that I am about
to settle in Hungary. There is nothing whatever in this report
beyond the anticipated order for my composing a second "Gran
Mass", and perhaps publishing an Hungarian translation of the
"Elizabeth." These two tasks may, during the course of next year,
lead to my revisiting Hungary (?).

Kindly present my excuses to Riedel, who wishes me to attend his
concert in the St. Thomas Church (at the beginning of July). I am
delighted that the "Seligkeiten" find a place in his programme,
and I am sincerely grateful to H. von Milde for having
contributed so much to their success by his fine interpretation
and inspired delivery. Whether the Psalm ("By the waters of
Babylon") is not somewhat too low for Frau v. Milde's voice, I
should not like to say. I remember, however, that she sang it on
one occasion at the Altenburg gloriously. Of course I can
consider it only a very flattering mark of attention and
amiability on the part of Frau von Milde to venture anywhere to
introduce any one of my compositions under her vocal protection,
but especially in Leipzig.

With hearty thanks and kindest greetings yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, June 13th, 1864



29. To the Committee of the Society for the Support of Needy
Hungarian Musicians in Pest.

Gentlemen,

You are good enough to invite me in a very flattering manner to
take part in the Association that you are starting, with the
object of helping needy and infirm musicians in Hungary. Every
tie which unites me to our noble country is dear to me. I
cordially accept to be entirely yours, and am pleased to hope
that the esteem in which you are held, added to your intelligent
solicitude for this good work, will secure it speedily and
lastingly excellent results.

The good that you propose to realise is not liable to
controversy, but is so plainly evident that you will receive on
all sides nothing but approbation, encouragement, help and
support. Nevertheless, as you do me the honor to ask my explicit
opinion with regard to the statutes of your Society, I will
venture to observe that it seems to me desirable not to limit
oneself exclusively and for ever to helping sick and infirm
musicians--and their needy heirs. Those who are in health, when
they are at the same time well-deserving, have a claim also on
your sympathy...Without enlarging on this point here, I only
recommend to your attention, gentlemen, the statutes (published
at Leipzig) of the Association which was formed at Weimar in
August 1861, under the name of "Allgemeiner Deutscher Musik-
Verein," in which the needs of music and of musicians of our day
have been taken into consideration simultaneously.

If I had not the sad honor of being poor I should hasten to put a
considerable sum at your disposal. Pray pardon me, then, the
moderate offering of a hundred florins which you will shortly
receive (through my cousin Dr. Eduard Liszt, of Vienna), and I
beg you to accept, gentlemen, the assurance of my sincere desire
to render in future the best service to your work, as also the
expression of my very distinguished and devoted sentiments.

F. Liszt

Rome, June 18th, 1864 (Madonna Del Rosario)



30. To Eduard Liszt

Very dear Eduard,

Assuredly I have not been "complaining" of you to Count
Gallenberg nor to anybody else in the world. Quite the contrary,
and on every occasion I boast of my beloved cousin, and am happy
and proud of his loyal, delicate and noble friendship, which is
one of the sweetest kindnesses of Providence to me.

Nevertheless I am much obliged to Count Gallenberg for having
somewhat driven you to write to me, extra, so good and tender a
letter, for which I thank you from my heart and soul.

The electoral circular you added to it gives me real
satisfaction, and I am pleased at the public evidence that has
been attained of your "honorableness, firmness of character and
great capability." It seems to me that it was not possible, under
the actual circumstances, to have obtained a more complete
success in the competition with Schuselka; [Eduard Liszt was at
that time standing against Schuselka as a andidate for the
Reichstag (Parliament), but without success.] but I hope that
your turn will come soon. The waiting is painful for you, without
doubt, and is also too prolonged as regards your deserts...still
one must be resigned to it, and that as simply as possible, by
abstaining from useless words and taking useless steps. To be
ever deserving, though only occasionally obtaining--much or
little--is still the wisest thing to do in this world, where "he
who endures little will not endure long!"--

.-. Shall I see you at Carlsruhe at the end of August? I hope so
most truly. Before returning here (at the beginning of October) I
shall spend a few days with my mother in Paris. You will not be
vexed with me for beginning with her first, and for postponing
till another year my transient visit to you at Vienna, which I
accept in the same manner as you offer it, and for which the
occasion will be found when I return to Hungary, supposing that
they are inclined (as appears likely) to give me an order similar
to that of the "Graner Messe." Otherwise, and unless there be any
determining circumstance for me, I am resolved not to tire people
with my presence, as also to withdraw myself from the idle
fatigue that people cause me. Thank God I have something to work
at without disturbing myself at my work further than is necessary
for the good conscience I hope always to keep. For this Rome is
peculiarly adapted to me, and I shall not go away for the
smallest thing without well knowing what it is for.

I send herewith my answer to the Committee of the Association in
aid of poor musicians in Hungary, [See the foregoing letter of
18th June.] to which I beg the Princess to authorise you to add
the sum of 200 florins. Let them be sent at once to the
Committee, begging for an acknowledgment, which you will send to
me.

Remenyi will come and see you shortly. He has spent nearly two
months here, and has been heard very often at the Argentina
Theater with extraordinary success. I have invited him to come to
Carlsruhe, as I am persuaded that he will succeed no less well
there than in Rome. Meanwhile I beg you to give him a cordial
reception.

Yours ever affectionately,

F. Liszt

June 22nd, 1864 [Rome]

Greetings and love to your dear ones.

It goes without saying also that I think most affectionately of
Cornelius and Tausig, which you will tell them.



31. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

.--. I can assure you of Remenyi's co-operation. By the middle of
July I expect a letter from him with his fuller address. It will
be superfluous to mention him in the preliminary programme of the
concert-performances. But what about Wagner?--Frau von Bulow
sends me very sad news of him...If he definitely refuses to
attend the Tonkunstler-Vers. all we can do is to obtain his
consent to give the extracts--previously enumerated in the
programme--from his "Meistersanger" and other of his works
(together with the scores and voice parts). In my opinion these
pieces are indispensable for the principal day of the Carlsruhe
programme. It would be best if Bulow alone brought the matter to
the desired issue. It seems to me impossible that Wagner could
give him and all of us the pain of an absolute refusal! At all
events everything must be done to avoid such a misfortune--nay, I
may even say, such a scandal.

For the future, dear friend, you shall be totally relieved of the
trouble of sending me these detailed communications. Frau von
Bulow is going to report to me of the further progress of the
preliminary arrangements concerning the Tonk.-Vers.; you yourself
have more than enough to do with writing, negotiating, deciding,
preparing, weighing to and fro, and in thinking things out, etc.,
etc.

It is settled, therefore, that I am coming, and you will have to
look after me during my couple of weeks' stay in Germany, as it
is mainly your fault that I am coming. Between ourselves I may
tell you that, had it not been for your pressing letters, I
should probably have confined myself to giving the Bulows a
rendez-vous in Marseilles, and to paying my mother a few days'
visit in Paris. Of other roads there are extremely few for me
nowadays--and those that I have still to tread are not to be
found in journeys, but only indeed at my quiet writing-table!

With hearty greetings and in all friendship, yours,

F. Liszt

July 1st, 1864

Yesterday I received a friendly letter from Seroff. Could not
some fragment from his "Judith" be fitted into your Carlsruhe
programme?



32. To Walter Bache in London

[The addressee (1842-1888), a pupil of Liszt's, settled in London
as teacher, pianist and conductor, devoted his whole life there
to making Liszt's music known in England. His annual Recitals and
Orchestral concerts were devoted mainly to this object.]

I reply to your letter, dear Mr. Bache, by assuring you once more
of my very sincere and affec-* *tionate interest. You will never
find me wanting or behindhand when it is a question of proving
this to you; be very sure of that.

The good news you give me of Madame Laussot is very welcome to
me. I hope she will give me the pleasure of coming again to Rome,
for I see no chance of my coming to Florence. Towards the middle
of August I shall start for Carlsruhe, where I have promised to
be present at the third Tonkunstler-Versammlung. Thence I shall
go to Weimar, and shall take Paris on the way in order to see my
mother again before returning here at the beginning of October.

Please tell Madame Laussot that she would wrong me if she did not
count me amongst her most truly affectionate and devoted
adherents. I especially preserve a grateful remembrance of her in
connection with the "Ideale," and all that attaches to it. She is
of the very small number of noble and intelligent exceptions in
the too great number of my friends and acquaintances. I was
speaking to this purpose the day before yesterday to a young
person of Grecian origin who lives in Florence at the Count de
Sartiges' house (and who frequents Madame Laussot's concerts).
The Athenian plays the piano marvellously and charmingly.

You will bring me Ehlert's Scherzo with other of his
compositions.

Meanwhile I commission you to give my best compliments to Ehlert.

A thousand cordial and affectionate things, and a revoir next
winter.

July 2nd, 1864, Madonna del Rosario

F. Liszt

Thanks for the triple photograph, [Probably of Mme. Laussot,
Pinelli and Bache, who were taken together.] which is thrice
welcome.



33. To ?

[Autograph letter (without address) in the possession of Monsieur
Etienne Charavay in Paris. The letter appears to be addressed to
a friend in Vienna.]

Dear Friend,

The parcel of music you kindly announce has not yet come; but I
will not delay in sending you my thanks, as I am about to leave
here for six or seven weeks.

The day after tomorrow I travel to Carlsruhe to attend the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung, the concerts there (conducted by Bulow)
being given between August 22nd and 26th. Thence I go to Weimar
on a visit. By the end of September I shall be with my dear
mother in Paris, and back here by the middle of October. You must
not be surprised if in newspaper-fashion I leave it undecided
whether or not I change my abode and remain in Rome for ever.

The words for ever remind me of the 22nd Psalm (according to the
usual Protestant numbering the 23rd) which, in reality, I
composed for a tenor, whereas the 137th is meant for a mezzo-
soprano (Fraulein Genast, now married to Herr Merian, in Basle).

I am therefore surprised that you should have proposed the latter
Psalm and not the 22nd for Herr Erl, and I fear the effect of it
will not be good sung by a tenor. The violin accompaniment which
on several occasions is in unison, as well as the concluding
chorus, "Jerusalem, Jerusalem," are written exclusively for
women's (or boys') voices, and thus demand a female soloist.
Besides which it seems to me that the sentiment and spiritual
tonality of the Psalm do not move in the masculinum. Israelitish
gentlemen must not be called upon to sigh, to dream and to
abandon themselves to their grief in any such way.

I shall be much pleased to become fully acquainted with the new
works by Kremser, Hasel and Ziehrer, which you promise me, on my
return.

Meanwhile with best thanks and kind greetings, yours in all
friendship,

F. Liszt

Rome, August 7th, 1864 (Madonna del Rosario)



34. To Eduard Liszt

Weimar, September 7th, 1864 (In the blue room of the Altenburg)

It grieved me to have to do without your presence at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Carlsruhe, dearest Eduard. Your
letter, however, speaks of your having made some advance in your
career, and this greatly delights me. I hope you will soon have
more definite news to communicate to me on the subject. You know
that to see you prosperous is one of the satisfactions I most
desire in life!--

As regards the Tonkunstler-Versammlung you will find a kindly and
satisfactory resume of the proceedings in the supplement of the
Allgemeine Augsburger Zeitung--3lst August, 1st to 3rd September.
Bulow was unfortunately prevented by serious illness from
conducting. From a personal as well as an artistic point of view
I felt his absence very keenly--however no complaint whatever can
be made about the performance, and the reception accorded by the
audience, especially to my Psalms, was extremely favorable. I
assuredly never expected to meet with such sympathetic
appreciation, after my experiences of former years. Friend Lowy
had, on this occasion, no reason to hide himself in a seat at the
back! In the Chamber-music soirees three of my Songs ("Es muss
ein Wunderbares sein," "Ich liebe Dich," and "Mignon") were sung
by Herr and Frau Hauser, and an encore was demanded. Remenyi
played magnificently, and Fraulein Topp [Alida Topp, a pupil of
Liszt's.] is a marvel.

At the conclusion of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung I started early
on Sunday morning for Munich with Cosima (who remained with me
the whole week of the concerts). Hans was confined to bed at the
Bairischer Hof; his nervous rheumatic complaint has now settled
in his left arm, which he will probably be unable to move for
several weeks to come. In addition to the physical pain he
suffers most grievously from this enforced state of inactivity.
To endure things patiently is to some natures an absolute
impossibility. He travelled back to Berlin, ill as he was, last
Saturday, accompanied by his wife, and I have promised to go and
spend a couple of days with him after my visit to Prince
Hohenzollern in Lowenberg, where I go in a day or so.

Of Wagner's wondrous fortune you are sure to have heard. No such
star has ever before beamed upon a tone-or a word-poet. N.B.--
H.M. the King of Bavaria addresses his communication, "To the
Word-and Tone-Poet, Richard Wagner." More by-and-by about this
remarkable affair of Wagner's. I saw him in Munich on several
occasions, and spent one day alone with him in his villa on the
Starnberger See.

I have been here since the day before yesterday. .--.

Continue to love me--as I do you.

With all my heart your

F. Liszt

Address me to Weimar (at the Altenburg). I must return here from
Lowenberg (between the 15th and 8th September) in order to await
the Grand Duke at the Wartburg.



35. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Herr Doctor,

Together with the corrected proofs of the Pastoral and the C
minor Symphonies (in which I found one or two errors) I sent you
(from Weimar) my pianoforte arrangement of the 3rd instrumental
movements of the 9th Symphony. After various endeavors one way
and another, I became inevitably and distinctly convinced of the
impossibility of making any pianoforte arrangement of the 4th
movement for two hands, that could in any way be even
approximately effective or satisfactory. I trust you will not
bear me any ill-will for failing in this, and that you will
consider my work with the Beethoven Symphonies as concluded with
the 3rd movement of the 9th, for it was not a part of my task to
provide a simple pianoforte score of this overwhelming 4th
movement for the use of chorus directors. Arrangements of this
kind have already been made, and I maintain that I am not able to
furnish a better or a more satisfactory one for helpless
pianofortes and pianists, and believe that there is no one
nowadays who could manage it.

In my edition of the 9th Symphony for two pianos, prepared for
Schott, the possibility was offered to me of reducing the most
essential parts of the orchestra-polyphony to ten fingers, and of
handing over the chorus part to the second piano. But to screw
both parts, the instrumental and vocal, into two hands cannot be
done either "a peu pres or a beaucoup pres!"

In case other proofs of the remaining Beethoven Symphonies are
ready, you might send me them to Weimar before Tuesday, 20th
September. I should be glad at the same time to receive the
splendid 6 Mottets of Bach in eight-voice parts (among which is
"Sing unto the Lord a new song"). I am all the more in need of
reading such works, as I am at present unable to hear a
performance of them.

Next week I shall again spend a few days in Weimar (or
Wilhelmsthal); thence I go to pay my mother a visit in Paris, and
by 18th October, at latest, I shall be back in Rome.

Yours respectfully and sincerely,

F. Liszt

Schloss Lowenberg, September 14th, 1864

I requested Herr Kahnt to return to you with my best thanks the
copy of the Symphonic Poems which was kindly forwarded to me in
Carlsruhe.



36. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Herr Stadtrath, [Town Councillor]

In compliance with the wish you so kindly express, I will again
make an attempt to "adapt" the 4th movement of the 9th Symphony
to the piano, and soon after my return to Rome will set to work
upon the required tentative. Let us hope that the variation of
the proverb: "Tant va la cruche a l'eau qu'a la fin...elle
s'emplit"--may prove true. [So often goes the pitcher to the
water that at last it is filled.]

While talking of various readings allow me to draw your attention
to an exceptionally valuable collection. A very carefully and
well-trained musician with whom I have been acquainted for many
years past--Herr Franz Kroll (in Berlin)--has, with industrious
and unceasing perseverance, been collecting, copying and
arranging for publication the noteworthy various readings of
Bach's manuscripts of the "Wohltemperiertes Clavier." [The well-
tempered Piano] Last week he showed me several of them, and I
became convinced of the substantial interest of the collection
and encouraged friend Kroll to send you a full account of them.
In now enclosing his letter to you--written at my instigation--I
take upon myself, with pleasure and the fullest conviction, the
musical duty of advocating the publication of these various Bach
readings, and of heartily recommending Kroll's work as an
essentially useful, complementary addition to your admirable
edition of the "Bach-Gesellschaft" [The Bach Society].

Pray accept, dear Herr Stadtrath, the assurance of my sincere
esteem and devotion.

F. Liszt

Wilhelmsthal, October 1st, 1864



37. To Madame Jessie Laussot

You will be good enough to excuse me, dear Madame, for having
delayed replying to your kind letter. Amongst your many rare
qualities there is one that I particularly admire; it is the
prowess of your musical sympathies. Nevertheless I must scruple
to expose you to too harsh trials, and, knowing by experience
with how little favor my works meet, I have been obliged to force
a sort of systematic heedlessness on to myself with regard to
them, and a resigned passiveness. Thus during the years of my
foreign activity in Germany I constantly observed the rule of
never asking any one whatsoever to have any of my works
performed; more than that, I plainly dissuaded many persons from
doing so who showed some intention of this kind--and I shall do
the same elsewhere. There is neither modesty nor pride in this,
as it seems to me, for I simply take into consideration this
fact--that Mr. Litz [Liszt quotes the very common misspelling of
his name which has frequently been seen since he was "le petit
Litz" in Paris.] is, as it were, always welcome when he appears
at the Piano (--especially since he has made a profession of the
contrary--) but that it is not permitted to him to have anything
to do with thinking and writing according to his own fancy. The
result is that, for some fifteen years, so-called friends, as
well as indifferent and ill-disposed people on all sides, sing,
enough to split your head, to this unhappy Mr. Litz, who has
nothing to do with it, "Be a pianist, and nothing but that. How
is it possible not to be a pianist when, etc., etc."

Possibly they are right--but it would be too much to expect me to
sign my own condemnation. Far from that, I confess that
contradiction ends by tempting me seriously, and that I am
resolved to pursue it to the end, without any illusion or
approbation whatever. Only at certain moments I fancy that that
judicious maxim of Champfort is somewhat applicable to me
"Celebrity is the punishment of talent and the chastisement of
merit."

Our friend Sgambati is happily in a fair way to incur this
punishment and chastisement--and certainly with very good reason.
He has done wonders this winter at his four concerts, which have
had a success both of fashion and of real good taste. I, for my
part, have gained a thorough affection for Sgambati, and the
remarkable development of his talent of so fine and noble a
quality interests me keenly.

A thousand very cordially affectionate and devoted things.

F. Liszt

Rome, March 6th, 1865



38. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

While awaiting from you definite word about the next Tonkunstler-
Versammlung in Dessau, let me, meanwhile, thank you for your last
communication. The main interest of the musical performances is,
of course, on this occasion centred in Riedel and his Verein. In
the programme-sketch I notice my Psalm 137 at the very beginning.
What lady takes the solo?--mind and soul are indispensable in it.

Bronsart wrote to me at the beginning of March that he
entertained the idea of a concert-tour to the Russian provinces
on the Baltic. I should be glad to hear that the Euterpe squabble
and quarrel in connection with the T.K.V. in Dessau were at an
end, and that Bronsart was to undertake the conductorship.

As a supplement to this I send you herewith the programme of the
concert held in the hall of the Capitol, where for some years
past no special festivities have been given, and probably never
anything of this kind before. For the first time the different
orchestras in Rome (the Sistine, St. Peter's, Lateran and
Liberian) all united to give a performance which upon the whole
may be said to have been as successful as it was well received.

The concert was proposed to the Holy Father, and approved of by
him. Owing to the exceptional character of the undertaking,
which, like that of last year, was made to fit in with the plan
of the detailed arrangements--(some ladies belonging to the
aristocracy, and commissionaires distributed the tickets which
were sold at a minimum, no advertising, etc.), I determined to
give my co-operation. I played the "Cantique" (the last number of
the "Harmonies poetiques et religieuses" published by Kistner),
and, as there was no end to the applause, I added my
transcription of Rossini's "Charite" (published by Schott).
Everybody in Rome with any claim to culture was present, and the
hall was more than full.

With friendliest greetings, your sincerely devoted

F. Liszt

April 3rd, 1865

P.S.--Please get Kahnt to inquire of Hartel as soon as possible,
how far the printing of my arrangement of the Beethoven
Symphonies has progressed, and whether I may rely upon his
sending--during Easter week as already settled--the orchestral
parts (autographed) of several of my Symphonic Poems,--more
especially of the Dante Symphony? It is possible that the Dante
Symphony may be performed here towards the end of April. But you
shall have further news of me before that.

Bote and Bock will shortly publish a very simple Hymn of mine
(for pianoforte) entitled "The Pope's Hymn."



39. To Prince Constantine of Hohenzollern-Hechingen

Monseigneur,

Your Highness will understand that it is a necessity of my heart
to speak to you of a very happy juncture that assures me
henceforth, in full degree, the stability of feeling and of
conduct to which I aspired. It seems to me that I should be
guilty of ingratitude and wanting in respect to the condescending
friendship with which you are good enough to honor me, did I not
let you know of the determination I have taken. On Tuesday the
25th April, the festival of St. Mark the Evangelist, I entered
into the ecclesiastical state on receiving minor orders in the
chapel of H.S.H. Monseigneur Hohenlohe at the Vatican. Convinced
as I was that this act would strengthen me in the right road, I
accomplished it without effort, in all simplicity and uprightness
of intention. Moreover it agrees with the antecedents of my
youth, as well as with the development that my work of musical
composition has taken during these last four years,--a work which
I propose to pursue with fresh vigor, as I consider it the least
defective form of my nature.--

To speak familiarly; if "the cloak does not make the monk" it
also does not prevent him from being one; and, in certain cases,
when the monk is already formed within, why not appropriate the
outer garment of one?--

But I am forgetting that I do not in the least intend to become a
monk, in the severe sense of the word. For this I have no
vocation, and it is enough for me to belong to the hierarchy of
the Church to such a degree as the minor orders allow me to do.
It is therefore not the frock, but the cassock that I have
donned. And on this subject Your Highness will pardon me the
small vanity of mentioning to you that they pay me the compliment
of saying that I wear my cassock as though I had worn it all my
life.

I am now living at the Vatican with Monseigneur Hohenlohe, whose
apartment is on the same floor as the Stanze of Raphael. My
lodging is not at all like a prison cell, and the kind
hospitality that Monseigneur H. shows me exempts me from all
painful constraints. So I shall leave it but rarely and for a
short time only, as removals and especially journeys have become
very burdensome to me for many reasons...It is better to work in
peace at home than to go abroad into the world,--except in
important cases. One of these is awaiting me in the month of
August, and I shall fulfil my promise of going to Pest at the
time of the celebration of the musical fetes that are being got
up for the 25th anniversary of the establishment of the
Conservatoire. My Oratorio of "Saint Elizabeth" and the Symphony
of the "Divina Commedia" form part of the programme.

Next year, if Your Highness still thinks of realising your noble
project of a musical congress at Lowenberg, I should be very
happy to take part in it, and place myself entirely at your
orders and service.

Permit me, Monseigneur, to express anew to you my most grateful
thanks for the evidences of sympathy you have so generously
accorded to myself and to my works; and graciously accept the
homage of unchanging sentiments of most respectful devotion with
which I have the honor to be

Your Highness's most humble and affectionate servant,

F. Liszt

Vatican, May 11th, 1865



40. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Herr Doctor,

My old musical weaknesses have not left me! The weakest and worst
thing about them is perhaps that I never cease composing; but
such wondrous things go wandering about in my head that I cannot
help putting them down on paper. And I have wanted to hear
something about the fate of the manuscripts I sent you for
printing. Have the pianoforte scores of the Beethoven Symphonies
been published? How has the printing of the Concerto for 2 pianos
(in E minor) [Concerto pathetique] progressed? Would you kindly
let me have a few copies soon?

With regard to the autographed orchestral parts of my "Symphonic
Poems," I should be glad if they could be out by the end of July.
Probably at the beginning of August I go to Pest, where several
of my compositions (more especially the "Dante Symphony") are to
be performed in connection with the festivities at the
Conservatoire. If the parts should be ready, please, dear Herr
Doctor, forward them to me to Pest. At present I do not require
them here; but should the "Preludes" be ready you would greatly
oblige me by sending all the orchestral parts, with four copies
of the quartet, if possible by the beginning of next month, to
Dr. R. Pohl (571, Hirschgasse, Baden-Baden). I have been asked
for the loan of them for some festival in Baden conducted by
Monsieur Reyer.

Pray kindly excuse all the trouble I am giving you, and receive
the expression of my most sincere esteem.

F. Liszt

The Vatican, May 27th, 1865



41. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Your favorable accounts of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Dessau
delighted me greatly. Owing to the crooked way in which my works
have been listened to in past years, I have felt oppressed; and
in order that my freedom in my work might remain unaffected, I
was obliged wholly to disregard their outward success. Hence my
absolute distrust of performances of my own compositions, and
this was not to be accounted for by any exaggerated modesty on my
part. As to the "Battle of the Huns" I was specially doubtful;
the Christian significance of Kaulbach's picture--as represented
in the "Chorale"--seemed to me a stumbling-block in the way of
favorable criticism. Kaulbach had indeed suggested this
interpretation by having thrown a special light upon the
cross...yet there are neither mendicant friars nor bishops in the
picture...and, besides, at the time of the "Battle of the Huns"
the organ was not yet invented! This last sweeping argument was
triumphantly hurled at me in Weimar by the infallible censors.
Since then I have hesitated to allow the work to be performed,
and have remained satisfied with sending Kaulbach the arrangement
for 2 pianofortes. And in that form it was executed [Executirt.]
in his salon, whereupon, of course, there were loud lamentations
about my squandering my time upon such an abominable jumble of
sounds, when I might be charming people in a more agreeable
fashion with my piano-playing!...So if the Dessau Meeting really
derived some pleasure from the "Battle of the Huns" I feel richly
rewarded for my small amount of suffering.

I beg you to present my best thanks to Fraulein Wigand. [Emilie
Wigand, studied under Prof. Gotze in Leipzig.] It is a good deed
of hers to have obtained willing ears for my Psalm--and if I am
in Germany again next year I shall want to hear it.

I will with pleasure take Weitzmann's place as examiner of the
manuscripts sent in. Send them to me in parcel form to Rome; I
promise to look through them quickly and to let you have my good
or bad opinion of them. For such work I am always inclined, and
am, perhaps, not an awkward hand at it.

.--. From the Committee in Pest I have not had any news for some
time past. I shall, however, hold myself in readiness to start
from here by the beginning of August. Meanwhile let nothing be
sent to me to Rome. As soon as I know anything definite about my
stay in Hungary I will let you know.

With all friendly greetings to your wife, I am your sincerely
attached

F. Liszt

July 21st (Villa d'Este-Tivoli), 1865

Any probable performance of the "Elizabeth" in Coburg we can
discuss later. I should consider it advisable to have my name but
little mentioned in the programme of the next Meeting of the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung. As regards a larger work (one to occupy
a whole concert) it would be well for Gille to leave the choice
of it to the Duke. The local taste would be a very important
point in the matter, and, for my own part, I know only too well
that people do not want to know or to hear too much of me--in
Coburg as well as in many other places!--



42. To Abbe Schwendtner in Buda-Pest

[Autograph in the possession of Frl. Therese v. Lavner in Pest.--
Liszt became acquainted with the Abbe in 1865, and frequently
enjoyed his hospitality when visiting Pest, up to the time when
he himself became connected with the Musik-Academie there.]

Right Reverend Sir and Friend,

Having returned to my abode here, I cannot refrain from again
thanking you most heartily for all the goodness and kindness you
showed me in so unusually abundant a measure, during my stay in
the town-vicarage of Pest. The five weeks I spent there in the
pleasantest way--owing to your considerate care and attention--
will remain an unextinguishable point of light in my life. You
admonish, and at the same time encourage and strengthen me, to
carry out further the artistic task that is set me. In the hope
that your Reverence will in the future continue to show me the
sympathy so kindly and generously expressed, I pray you to
implore God's blessing to keep me ever a good child of the State
and Church.

May I add another request? On the 22nd October (my birthday) for
some years past a Mass has been read in the Franciscan Church in
Pest, and at the words: "Memento Domini" I [am] held in
remembrance...I would ask your Reverence to remember my wish that
this may be done also on the same day in the parish church.

In sincere veneration and gratitude, I remain cordially and
faithfully

Your Reverence's devoted

F. Liszt

The Vatican, September 20th, 1865

My respectful compliments to the amiable lady president of the
morning coffee--Fraulein Resi [A niece of the Abbe's.]--who
conducts and beautifies the real Magyar hospitality at the
Vicarage in an incomparably graceful manner. I shall take the
liberty one day of sending Fraulein Resi a few Roman trifles.
Bulow has undertaken to send you the medallion of my humble self,
a masterly piece of work by Rietschel. As you will know,
Rietschel is the sculptor who made the Lessing statue in
Brunswick, the Goethe and Schiller group in Weimar, etc.--



43. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Accept my best thanks for having admitted into your Neue
Zeitschrift Bulow's account of the Musical Festival in Pest.
These three articles are a masterly piece of work, and, as your
paper has for several years past followed the difficult process
of my development as a composer in so kind and careful a manner,
I wished specially that the very successful performances of the
"Elizabeth" and of the "Dante Symphony" in Pest should receive
confirmation in the Neue Zeitschrift.

With regard to the "Elizabeth" I have received offers from Vienna
and a few other places; but it is in no way my intention to wage
war in a hurry with this work. I shall, therefore, decline the
invitations with thanks, and await an opportunity more convenient
to myself for the next performance. Whether this may be at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Coburg I do not know, and, frankly
said, this will depend upon the Duke's bon plaisir. [It was not
performed at a Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Coburg.] For my own
part I am in no great hurry, as I have heard enough of the work
in Pest, and found no alterations to make in it. Then also there
is no hurry with regard to its publication, and my reply a short
time ago to a willing publisher (who, curiously enough, offered
me a respectable honorarium for it!) was, that only by next
summer could I decide whether to have it published or not.

Gille has the kind intention of arranging a performance of the
"Elizabeth" in Jena as soon as possible. I don't want to enter
into a fuller correspondence with him on the subject; but please
tell him, in all friendliness, that I regret to be obliged
somewhat to check his admirable zeal. Apart from certain
considerations of propriety (which I will never disregard in the
slightest degree) there is an irremovable difficulty in the
matter of the performance itself. It cannot be given in Jena
without the co-operation of the Weimar performers. And why plague
our dear and excellent Weimar singers and artists, and how--with
their many theatrical engagements--could they find the necessary
time for studying the parts, for rehearsals?--etc., etc.--

Hence let us give a simple no as regards Jena, and put a sign of
interrogation? nay, even two or more??? as regards the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Coburg, for (as I told you in my last
letter but one) we shall there have entirely to submit to the
Duke's opinion concerning the larger (or longer) work which is to
fill the first day's programme.

(N.B.--"Elizabeth" lasts about three hours, including the
intervals. Bulow's conductorship would be indispensable.)

For ten days past I have again been back in the Vatican, and
think of remaining here over the winter. At the present moment I
am engaged in arranging the Pope's Hymnus, published last month
by Bote and Bock for pianoforte as a solo and in duet-form, for
chorus (with Italian words). I think something of this piece, for
which Kaulbach has made a splendid drawing. If it is performed
here you shall hear about it. As soon as possible I mean to set
to work with my "Christus Oratorio." Unfortunately I have had to
set it aside for a year, as the "Vocal Mass" and other smaller
works prevented my doing anything to it. I shall require from six
to eight months before I get the "Christus" finished, for I am
scarcely half-way through yet.

My health is good, and I can unconcernedly allow people the
pleasure of referring to me as "physically broken down" and a
"decayed wreck" (as I have been described in the Augsburger
Allgemeine Zeitung).

One favor do me at once, dear friend. Request Kahnt to purchase
for me the steel-plates (or woodcuts) of Schwind's "Elisabeth-
Galerie" in the Wartburg, published in Leipzig by Weigel or
Brockhaus, and let them be sent safely, quickly and correctly,
addressed to "Herr Baron Anton von Augusz--Szegzard" (Tolnaer
Comitat--Hungary). If I am not mistaken, the drawings are
published in two parts. The first part contains the pictures of
St. Elisabeth's arrival at the Wartburg, the miracle of Roses--up
to her death. The second part gives the medallions depicting her
works of charity. I wish to send the complete "Elisabeth-Galerie"
to Baron Augusz. The price is not high, and the money shall be
refunded to Kahnt as soon as I get the bill.

By the way Kahnt would be doing me a favor by presenting
"Remenyi," through Roszavogli (Pest), with a copy of Pflughaupt's
arrangement for pianoforte and violin of my "Cantique d'amour"
and "Ave Maria"--and by granting my humble self a copy also, at
his convenience. Remenyi will be glad to play the pieces with
Plotenyi and thus make them known, and I would get Sgambati and
Pinelli [A Roman violin virtuoso (born 1843), was appointed in
1872 Director of the "Societa musicale romana," in Rome.] to do
the same here.

With hearty greetings to your wife,

Your unchangeably sincere and devoted

F. Liszt

The Vatican, September 28th, 1865

Let me know of the despatch of the "Elisabeth-Galerie," and also
send me a few copies of Bulow's three articles.

Why have my organ-pieces (from Korner, Erfurt) not yet reached
me? Please remind Kahnt or Gottschalg of this.



44. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

My heartiest thanks to you for remembering the 22nd October. The
day was celebrated quietly and happily like last year in my
former residence (Madonna del Rosario)--and you were present with
me in my inmost heart.

Before I received your lines I had already answered Dunkl's and
Herbeck's letters relating to the "Elizabeth" Oratorio. You know
how much against my wish it is to put this work into circulation.
And, however flattering it may be to me (perhorrescised
composer!) to receive offers from various places about it, still
I think it advisable to avoid precipitancy, and not to expose my
friends so soon again to unpleasantnesses such as my earlier
works brought upon them. Lowy's empty stalls (with the Preludes)
are significant...and, considering the various kinds of abuse
which my works have had to endure, silence would seem to be most
becoming.

Therefore be good enough, dearest Eduard, to tell those kindly
disposed "Musical Friends," emphatically that I cannot make up my
mind to the proposed performance of the "Elizabeth," and beg them
to pardon this small-mindedness in me. Besides the score is no
longer at my disposal, as I have sent it to Bulow, who requires
it for a performance desired by H.M. the King, for which I have
already invited Herbeck. Bulow is giving some concerts this month
and next in Berlin, Dresden, Prague, etc. Hence he cannot begin
rehearsing the Elizabeth till later. Of the Munich performance
you shall hear details when the time comes.

With regard to your communication to the Princess, I assure you
again that as soon as and as often as it is possible for me to do
you a service, as certainly shall it be done.

Kindest greetings to your wife from

Your truly devoted

F. Liszt

[Rome,] November 1st, 1865.



45. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear friend,

My answer to you has been delayed in order that I might at the
same time tell you of a variety of things.

A) At the beginning of March I intend going to Paris. The Gran
Mass is to be given on March 15th in the Church of St. Eustache
at the anniversary "de l'oeuvre des ecoles" to which the Maire of
the 2nd Arrondissement, M. Dufour, sent me an official invitation
the other day.

B) The report spread in various newspapers about the Hungarian
Coronation-Mass which I am to compose, is for the present only
officiously correct. Probably it may become true shortly. [This
did occur, as is well known.]

C) At the opening of the Dante Gallery here at the end of the
month my "Dante Symphony" is to be performed. I enclose the
article from the Osservatore Romano in which this extraordinary
event is discussed in detail--also another number of the same
paper containing a short notice on the "Stabat mater speciosa" (a
very simple chorus from my "Christus Oratorio"), that was sung
last Thursday in the Franciscan Church Ara Coeli (on the
Capitol).

D) I am quite determined to attend the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in
Coburg, and expect to hear from you shortly more about it. It is
to be hoped that Bulow will conduct. If there should be any
thought of giving the "Elizabeth," Bulow will be indispensable.--

As regards the Elizabeth, pray make my best excuses to Kahnt. I
did not reply to his friendly request, because I have made up my
mind not to have this work published meanwhile, and hold fast to
this negative determination. Do not let Kahnt take this ill of
me, and let him be assured of my sincere willingness to meet his
wishes in all other matters.

.--. I am in want of a great many things, but most of all in want
of more time!

With friendliest greetings, sincerely and devotedly yours,

F. Liszt

The Vatican, January 14th, 1866



46. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

So there is to be no Tonkunstler-Versammlung this year; in place
of it war-cries, and symphonies of bayonets and cannon! Here,
probably, we shall remain in peaceful quietude under the
protection of France.--As regards my humble self, I mean to try,
during the second half of this 66th year, to overtake what I was
compelled to neglect during the first half of it. My "Christus
Oratorio" shall be finished by Christmas.--Prince Hohenlohe, with
whom I have been residing since April 1865, has been made
Cardinal and shortly leaves the Vatican. Last Sunday I returned
to my old quarters at Monte Mario, Madonna del Rosaraio, where I
am as comfortable as possible. Next year I think of going to
Germany, first to Munich. As you know, the King of Bavaria has
conferred upon me the title of Knight of the Grand Cross of the
Order of St. Michael. And the Emperor Maximilian that of the
Guadeloup order.--

My stay in Paris will not prove unfruitful. People may say of it
what they like.--I must mention to you the name of Camille Saint-
Saens in Paris, as specially deserving of notice in the Neue
Zeitschrft as a distinguished artist, virtuoso and composer. Last
year he was in Leipzig, so he told me, and played his Concerto at
the Gewandhaus there. But people could not make anything out of
him, and in dignified ignorance allowed him to pass. Langhans [A
Berlin musical composer and critic who died in 1892.] sees him
frequently and could give you fuller information about him for
the Zeitschrift.

Give Kahnt my grateful thanks for carefully carrying out the
orders from Paris. I mean to wait another year before publishing
the "Elizabeth." I also want several illustrations for it, for,
as the work is dedicated to the King of Bavaria, I wish it to
present the choicest and noblest appearance.

If Kahnt should be disposed to take it next year, I shall be glad
to come to some arrangement with him about it. Still I am
determined not to have the "Elizabeth" published till then; to
several publishers who have offered to undertake the publication
I have already replied,--may every kind of printing long be held
at a distance from this score.--

Allow me to recommend to your friendly interest a few other
things I have at heart.

Ask Kahnt, in my name, not to be sparing in supplying Bulow with
copies of the Liszt-compositions he has published. I should more
especially like my Quartets for male voices circulated, and a few
complimentary copies from Kahnt would be useful in this respect.
No fear need be entertained of Bulow's making indiscreet demands,
and one may confidently grant him all he wishes.

.--. Hartel will shortly be sending me some music. Please enclose
the last numbers of the Neue Zeitschrft in the parcel in order
that my ignorance on matters musical may be relieved.

In sincere attachment I remain in unalterable friendship,

Yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, June 19th, 1866

The score of the Gran Mass presumably reached Riedel safely (6
weeks ago). The vocal parts I have meanwhile left with
Giacomelli. Later an edition of the choral and orchestral parts
will become a necessity.



47. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Your last letter but one, the registered one, has reached me
safely. As it contained more in the way of answers than was
wanted I hesitated to write to you. As already said, I have made
up my mind to wait another year before publishing the
"Elizabeth." In the first place it is necessary that I should
correct the frequent errors in the copy of the score--a piece of
work that will take a couple of weeks.--Then, before its
appearance, I should like an opportunity of quietly hearing the
work once in Germany, and this perhaps might occur next year.
Meanwhile give Kahnt my best thanks for his ready consent, of
which, however, I cannot make use till later, provided that an
honorarium of a couple of thousand francs (which has been offered
me elsewhere) does not frighten him. .--. So far as one can plan
a journey nowadays, I intend to be in Germany again for a few
weeks during the summer of 1867.--Tomorrow I shall write to Dr.
Hartel and tell him that you have kindly expressed yourself ready
to discuss with him the small matter about the Draseke brochure.
It would please me greatly to hear that some amicable arrangement
had been made.

With regard to the publications of the Allgemeine Deutsche
Musikverein, I would vote for the Overture by Seifriz. Likewise
for the continuation of the Chamber music performances in
Leipzig--and, of course, for the compensation from the Society's
purse due to you.

Stade's article on the "Faust Symphony" I have not yet received.
My last number of the Zeitschrift is that of July 6th. I am glad
that Stade does not disapprove of these Faust-things.--
Schondorf's Polonaise, Impromptu, etc., which Kahnt has sent me,
I have read through with pleasure and interest. With the next
sending to Rome please enclose the "Petrus" Oratorio by Meinardus
(the pianoforte score). In case the pianoforte score has not
appeared, then let me have the full score. And together with the
"Petrus" Oratorio please also send me the fragment of the
"Christus" Oratorio by Mendelssohn (published by Hartel).

My "Christus" Oratorio has, at last, since yesterday got so far
finished that I have now only got the revising, the copying and
the pianoforte score to do. Altogether it contains 12 musical
numbers (of which the "Seligkeiten" and the "Pater Noster" have
been published by Kahnt), and takes about three hours to perform.
I have composed the work throughout to the Latin text from the
Scriptures and the Liturgy. After a time I shall ask Riedel for
his assistance and advice with regard to the German wording.

Please give Alex Ritter my cordial thanks for his Amsterdam
report.

I cannot, at present, promise you any literary contributions for
the proposed Annual of the D. M. If the instrumental Introduction
to the "Elizabeth" (for piano-forte) would suit you I would
gladly place it at your disposal, reserving the copyright for the
subsequent publisher of the score, that is, his right to publish
the same Introduction again.

As far as I can foresee I shall remain here the whole winter. My
address is simply: To Commandeur Abbe Liszt--Rome.

Fuller performances of the Beethoven Symphonies and of the Dante
Symphony are to be given next Advent in the Dante Gallery.
Sgambati is to conduct them, and I have promised to attend the
rehearsals.

Heugel of Paris (Director of the Menestrel) is shortly to publish
a new edition of my Franciscus-legends.

With friendliest greetings, your attached

F. Liszt

October 2nd, 1866



48. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Much Esteemed Herr Doctor,

It is very mortifying to me to have to confess that I have most
awkwardly come to a standstill with the transcription of the
Beethoven Quartets. After several attempts the result was either
absolutely unplayable--or insipid stuff. Nevertheless I shall not
give up my project, and shall make another trial to solve this
problem of pianoforte arrangement. If I succeed I will at once
inform you of my "Heureka." [Discovery (from a Greek word).-
TRANS.]  Meanwhile I am occupied exclusively with the "Christus
Oratorio," which has, at last, advanced so far that all I have
now to do is to put the marks of expression in the score and the
pianoforte score.

Pray kindly excuse me if a small piece of vanity leads me to
address you with a wish. My "Symphonic Poems" have, as you know,
had a regular deluge of halberds hurled at them by the critics.
After all these murderous and deadly blows that have been aimed
at them, it would be very gratifying to me if the analyses of
these "Symphonic Poems" in which, a few years ago, Felix Draseke
discussed them severally in the Anregungen [Notices] could now be
published by you all together in the form of a brochure, for they
are written with a thorough knowledge of the subject, yet in a
kindly spirit.

On this account I begged Dr. Brendel to discuss the matter with
you, and now take the liberty of addressing you personally on the
subject of my wish.

With much esteem, yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, October 4th, 1866

Will you kindly send Cantor Gottschalg in Tieffurt a good copy of
my pianoforte scores of the nine Beethoven Symphonies? 49. To Dr.
Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

My heartfelt sympathy in the grievous loss which you have
sustained. [On November 15th, 1866, Dr. Brendel lost his wife,
Elizabeth nee Trautmann (born in St. Petersburg 1814). She was a
pianist and a pupil of Field and Berger. Dr. Brendel survived her
only two years.] It is an immeasurable sorrow on which one can
only be silent!--

Let us pass over to the business part of your letter. Our Grand
Duke informs me that there is to be a Wartburg Festival this
summer (a Jubilee in celebration of the 800th year of the
Wartburg's existence). And for this fete he wishes a performance
of the "Elizabeth-Legend" under my personal direction. I have
agreed to this, for, as the occasion is an exceptional one, I too
am enabled to make an exception to meet his commands. Now as the
Duke is Patron of the Tonkunstler-Verein, it seems to me
appropriate that this year's T. K. Versammlung should be brought
into some connection with the Wartburg Jubilee. Think the matter
over and discuss it with Gille. The date of the Wartb. Festival
has not been announced to me, and will probably not be settled
till later. As for myself I could not promise to remain more than
one month in Germany. Hence it would be agreeable to me
personally if the T. K. Versammlung were not kept apart from the
Wartburg Jubilee, and were arranged for about the same date; I
could then attend both. In case Bulow cannot undertake to act as
conductor, those to be mentioned as substitutes would be, no
doubt, Seifriz, Riedel, Damrosch, Lassen.-- Seifriz's hesitation
with regard to the publication of his Overture I consider to be
scrupulous beyond measure, and am of the opinion that he should
not hold to it any longer. Gille's circular (of December 9th) I,
of course, agree with, only the compensation of 50 thalers [about
71 British pounds sterling, 0s., 0d.] is somewhat too modest. I
should like to see an 0 added to the 50.--

The full score and pianoforte score of the "Elizabeth" contain a
mass of errors. The revising will take me a couple of weeks. At
the beginning of February I will send you the manuscript for
Kahnt's disposal, that is, if he is willing to comply with my
conditions about the publication (which I will write out
carefully for you). You know that I should have preferred to
postpone the publication of the "Elizabeth" for some time longer-
-still I understand Kahnt's difference of opinion, and desire to
prove myself willing, provided that you approve of my
willingness.

.--. Kindly, when you have an opportunity, remind Hartel about
sending the dedication-copy of my pianoforte scores of the
Beethoven Symphonies to Bulow. The copy ought to be properly
bound (in three volumes--3 Symphonies in every volume), and
addressed to Bulow, Johanniss-Vorstadt 31, Basel.

With sincere thanks and hearty good wishes for the year 1867, I
remain in unchanging friendship, yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 6th, 1867

The Neue Zeitschrift has not come for more than six months.



50. To Doctor Cuturi, Pisa

[From a rough copy of Liszt's in possession of Herr Alexander
Ritter in Munich]

Sir,

I am told that you would be good enough to take into
consideration my recommendation of Mr. Alexander Ritter. I hasten
therefore to assure you of the sincere esteem in which I hold his
remarkable talent as a violinist and his capability as an
orchestral conductor. His very extensive musical knowledge, his
frequent and close connection with virtuosi and celebrated
composers, and his practical experience of the best-known works
and orchestras qualify him in a high degree for the post that
would be offered to him at Pisa. The best judges discern in Mr.
Ritter not merely a brilliant virtuoso, able to obtain everywhere
applause and approbation, but also--which is more rare--a
consummate musician, endowed with the most noble feeling for Art,
and possessing the most perfect understanding of the works of the
great masters.

Besides this, sir, I am sure that you will find much pleasure in
your personal relations with him. All who know him bear testimony
to his honorable character as well as to his gentlemanly manners;
and I will merely add that amongst all my German friends there
are few of whom I preserve so affectionate a remembrance.

Pray accept, Monsieur le Docteur, the expression of my esteem and
distinguished consideration.

F. Liszt

Rome, January 22nd, 1867



51. To Julius von Beliczay in Vienna

[Hungarian composer, living in Budapest since 1871]

Dear Sir,

Accept my sincere thanks for your very friendly letter and for
the dedication of the Beethoven Cadenza. It sounds well and is
pleasant to play. Of course somewhat more might have been made of
the thing, and a different key taken at the outset than C minor.
But it is easier for me to play the critic than to do things
myself, and so today I will merely thank you and assure you of my
interest in your efforts and your success.

Very truly yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, April 29th, 1867



52. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear Madame,

I cannot tell you how your generosity of mind and heart touches
me. The favorable reception you have obtained at Florence for the
"Beatitudes" and the "Pater noster" is a link the more in the
chain of my musical obligations to you, dear and valliant
Maestra. Will you kindly convey my best thanks to your co-
operators. .--.

As a slight musical indication observe that in the "Pater noster"
I simply modulate and develop somewhat,--in the somewhat confined
limits of a sentiment of trusting and pious submission,--the
Gregorian intonation as sung in all our churches--

[Figure: Musical score excerpt setting the words "Pater noster
qui es in coelis"]

following the traditional intonations for each verse. This
framework was naturally adapted to the arranging of my Oratorio--
"Christ",--in which I employed two or three other intonations of
the plain-song, without considering myself guilty of a theft by
such a use.

You know that the rehearsals of the "Christ" have begun. With the
help of our dear and admirable Sgambati it will be able to be
given here at the end of June. I shall invite you to come and
hear it, and shall send you shortly the programme of the whole
work, which is going to be published previously.

But since you interest yourself with so rare a zeal in my poor
works and in making them known, I am tempted to propose to you
the 23rd and 137th Psalms for your Florence programmes. The
latter has been sung here this winter with some success. It is
not very troublesome to study; provided that the singer
understands what she has to say the rest goes of itself. The
accompaniment is limited to four instruments,--Harp, Violin,
Harmonium and Piano; and, as in the Magnificat of the Dante
Symphony, the chorus is written for Soprano and Alto voices
(without Tenors or Basses). The text is excessively simple, and
is reduced to the one word, Jerusalem!

Perhaps you may also meet with a kind soul who is willing to
translate into Italian the Chorus of Reapers ("Schnitterchor")
from the Prometheus, which could be performed quite simply with
piano accompaniment.

I will permit myself to send you the two Psalms next week by Mrs.
Pearsoll (of New York), to whom I have sung your praises, a
matter in which I yield to no one. Happily the opportunity for
practising this recurs often: Mme. d'Usedom (whom I met the other
evening at Bn. Arnim's) will speak to you of it. .--.

As soon as I receive positive tidings about the coronation at
Pest you shall know. I shall certainly not stir from Rome this
time without coming to spend some hours with you at Florence.

Continue your friendship to me, and believe in mine, very cordial
and grateful.

F. Liszt

Rome, May 24th, 1867

The success of Bronsart's Trio delights me. You will give him
great pleasure if you will write him a couple of lines, which you
must address simply "H. v. B. Intendant des Hoftheaters.
Hannover." Tell him about Sgambati and his Trio at Rome and
Florence. I, on my side, will write to Bronsart as soon as my
summer plans are fixed.



53. To Eduard Liszt

Very dear Eduard,

You know that the Coronation Mass has met with the most kind
reception. [At its performance at Ofen (Budapest)] None of my
works up to the present time had been so favorably accepted. I
have begged Franz Doppler in particular to let you know about it,
knowing that you would like to hear me praised, even with some
exaggeration, by a friend as competent as he is affectionate.
Since the performance of the "Gran Mass" Doppler has always shown
the kindest feelings towards me. Tell him that I am very
sincerely grateful to him. I am anxious to thank Schelle [Musical
critic of the Vienna Presse, since dead] for his excellent
article in the Presse, and send you herewith a few lines which
you will be good enough to give him...

The rehearsals of my Oratorio "Le Christ" are progressing. It
will probably be performed in the early part of July, and I will
have the programme sent to you.

Towards the end of July I shall go to Weimar. The "Wartburg
Festival" is fixed for the 28th August. On that day the Elisabeth
will be heard in the hall of the Minnesingers. A fortnight before
that the concerts of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung will take place
at Meiningen. Possibly you may be able to come and look me up in
the course of this same month of August.

Yours ever from heart and soul,

F. Liszt

Rome, June 20th, 1867



54. To William Mason in New York

Dear Mr. Mason,

Your kind letter gives me a very cordial pleasure, and I beg you
to be assured of the continuance of my very affectionate
feelings. I frequently hear your success in America spoken of.
You deserve it, and I rejoice to know that your talent is justly
appreciated and applauded. Your compositions have not yet reached
me, but I am fully disposed to give them a good reception. In
about a fortnight I shall start for Weimar. The Tonkunstler-
Versammlung is to take place at Meiningen this year from the 22nd
to the 25th August. I shall be present at it, as also at the
Jubilee Festival at the Wartburg, at which my Oratorio "Saint
Elizabeth" will be performed on the 28th August. Perhaps I shall
meet there Mr. Theodore Thomas and Mr. S.B. Mills, of whom you
speak. I have heard the highest praises of the capability of Mr.
Thomas, whom I have to thank particularly for the interest he
takes in my Symphonic Poems. Artists who are willing to take the
trouble to understand and to interpret my works cut themselves
off from the generality of their fraternity. I, more than any
one, have to thank them for this, therefore I shall not fail to
show my thanks to Messrs. Thomas and Mills when I have the
pleasure of making their acquaintance.

The news which reaches me from time to time about musical matters
in America is generally favorable to the cause of the progress of
contemporaneous Art which I hold it an honor to serve and to
sustain. It seems that, among you, the cavillings and blunders
and stupidities of a criticism adulterated by ignorance, envy and
venality exercise less influence than in the old continent. I
congratulate you on this, and give you my best wishes that you
may happily pursue this noble careerof an artist,--with work,
perseverance, resignation, modesty, and the imperturbable faith
in the Ideal, such as was indicated to you at Weimar, dear Mr.
Mason, by your very sincerely affectionate and attached

F. Liszt

Rome, July 8th, 1867



55. To E. Repos, director of the "Revue de Musique sacree" in
Paris

[Autograph of all the letters to Repos in the possession of Herr
Dr. Oscar von Hase in Leipzig.]

Dear sir,

I am very much obliged to you for the kind feelings you express
to me, and beg to assure you of my desire to correspond to them.
By your activity and the character of your publications our
interests are naturally similar; I will take care to make them as
agreeable as possible to you.

The day after tomorrow I will send you four or five small pages
which, if I mistake not, will suit you,--and which may be
propagated. It is a simple and easy version for Organ of the hymn
"Tu es Petrus," lately performed here on the eighteen-hundredth
anniversary of St. Peter. I hope you will find an organist in
Paris who is willing to appropriate this piece and by his talent
to make it worth hearing.

As I am anxious that your edition should be perfectly correct I
beg that you will send me the proofs. Address them to me, from
the loth to the 30th August, at Weimar, Grand Duke of Saxe-
Weimar, Germany. The performance of my Oratorio "Saint
Elizabeth," at the jubilee Festival of the Wartburg on the 28th
August, calls me into those parts of Thuringia which "Saint
Elizabeth" has illustrated.

I shall start from here in about a week. Will you therefore defer
what you are so kindly intending to send me until my return to
Rome (end of October)? Accept, dear sir, my best thanks, together
with the assurance of my very distinguished and devoted
sentiments.

F. Liszt

Rome, July 12th, 1867

Here, as in Germany, my name is enough without any more detailed
address.



56. To Prince Constantine Czartoryski

[From a rough copy in Liszt's own handwriting enclosed in the
following letter. The addressee, President of the Society of the
Friends of Music, died in 1891 in Vienna, where he was Vice-
President of the Herrenhaus.]

My Prince,

The two letters which you have done me the honor to address to me
at Rome and Munich have reached me at the same time. I cannot but
feel myself highly flattered at your kind proposition with regard
to the performance of my Oratorio "Saint Elizabeth" at one of the
concerts of the musical society over which you preside. The great
renown of these concerts, the rare capability of their conductor
Mr. Herbeck, the talent of the artists who take part in them, and
the care that is taken to maintain the traditions of the musical
glory of Vienna, make it very desirable for every serious
composer to take a place in their programme. Thus I am most
sincerely grateful to you, my Prince, for procuring me this
honor, which however, much to my regret, I should not be able to
accept without some delay.

It would be wearisome to enter into many details; one fact alone
will suffice: the score of the "Elizabeth" is to be sent back to
be engraved, and I promised the editor not to let it go anywhere
else before its publication. Besides this the voice and
orchestral parts which were used at the Wartburg are no longer
available.

Kindly pardon me therefore that I cannot in this matter satisfy
your favorable intentions as I should like. "What is deferred is
not lost," says a proverb to which I prefer to attach myself
today, while begging you to accept, my Prince, the expression of
the sentiments of high esteem and consideration with which I have
the honor to be

Your Highness's very humble and devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Munich, October 14th, 1867



57. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

My hearty thanks to you for your letter. It almost made me
determine to send Prince Czartoryski an answer in the
affirmative; but when I came to think the matter over more fully
it did not seem suitable, considering my peculiar position.
Enclosed is a copy of my letter to Czartoryski; I hope you may
not disapprove of it; let me give you a few more reasons.

1st. I really cannot at present send off the only existing copy
of the score of the "Elizabeth", for it is required for printing.
Nor should I care to have the orchestra and chorus parts from
Munich used, and this I wrote to Prince Cz. It was for this very
same reason that I declined offers respecting performances of the
"Elizabeth" from Dusseldorf, Leipzig, Dresden, etc.

2nd. I do not share your rosy hopes of this work proving a
success in towns where my earlier works not only met with little
appreciation, but even received unseemly rebuffs. In Vienna,
Leipzig, Berlin and even larger cities, the hisses of half a
dozen stupid boys or evil-disposed persons were always sufficient
to delude the public, and to frustrate the best intentions of my
somewhat disheartened friends. In the newspaper criticisms these
hissing critics are sure to find numerous supporters and pleasant
re-echoes as long as the one object of the majority of my judges
of this species is to get me out of their way. The improvement,
which is said of late to have shown itself in regard to my
position, may be interpreted somewhat thus: "For years in his
Symphonic Poems, his Masses, Pianoforte works, Songs, etc., Liszt
has written mere bewildering and objectionable stuff; in his
"Elizabeth" he appears to have acted somewhat more rationally--
still, etc., etc."--Now as I am in no way inclined to cry peccavi
for all my compositions, or to assume that the castigations they
received were just and justifiable, I do not consider it
advisable to subscribe to the supposed extenuating circumstances
of the "Elizabeth". I well know the proverb: "Non enim qui se
ipsum commendat, ille probatus est," and do not think I am
sinning against it. However it is possible that my resolute
friends may, in the end, be right in asserting that my things are
not so bad as they are made out to be!--Meanwhile what I have to
do is to go on working quietly and undismayed, without in the
smallest degree urging the performance of my works-nay in
restraining some friendly disposed conductors from undertaking
them.

3rd. After having two years ago excused myself to Herbeck about
allowing a performance of the "Elizabeth" in Vienna, I cannot now
immediately accept the friendly offer of Prince Czartoryski. It
might be somewhat different had Herbeck attended the Wartburg
performance, as I invited him to do through Schelle. But much as
I appreciate and admire Herbeck's talent as a conductor, still I
cannot know in advance whether he likes my work or not, or how
far he agrees with my intentions. At all events I should have to
come to some personal understanding with him on the subject
before a performance is given in Vienna, just because this is a
matter of importance to me, and the performance ought not to be a
dementi of the preceding ones. It is much more to my advantage
not to have my works performed at all, than to allow them to be
performed in a half-and-half or unsatisfactory manner.--I may say
quite frankly that it would certainly be very agreeable to me to
stand in a somewhat better light in Vienna as a composer than I
have hitherto done. But the time has not come for that--and if it
should ever come, half a dozen of my compositions, for instance
the 13th Psalm, the Faust and Dante Symphonies, some of the
Symphonic Poems, and even, horribile dictu! the Prometheus
Chorus, would have to be introduced to the public in proper
style. Three concerts would be necessary for this, and would have
to be announced beforehand, arranged and rehearsed, and there the
"Elizabeth" might also then find a place among them. Herbeck
would be an excellent one to arrange and conduct these concerts,
provided he were not too much afraid of the obligations due to
criticism. My personal position will not permit of my taking any
part in them as a conductor; nevertheless I should not care to be
altogether idle on the occasion, and hence should like, first of
all, to have a careful discussion with Herbeck about various
points that must absolutely be given thus and in no other way. It
was in this sense that I wrote to Czartoryski that: "Ce qui est
differe nest pas perdu" ("Aufgeschoben ist nicht aufgehoben")
["Put off is not given up."]--and so I may possibly come to
Vienna--in the winter of '69.

First of all, however, I need several quiet months in Rome in
order again to take up the work that has been interrupted for so
long. The Bulows have persuaded me to spend my birthday with
them. The Munich Musik-Schule is in full activity and seems as if
it were likely to outstrip the other Conservatoires. Bulow is
assuredly justified in saying, "Go and do likewise"!--

Before the end of the month I shall be back in Rome. All hearty
good wishes to you and yours, from your faithfully attached,

F. Liszt

Munich, October 16th, 1867

P.S.--Before long you will receive a visit from August Rockel.
This name will probably call up to your imagination--as it has
done in many other cases--an ultra-revolutionary agitator; in
place of which you will find a gentle, refined, kindly and
excellent man. I should like you to cultivate his acquaintance,
and can cordially recommend him to you. His daughter (at the Burg
Theater) you are sure to know--and you will also know of his old
friendship with Wagner and Bulow. It was not till I came here
that I became acquainted with Rockel and learned to value him.

Have you read in the Augsburger Allgem. Zeitung the extremely
kind notice of my stay in Stuttgart? Best thanks also for sending
me your article on the "Wanderer."



58. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

By some mistake I did not receive your letter of the 16th till
today. From my last you will have clearly seen that I do not wish
any further performance of the "Elizabeth" before the score is
published. As I told you, I have declined the offers from
Dusseldorf, Dresden and other towns. Even as regards Leipzig,
where I am under special obligations to Riedel (for he has on
several occasions got his Society to give excellent performances
of the "Gran Mass," the "Prometheus" choruses, the "Seligkeiten,"
etc.), I shall endeavor to defer the promised performance of the
"Elizabeth." The matter would be one of special importance to me
as regards Vienna,--and for this very reason I am anxious not to
be in too great a hurry. Hence I most gratefully accept your
mediation with Prince Czartoryski. Be my kind mediator and point
out to him my peculiar position, so that there may not be any
sort of vexation--and let the "Elizabeth" remain unperformed. I
think I have clearly stated my reasons for this passive, or, if
you prefer it, this expectative mode of action.

It would interest me to know how the "Coronation Mass" was
performed and received in Vienna. Ask Herbeck in my name not to
drag the tempi; the "Gloria," more especially, must be taken the
more rapidly as it proceeds--the time to be beaten throughout
alla breve. Send me word about this to Rome.

To please the Bulows I shall remain here till October 24th,--and
be back in Rome, at latest, on the 30th.

If Bulow goes on working here for a couple of years, Munich will
become the musical capital of Germany. In addition to my interest
in all musical matters here, my stay has offered many other
points of interest and pleasure by my intercourse with Kaulbach,
Liebig, Heyse, Geibel, Redwitz, etc.--

Cordially yours,

F. Liszt

Munich, October 20th, 1867

Enclosed is a tolerably good photograph of my humble self.



59. To Peter Cornelius in Munich

Dearest Cornelius,

I am grieved not to have met you yesterday, so as to have thanked
you at once for the indescribable pleasure your poem gave me. The
little interpreter Lulu [Daniela, the eldest daughter of H. v.
Bulow, now married to Prof. Dr. Thode] recited it twice admirably
without the smallest error or stumbling. I most sincerely wish
that all your works may find such interpreters as Lulu, so fully
able to grasp your sentiments that your audience has nothing to
do but to weep--as was our feeling yesterday with Cosima, when we
both wept like children!

With all my heart, your

F. Liszt

Wednesday, October 23rd, 1867 [Munich]



60. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

The enclosed letter from Chordirector Kumenecker [The Director of
the Altlerchenfelder Kirchenmusik-Verein, in Vienna, had
requested Liszt to grant him permission to give a performance of
the "Coronation Mass."] I received only on my return to Rome
(November 6th). Be so good as to pay the writer of it a visit in
my name, and ask him kindly to excuse my not complying with his
request. Also tell him that I have not got either the chorus or
the orchestral parts of the "Coronation Mass." The only existing
copies are those belonging to the Court orchestra of Vienna;
hence these parts would have either to be obtained or to be
copied if a performance of the work is to be given elsewhere, and
this I should not care either to advise or disadvise.

The Mass fulfilled its object in Pest on the Coronation Day. If
it should be given on any future occasion, I would recommend the
conductor to take the tempi solemnly always, but never dragging,
and to beat the time throughout alla Breve. And the "Gloria,"
more especially towards the middle and before the commencement of
the "Agnus Dei" up to the Prestissimo, must be worked up
brilliantly and majestically. Whether and when the "Coronation
Mass" is to appear in print I do not know. Dunkl (Roszavoglyi) in
Pest had intended to publish it, but the honorarium of 100 ducats
seems to make him hesitate, and I will not accept any smaller
sum. Two movements from it (the "Offertorium" and "Benedictus") I
have transcribed for the piano, and these may be bought
separately, which will be an advantage to the publisher. And the
pianoforte arrangements for one or two performers are to appear
simultaneously with the score.--It is of no importance to me to
have the work published immediately. If you should meet Carl
Haslinger and have an opportunity, ask him whether he would risk
100 ducats upon it. As he has already published a number of
Masses, this one might suit him as well. If not, it is all the
same to me. Only I cannot make any alteration about the
honorarium I have now fixed upon. [The "Coronation Mass," like
the "Gran Mass," was published by Schuberth, Leipzig.]

Yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, November 6th, 1867



61. To E. Repos

Dear Sir,

Pray excuse me for replying so late to your kind and cordial
letter. Various matters detained me in Germany longer than I
expected, and I have only been back three days at my house at
"Santa Francesca Romana," where I shall spend the winter. Your
publications will be excellent company to me here. I accept with
gratitude the Gradual and Vesperal [Gradual--a portion of the
Mass. Vesperal--book of evening prayer] (in--12) that you are
kind enough to offer me, and beg you to let me have them shortly.
What can I on my side send you that will be agreeable to you?
Something will be found, I hope, for I sincerely desire to
satisfy you.

It seems to me that it would not be of any use for you to
undertake to publish now one or two large works of my
composition. In order to be somewhat accredited, they must first
of all be performed and heard, not en passant, but seriously and
several times. For this I have no support in France, and should
even expose myself to unpleasant dispositions and interpretations
if I in the least endeavored to bring myself forward there. It is
only in Germany, Hungary, and Holland that, in spite of frequent
and lively opposition, my name as a composer has acquired a
certain weight. In those countries they continue performing my
music by inclination, curiosity, and interest, without my asking
anybody to do so. You have probably heard of the favorable
reception that the "Legend of St. Elizabeth" met with at the
Festival of the Wartburg at the end of August. For two years past
this work has been performed several times at Pest, Prague,
Munich, and I have recently been asked for it from Vienna,
Dresden, Leipzig, Aix-la-Chapelle, etc., but as the score has to
be sent to be engraved I have not been able to lend it further. I
shall give myself the pleasure of sending you a copy towards
Easter.-It is also in Germany (probably at Munich) that my
Oratorio "Le Christ" will be first given: now, as it is important
to me that the first complete performance (for the one in Rome on
the occasion of the centenary of St. Peter was only a tentative
and partial one) should be as satisfactory as possible, I must be
present at it. Consequently it will not take place till the
winter of '69--if I am still in this world then,--it being my
intention not to leave Rome for a year.

Pardon me these details, dear sir. As the cordiality of your
letter assures me that we shall have long business relations with
one another, it is better to put you at once in possession of the
facts of my musical situation. It prescribes to me duties
attached to many restrictions which my ecclesiastical capacity
increases still more. "Providemus enim bona non solum coram Deo
sed etiam coram hominibus."--

To return to your publications. Palestrina, Lassus, the masters
of the 16th and 17th centuries, are your models par excellence.
You have plenty of work for years to come to edit their admirable
works, and to put yourself on a par with the collection published
(cheap) at Ratisbon under the title of "Musica divina." Moreover
there is nothing to prevent you from adding many a composition
more or less modern. Dispose of my few, as you are pleased to
admit them. You might begin with the "Credo" (from the
"Coronation Mass"), and the "Te Deum" in plain song [cantus
planus] of which you speak. Later on a tolerably simple Mass,
with organ accompaniment only, might perhaps find a place. Then,
two excerpts from the Oratorio "Christ,"--"the Beatitudes" and
the "Pater noster"--which have already appeared at Leipzig, might
reappear in Paris, especially if there were any favorable
opportunity of getting them heard. As to the Oratorio entire, it
will be better still to wait awhile longer.

"Expectans expectavi"...and let my biographical notice which you
have in view also wait. In order to make it exact and
comprehensive, it would be necessary for me to give some data to
the writer who would undertake the task of representing me today
to the public. Many things have been printed about me in a
transient way. Amongst the most remarkable articles that of Mr.
Fetis, in his "Biographie universelle des Musiciens" (second
edition), of which you tell me, takes the foremost place.
Nevertheless, however much disposed I am to acknowledge the
conscientious and kind intentions towards myself of the
illustrious and learned man, and even whilst really thanking him
for raising the importance of my works which he connects with
"one of the transformations of Art," I shall not have the false
humility of accepting some of his valuations as definitive
judgments. Of all the theorists whom I know, Mr. Fetis is the one
who has best ascertained and defined the progress of harmony and
rhythm in music; on such chief points as these I flatter myself
that I am in perfect accord with him. For the rest he must excuse
me for escaping in different ways from the critical school whose
ways he extols. According to his theory Art ought to progress,
develop, be enriched, and clothed in new forms; but in practice
he hesitates, and kicks against the pricks,--and, for all that,
would insist that the "transformation" should take place without
in the least disturbing existing customs, and so as to charm
everybody with the greatest ease. Would to Heaven that it might
be so! Between this and them, pray accept, dear sir, my best
thanks, together with the expressions of my very distinguished
and devoted sentiments.

F. Liszt

Rome, November 8th, 1867--Santa Francesca Romana

P.S.--My sincere congratulations for the cross of St. Sylvestre.
People outside are quite mistaken in thinking that they are
lavish with decorations here.

I have informed the Princess W. of your kind arrangements
relative to t